[]

[]

Verso would like to express its gratitude to Rosa Luxemburg Stiftung for
help in publishing this book

[]

The publisher also gratefully acknowledges the assistance of Dietz
Verlag for allowing the publication of translations of “The Industrial
Development in Poland,” “Introduction to Political Economy” and “Back to
Adam Smith” based on Rosa Luxemburg’s _Gesammelte Werke_, as well as
gratitude, alongside M. Krätke, for providing transcripts of the seven
manuscripts from the SPD Party School.
First published by Verso 2013
© Verso 2013
English translation of chapters 1 and 4 through 10 and appendix
© George Shriver 2013
English translation of Chapter 2 © Joseph Fracchia 2013
English translation of Chapter 3 © David Fernbach 2013

Introduction © Peter Hudis 2013

All rights reserved

The moral rights of the authors have been asserted

VERSO

UK: 6 Meard Street, London W1F 0EG
US: 20 Jay Street, Suite 1010, Brooklyn, NY 11201

www.versobooks.com

ISBN (US): 9781844679751
ISBN (UK): 978-1-78168-539-6

Verso is the imprint of New Left Books

ISBN-13: 978-1-84467-974-4
eBook ISBN: 978-1-84467-975-1

BRITISH LIBRARY CATALOGUING IN PUBLICATION DATA
A catalogue record for this book is available from the British Library

LIBRARY OF CONGRESS CATALOGING-IN-PUBLICATION DATA
A catalog record for this book is available from the Library of Congress

v3.1



CONTENTS


_Cover_

_Title Page_

_Copyright_

_Introduction_ by Peter Hudis

  About Your eBook

  1. The Industrial Development of Poland

  2. Back to Adam Smith!

  3. Introduction to Political Economy

  4. Slavery

  5. Notes About the Economic Form of Antiquity/Slavery

  6. The Middle Ages. Feudalism. Development of Cities

  7. Practical Economics: Volume 2 of Marx’s _Capital_

  8. History of Crises

  9. Practical Economics: Volume 3 of Marx’s _Capital_

10. History of Political Economy

Appendix: Theory of the Wages Fund

_Author’s Notes_

_Editor’s Notes_

_A Glossary of Personal Names_



ABOUT YOUR EBOOK


Throughout _THE COMPLETE WORKS OF ROSA LUXEMBURG: VOLUME I: ECONOMICS
WRITINGS I_, notes from the author are set in Roman numerals and notes
from the editor are in Arabic numerals.

When you see and click a ROMAN numeral, you will be taken to the end of
the chapter you are reading. To get back to the page you were reading,
simply click the Roman numeral to get back to your page of text. If your
eReader allows, simply press the back button or arrow.

When you see and click an ARABIC numeral, you will be taken to the NOTES
section in the back of your eBook. To get back to the page you were
reading, simply click the Arabic numeral to get back to your page of
text. If your eReader allows, simply press the back button or arrow.



INTRODUCTION: THE MULTIDIMENSIONALITY OF ROSA LUXEMBURG


I.

The depth and breadth of Rosa Luxemburg as theoretician, activist, and
original personality was once expressed by her in the following terms:

I feel, in a word, the need as [Wladyslaw] Heine would say, to “say
something great” … I feel that within me there is maturing a completely
new and original form which dispenses with the usual formulas and
patterns and breaks them down … I feel with utter certainty that
something is there, that something will be born.¹

This quest for what she called a “land of boundless possibilities” can
be regarded as one of her most distinguishing characteristics.

This is most of all evident from Luxemburg’s intellectual and political
commitments. By the time of her death in 1919 she was renowned as one of
the most fiercely independent figures in European radicalism. Refusing
to define herself in the terms often adopted by her contemporaries, she
issued a searing critique of the inhumanity of capitalism while being no
less critical of what she viewed as misguided efforts by radicals to
supplant it. Her understanding that capitalism could only be overcome
through a thoroughly participatory and democratic process that actively
involves the _majority_ of the oppressed² was a departure from the
hierarchical models of electoral politics and revolutionary putschism
that defined so many efforts at social change in the twentieth century,
just as it anticipates the aspirations of many feminists, ecologists,
and Occupy activists struggling in the twenty-first century to avoid the
errors of the past.

Luxemburg’s quest for a “land of boundless possibilities” is
unmistakable to anyone who encounters her numerous political pamphlets,
essays, and articles—whether her well-known publications such as _Reform
or Revolution, The Mass Strike, the Political Party, and the Trade
Unions_ or _The Russian Revolution_, or her many lesser-known works that
have never been translated in English but which will all appear in the
_Complete Works_.³ The same is true of her voluminous correspondence,
which illuminates her original personality and remarkable span of
interests—literary, scientific, and political—all grounded in an effort
to stay true to what it means to be human.⁴

What may not have received sufficient attention in some quarters is that
Luxemburg’s effort to “say something great” is most powerfully exhibited
in her four major books—_The Industrial Development of Poland;
Introduction to Political Economy; The Accumulation of Capital;_ and
_The Accumulation of Capital, or What the Epigones Have Made of Marx’s
Theory: An Anti-Critique_.⁵ Each is a Marxist analysis of economic
phenomena. Taken as a whole, they represent the most comprehensive study
of capitalism’s inherent tendency towards global expansion ever written.
Living as we are at a historical moment in which the logic of capital
has now expanded to cover the entire world, the time has surely come to
revisit these writings by one of the most important women economists of
the twentieth century.

This effort has been hindered, however, by the fact that much of
Luxemburg’s work (including the bulk of her articles, essays, and
letters) has yet to appear in English. This is also true of her economic
writings, since until now the Anglophone world has lacked a complete
translation of one of her most important books, the _Introduction to
Political Economy_. The _Introduction_ contains material not found in
her other works, critiques of such theorists as Karl Bücher, Werner
Sombart and Max Weber; analyses of pre-capitalist societies, such as
those in sub-Saharan Africa and pre-Columbian America; and a detailed
discussion of the role of wage labor in contemporary capitalism.

The _Introduction_ was composed as part of her work as a teacher—a
dimension of her work that is little known in the English-speaking
world. From 1907 to 1914 she taught history, economics, and social
theory at the German Social-Democratic Party’s school in Berlin. She
devoted considerable time and energy to her teaching and wrote the
_Introduction to Political Economy_ as a result of her discussions with
students at the party school. As part of this work, she composed a
number of manuscripts and lecture notes (seven in all survive), which
have only recently come to light. Only part of one of these seven
manuscripts has previously appeared in English;⁶ all are published in
full in this volume. They indicate how intently Luxemburg kept up with
the latest literature on economic history, sociology, anthropology, and
ethnology, and serve as an important supplement to the _Introduction to
Political Economy_ and _Accumulation of Capital_. Together with a number
of her pre-1914 economic writings, such as her dissertation on _The
Industrial Development of Poland_, a manuscript of 1897 on the theory of
the wages fund, and an essay from 1899 on Marxian value theory, this
volume provides a fuller picture of Luxemburg’s contribution as an
economic theorist than has heretofore been available.

A second volume of her economic writings will contain a new English
translation of _The Accumulation of Capital_ and _Anti-Critique_ as well
as the chapter on Volumes 2 and 3 of Marx’s _Capital_ that she
originally wrote for Franz Mehring’s biography of Karl Marx. The
_Complete Works_ will be rounded out with seven volumes of political
writings and five volumes of correspondence.

Just as Luxemburg’s stature cannot be fully appreciated without taking
account of her as a political figure and an inspiring personality, her
overall contribution cannot be grasped without engaging with her work as
an economic theorist. It is for this reason that we have decided to
begin this fourteen-volume _Complete Works_ with her economic writings.
Surely, separating her oeuvre into economic and political categories is
somewhat artificial. As she indicates in her correspondence, her initial
approach to economic theory was largely stimulated by a _political_
problematic—the expansion of European imperialism into Asia and Africa.
She wrote, “Around 1895, a basic change occurred: the Japanese war
opened Chinese doors, and European politics, driven by capitalist and
state interests, intruded into Asia … It is clear that the dismembering
of Asia and Africa is the final limit beyond which European politics no
longer has room to unfold.”⁷ Luxemburg’s effort to comprehend the
phenomena of imperialism and how it points to the dissolution or “the
final crisis” of capitalism determined much of the content of her
economic work. Meanwhile, many of her “political” writings—such as
_Reform or Revolution_—contain brilliant analyses of the economic law of
motion of capitalism and its proclivity for cyclical crises. Yet given
the amount of time, care, and attention that Luxemburg gave to
developing her major economic works, it makes sense to begin the
_Complete Works_ with the writings that contain her most detailed and
analytically specific delineation of Marxian economics. It is here where
her brilliance, originality, and independence of intellect—as well as
some of her misjudgments and limitations—are most readily visible.


II.

Not long after being forced to flee Poland as a teenager, where she
became active in the nascent Polish Marxist movement, Luxemburg moved to
Switzerland and enrolled in the University of Zurich. By May 1897 she
had earned a Ph.D. in economics—one of the first women in Europe to
obtain one. Her dissertation, _The Industrial Development of Poland_,
was the first detailed analysis of the development of capitalism in
Poland. Based on original research at the Bibliotèque Nationale and
Czartoryski Library in Paris, it was a rigorous, empirical study that
immediately defined her as a serious theoretician. Unusual for the time,
it was published as a book by a major German publisher soon after its
completion and was widely (and warmly) reviewed by both radical émigrés
and academic economists.⁸

That _The Industrial Development of Poland_ earned Luxemburg a degree
and did not explicitly reveal the extent of her commitment to
revolutionary politics (Marx is mentioned only once in it) should not be
taken to mean she had her eye on an academic career. Instead, the
dissertation was central to her effort to come to grips with how the
Marxist analysis speaks to her particular homeland. Although Luxemburg
did not obtain a major international reputation until the revisionist
debate in German Social Democracy in 1898–99, her dissertation already
established her as an important _Marxist_ thinker.

Central to the dissertation is the theme found throughout her subsequent
work: internationalism. She analyzed the economy of Russian-occupied
Poland as a part of an increasingly globalized capitalist system by
detailing how its industrial development was dependent on goods and
skills imported from Western Europe as well as new markets being opened
up through Russia’s penetration of Asia. Poland’s economy, she insisted,
was increasingly dependent on global capital; any independent path of
national development was foreclosed by economic reality. She wrote, “It
is an inherent law of the capitalist method of production that it
strives to materially bind together the most distant places, little by
little, to make them economically dependent on each other, and
eventually transform the entire world into one firmly joined productive
mechanism.”⁹

This in turn became the basis of her effort to address the question that
most bedeviled the Polish Marxist movement from its inception: what
position to take on demands for national self-determination. Should the
struggle for socialism be inextricably connected to demands for national
independence? Or does the former make the latter superfluous? In direct
contrast to Marx and Engels, who consistently supported the Polish
independence struggles,¹⁰ Luxemburg opposed all calls for national
self-determination for Poland. _The Industrial Development of Poland_
represents the economic justification for this political position by
arguing that Poland’s economy had become so integral to Russia’s that
any and all calls for national independence had become thoroughly
utopian and impractical.

Many of the debates addressed in _The Industrial Development of Poland_
were resolved long ago, and not always to Luxemburg’s credit. Her
contention that the deepening economic links between Finland and Russia
signifies “the beginning of the end of Finnish independence in
_political_ terms”¹¹ has hardly stood the test of time; Finland achieved
national independence from Russia in December 1917, just as Poland
itself did only a few months later. Despite the considerable problems
that plagued the Polish economy between the two world wars, her claim
that demands for its national independence had become totally
impractical have clearly been undermined by the actual historical
developments.

At the same time, her dissertation’s keen appreciation of the impact of
the global economy on efforts to foster capitalistic industrialization
means it is not as dated or distant as may appear at first sight.
Efforts at industrial modernization that try to seal off a country from
the deleterious impact of the world market, she suggests, are inherently
counter-productive, since capital accumulation is dependent on a web of
influences that extend beyond national borders. Her work counters the
claim that development can best be secured by relying solely on a
nation’s internal resources—a point that many socialists have belatedly
begun to discover in recent decades, in light of the painful failures
that have accompanied many efforts to pursue a nationalist development
strategy in the developing world.

After completing her dissertation, Luxemburg moved to Germany and became
a leading figure in the German Social-Democratic Party and Second
International. Her reputation secured by her intervention in the
revisionism controversy of 1898–99, she became a much sought after
public speaker, journalist, political campaigner, and agitator. By
1905–6, when she returned to Poland to participate in the Russian
Revolution and penned her famous pamphlet on _The Mass Strike, the
Political Parties, and the Trade Unions_, she had become known as an
uncompromising opponent of bureaucracy and political elitism and a firm
defender of rank-and-file initiatives and mass spontaneity.

Although some of Luxemburg’s biographers have tended to view her work of
1907–14 as less significant than that from 1898 to 1907,¹² the years
between the _Mass Strike_ pamphlet and the outbreak of World War I
actually marked the period in which she produced her most important
theoretical work. Much of it was connected to her work as a teacher at
the SPD’s school in Berlin. Founded in 1906 in response to growing
interest in radical ideas following the 1905 Revolution,¹³ its aim was
to educate party cadres and trade unionists in Marxist theory, history,
and sociology.

Luxemburg began teaching at the school in October 1907. Despite lacking
any formal experience as a teacher, she plunged into the work with
enthusiasm and soon became one of the most popular instructors. Her
teaching load was intensive: she lectured five days a week for two hours
a day and spent additional time advising and assisting students. She was
the only woman on the teaching staff.

Luxemburg’s massive theoretical output from 1907 to 1914, much of it
devoted to economic theory, was directly impacted by her experience as a
teacher. As J.P. Nettl put it, “Undoubtedly the constant polishing of
ideas before her students helped Rosa greatly to clarify her own mind on
the basic propositions of her political faith.”¹⁴ Luxemburg was in fact
deeply invested in critical pedagogy. It reflected her life-long
commitment to intellectual and cultural advancement as at the heart of
the struggle for a new society. She defined her teaching philosophy
thusly:

We have tried to make clear to them … that they must continue to go on
learning, that they will go on learning all their lives … What the
masses need is general education, theory which gives them the chance of
making a system out of the detail acquired from experience and which
helps to forge a deadly weapon against our enemies.¹⁵

This was part and parcel of her view in the _Mass Strike_ pamphlet that
“The most precious, because lasting, thing in this rapid ebb and flow of
the wave [of class struggle] is its mental sediment: the intellectual,
cultural growth of the proletariat.”¹⁶

Along similar lines, she argued that the ability of the bourgeoisie to
throw off the fetters of absolutism, which was so important for the
unfolding of capitalism as a global system, could not have occurred
without such intellectual revolutions as the Enlightenment that preceded
it:

[P]olitical economy, along with the philosophical, social, and
natural-rights theories of the age of Enlightenment, was above all a
means for acquiring self-consciousness, a formulation of the class
consciousness of the bourgeoisie and as such a precondition and impulse
for the revolutionary act.¹⁷

Ideas, she held, are not merely epiphenomenal—which is one reason why
this painstaking Marxian materialist had no problem identifying herself
as an _idealist_.¹⁸

On the basis of her lectures and discussions at the party school, she
decided to work on a full-length book, eventually called _Introduction
to Political Economy_. Several of her fellow teachers first suggested
the idea of such a book so that her lectures could obtain a wider
audience. She began doing research for the book at the end of 1907, and
by the summer of 1908 was already looking forward to preparing a
manuscript for the printer.¹⁹ As of this period of 1907/08, the content
of her planned book closely corresponded to the subjects of her
lectures, which were listed as follows: 1) What Is Economics?; 2) Social
Labor; 3) Exchange; 4) Wage Labor; 5) The Rule of Capital; 6)
Contradictions in the Capitalist Economy.²⁰

As she proceeded to work on the book, she decided to include additional
material on pre-capitalist societies that was not part of her initial
lectures at the party school. This took her into intense studies of the
latest literature on ancient, medieval, and early modern societies. In
the summer of 1909 she began preparing the manuscript for publication;
in 1910 she completed an initial draft, containing eight chapters. She
intended to first publish the work as eight separate brochures or
pamphlets and later as a complete book.²¹

In the course of working on the last brochure or chapter in November
1911—dealing with the trajectory of capitalism as a whole—Luxemburg
encountered what she called a “puzzling aspect” of a larger subject:
namely, _what are the barriers that prevent the continued expansion of
capitalism_? She was acutely aware that “What particularly distinguishes
the capitalist mode of production from all its predecessors is that it
has the inherent impetus to extend automatically across the whole of the
earth, and drive out all other earlier social orders.”²² This drive for
global expansion, she held, is the economic basis of colonialism and
imperialism. On these grounds, she repeatedly attacked the leading
economists of the time, such as Karl Bücher and Wilhelm Roscher, for
presuming that capitalism can be understood as a _national_ system.
Indeed, the study of political economy was termed “national economy” by
the German economists of the time—a fact that earned Luxemburg’s scorn.
However, what establishes the _limits_ to capitalist expansion? She
wrote,

Yet the more countries develop a capitalist industry of their own, the
greater is the need and possibility for expansion of production, while
the smaller in relation to this is the possibility of expansion due to
market barriers … Incessantly, with each step of its own further
development, capitalist production is approaching the time when its
expansion and development will be increasingly slow and difficult.²³

As Luxemburg pondered this issue, she became convinced that Marx failed
to explain adequately the limits to capitalist expansion in his formulae
of expanded reproduction at the end of Volume 2 of _Capital_, which
assumes a closed capitalist society without foreign trade. Luxemburg
viewed this as a very serious error, since she took it to imply the
possibility of infinite capitalist expansion—something that, if true,
would reduce the effort to create a socialist society to being a
subjective, utopian wish instead of an objective, historical necessity.

Luxemburg realized that the issue of expanded reproduction was too
complex and serious to be briefly dealt with at the conclusion of the
_Introduction to Political Economy_. She therefore decided to devote an
entire work to the problem. As a result, in January 1912 she broke off
work on the _Introduction_ in order to begin writing _The Accumulation
of Capital_. Published in 1913, it aimed to show that the imperialist
destruction of non-capitalist strata is driven by the inability of
workers and capitalists to consume or realize the bulk of the surplus
value produced through capitalist production. The imposition of
capitalist relations upon non-capitalist strata, she argued, is both
crucial for further capital accumulation _and_ establishes the
historical limits to such expanded reproduction.

Neither the problem of expanded reproduction nor her differences with
Marx appear in the _Introduction to Political Economy_; indeed, they are
not dealt with in her lectures on Volumes 2 and 3 of _Capital_ that she
gave as part of her work at the SPD school, and which appear here in
English for the first time. These issues are reserved for the far more
detailed and technical discussion in _The Accumulation of Capital_. But
that does not mean Luxemburg gave up on the _Introduction to Political
Economy_. She resumed work on it in 1916, when she was imprisoned in the
Wronke Fortress for her opposition to World War I, and she continued to
work on the manuscript until her release from prison in late 1918.

Her 1916 outline of the _Introduction_ included ten chapters, reflecting
her much-expanded treatment of pre-capitalist societies.²⁴ She appears
to have completed much of the manuscript by then and was already
envisioning plans for its publication.²⁵ However, at the time of her
death only five chapters (that is, chapters 1, 3, 6, 7, and the
beginning of chapter 10) were found among her papers. It is likely that
some of the material was destroyed or lost when the proto-fascist
Freikorps ransacked her apartment shortly after her assassination in
January 1919.

This volume includes the text of the _Introduction to Political Economy_
published after her death by Paul Levi, Luxemburg’s colleague and
follower, in 1925. The text has to be read with caution, since the
version available to us is missing a number of important chapters—such
as those on the theory of value, capital and profit, and on the history
of crises—and Luxemburg did not get to edit what we do have for final
publication. We have every reason to believe, however, that she did
compose the missing chapters on value, capital and profit, and crises;
the importance she gave to the theory of value, for instance, is evident
from much of her work, including an essay from 1899 that is included
here, entitled “Back to Adam Smith!” It states,

But the fundamental difference between Ricardo’s and Marx’s labor theory
of value—a difference not only misunderstood by bourgeois economics, but
also mostly misjudged in the popularization of Marx’s doctrine—is that
Ricardo, corresponding to his universal, natural-rights conception of
the bourgeois economy, also held the creation of value to be a _natural_
attribute of human labor, of the individual, concrete labor of
individual people. Marx, on the other hand, recognized value as an
_abstraction_, an abstraction made by the society under particular
conditions, and arrived thereby at a differentiation of the two sides of
commodity-producing labor: concrete, individual labor and
undifferentiated social labor—a differentiation from which the solution
to the _money riddle_ springs to the eye as though illuminated by the
glow of a bulls-eye lantern.²⁶

Closely connected to the content of the _Introduction to Political
Economy_ is the series of manuscripts and lecture notes from her work at
the party school. Three of the manuscripts—notes on slavery, the history
of economic crises, and the history of political economy—were a direct
part of her research for the _Introduction_.²⁷ In addition, four
transcripts of her lectures at the party school have survived that are
also connected with the _Introduction_, dealing with Volumes 2 and 3 of
Marx’s _Capital_, slavery in ancient Greece and Rome, and the Middle
Ages.²⁸ These lectures appear to have been transcribed by Rosi
Wolfstein, a student of Luxemburg’s at the party school and an important
activist in the German socialist movement.²⁹ All appear in this volume
in full,³⁰ for the first time in English.³¹

The manuscripts and lecture transcripts from the party school are of
great importance in illustrating the extent of Luxemburg’s historical
and empirical knowledge as well as the depth of her critical and
analytical intellect. They show how much work she put into keeping up
with the latest literature in political economy, anthropology,
sociology, and ethnology—all while maintaining a heavy schedule of
writing for the socialist press, speaking at rallies and protests, and
engaging in the internal debates and polemics of the Second
International.³²

Her fierce independence is manifest in many of these writings, such as
her work on slavery in the ancient world. She took issue with Friedrich
Engels, Marx’s closest colleague and follower, for claiming that slavery
resulted from the creation of private property, arguing, “This
explanation cannot, strictly speaking, satisfy us,” since slavery arose
_earlier_, as a direct result of the dissolution of the primitive
agrarian commune. She based much of her research on the same figures
that Marx studied in his investigations of non-Western societies at the
end of his life, such as the Russian sociologist Maxim Kovalevsky.³³
Moreover, she showed a pronounced interest in the _positive_
contributions of communal social relations in the non-Western world,
especially in sub-Saharan Africa—a part of the world that was hardly
ever discussed by the European Marxists of her era.

This volume also contains a manuscript on “Theory of the Wages Fund,”
which sharply attacks the classical theory that the wages of workers is
determined by the ratio of the total amount of capital to the population
of available workers, by counter-posing that theory to Marx’s theory of
the surplus army of the unemployed. Luxemburg scholar and biographer
Annelies Laschitza has recently discovered that the manuscript was
actually composed in 1897, while Luxemburg was at the University of
Zurich.³⁴


III.

What was Luxemburg’s specific approach to the study of economic
phenomena, especially as shown by _Introduction to Political Economy_
and the manuscripts and typescripts that were part of her work at the
party school?

It is evident to anyone reading the _Introduction to Political Economy_
and the materials composed for her courses at the party school that
Luxemburg does not proceed along the lines of Volume 1 of Marx’s
_Capital_. Unlike Marx, she does not try to delineate the logic of the
commodity-form and value production on a highly abstract level. She
instead takes a historical approach by discussing the factors that
helped bring the commodity-form and value production into being.
However, this does not mean that Luxemburg was writing a straight
narrative history. Her aim was not to write a history of capitalism so
much as to discuss the central categories of Marx’s _Capital_ through a
historical approach.

Michael R. Krätke has captured the gist of Luxemburg’s project in
calling it “a problem-oriented representation” that “traces the logic of
historical development of the modes of production far beyond the topic
of Marx’s _Capital_.”³⁵ The latter work is a study of capitalist
production and capitalist production alone. It is not mainly concerned
with showing how capitalism emerged from pre-capitalist modes of
production. Why then does Luxemburg take a more historical approach, and
what does this tell us about her theoretical contribution?

It is first of all important to recognize what Luxemburg is _not_
doing—trying to popularize the Marxian doctrine. In the period before
and after Marx’s death in 1883, numerous popularizations of Marx’s
_Capital_ appeared by such figures as Johann Most, Henry Hyndman,
Friedrich Engels and Karl Kautsky. Many of these tried to spare readers
the trouble of working through the hard, theoretical abstractions found
in the opening chapters of _Capital_ by treating them as a mere
reflection of specific historical phases, such as the transition from
simple commodity exchange to generalized commodity production.³⁶ In some
cases, students were even advised to skip Chapter 1 altogether.
Luxemburg was not enamored of these efforts to simplify Marx’s critique
of value production. There is no doubt that she directed her lectures
and the _Introduction to Political Economy_ to those who might benefit
from a primer to Marxian concepts. The issue she faced, however, was how
to present the theoretic determinants of _Capital_ without falling prey
to the superficial summaries so common in the SPD. She sought to make
Marx’s ideas more accessible, not by rephrasing or abbreviating them in
a simplified or vulgarized fashion, but rather by elucidating their
complexity by showing how they relate to both the emergence and the
dissolution of capitalist society.

In other words, Luxemburg does not bring in history as a way of
providing examples of theoretical concepts; instead, the complexity and
importance of the concepts are elucidated by analyzing history in their
light. The former approach maps the categories directly onto history;
the latter enables students to obtain an understanding of the categories
on their own terms through a study of history.

Paul Frölich, Luxemburg’s colleague and biographer, expressed her
approach thusly: “The language is that of the people, but it is not that
popularizing style which avoids difficulties by flattening out and
simplifying the problems, but a straightforward simplicity as is found
only in the writings of someone who has a lively view and a complete
intellectual mastery of things.”³⁷ As Luxemburg put it in a letter to
Clara Zetkin, her _Introduction to Political Economy_ “is not an
economic history, as you thought, but a brief analysis of political
economy, that is, of the capitalist mode of production.”³⁸

No less important, Luxemburg was not simply trying to provide an
explanation of capitalism’s historical development. She was most of all
concerned with tracing out the process of its dissolution. Indeed, the
issue of dissolution is central to each specific historical era she
explored. In analyzing the “primitive” communist societies of the Incas,
Africans, and others, she shows how “private property, class rule, male
supremacy, state compulsion, and compulsory marriage” arose out of the
internal dissolution of early communal bonds.³⁹ In analyzing ancient
Greece and Rome, she shows how slavery undermined the economic viability
of these societies and ultimately led to their demise. In the case of
the European Middle Ages, she reveals the damage done by the growth of
commodity exchange and private property to the patriarchal solidity of
feudal societies. And in analyzing the pre-capitalist societies
persisting in her own time, she shows how the impact of European
colonialism and imperialism “accomplishes what millennia and the most
savage Oriental conquerors could not: the dissolution of the whole
social structure from the inside, tearing apart all traditional bonds
and transforming the society in a short period of time into a shapeless
pile of rubble.”⁴⁰

More than anything else, it is this keen attentiveness to the process of
dissolution that characterizes her analysis of capitalism. All of her
economic studies—as well as many of her political writings—seek to
pinpoint the internal contradictions of value production that lead, of
necessity, to the destruction of the existing order. As she wrote in the
_Introduction to Political Economy_,

The capitalist mode of production, for its part, is already, right from
the start, viewed in the quite immense perspective of historical
progress, not something inalterable that exists forever; it is simply a
transitional phase, a rung on the colossal ladder of human cultural
development, in the same way as previous social forms. And indeed, the
development of capitalism itself, on closer inspection, leads on to its
own decline and beyond. If we have up to now investigated the
connections that make the capitalist economy _possible_, it is now time
to familiarize ourselves with those that make it _impossible_.⁴¹

Luxemburg’s emphasis on decay also explains why she was so determined to
develop a Marxist theory of imperialism. In her view, workers and
capitalists cannot supply what is required in terms of demand to “buy
back” or realize the bulk of surplus value generated by capitalist
production, and consequently imperialism becomes essential if the
economy is to continue to expand. But the depletion of non-capitalist
strata through imperialist intervention ultimately exhausts the
potential for expansion. For that reason, she viewed imperialism as the
period of capitalism’s “final crisis.”⁴²

In emphasizing capitalism’s tendency towards dissolution, as against
developing a theory of capitalism’s development, Luxemburg is following
the approach of Marx himself, who treated dissolution as the key to any
social phenomena. Indeed, that is the essence of Marx’s _Capital_. Its
primary object of investigation is not the development of capitalism but
rather the elements within it that contain the seeds of its destruction.
That this was Marx’s approach to historical phenomena is also evident
from such works as the _Grundrisse_ and the _Ethnological Notebooks_.⁴³
That Luxemburg took much the same approach—despite the fact that many of
Marx’s works had not yet been published and were inaccessible to
her—indicates that, her differences with Volume 2 of _Capital_ not
withstanding, she had a far better understanding of Marx’s approach than
most of his critics and followers.

Luxemburg’s emphasis on dissolution is also evident in her attitude
toward political economy. The end of the first chapter of the
_Introduction to Political Economy_ argues that since political economy
is the study of the social relations of modern capitalism, the passing
of capitalism will spell the end of political economy itself. This
indicates that Luxemburg, like Marx, did not see her role as
revitalizing political economy so much as undermining its very
foundations through a rigorous critique of the capitalist mode of
production.⁴⁴ This may give the professional economists some discomfort,
but Luxemburg’s vision was far more expansive than what generally
defines that field. Which does not of course mean she wasn’t intent on
mastering the subject as part of an effort to subvert it from within.


IV.

As important as are Luxemburg’s contributions to an understanding of the
modern world, her limitations are no less instructive. One will search
in vain to find in her work a discussion of one of the most important
Marxian concepts—the fetishism of commodities. Like virtually all the
Marxists of her generation, this dimension of Chapter 1 of _Capital_ was
largely passed over in silence. It is only with the work of Georg Lukács
in the 1920s—who wrote, “[T] he chapter dealing with the fetish
character of the commodity contains within itself the whole of
historical materialism”⁴⁵ —that it began to obtain the attention it
deserved. One will also not find a serious discussion or defense of the
Marxian notion of the decline in the rate of profit, which some
contemporary economists argue is of crucial importance for understanding
the present crisis of global capitalism. Instead, she dismissed the
concept on the grounds that “there is still some time to pass before
capitalism collapses because of the falling rate of profit, roughly
until the sun burns out.”⁴⁶

Most important of all, Luxemburg (like virtually all Marxists of her
generation) tended to view the absolute class opposites as anarchy
versus organization, by identifying “planlessness” with capitalism and
an “organized economy” with socialism. As she writes in _Introduction to
Political Economy_, in capitalism there is “the disappearance of any
kind of authority in economic life, any organization and planning in
labor, any kind of connection between the individual members.” She adds,
“There is indeed, still today, an over-powerful lord that governs
working humanity: _capital_. But its form of government is not despotism
but _anarchy_.”⁴⁷ Although this was the standard view in the Second
International, Engels had attacked it many years earlier. The 1891
Erfurt Program, which served as the programmatic and theoretic basis of
German Social Democracy, had referred to “The planlessness rooted in the
nature of capitalist private production.” In his critique of the
program, Engels countered: “Capitalist production by _joint-stock
companies_ is no longer _private_ production but production on behalf of
many associated people. And when we pass on from joint-stock companies
to trusts, which dominate and monopolize whole branches of industry,
this puts an end not only to _private production_ but also to
_planlessness_.”⁴⁸ Of course, that doesn’t make society any less
capitalistic. Yet despite this, Luxemburg persisted in claiming that
“anarchy is the life element of the rule of capital”⁴⁹ —thereby giving
short shrift to the despotic plan of capital at the point of production.
This is no academic matter, but touches directly on the conception of
what constitutes a truly socialist society. For if “market anarchy” is
the essence of capitalism, it seems to follow that the abolition of the
market and the rule of society by a state-planned economy constitutes
“socialism.”⁵⁰

Surely, Luxemburg was correct that one of the historical factors that
produced the dissolution of pre-capitalist societies and the rise of
capitalism was the increasing role of anarchic relations of commodity
exchange. However, she runs up against the following question: does
private property emerge as a result of generalized commodity exchange,
or is it the other way around? She writes, “We thus come up against a
strange contradiction: exchange is only possible with private property
and a developed division of labor, but this division of labor can only
come about as a result of exchange and on the basis of private property,
while private property for its part only arises through exchange.”⁵¹ She
admits that “we are clearly going round in a circle” and running up
against a contradiction. She tries to resolve the matter thusly: “A
contradiction may well be something inextricable for individuals in
everyday life, but in the life of society as a whole, you find
contradictions of this kind everywhere you look … [as] the great
philosopher Hegel said: ‘Contradiction is the very moving principle of
the world.’ ” The problem, however, is that this way of putting things
does not really posit contradiction in a Hegelian sense, in which
dialectical duality is resolved through a higher development. She
instead poses the contradiction along the lines of a Kantian
antimony—that is, of an unresolved and insuperable contradiction.

Marx grappled with a similar contradiction, but he resolved it quite
differently. He wrote in his _Economic and Philosophical Manuscripts of
1844_,

_Private property_ thus results by analysis from the concept of
_alienated labor_, i.e., of _alienated man_, of estranged labor, of
estranged life, of _estranged_ man. True, it is as a result of the
_movement of private property_ that we have obtained the concept of
_alienated labor (of alienated life)_ in political economy. But analysis
of this concept shows that though private property appears to be the
reason, the cause of alienated labor, it is rather its consequence, just
as the gods are _originally_ not the cause but the effect of man’s
intellectual confusion. Later this relationship becomes reciprocal.⁵²

Luxemburg did not have access, of course, to Marx’s _1844 Manuscripts_,
or many of his other writings that contain a far deeper critique of
capitalism than the counterpoising of “market anarchy” and “organized
plan.” That liberatory perspective did not permeate her generation of
Marxists—just as it has been outside the purview of many lesser Marxists
who came after her.

No one can doubt that Luxemburg had a fiercely independent intellect and
personality—to the extent that she was not afraid to take issue with
even her closest intellectual mentors. As the entirety of her
contribution is made available in the _Complete Works_,⁵³ we will be in
a better position to judge the validity and strength—as well as the
possible weaknesses—of her overall contribution to the struggle for
human liberation. Reading Luxemburg critically is undoubtedly what she
herself would expect of us, as we try to grasp what the revolutionary
critique of capital that she devoted herself to means for today.

_Peter Hudis_



THE INDUSTRIAL DEVELOPMENT OF POLAND


PREFACE

Although the subject of the following treatise is highly specialized, we
are nevertheless convinced that, for a number of reasons, it can be of
more than passing interest to Western European readers. Today, in all
civilized countries, economic issues stand in the forefront of
intellectual life. There is already a widespread recognition that they
are the motive forces of all social being and becoming. The political
physiognomy and historical destiny of a country are for us like a closed
book, sealed with seven seals,¹ if we do not know that country’s
economic life and all the resulting social consequences.

It was not so long ago that Poland’s name resounded throughout the
civilized world; its fortunes stirred the minds of all and brought
excitement to every heart. Lately no one any longer hears much about
Poland—not since it became an ordinary capitalist country. If one wants
to know what has become of the old rebel, and where the destinies of
history have steered it, the answer can come only from research into the
economic history of Poland in recent decades.

One can view and discuss the so-called Polish question from various
standpoints, but for those who see in the material development of
society the key to its political development, the solution to the Polish
question can be found only on the basis of Poland’s economic life and
the trends within it. We have attempted in the following treatise to
gather together the available material necessary for solving this
problem, organizing it as much as possible to provide a clear and
overall view. In the process, here and there, we have also taken the
liberty of doing some direct finger pointing of a political nature.
Thus, the subject that at first glance seemed so dry and specialized may
prove to be interesting for political people as well.

This may also be true for other reasons. We live at a time when the
mighty Empire of the North is playing an increasingly important role in
European politics. All eyes are keeping a close watch on Russia, and
people view with concern the alarming advances made by Russian policy in
Asia. Soon it may not be a secret to anyone that the most important
capitalist countries will, earlier or later, have to be prepared for
serious _economic_ competition with Russia in Asia. The economic policy
of the tsarist empire can therefore no longer be a matter of complete
indifference to Western Europeans. Poland constitutes, however, one of
the most important and most advanced industrial regions of the Russian
empire, one in whose history the economic policies of Russia have
perhaps been most clearly and distinctly expressed.

The material for our study lay scattered in numerous statistical
publications, which often contradicted one another, as well as polemical
pamphlets, newspaper articles, and both official reports and unofficial
ones. No exhaustive work about the history of Polish industry in
general, and especially about its present condition, is to be found in
the existing literature, neither in the Polish language nor in Russian,
nor in German. We believed therefore that we needed to process and
digest this ragged, disconnected raw material in order to present it in
as finished form as possible, so that the reader could most easily reach
significant general conclusions.


I. THE HISTORY AND PRESENT CONDITION OF POLISH INDUSTRY

_1. The Period of Manufacture, 1820–50_

Toward the beginning of the nineteenth century, political events placed
Poland in entirely new circumstances. The partitioning of Poland²
removed it from the special feudal-anarchic conditions of natural
economy that had prevailed under the republic of the gentry—conditions
found in Poland for most of the eighteenth century. Poland was brought
under a regime of enlightened absolutism, under the centralized,
bureaucratic administrative systems of Prussia, Austria, and Russia. The
main part of Poland, under Russia, which is of interest to us here,
indeed was very soon able, at first as the Duchy of Warsaw³ and, later,
after the Congress of Vienna [as the Kingdom of Poland], to maintain its
own constitution based on social estates.⁴ But there was a world of
difference between this Congress Poland and the Poland of former times.
The entire administrative, financial, military, and judicial apparatus
was adapted to that of a modern centralized state. But this apparatus
proved to be in glaring contradiction to the economic relations onto
which it had been superimposed. As before, Poland’s economic life
centered on landed property. The development of urban craft production,
which had begun in the thirteenth century, had run into the sand by the
time of the seventeenth century. At the end of the eighteenth century,
attempts by the owners of large landed estates (the magnates) to create
a manufacturing system likewise fell apart, having gone nowhere. After
all, landed property was entirely unsuited to serve as the basis for a
modern state organization. Because of its dependence on the world
market, which dated from the fifteenth century, the Poland of old had
been driven to establish a highly extensive latifundia economy, with the
most extreme exactions being imposed on serf labor. These latifundia
were managed more and more irrationally, and therefore constantly became
less and less productive. The wars of Poland’s final epoch, and then
Napoleon’s economic policies in the Duchy of Poland, especially the
Continental System,⁵ and the accompanying drop in grain exports, plus
the falling price of grain, followed by the abolition of serfdom in
1807—all these blows of different kinds fell upon landed property, one
after the other, over the course of about ten years and brought it to
the verge of ruin. But because landed property constituted the main
source of revenue in the country, once again the full burden of the
relatively large costs of the new administrative system fell on the
landed proprietors. The 10 percent income tax on landed property, which
Poland had already introduced in olden times, but which was now actually
being collected for the first time, was suddenly supposed to be
increased to 24 percent. In addition, the burden of quartering troops
and supplying the military _in natura_⁶ fell on the nobility.

The result was that landed property soon fell into the clutches of the
usurers. While old Poland possessed no urban capitalist class, because
of the decay of urban production and trade, such a class surfaced right
after the partition of Poland. In part it consisted of immigrating
officials and usurers, in part of Polish upstarts who owed their
material existence to the country’s huge political and economic crisis.
This new section of the population now provided the needy gentry with
capital. Incidentally, to a large extent the ten-year rule of Prussia
(1796–1806) had already laid the foundations for the gentry’s
indebtedness. During that decade for the first time an organized system
of agricultural credit was thrown wide open for the Polish gentry.

For Polish landed property this constituted a veritable revolution. What
then took place had been accomplished in Western Europe during the
Middle Ages by a slow and gradual process over centuries—the undermining
of patrimonial land ownership as the result of usurious interest
payments. In Poland this process was brought to completion in less then
twenty years. Up until the end of the republic, landed property had been
kept free of the usurer. But now, as early as 1821, the landowners had
to be saved from destruction by an emergency regulation issued by the
government of the Kingdom of Poland—a moratorium.

Under such circumstances, a deficit was a permanent part of the budget
of the Kingdom of Poland from the very beginning. The creation of new
sources of revenue for the exchequer and of new spheres of economic
activity in the country therefore became a condition of existence for
the Kingdom from the first moment. Following the example of other
countries and driven by immediate needs, the government undertook the
establishment of urban industry in Poland.

The decade 1820–30 is the time of origin for Polish industry, or more
exactly, for Polish manufacture.

It is indicative that this came about in a way quite similar to that of
the earlier origins of Polish craft production, with foreign, mostly
German, craftsmen being encouraged to move to Poland. Just as the Polish
princes in the thirteenth century tried to attract foreign workers by
offering all sorts of privileges, so too did the government of Congress
Poland. An entire series of tsarist decrees to this effect were issued
in the years 1816–24. The government made houses available free of
charge, as well as construction materials, waived rental payments, and
established a so-called iron fund for the erection of industrial
buildings and housing for industry personnel. In 1816 immigrating
craftsmen were assured of freedom from all taxation and other public
burdens for six years, their sons were exempted from military service,
and they were permitted to bring personal property into the country
duty-free. In 1820 the government granted the immigrants free use of
building materials from the state forests and established special
brickyards to provide them with the cheapest possible bricks.

An 1822 law freed all industrial enterprises, for a period of three to
six years, from the obligation to quarter soldiers. In 1820 and 1823 it
was decreed that the cities were to hand over locations to these
enterprises rent-free for six years. The industrial fund established in
1822 for the encouragement of industrial colonization amounted to 45,000
rubles at the beginning; it was already twice as much in 1823, and from
then on, was set at 127,500 rubles annually.^(I)

Such manifold attractions did not fail to have an effect. Soon German
craftsmen trooped into Poland and settled down. About 10,000 German
families immigrated in a few years at this time. In this way, the most
important industrial cities of today soon arose: Łódż, Zgierz, Rawa,
Pabianice, and others. In addition to craftsmen, the government of
Russian Poland called in prominent foreign industrialists to direct its
enterprises: [John] Cockerill from Belgium, [Alfons] Fraget, [Philippe
de] Girard, and others.⁷ But the government of Congress Poland did not
content itself with the granting of privileges to immigrants and the
establishment of German manufacturing towns. Unlike the handicrafts of
the Middle Ages, manufacturing could not content itself with a narrow
circle of consumption and circulation within one city; to start with, it
required a wholesale market and, further, commodity circulation
embracing at least the whole country. Together with the foundation of
manufacturing colonies, the government had to undertake a whole series
of administrative and legislative reforms intended to unify the country
economically into a single complex and create the necessary legal forms
for internal commodity traffic. The greatest breach in the property
relations and especially the landed property relations of old Poland had
already been forced by the Napoleonic Code,⁸ introduced in the Duchy of
Warsaw in 1808. This had superimposed the legal forms of a modern
bourgeois economy in quite finished form onto the economic conditions of
a purely feudal natural economy. This code did not have the power to
reorganize the mode of production as such, not in the least, but it did
undermine the old property relations drastically and thereby hastened
their disintegration. With the abolition of perpetual rent, entail,
etc., landed property was ripped out of its state of immobility and
catapulted into circulation. At the same time, the Napoleonic Code
supplied commerce and the commercial courts with legal standards. In
1817, furthermore, chambers of commerce and manufacturing were
established and the regulation of trade was brought to a close; in the
following year, deed registries were introduced; in 1825, the
Agricultural Credit Association was founded.^(II) In 1819, the building
of highways and the regulation of waterways were begun at government
expense; and in 1825, the construction of a canal between the Niemen and
the Vistula.^(III) Finally, the government also took the lead—as in
other countries where manufacture was just beginning—by establishing its
own industrial enterprises: model factories, model sheep ranches, and so
on. But it gave the strongest foothold to budding manufacturing by
establishing the Bank of Poland, which was brought into existence by a
tsarist decree of 1828 and organized after the model of the Belgian
Societé Generale and the German Seehandlung.⁹ The Bank of Poland was an
issuing, investment, deposit, mortgage, commission, and industrial bank
all in one. Initially endowed with a fund amounting to three million
rubles, it also obtained deposits, securities, ecclesiastical funds,
fire insurance, pensions, and other capital deposits, which by 1877 came
to a total of 282 million rubles. The bank offered credit to industry as
well as to agriculture. Over the course of 50 years from its founding it
provided credit to commercial and industrial enterprises in the amount
of 91 million rubles. The activity of the bank was extremely diverse. It
not only established factories itself and engaged in mining and
agriculture, but also concerned itself with the transportation system.
The first Polish railroad line, from Warsaw to Vienna, completed in
1845, was chiefly the work of the Bank of Poland.

The activity of the government outlined above was the first important
factor in the development of industry in Russian Poland. Whatever other
circumstances may have affected its subsequent history, it undoubtedly
owed its original existence to the initiative and efforts of the
government.

We see of course, as has been said, that in other countries, for
example, France and Germany, governments have stood beside the cradle of
manufacturing and taken its destiny energetically in their hands. But
there the governments offered their help only to a natural development
of urban production, which moved of itself and by virtue of objective
factors such as the accumulation of trading capital, the widening of
markets, and the technological development of craft production toward
transformation into manufacturing production methods. In Poland,
manufacture, like urban handicraft earlier, was a foreign product
imported in finished form, which could develop neither a technological
nor a social connection to Poland’s own economic development. Here,
then, the activity of the government was the only positive factor in the
rise of manufacture, and this explains to us the predilection, which
Polish economists and political journalists have shown, for restating
this point over and over; thus, on the whole, its significance is only
too often overstated. Above all, they forget that the autonomous Polish
government, in the activity that they describe, acted in the most
intimate agreement with the Russian tsarist regime, which was guided by
intentions that, in national terms, were nothing less than friendly
toward Poland.

Moreover, the efforts of the government of Congress Poland encountered
highly favorable ground in the form of Poland’s tariff relations with
other countries. In this respect, the Vienna Congress had made two
important decisions affecting Poland: first, it was united with Russia;
and second, it was guaranteed free trade with the other parts of the
former Polish state, which basically meant the same thing as free trade
with Germany and Austria. With regard to unification with Russia, the
trade relations between the two countries were regulated by the tariffs
of 1822 and 1824 in such a way that their products were exchanged almost
duty-free.^(IV) The meaning of this new arrangement for Poland only
becomes clear, however, if one focuses on what Russia had been doing
since 1810, and especially later under the administration of [Yegor
Frantsevich] Kankrin.¹⁰ Russia had pursued an extremely prohibitive
tariff policy toward the rest of Europe, often bordering on absurdity,
protecting itself on all sides from foreign manufactures with a
virtually insurmountable tariff wall. Through the unification with
Poland, Russia now became accessible to German goods from that
direction, because of the above-mentioned tariffs. The result of this
for Poland was that it became the workshop for the processing of
half-finished German goods, most of which were imported into Congress
Poland duty-free and finished in Poland; they then found their way into
Russia as Polish products, again almost duty-free. One particular result
was that Poland’s large cloth-manufacturing operations came into full
bloom in only a few years.^(V) Although it was first established in the
period 1817–26, Polish cloth manufacturing had already attained, by
1829, a level of production worth 5,752,000 rubles, a substantial amount
for that time.^(VI) That this surprisingly rapid growth resulted almost
entirely from Russian consumption is shown by the following table of
exports of wool products to Russia, in thousands of rubles:

1823–1,865

1825–5,058

1827–7,218

1829–8,418^(VII)

If the value of exported products, according to the table above,
exceeded the value of those manufactured in Poland, it was because, in
addition to the goods finished in Poland, German finished products were
smuggled into the country and exported to Russia under Polish labels on
a massive scale.

The above-mentioned tariff relationship had yet another important aspect
for Congress Poland. It opened a free trade route to China, to which
Polish cloth was likewise exported in large quantities. This export
specifically amounted to the following, again in thousands of rubles:

1824–331

1826–332

1828–1,024

1830–1,070^(VIII)

Although Poland’s entire export trade in the first decade of its
industrial development was actually based on only one branch of
manufacture, wool production, it nevertheless had great importance for
the country, because it had invigorating repercussions on other branches
as well, and it acted as a powerful stimulus to immigration by German
craftsmen. A historian of the center of the Polish textile industry, the
city of Lodz, calls Poland’s cloth trade with Russia and China at that
time “the main driving force in the development of industry.”^(IX)

In 1831, however, this trade came to an end. There was an uprising in
Poland in that year.¹¹ The uprising brought the development of Polish
manufacturing to a standstill for some time, and had the additional
lasting effect that the tariff between Poland and Russia was
significantly increased.^(X) For a long time the competition of Polish
cloth in Russia and China had been a thorn in the side for the Russian
manufacturers. They repeatedly petitioned the tsarist government for
higher tariffs at the Polish border, but had no success until the
uprising of 1831, and with it the cessation of Polish cloth exports to
Russia. This gave the Russian manufacturers the opportunity to quickly
take possession of the abandoned field by expanding their own production
and showing the government, with the numbers thus obtained, how much the
“Fatherland’s” industry had suffered up till then from Polish
competition. With the raising of the tariff and, at the same time, the
elimination of free transit to China, Polish exports sank rapidly.^(XI)

In 1834, total exports amounted to 2,887,000 rubles.

Of this, manufactured products accounted for 2,385,000 rubles.

In 1850, total exports amounted to 1,274,000 rubles.

Of this, manufactured products accounted for 755,000 rubles.

This was a heavy blow to Polish wool production. After its value had
reached, in 1829—as we saw—the height of 5,752,000 rubles, it sank in
1832 to 1,917,000 and rose only little by little to 2,564,000 rubles in
1850, that is, to half of the earlier amount.^(XII)

Nevertheless, taken all in all with regard to the further destiny of
Polish manufacturing, it was not possible that the closing of the
Russian border would have any great significance. In Russia itself there
existed neither the prospects of a growing demand for manufactured goods
nor the means of transportation capable of shipping in mass quantities.
The large cloth export trade [from Poland] can mainly be explained by
nothing other than the Russian army’s demand for cloth. Moreover, Polish
manufacturing had not even had time to provide itself with an internal
market. So after the closing of the Russian customs border, it slowly
undertook to establish a foothold inside the country, promoted by
favorable government measures and supported in particular by the Bank of
Poland. In the following two decades many branches of production
developed well: in the 1830s tanning and the manufacture of soap, and in
the 1840s sugar production; also in the 1830s mining, and likewise
papermaking.^(XIII) Yet because of the social conditions in Poland
fairly narrow limits were imposed on the growth of industry there. The
population of Congress Poland amounted to only a small number, four to
five million people, and besides, the people lived for the most part in
the framework of a subsistence economy. Despite the abolition of serfdom
in 1807, forced labor remained the predominant type of work in
agriculture, and as a result the landed proprietors, as well as the
peasants, were to a large extent cut off from commodity and money
exchange. The cities grew only slowly; poor and meagerly populated as
they were, they could not provide a strong demand for manufactured goods
either. The development of industry was thus a very slow process. Thirty
years after Polish manufacture arose, a period in which it oriented
mainly toward its own internal market, we see that it was still
constrained within totally miniature dimensions. Even in the 1850s the
most advanced of all branches of industry, textiles, still operated
mainly with manual labor, without steam power, and therefore only with
skilled master craftsmen and journeymen and without a trace of female
labor. On the whole the fragmentation of production indicates its
predominantly craft character, for in the year 1857 we still see 12,542
“factories” in Poland with a total of 56,364 workers and total
production worth 21,278,592 rubles: [this means] on the average at each
“factory,” four to five workers, with production worth 1,700
rubles.^(XIV)

In accordance with the conditions described above, the fact was that
urban industry played only a subordinate role in the social life of
Poland up until the 1850s and even the 1860s. The same old power of
landed property, as ever, set the tone in the economy and the politics
of the country. Indeed, the broad mass of landowners with medium-sized
properties, those who represented public opinion at that time, viewed
up-and-coming urban industry, and the capitalist economy along with it,
as a poisonous plant imported from abroad, a “German swindle” that was
to blame for the desperate condition of landed property and of the
country as a whole.

_2. The Transition to Large-Scale Industry, 1850–70_

We have made our acquaintance with the first beginnings of industry in
Poland and its further development in the limits of the domestic market.
We have seen that it owed its origins to the efforts of the government,
and that until the 1850s, because of the limited domestic market, it
could not get beyond the forms of basic manufacture. But here the first
epoch of its history comes to an end, and a new page of that history
begins. After the 1850s, a series of new factors made their appearance,
and although in and of themselves they were quite varied, in the last
analysis all of them definitely contributed to the opening of Russian
markets to Polish production and thereby assuring it of a mass market.
This gradually brought about a complete revolution in Polish industry
and transformed it from manufacture into truly large-scale industry,
with mass production. We can therefore designate the second period of
its history as the era of large-scale industry. The decades 1850–70 were
a time of transition from the first to the second phase.

There were four important factors that revolutionized Polish industry
during the above-mentioned transition period.

_First, the abolition of the customs barrier between Russia and Poland_.
In the year 1851 Poland’s tariff relations were altered in two ways. On
the one hand, the customs barrier, which until then had cut Poland off
from Russia, was eliminated; on the other, Poland’s independent policy
on trade with the outside world was ended and Poland was incorporated
into the Russian tariff zone.^(XV) In this way, ever since that time,
Poland has formed a single whole, together with Russia, as far as trade
policy is concerned.^(XVI) For Poland the great significance of the
tariff reform of 1851 was first of all that it made the totally free
export of goods to Russia possible. Thus Polish manufacture had the
prospect of producing for a larger mass market, of going beyond the
narrow limits of the domestic market and becoming a truly
mass-production industry. But a longer period of time was required
before these phenomena could fully manifest themselves. At the moment
when the tariff barriers between Poland and Russia were eliminated,
three important obstacles still stood in the way of truly mass export of
Polish manufactured goods to Russia. First, up until then Polish
manufacture had been geared mainly to the demands of the domestic
market, and thus was not yet capable of the rapid expansion, by leaps
and bounds, which to such a great extent characterizes large-scale
mass-production industry. Second, no modern means of transportation
existed between Poland and Russia. Third, the domestic market in Russia
was also of limited dimensions, restricted by the continued existence of
serfdom and the natural economy. But soon a complete transformation
occurred in all three areas.

Undoubtedly the _Crimean War_ [of 1853–56] had a revolutionizing effect
on Polish as well as Russian manufacturing. The blockade of Russia’s
maritime borders stopped the import of most foreign goods; but in part,
such goods found a new way through, at the western land borders of
Poland, which became the route for a lively transit trade. More
important, however, was the mass demand created by the needs of the
Russian army, primarily for products of the textile industry. In Russia
the growth of the latter in the years 1856–60 amounted to 11.6 percent
yearly for cotton spinning, 5.5 percent for cotton weaving, and 9.4
percent for dyeing and finishing.^(XVII) In Poland, an even greater leap
may be observed. There the value of production in thousands of rubles
was as follows:^(XVIII)

  ------------------------ -------- -------- --------------------------
                             _1854_   _1860_  _percentage of increase_
  In the canvas industry        723    1,247            +72
  In the wool industry        2,044    4,354            +113
  In the cotton industry      2,853    8,091            +183
  ------------------------ -------- -------- --------------------------

The era of the Crimean War also caused a deep-going revolution in
textile-industry technology, bringing with it the introduction of the
mechanical loom and the mechanical spindle in both Russia and Poland. In
Lodz in 1854, the Scheibler firm,¹² which is now a gigantic factory, was
founded with 100 looms and 18,000 spindles.^(XIX) The following year,
the first mechanical linen-spinning mill was established in Russia, and
in 1857, the largest canvas factory in Poland, the Žyrardow [Girards’]
factory,¹³ which is still important today, was converted from a
hand-operated weaving mill to one run by machinery.¹⁴

The _second_ important result was the establishment of a _series of
railroad lines_ between Poland and the central parts of Russia. In 1862,
Poland was connected with St. Petersburg, in 1866 with Volhynia,
Belorussia, and Podolia, in 1870 with Moscow, in 1871 with Kiev, in 1877
with southern Russia. Moreover, the feverish building of railroad lines
in central Russia opened ever more areas to trade.^(XX)¹⁵ The
construction of each new railroad connection to Russia was followed by
an increase in demand for Polish products and an expansion of
production. To be sure, the Polish uprising [of 1863–64] and the
consequent temporary cessation of trade with Russia had a depressive
economic effect.¹⁶ But in spite of this, the decade 1860–70, the period
of technological revolution in transport, had the result that while the
total value of Poland’s industrial production amounted to only 31
million rubles in 1851 (21 million, according to another source), it
represented 73 million rubles (according to both sources) in 1872, after
15 years—an increase of 135 percent and 248 percent respectively.^(XXI)

_The third factor_ that contributed to the industrial revolution was
_the abolition of serfdom_ in Russia in 1861 and in Poland in 1864 and
the resulting transformation of agriculture. Now robbed of the unpaid
labor power of the serfs, the landowners turned to the employment of
wage laborers and the purchase of industrial products, which earlier
were made by unpaid labor on the estates. On the other hand, the great
mass of peasants now had money to spend, and also became the buyers of
factory goods. Connected with this was a tax reform and the beginning of
the government’s policy of squeezing the Russian peasantry, a policy
that violently pushed even the small peasant onto the market with the
products of his labor and, as this more and more undermined the natural
economy in agriculture, to the same degree it prepared the ground for a
money economy and a mass market for manufactured goods. The other result
of the reform was the proletarianization of broad layers of the
peasantry, thus the “setting free” of a mass of workers who placed
themselves at the disposal of industry.

Thus we see in Russia, in connection with the Crimean War, an upheaval
in all social relations. The collapse of the old patrimonial form of
landed property and of natural economy, the reform of finances and the
tax system, and the establishment of a whole network of railways—all
this meant the emergence of markets, of new channels and outlets for
sales, and of hired hands for Russian industry. But since, in terms of
trade policy, Poland formed a single whole with Russia ever since the
tariff abolition of 1851, so Polish manufacture was swept into the
whirlpool of Russia’s economic metamorphosis and was transformed by the
rapidly growing market into real mass-production industry.

In addition, in the late 1870s, _a fourth important factor_ came onto
the scene and helped transform Polish manufacture into the large-scale
industry we see in Poland today, and that was the tariff policy of the
Russian government.

_3. The Period of Large-Scale Industry in Poland_

Since the beginning of the century, Russia, as was mentioned, had
adhered to a highly protectionist policy. The Crimean War, however,
caused a change here, as in all other areas of social life. In the
“liberal period” of the 1860s tariffs were significantly reduced. This
free-trade turn did not last long, however. Because of the reforms
themselves, especially the costly railroad construction, the government
ran enormously into debt to foreign countries, and the gold tariff was
introduced in 1877 with the object of getting hold of gold. With this,
Russia entered onto a course of ever more stringent protectionist
policies.

With the exchange rate of the paper ruble falling, the gold tariff meant
an increase in the tariff rate of 30 percent in the first years and of
40 to 50 percent in following years. In 1880 a deficit in the state
treasury developed once more as a result of the abolition of the salt
tax. To replace that, there followed in 1881 a general tariff increase
of 10 percent. In 1882, several individual tariff rates were raised,
such as those for linen, wool yarn, chemical products, dyes, etc.; in
1884, a repeated increase in various individual tariff rates occurred,
for example that for silk yarn; in 1885, there was a nearly universal
increase of tariffs by 20 percent; in 1887, once again a partial rise
tariffs on particular items, and the same in 1891.^(XXII)

Obviously the purpose of protectionism, when not fiscal revenue, was
above all protection of domestic industry from foreign competition.

The results of such a substantial forcing up of the tariff were twofold.
First, the import of foreign manufactured and half-finished goods
declined rapidly. The total imports over Russia’s European borders in
millions of gold rubles annually amounted to:

  --------- -------------
  1851–56   74
  1856–61   120
  1861–66   121
  1866–71   212
  1871–76   364
  1876–81   326
  1881–86   304
  1886–91   224
  1891      220
  1892      219^(XXIII)
  --------- -------------

The import of manufactured and half-finished goods, whose duties much
higher than raw materials, shriveled up even more severely than the
above table indicates. Thus a place was made in Russian markets for
native—Russian and Polish—industry, which was freed to a great extent
from foreign competition.

The other natural result was the general climb in commodity prices. It
has recently been calculated that the Russian consumer may pay much more
for most commodities than, e.g., the German consumer; thus

  ---------------------------- -------------
  For tea                      304%
  For tobacco                  687%
  For coal                     200%
  For paper                    690%
  For linen                    225%
  For cotton products          357%
  For agricultural machinery   159%^(XXIV)
  ---------------------------- -------------

As for the metal industry: a pood [36.11 pounds] of wire nails of medium
size, for example, costs an American [the equivalent of] 1 to 1.50
rubles, while a Russian pays 3.20 rubles in tariffs alone on this
quantity of goods and 4 to 8 rubles for the goods as a whole. In
relation to the price of the most important metals, the tariff in 1896
constituted 70 percent for iron ore; 45 percent for finished iron; and
35 percent for steel.^(XXV)

Under such monopoly conditions, Russian and Polish industry began to
rake in colossal profits from the domestic market. We can get an
approximate notion of these profits from the official statements of the
manufacturers themselves. In 1887, for example, the following net
profits were declared:

  ------------------------------------------------------ --------------
  By the Russian Cotton Spinning Mills, St. Petersburg   15.0%
  By the Moscow Manufacturing Company                    16.0%
  By the Balin Manufacturing Company                     16.0%
  By the Narva Linen Spinning Mill                       18.0%
  By the Sampson Cotton Spinning Mill                    21.3%
  By the Yekaterinhof Cotton Spinning Mill               23.0%
  By the Rabeneck Cotton Dye Works                       25.4%
  By the Izmailov Cotton Spinning Mill                   26.0%
  By the S. Morozov Works                                28.0%
  By the Neva Cotton Weaving Mill                        38.0%
  By the Krenholm Works                                  44.9%
  By the Thornton Wool Works                             45.0%^(XXVI)
  ------------------------------------------------------ --------------

From more recent times we have no less astonishing statements of profits
in the Russian metal industry. The metallurgical enterprises in southern
Russia yield on the average a profit of 50 percent, and the colossal
works of the Englishman [John] Hughes as much as 100 percent.²⁷ “It is
not without interest,” writes the official organ of Russia’s Finance
Ministry, “to note how the profits obtained are put to use, giving rise
to the impression that the companies, in view of the utter excess of
profit, seem unclear, so to speak, about what to do with it
all.”^(XXVII) In other words, they are unsure about the proper category
in the official reports to enter their earnings in, so as to veil their
shockingly large size.

The influence of monopoly prices on the size of capitalist profits,
together with the relationship of the latter to outlays for labor power,
is most strikingly shown by the following little juxtaposition. The
market price of raw iron in Kiev in July 1897 amounted to 85 kopecks per
pood; of that, the costs of production in Russia made up 45 kopecks,
including wages at 4 kopecks per pood—with a net profit of 40
kopecks.^(XXVIII) The relation of profits to cost of production and to
wages was thus 10:11 and 10:1 respectively.

The profits of Polish entrepreneurs were in no way inferior to the
enormous profits of the Russians, as we will see. At the beginning of
the 1890s, dividends from the sugar factories in Poland, for example,
amounted to as much as 29 percent.^(XXIX) In the textile industry, 40
percent profits were regarded as a normal phenomenon.^(XXX) But these
official manufacturers’ statements are notoriously 30 to 50 percent
smaller than the profits actually obtained.

In this way, after all the main conditions for industrial development—a
domestic market, means of transport, an industrial reserve army—were
brought into existence in the years 1860–77, the additional tariff
policy created a hothouse atmosphere of monopoly prices that placed
Russian and Polish industry in an absolute El Dorado of primitive
capitalist accumulation. In the year 1877 an era of feverish enterprise
and grandiose accumulation of capital began, combined with the bounding
growth of production. A picture of Poland’s overall industrial
development under the impact of the conditions described above may be
represented as follows:

_In millions of rubles_

  

_Total Production_

_Cotton Industry_

_Wool Industry_

_Linen Industry_

1860

50.0(1864)

8.1

4.3

1.2

1870

63.9

10.2

4.0

1.2

1880

171.8

33.0

22.0

5.0

1890

240.0

47.6(1891)

35.5

6.5^(XXXI)

The strongest upswing between 1870 and 1880—for all industry +169
percent, for the cotton industry +223 percent, for the wool industry
+450 percent, for the linen industry +317 percent—is chiefly a result of
the first three years (1877–80) of the new era in tariff policy. As we
will see below, the introduction of the gold tariff brought with it not
only the sudden establishment of many new enterprises but also the
transfer of a number of German factories from Saxony and Silesia to the
western part of Poland. Of the largest factories in Poland, which were
inspected in an official inquiry organized in 1886, only 18.1 percent
were founded before 1850,

  ------- --------------------
  6.8%    in 1850–60
  13.6%   in 1860–70
  29%     in 1870–80
  32.5%   in 1880–86^(XXXII)
  ------- --------------------

Thus 61 percent of all large factories were established after 1870. As
for the extent of production, it increased by a factor of almost six in
the textile industry as a whole, in the period 1870–90. The following
table shows quite specifically the influence of the tariff policy. Of
the most significant factories:

  ------- -------------- --------------
  18.1%   were founded   before 1850,
  37.2%                  in 1850–77
  44.7%                  in 1877–86
  ------- -------------- --------------

Thus almost half (today even more) of all the large factories in Poland
originated since 1877 as a direct result of the protectionist tariff
policy.

This expansion of production went hand in hand with a revolution in the
means of production themselves. Everywhere in place of the small,
scattered factories appeared modern large-scale industrial enterprises
with extensive use of steam power and the latest technology for
construction and operation. The concentration of industry in Poland in
general is as follows:

  ----------------------------------------- -------------- --------- ---------------
                                            _1871_         _1880_    _1890_
  Number of workers                         76,616         120,763   ca. 150,000
  Value of production (in million rubles)   66.7           171.8     240
  For one firm (in rubles)                  3,239          8,063     71,248
  For one worker (in rubles)                882^(XXXIII)   1,422     1,600^(XXXIV)
  ----------------------------------------- -------------- --------- ---------------

However here the average figures are, as usual, not suited to giving a
true idea of the revolution taking place, since this was of course not
accomplished equally in all branches of industry. Most characteristic
are the figures for the _textile industry_. Here we find:

  ------------------------------------ -------- -------- ----------------
                                       _1871_   _1880_   _1890_
  Number of factories                  11,227   10,871   635
  Number of workers                    28,046   45,753   60,288
  Production (in million rubles)       18.1     57.6     88.4
  Workers per factory                  2.5      4.2      95
  Production per factory (in rubles)   1,612    5,303    139.298^(XXXV)
  ------------------------------------ -------- -------- ----------------

But within the textile industry the _cotton industry_ shows the
revolution in the most vivid way:

  ------------------------------------ -------- -------- -----------------
                                       _1871_   _1880_   _1891_
  Number of factories                  10,499   3,881    163
  Number of workers                    19,894   19,576   26,307
  Production (in million rubles)       10.4     30.8     47.6
  Workers per factory                  1.9      5        162
  Production per factory (in rubles)   994      7,950    291,736^(XXXVI)
  ------------------------------------ -------- -------- -----------------

The surprising growth of the cotton industry can also be measured in the
number of spindles. These amount to:

  ------ ----------------------
  1836   7,300
  1840   27,300
  1850   61,300
  1863   116,200
  1870   289,500
  1875   385,500
  1879   449,600
  1882   467,600
  1888   ca. 600,000^(XXXVII)
  ------ ----------------------

According to other sources, the number of spindles grew during a period
of ten years (1877–86) from 216,640 to 505,622, i.e., 134 percent. In
the same period, the number of spindles in the Russian cotton industry
shows an increase of 32 percent (in particular, 45 percent in the Moscow
district, 10 percent in the St. Petersburg district); that in the North
American industry (1881–91), 30 percent; and in the English, 8 percent.
The number of looms grew from 1877 to 1886: in the Russian cotton
industry, 46 percent (in particular, 50 percent in the Moscow region, 25
percent in the St. Petersburg region); but in Poland, 139
percent.^(XXXVIII)

The more extensive use of steam power begins only in the 1870s, but
since then it has grown quickly.

  ---------------------------------------------------- -------- ----------------
                                                       _1875_   _1890_
  Steam horsepower in industry as a whole _of that:_   14,657   51,800
  in the textile industry                              4,220    26,772
  in mining                                            1,803    10,497^(XXXIX)
  ---------------------------------------------------- -------- ----------------

In branches of industry to which excise taxes were not applied, steam
horsepower nearly doubled again in the two-year period from 1890 to
1892, growing from 41,303 to 81,346.

In 25 years, the whole outward appearance of the country changed from
the ground up. In the midst of this, the little town of Łódż quickly
grew into a giant center of the textile industry, into a “Polish
Manchester,” with the typical appearance of a modern factory
city—countless smoking factory chimneys packed tightly one next to the
other, a population made up almost exclusively of factory personnel, and
a municipal life regulated by factory whistles, revolving exclusively
around industry and trade. Here we find a series of gigantic
establishments, among which the Scheibler factory, with its yearly
production, worth 15 million rubles, and its 7,000 workers, claims first
place. In the southwestern corner of the country, on the Prussian
border, a whole new industrial area sprang up, as though conjured up out
of the ground, where factories suddenly emerged amid forests and rivers,
where no cities had even been built, and all else was grouped around the
factories from the outset. In the old capital, Warsaw, the collection
point for all handicrafts, craft production did increase significantly.
But at the same time it frequently fell under the domination of merchant
capital. Small and medium-sized independent workshops dissolved
themselves into cottage industry, and large warehouses for the products
of craftsmen came to the fore as collection points for small production.
The trade of the whole country was concentrated from now on in the Stock
Exchange and in countless banking and commission firms. Praga, a suburb
of Warsaw, became a center of the metal industry with large-scale
metallurgical plants. And the gigantic Žyrardów linen factory in
Warsaw,¹⁸ with its 8,000 workers, became a small city unto itself.

_4. The Main Regions of Polish Industry_

We have given a general outline of the development of Polish industry,
and it remains for us to illustrate what we have said in greater detail
with individual histories of the most important branches of industry,
providing a sketch of how factory production is grouped locally, along
with its outward appearance.

The industry of the Kingdom of Poland—if one leaves out the
insignificant factories scattered about on the east bank of the Vistula
and along the Prussian border—is concentrated in three areas, each with
its own distinctive physiognomy, each with a character and history
different from the others.

The most significant among them is _the Łódż region_. It includes the
city of Łódż with its adjoining area, and farther out, the cities of
Pabianice, Zgierz, and Tomaszów, as well as some districts of Kalisz
province. In 1885, the value of production from this region already
amounted to 49 million rubles.^(XL) Today it is worth at least 120
million.^(XLI) This is the true _textile industry region_ of Poland. The
history of its main center, _Łódż_, typifies to the greatest extent the
history of all Polish industry. It would be difficult to imagine a less
favorable place than Łódż for the founding of an industrial city. It is
located in a plains area with hardly any forests or water.¹⁹ Only about
ten years ago there were boggy areas here and there on both sides of the
main street, so that in some places the town was barely 200 paces wide.
The tiny Łódka River is now completely polluted by factory waste, and
all necessary water comes to the factories from artesian wells and
ponds. In the year 1821 Łódż had only 112 houses with 800 inhabitants.
But in 1823 colonization began, Silesian and Saxon cloth makers settled
there, and by 1827 the inhabitants of Łódż numbered 2,840, with 322
manufacturing workers among them. In 1837 it had more than 10,000
inhabitants, and in 1840, 18,600, with production worth over 1.1 million
rubles annually. As a result of the increased Russian tariff of 1831,
however, and the crisis caused by that in cloth manufacturing, the city
stopped growing, and the number of inhabitants even declined in 1850 to
15,600.^(XLII) After the 1860s, however, as a result of the causes
described above, which all together brought about the opening of the
Russian market, there began for Łódż an era of rapid development,
followed in the 1870s by growth that was truly tempestuous. For in Łódż
we see:

  --------- --------------------------------------------------------------------
  In 1860   32,000 inhabitants and production worth 2,600,000 rubles
  In 1878   100,000 inhabitants and production worth 26,000,000 rubles
  In 1885   150,000 inhabitants and production worth 36,500,000 rubles
  In 1895   315,000 inhabitants and production worth 90,000,000 rubles^(XLIII)
  --------- --------------------------------------------------------------------

In the last 25 years in Łódż, there was also a conversion in the kind of
cloth produced. Up until the 1870s, cotton goods were made for a limited
market, primarily for the well-to-do classes. But when the Russian
market was opened to Polish industry and gradually a new class of
customers, the working population, began to play the leading role in
demand, the textile industry in Łódż had to adjust itself to the new
consumers. So the Łódż factories went over to the production of cheaper
and simpler cotton goods, such as tricot and other types of cheap cloth,
including crude cotton prints, but above all to the production of
fustian.²⁰ Fabrication of this cloth was first transplanted from Saxony
to the city of Pabianice in 1873.^(XLIV) Today it is the prevalent kind
of cloth produced in the entire region, as the following figures show.
Łódż manufactured:^(XLV)

  --------------- -------- --------
                  _1881_   _1886_
  Lancort²¹²²     29%      27%
  Bjas²³          44%      29%
  Fustian         10%      35%
  Mitkal²⁴        5.5%     5%
  Miscellaneous   11.5%    4%
                  100.0%   100%
  --------------- -------- --------

The drastic change in tariff policy in 1877 also brought into being a
new branch of the cotton industry in the Łódż region, namely the
fabrication of a so-called mixed yarn of cotton and wool (vigogne).²⁵
Before that, this product was massively imported to Russia from Werdau
and Crimmitschau,²⁶ but shortly after the introduction of the gold
tariff its entry into Russia was closed. To circumvent this tariff wall,
several factories were now transferred directly from Saxony to Łódż by
German entrepreneurs, and by 1886 over 39,000 spindles were producing
this mixed yarn there.^(XLVI)

In this way the current structuring of the large cotton industry in the
Łódż region is seen to be a result of the opening of the Russian market
and of Russian tariff policy in the 1870s.

The same factors are no less prevalent in the wool industry of this
region. The mighty leap in wool production from a value of four million
rubles in 1870 to 22 million in 1880 shows what an effect the Russian
market had on this branch of Polish industry. As for the spinning of
wool, that industry has an especially great debt to Russia’s tariff
policy for its present-day level of development. The introduction of the
gold tariff in 1877 had as a direct result the relocation of many
foreign spinning mills to Łódż; the largest, with 22,000 spindles, was
established in 1879 by Allart Rousseau Fils, and today it is still an
affiliate of that firm in Roubaix,²⁷ from which it also obtains its
semi-finished goods.^(XLVII) Since the 1870s, Poland has become Russia’s
source of supply for yarn, and its production of yarn surpasses that in
Russia by more than 217 percent; in 1890 in Poland its value amounted to
18,749,000 rubles; in Russia, 5,909,000 rubles. In most recent times,
Russian tariff policy has helped two other branches of the textile
industry to flourish in Łódż—hosiery mills and knitting mills.^(XLVIII)

A still more interesting illustration of the effect of Russian tariff
policy on Polish industry is offered by the history of _the second
region, that of Sosnowiec_.

This encompasses the southwestern part of Piotrków province, lying close
to the Prussian border, including the cities of Częstochowa, Będzin,
Zawiercie, Sielce, and Sosnowiec. While the Łódż region began its
industrial development in the 1820s, the industry of the Sosnowiec
region, as has been mentioned, represents a phenomenon of quite recent
date.

Up until the 1860s there was nothing to be seen here for miles other
than dense pine forests, but within 15 years this forest region was
transformed into a busy industrial area whose textile industry was
already preparing to give serious competition to that of old Łódż.

Two important circumstances greatly favored the rapid development of
industry in the Sosnowiec region. First, the cheapness of fuel. The
southern part of Piotrków province contains Poland’s coal basin, and
having this coal in its vicinity placed youthful Sosnowiec industry in
an outstandingly advantageous position in comparison with not only
Russia but also the other parts of Poland. The average price of one pood
of coal in the regions under discussion is as follows for each location:

  ------------------ ------------------------------
  Sosnowiec region   2.40 to 9.7 kopecks
  Warsaw region      11.22 to 13.0 kopecks
  Łódż region        11.50 to 14.9 kopecks^(XLIX)
  ------------------ ------------------------------

Second, the cheapness of labor. From the outset, this coal industry
placed a contingent of “free” female labor and child labor at the
disposal of the factories of the region, in the persons of the members
of the miners’ families. Here too the Sosnowiec region finds itself in a
significantly more advantageous position than that of Łódż.
Specifically, wages per month in rubles amount to:^(L)

_Sosnowiec District_

_Men_

_Women_

_Children_

Finishing

13.50

10.75

8.50

Wool spinning

29.25

9.0

6.0

Mixed spinning

21.25

10.25

–

Cotton spinning

15.75

11.0

4.75

Average

20.0

10.25

6.25

_Lodz District_

_Men_

_Women_

_Children_

Finishing

26.00

18.0

9.75

Wool spinning

28.25

18.25

6.0

Mixed spinning

22.0

13.0

–

Cotton spinning

21.0

17.75

4.50

Average

24.30

16.6

6.7

The difference in the average [of wages] for the textile industry in
Łódż by comparison with that in Sosnowiec comes to + _21.5 percent for
men; for women, + 61.9 percent; for children, + 4.7 percent_.

The real reason for the rise of industry in the Sosnowiec region,
however, was the new era in Russian tariff policy. Right after 1877 a
whole series of Prussian and Saxon factories were simply moved from
Germany to Poland. An impressive industry was soon concentrated in one
zone three Russian miles wide along the border. Of the 27 most
significant factories that could be counted here in the vicinity of the
border in 1886, five had been founded before 1877, and 22 in the years
1877–86 (81.5 percent).^(LI) Production from the factories in Sosnowiec
had a value of half a million rubles in 1879, but in 1886 the figure was
13 million, an increase of about 2,500 percent in seven years.^(LII)

The development of factory production in the Sosnowiec region went hand
in hand with surprising growth in the _coal industry_. Supported and, in
the 1830s (1833–42), even directly run by the Polish Bank, this industry
developed quite slowly up until the 1860s and in 1860 produced a yield
of 3.6 million poods²⁸ of coal. Since that time, three important factors
came into play one after the other, providing a powerful impetus to the
development of mining: first, the construction of railroads in the 1860s
and 1870s; second, the development of factory industry; and third, the
prohibitive tariff system. The upturn in coal production can be
expressed in the following table, which shows the extraction of coal, in
millions of poods:

  ------ --------------
  1860   3.6
  1870   13.8
  1880   78.4
  1890   150.8^(LIII)
  ------ --------------

Thus, during the twenty-year period 1870–90, coal production increased
by 993 percent.

The rail industry is one of the most important buyers of coal. The
Polish coal basin and the coal basin in southern Russia [i.e., the
Donbas] supply Russia’s railroads with fuel. The consumption of the
latter amounted to:

_In millions of poods_

_1880_

_1885_

_1890_

coal from southern Russia

22.2

34.3

39.8

coal from Poland

10.8

13.8

17.5^(LIV)

But factory industry is a still more important buyer of coal. In 1890
the Łódż region alone used 30.6 million poods of coal, the Warsaw region
26 million, and the Sosnowiec region 40 million poods, in which the iron
works played a great role.^(LV) In 1893, coal consumption in Warsaw came
to 35.5 million poods, in Łódż in the same year 36.2 million.^(LVI) And
in 1896 coal consumption in Łódż was 41 million poods.^(LVII)

A new epoch in the Polish coal industry begins with the extension of the
protective tariff policy to this branch of production in 1884, which
imposed a tariff of one-half to two kopecks in gold per pood on the
importation of foreign coal, which until then had been duty-free. The
immediate result was a great “coal crisis” in Russia, i.e., a great coal
shortage as a result of the backward methods of the Russian coal mining
industry and its inability to replace the reduced import of English coal
with its own coal, proportionate to growing demand.^(LVIII)

The Polish coal industry reaped the benefits of this situation; it
rapidly expanded its activity and in a few years conquered all the most
important markets in Russia: Odessa, Moscow, St. Petersburg, even
southern Russia. Although the “coal crisis” was overcome a long time
ago, Polish coal has since then driven southern Russian coal from the
battlefield, step-by-step, on the Moscow–Kursk railroad line, the
Moscow–Brest line, the Kiev–Voronezh line, the Fastov line, the St.
Petersburg-Warsaw line, and in part the southwestern lines. In 1894,
5,824,000 poods of coal were delivered to Odessa from Poland, as against
5,300,000 from the southern Russian coal basin [i.e., the Donbas].^(LIX)

It still remains for us to take a look at the [Sosnowiec] region’s iron
industry. This had behind it a longer history, because even at the time
of the Duchy of Warsaw around 1814, 46 blast furnaces for iron ore could
already be counted.^(LX) However, development proceeded so slowly that
up to the 1880s Poland had brought production no higher than 2.5 million
poods of pig iron, 1.4 million poods of iron, and 3.9 million poods of
steel.^(LXI)

A new page in the history of the Polish iron industry begins with the
drastic change in Russia’s tariff policy. After the Crimean War the
brief period of tree trade lasted somewhat longer for iron than for
other commodities, because even with the most stringent protective
tariff policy the Russian iron industry could not have satisfied the
enormous demand created by the building of the railroads. But here too,
from 1881 on, a protective tariff has taken the place of free trade, and
after a gradual rise the tariffs were set in 1887 at between 25 and 30
kopecks in gold per pood for pig iron, between 50 kopecks and 1.10
rubles for iron, and 70 kopecks for steel; and the tariff of 1891
brought a further increase in customs duties.^(LXII) We see the direct
effect of the upwardly revised tariff in the decline of foreign metal
imports to Russia in the following table:^(LXIII)

_In millions of poods_

_Pig Iron_

_Iron_

_Steel_

1881

14.3

6.5

1.4

1890

7.1

5.0

1.0

Metal production in Russia and Poland grew correspondingly. In Poland it
was as follows:^(LXIV)

_In millions of poods_

 

_Pig Iron_

_Iron and Steel_

1860

0.7

0.3

1870

1.3 (100%)

0.6 (100%)

1880

2.4

5.5

1890

7.4 (+488%)

7.5 (+1054%)

The _third industrial region, that of Warsaw_, does not have such a
distinctive physiognomy as the two already described. Here we find a
great diversity of industrial branches, but the most important are
_machinery production_ and _the sugar industry_. The history of the
first is completely told in the following simple comparison. While until
1860 only nine factories producing agricultural machinery existed in
Poland, in 1860–85 forty-two new ones were established.^(LXV) Here, as
in all earlier cases, we see the same upswing as a result of the radical
change in market conditions in the 1860s and 1870s.

Finally, let us take a look at the history of the sugar industry. It had
already made its start in the 1820s but until the 1850s was only a
subsidiary branch of agriculture, of small dimensions and often run by
the landowners themselves. The production of the 31 sugar factories in
operation in 1848 did not exceed 177,500 poods, amounting to no more
than 5,000 to 6,000 poods per factory. The year 1854 shows the greatest
number of sugar factories, when there were 55.^(LXVI) After the
abolition of serfdom and the revolution in agriculture, sugar production
was separated from agriculture and became an independent branch of
industry. The number of establishments gradually decreased through the
simultaneous concentration of production. In 1870 we still find only 41
sugar factories, but with an annual output of 1.2 million poods. A true
revolution, however, was caused in the sugar industry by the tax and
customs policy of the Russian government. Namely, in 1867 the singular
system of sugar taxation that had applied in Poland until then was
annulled and replaced by that of the Russian Empire. The latter was
based on taxation not of the finished product actually produced, but on
the amount of finished product that was assumed to be produced in every
factory, measured by the fixed standard productivity of the press
apparatus. In this form the sugar tax naturally became the spur to the
improvement of production; it soon moved all sugar factories to
introduce the diffusion method, which pushed productivity above the norm
taken as the basis for the tax, making the nominal tax of 80 kopecks per
pood in reality only 35 or even 20.^(LXVII) In 1876, to encourage sugar
exports, a rebate of the excise tax on exported sugar was ordered, which
in view of the above circumstances acted as the equivalent of a colossal
export subsidy. This was yet another spur to a feverish improvement of
production methods and to expansion of production. In a few years the
sugar industry in Russia and in Poland was transformed into a
large-scale, mass-production industry. While Russia had exported only
four poods of sugar in 1874, sugar exports in 1877 already amounted to
3,896,902 poods, and the government found itself obliged to “refund”
roughly 3 million rubles—half the entire sugar excise tax levied in the
Empire.^(LXVIII) In 1881 the government took steps toward thorough
reform of taxation of the sugar industry, but in the meantime the
industry had reached very high levels of technological development. In
Poland there were:

in 1869–70, 41 factories with an output of 1.2 million poods;

in 1890–91, 40 factories with an output of 4.8 million poods.

From this feverish expansion of production there followed a crisis in
1885, which brought in its wake the establishment of a sugar cartel
embracing all of Russia and Poland and thus placed the distinctive stamp
of large-scale industry on this branch of production. One peculiar
effect of this cartel is that Russian sugar, whose production cost
amounts to one and five-sixths pence per pound, is sold outside the
Empire for one and two-thirds pence, but in Kiev for four pence per
pound.^(LXVIX) With such monopoly prices, no wonder the sugar factories
are able to pay out enormous dividends.

The foregoing picture of industry in Poland would not be complete if it
were not at least supplemented with some information about the role of
Polish industry in the economy of the Russian Empire in general and, in
particular, in comparison with other important industrial regions. The
significance of Poland and the two capitals of Russian factory
production—St. Petersburg and Moscow—in terms of industrial activity can
be generally represented as follows:^(LXX)

  ----------------------- -------------------------------------------- --------------------------
  _1890_                  _Total Production (in millions of rubles)_   _Per Capita (in rubles)_
  Russian Empire          1,597                                        13.5
  Moscow region           460                                          38
  St. Petersburg region   242                                          40
  Poland                  210                                          23
  ----------------------- -------------------------------------------- --------------------------

As one may see, Polish industry takes _third place_ in the Empire, in
absolute as well as in relative terms, while Moscow claims first place
in absolute terms and St. Petersburg has first place in relative terms.
If we single out the two most important branches of production, textiles
and mining, we obtain the following comparison:

Of the total production of the Empire (without Finland), which amounted
to 82.0 million poods of pig iron, 25.7 million of iron, 34.5 million of
steel, and 550 million of coal, the share of the three main regions was
as follows (referring only to private businesses):^(LXXI)

  --------------- ------------ -------- --------- --------
                  _Pig Iron_   _Iron_   _Steel_   _Coal_
  Urals region    36%          56%      7.7%      2.9%
  Donets region   40%          6%       42.0%     54.0%
  Poland          14%          14%      23.0%     40.0%
  --------------- ------------ -------- --------- --------

Specifically, the most important regions in Russia for metal and coal
production are the Donets Basin (in southern Russia) and the Urals
region, and Poland is in competition with primarily the former but in
part also with the latter for the Russian market. As we see, Poland
stands in _second place_ in the Empire in mining, right behind the
Donbas; only in the production of pig iron does it take third place.
Although Poland has only 7.3 percent of the Empire’s total population,
it has a quarter of the Russian Empire’s steel production and two-fifths
of its coal production.

Similarly, in the Empire’s textile industry Poland plays a very
significant role quite out of proportion to the size of its population.
The share of the total number of spindles and looms in the Empire’s
cotton industry, which in 1886 amounted to 3,913,000 and 84,500
respectively, was as follows for the three main regions:^(LXXII)

  ----------------------- ------------ ---------
                          _Spindles_   _Looms_
  Moscow region           55%          71.6%
  St. Petersburg region   29%          12.8%
  Poland                  13%          12.5%
  ----------------------- ------------ ---------

Here again Poland stands in _third place_. In the other branches it has
a much greater significance, as is seen from the following: Of the total
textile industry in the Empire, whose value of production amounted to
580.9 million rubles in 1892, 19.5 percent fell to Poland; its share in
individual branches, however, amounted in cotton spinning to 15.6
percent, in cotton weaving to 16 percent, in linen making to 42 percent,
in wool weaving and cloth making to 29.6 percent, in wool spinning to 77
percent, and in knitting to 78 percent.^(LXXIII)

If Poland on the whole is surpassed by the industries of central Russia
and the St. Petersburg region, nevertheless in certain important
branches of the economy it is ahead of all other parts of the Empire. In
particular, Poland’s great significance in these branches indicates a
far-reaching division of labor between Polish and Russian industry.

_5. Poland’s Industrial Market_

From the foregoing it is clear that Russian markets have been the actual
driving forces behind the development of today’s large-scale industry in
Poland. It would therefore be interesting to hear more precise
statements about the extent of the market for Polish commodities in
Russia, but this can be determined only with difficulty. As in the
statistics of all nations, there exists in those of Russia a great lack
of data on internal trade. Here an overview can be obtained only
indirectly and approximately. The official investigation carried out in
1886 showed that of the 141 largest factories, which together represent
a third of all production,

37 factories with output worth 7,061,984 rubles produce exclusively for
Poland,

27 factories with output worth 7,480,645 rubles produce exclusively for
Russia,

11 factories with output worth 13,224,589 rubles produce mainly for
Poland,

34 factories with output worth 22,824,013 rubles produce mainly for
Russia,

32 factories with output worth 19,311,695 rubles produce half for Poland
and half for Russia.^(LXXIV)

If we assume that the term “mainly” is equivalent to two-thirds, then
Polish industry’s market can be represented as follows: The 141
factories produce commodities

for Poland to the value of 33,142,228 rubles, equaling 47%;

for Russia to the value of 36,760,698 rubles, equaling 52%.

The general conclusion reached by the investigative commission was that
Polish factories sell 50 to 55 percent of their products in Russia.

Some partial data also confirm the above-mentioned conclusion, such as
the following figures (in poods) showing where the textile industry of
Łódż marketed its goods.^(LXXV)

_1884 (crisis)_

_Poland_

_Russia_

Cotton and woolen goods

372,390

1,004,286

Yarn

45,290

4,524

Total

417,680

1,008,810

_1885_

_Poland_

_Russia_

Cotton and woolen goods

321,344

1,115,460

Yarn

63,051

99,951

Total

384,395

1,215,411

_1886_

_Poland_

_Russia_

Cotton and woolen goods

443,565

1,507,259

Yarn

56,583

90,136

Total

500,148

1,597,395

Thus the center of the textile industry was already selling
three-fourths of its products in Russia by the middle of the 1880s. In
the ten years since the above calculations were made, however, the
relationship may have shifted to a much greater degree in favor of sales
in Russia, since production has grown by roughly half again since then,
while it is self-evident that the domestic market could only increase by
a small proportion. On the other hand, we have direct evidence that
during these ten years the Polish market opened up new areas in Russia,
which we will discuss in more detail below. Thus one may assume that the
relationship today, at a minimum, is that two-thirds of the products of
Polish industry are absorbed by Russia. In fact, this market has spread
to include all those branches of industry that constitute the central
core of large-scale capitalist production in any country: the textile,
metal, and coal industries. Naturally a whole series of smaller
industrial branches, such as those producing candy and other
confections, or trinkets and gewgaws, etc., are also sending their
products to Russia in ever growing quantities.

The advance of the Polish market in Russia offers an interesting picture
from a geographical standpoint. As was said, this trade began on a
larger scale only in the 1870s. For a long time, however, it was
restricted to only the western and southern provinces of the Russian
Empire—to Lithuania and Ukraine, thus actually to the old parts of what
was formerly Poland. But in the beginning of the 1880s, Poland conquered
a new market in the south of Russia, the area called New
Russia.^(LXXVI)²⁹ In the middle of the 1880s, Polish trade took another
step forward. In 1883 the free transit to Transcaucasia via Batum,
agreed to at the Congress of Berlin, was abolished and a tariff border
erected.³⁰ The Western European countries, above all England, thereby
lost a significant market for their products, a market that now passed
into the hands of Russian and Polish industrialists. In the year 1885
Polish manufactured goods appeared for the first time in the Caucasus;
since then the import of these goods to the three centers of Caucasian
trade has grown as follows:^(LXXVII)

  ------------ --------- ---------- ---------
  _In poods_   _Batum_   _Tiflis_   _Baku_
  1885–86      39,000    55,000     68,000
  1887–88      95,100    200,000    258,000
  ------------ --------- ---------- ---------

At the end of the 1880s Polish trade pushed eastward—to the Volga
region. Polish deliveries to the center of Volga trade, Tsaritsyn, were:
1887: 55,640 poods; 1888: 73,729 poods; 1889: 106,403 poods.^(LXXVIII)

At the same time Poland began to take part in trade between Europe and
Asia; its products appeared at the colossal fairs in _Nizhny Novgorod_,
where large Polish warehouses were built beginning in 1889,^(LXXIX) and
also in _Irbit_. Finally, at the end of the 1880s and the beginning of
the 1890s, Polish trade stepped onto Asian ground. First, trade
relations were entered into with Siberia: in 1888 with _Tomsk_ in
western Siberia,^(LXXX) in 1892 with _Nerchinsk_ in southeastern
Siberia,^(LXXXI) and in 1894 Polish commodities appeared in _Omsk_ [in
central Siberia].^(LXXXII) During the same time Polish trade in Asia
also developed in two other directions, on the one hand to China, on the
other to Persia and Asia Minor.

In the course of twenty years, 1870–90, Polish trade found access,
step-by-step, to every corner of European Russia. This rapid expansion
of the market, as we have seen, turned Polish factory production into
large-scale industry in twenty years. Since then, however, it has been
preparing itself for a new, important undertaking: _the conquest of
Asian markets_. Polish trade has already taken several important steps
in this direction. This, however, is doubtless only the beginning of a
beginning, and the tremendous prospects that are opening to industry
thanks to the Trans-Siberian Railroad³¹ and the major successes of
Russian policy in Asia mean a new revolution for Polish industry (among
other things), a revolution perhaps even more thoroughgoing than that
which it experienced in the 1870s. With great earnestness Polish
entrepreneurs are getting ready for this future and steadily directing
their attention toward Asia. A museum of products from the Orient has
been built in Warsaw, which has the special task of familiarizing Polish
producers with the world of Asian commodities and with the tastes, and
the needs and requirements, of Asians. The prospectus of the new
commercial institution states:

Sugar and distillery products, machinery and cast-iron pipe, glass,
faience, and porcelain, shoes, neckties, and gloves, and fabrics, both
cotton and linen, which are made in our country, just a short time ago
traveled no farther than to a few neighboring provinces; today they go
across the Don and Ural rivers, to the Caucasus, over the Caspian Sea,
to China, Persia, and Asia Minor. But in order to carry the process
along in this direction as far as possible, our tastes cannot be imposed
on those for whom the goods are intended; rather we must pay attention
to their tastes, and we must produce what will sell in those markets,
but the tastes there are infinitely different from our own … Out there
the type of cloth, the form, the design, the color preferences—all are
different from ours … What we have been producing so far has been
intended primarily for the civilized, established layers of the
population in those countries. The masses have been beyond the target
range of our industry. But if we want to place our industry on a firm
foundation and even expand it, we must produce goods that correspond to
the habits and tastes of the masses, and therefore we must learn what
the needs of those masses are.^(LXXXIII)

Here, then, in a few brief strokes [let us summarize] the history of
industry in Russian Poland. Having arisen out of the efforts of the
Kingdom of Poland government, it immediately, at the very first moment,
made an attempt to take hold of the markets in Russia. When its access
to those was impeded, it had to rely more on the domestic sphere of
consumption, and so it developed slowly, little by little. The social
crisis that Russia went through in the 1860s tore Poland out of its
economic immobility and drew it into the whirlpool of capitalist
development. With the renewed opening, this time on a definitive basis,
of the Russian market regions, Polish industry gained access to a rich
and fertile breeding ground, and quickly went through the process of
conversion to large-scale industry. Russia’s tariff policy gave monopoly
advantages to the Russian and Polish capitalists in this enormous sales
territory, giving rise to a feverish accumulation of capital. Factory
industry now became the dominant factor in the entire life of Polish
society, so that a complete and drastic change took place in Polish life
during the last twenty-five years.

As we mentioned earlier, up until the 1860s Poland preserved the
characteristics of an agricultural country, with the social estate of
the landowning nobility dominant in all spheres of public life. The
peasant reform³² for the most part shattered this preeminence of the
landowning nobility.^(LXXXIV) The indebtedness of the landowning nobles
was greatly increased by the need to have money capital at their
disposal for running their estates [as commercial businesses]. The
general crisis of European agriculture that was ushered in, in the
1880s, and the [accompanying] fall of grain prices finished them off.

In this way the whole broad stratum of nobles owning medium-sized land
holdings was and is heading toward its ruin more and more every day.
Fifteen percent of the estates of the nobility have already passed from
those owners into German and Jewish hands, and another 15 percent has
been broken up into parcels and sold to peasants. The remaining landed
property is burdened with mortgage debt, which amounts on the average to
80 percent of its value, but in two-fifths of the cases the debt amounts
to between 100 and 250 percent of the property’s value.^(LXXXV) At the
same time, however, industry has grown ever stronger, and soon it will
outpace agriculture in all respects. As early as 1880 the value of
industrial production was equal to that of grain production.^(LXXXVI)
Today it is more than double the value of grain production; the former
amounts to at least 23 rubles per capita, the latter only 11
rubles.^(LXXXVII) But even this quantitatively subordinate agriculture
has become totally dependent on industry. Whereas Poland was formerly a
“breadbasket of Europe,” a country that mainly produced grain for the
world market, today it barely meets its own needs. Industry has created
an internal market that devours the entire output of agriculture. If
today Poland still exports substantial quantities of wheat, this happens
only because, to make up for that, it imports even larger quantities of
inferior types of grain from Russia. Second, agriculture today, in view
of the constantly falling price of grain, is forced to emancipate itself
more and more from pure wheat production and switch over to the
cultivation of so-called industrial crops and to the raising of
livestock.^(LXXXVIII) It would be superfluous to stress the fact that
handicrafts, too, where it has not been destroyed directly by the
competition of factories, owes its continued existence to factory
industry—in part by working for it directly, in part by profiting from
the overall accumulation of capital and the increased internal
consumption that industry has brought with it. Industry has now become
the trunk from which all other branches of the country’s material
existence draw their vital juices. Or to state it more correctly, it is
the driving force that revolutionizes all aspects of material existence
and subordinates them to itself: agriculture, handicraft, trade, and
transport. Poland, a country whose social conditions were previously so
unique, has now become a typical capitalist country. The mechanical loom
and the steam engine have robbed it of its unconventional physiognomy
and placed a levelling international stamp upon it. As early as 1884
Poland was afflicted with an illness specific to capitalism, its first
big economic crisis. Already, here and there in the awakening labor
movement, the Hippocratic features in Polish capitalism³³ are coming to
light.


PART II. RUSSIA’S ECONOMIC POLICY IN POLAND

The picture we have given in the foregoing of the historical development
and present-day condition of industry in Poland is quite different from
that presented to us by the history of urban craft production in
medieval Poland. Despite the identical nature of their
origins—artificial transplantation from Germany carried out by the
higher authorities—manufacture in Poland not only did not perish, as
urban handicraft did earlier, but developed into large-scale industry,
and despite its foreign, German beginnings, it not only sank deep roots
in the national life of Poland but also became the dominant factor,
actually setting the tone in Polish life.

However, in recent times certain phenomena have appeared that have
awakened fears in various quarters about the longer-term future of
Polish industry. It is clearly evident that the market in Russia, and in
conjunction with it the Asian market that has now been opened, have been
the lifeblood of Polish industry. In all these areas, however, it goes
without saying that Polish commodities are in competition with Russian
ones. A conflict of interest between the Russian and Polish bourgeoisies
over these markets appears at first glance to be the natural
consequence, a conflict that is bound to become more severe, the more
Polish industry grows. On the other hand, it seems to be just as natural
that the Russian capitalist class would have the Russian government on
its side against the Polish competition, and that the government might
use its power to discriminate against Polish industry, and might perhaps
reestablish some sort of tariff barrier between Poland and Russia as the
simplest and most radical means of doing this. Recently, voices calling
for such measures have frequently made themselves heard, and the opinion
has been expressed here and there that for Polish industry, after the
period of prosperity which it has enjoyed up to now, a new period may
begin—one of persecution and punitive measures against Polish industry
by the Russian government—and that as a result, sooner or later, Polish
industry is bound to go under.^(LXXXIX)³⁴

Before we conclude our description of Polish industry, then, we still
need to go into the question of what the conflict of interest between
Polish and Russian factory production is in reality, of how Polish
industry is equipping itself for competitive battle with Russian
industry, and what the position of the Russian government is with regard
to this struggle. In this way, we will be in a position to amplify our
account of the history of industry in Poland with a discussion of the
prospects for its future.

_1. History of the Fight Between Moscow and Łódż_

It is, first of all, quite untrue that the competition and conflict
between Russia’s central industrial region and Polish industry, over
which so much of an uproar has been made in the last few years, is a new
phenomenon dating only from the 1880s, as is generally assumed. Quite
the contrary: this battle is as old as Polish industry itself. As early
as the 1820s the government was presented with petitions that, from the
Russian side, called for an increase in the Russian-Polish tariffs, and
from the Polish side, for the total abolition of the tariff barrier
between Poland and Russia. In fact, ever since that time the rivalry has
gone on unceasingly. Except for the year 1826, there were 1,831
petitions sent by the Russian entrepreneurs to St.
Petersburg^(XC)—always with complaints about Polish industry and with
demands that “the industry of the Fatherland” be supported in its fight
against its Polish counterpart. As one may see from [Part One’s review
of] the history of Polish industry, in the end the government not only
did not fulfill the requests of the Russian entrepreneurs, but, on the
contrary, abolished the tariff barrier between Poland and Russia in 1851
and so let the contest between the opponent industries take its own
course. The battle flared up again intensely in the middle of the 1880s,
first because Polish industry at that time, as we have mentioned, took
possession of a whole series of new market areas in Russia, in the south
as well as the east, and second because, just at that time, the whole
textile industry of the Sosnowiec region was seemingly conjured up out
of the ground along the Prussian border. But on the other hand, the
price of goods, forced up suddenly and severely by the change in tariff
policies at the end of the 1870s, had fallen somewhat toward the middle
of the 1880s. The Moscow entrepreneurs, upset by this, began “to search
for the guilty party.”^(XCI) And they found it—the Polish competition.
Here the battle was led chiefly by the Moscow cotton manufacturers,
because of the conquests that Polish cotton goods were making in the
Russian markets.

A certain [Sergei Fedorovich] _Sharapov_ led the first attack on behalf
of the Moscow entrepreneurs in a public speech,³⁵ which he gave in 1885,
in Moscow and in Ivanovo-Voznesensk,³⁶ a speech that later appeared in
print. From the start, Sharapov took the loftiest of tones and puffed up
the whole campaign [supposedly] waged by Moscow’s calico against the
accursed fustian from Łódż, portraying it as a historic and heroic
combat by the Slavic race against the Germanic. He demonstrated that
Polish industry in every way enjoyed more favorable conditions than
Russian industry; for example, according to Sharapov, cheaper German
credit was at Poland’s disposal. It cost only 3.5 to 4 percent, while
the entrepreneurs in central Russia had to pay 7 to 8 percent. Second,
cheaper raw materials were available to Poland, which also had to pay
far lower transportation costs than the Moscow region lying far to the
east. Third, Poland enjoyed more favorable rates on the railroads, which
it obtained as a result of a private agreement among the railroad
companies. Fourth and last, it had to pay significantly lower taxes: in
central Russia taxes amounted to 3,600 rubles per 1 million rubles of
production; in Łódż, however, the figure was only 1,400 rubles; and in
smaller Polish cities, only 109 rubles.^(XCII)

Sharapov called on the government to fight against the “German” industry
of Poland and to rescue the Russian _and Polish_ elements oppressed by
it (!).

The next year, 1886, the Moscow entrepreneurs sent a deputation to St.
Petersburg with the “most humble and obedient” request to once again
establish a tariff barrier between Poland and Russia.^(XCIII)

The government, having been approached in this way, formed a commission
in the same year, 1886, consisting of Professors [I.I.] Ianzhul, Ilyin,
and [Nikolai Petrovich] Langovoi,³⁷ which had the task of investigating
the conditions of production of the Polish industrial districts and of
checking into the claims of the Moscow manufacturers and verifying
whether they were correct.^(XCIV) The results of this investigation,
carried out more seriously and more thoroughly than any other, were as
follows:

On the side of Polish industry we see cheaper fuel, smaller fixed
capital, lower taxes, a better labor force, and more advantageous
spatial concentration of firms in a few locations. On the side of
Russian industry, on the other hand, cheaper labor power, smaller
transportation costs to the markets (Caucasus, Volga region, Asia),
smaller outlays on the workforce (hospitals, schools, etc.), profits
from the factory stores, finally a surplus of water to run the cotton
weaving and spinning mills.^(XCV) In its conclusions, the commission
came out against the introduction of a tariff barrier between Poland and
Russia, and likewise against a differential tariff on raw cotton
directed against Poland, first because the government “would hardly deem
it possible to treat Poland as a foreign country in trade and industrial
relations,” and second because a higher differential tariff “would
appear to the inhabitants of Poland, Russian subjects, as an injustice
against them and would doubtless give rise to great dissatisfaction.”
The commission considered the only just measure to be an increase in the
prevailing taxes on Polish industry sufficient to equalize them with
Russian taxes.^(XCVI)

In 1887 the Moscow entrepreneurs once again presented a petition to the
minister of finance at the annual fair in Nizhny Novgorod, in which they
requested an increase in the duties on cotton and the introduction of a
higher differential tariff at the Polish border.^(XCVII) Now the Łódż
manufacturers also entered the fray. They answered the above-mentioned
document with a counterpetition, in which they sought to prove that they
suffered significantly less advantageous conditions of production than
their Moscow competitors, that the cotton mills of central Russia
yielded profits as high as 8.4 percent, while those in Poland yielded
only 7.5 percent.^(XVIII) [They also argued] that transport of raw
cotton from Liverpool to Moscow cost 35.77 kopecks per pood, but from
Liverpool to Łódż, 37.10 kopecks per pood, and that therefore a further
worsening of their situation by the introduction of a differential
tariff on cotton would make cotton production extremely difficult for
them.^(XCIX)

In 1888 once again a commission was appointed to investigate the
disputed matter, this time under the chairmanship of [an official named]
Ber.³⁸ Its conclusions this time were very much to Poland’s
disadvantage, and the commission called for a series of measures to
protect the Moscow industrial district against better-situated Polish
industry.^(C)

On the other hand, also in 1888, the Moscow industrialists again
submitted a petition to the minister of finance, in which they
complained about how hard-pressed they were by their situation and
called on the government to take measures against the “parasitical”
industry of Poland.^(CI)

In 1889 the Łódż industrialists put out a public-relations pamphlet
entitled _The Conflict between Moscow and Łódż_, in which they attempted
to show through the mouth of “an impartial, nonpartisan observer” that
Łódż had to pay more for raw cotton than Moscow did; that the advantage
of cheaper fuel, which Łódż had over Moscow, amounted merely to the
negligible figure of 0.2 kopecks per arshin of material; that the causes
of the more expensive credit in Moscow lay at Moscow’s own feet, the
result of poor organization; that Łódż suffered from a shortage of
water, paid more for labor, and, finally, made smaller profits than
central Russian industry.^(CII)

In 1890 the system of railroad rates was taken over by the government
for [proper] organization. This provided an occasion for forming a new
commission and delegating it to investigate, for the nth time, what the
competitive conditions of the Polish and central Russian industrial
districts actually were, and how, relative to this, the railroad rates
on the lines of importance to the competitors should be calculated. This
commission, which served under the chairmanship of Lazarev,³⁹ a
representative of the government’s department of railroads, again came
to no conclusion. The representatives of the Łódż and Moscow
industrialists gave their familiar arguments and counterarguments as
best they could. Two arguments from the Polish side were the only new
additions, namely, their reference to the use of cheap naphtha residue⁴⁰
as fuel in the Moscow industrial district, and the claim that the tax
burden was greater in Poland than in central Russia, specifically 5.82
rubles per capita in the Moscow region, but 6.64 rubles in
Poland.^(CIII)

The next year, in 1891, once more a well-known economist, this time a
man named [V.D.] Belov, was appointed to investigate the conditions of
production in Poland and central Russia. This man again came to the
conclusion that all the disadvantages were to be found on the Łódż side,
while all the advantages were on Moscow’s, in particular: cheaper labor
power, longer labor time (Moscow 3,429 hours a year, Poland 3,212),
cheaper fuel (naphtha residue costs 6 pence per hundredweight, whereas
coal for the same amount of heat is significantly more, 10.25 pence per
hundredweight), cheaper raw cotton, and, finally, more favorable
railroad rates. The same Sharapov who had sounded the first alarm
against Łódż in 1885 now asserted, in light of the Belov investigation,
that the situation had changed completely since 1885 and that Łódż now
absolutely did not deserve to be penalized in any way.^(CIV)

It was necessary [for us] to deal with the various stages of the dispute
between Łódż and Moscow as thoroughly as we have in order to demonstrate
how difficult it is to arrive at an impartial opinion on this matter,
and how cautious one must usually be about accepting any assertions made
on this subject, because there is not a single argument which has not
been used by both parties, with directly contradictory figures as proof.
And it is only too easy to become an unconscious megaphone amplifying
the chorus of one or another of these two entrepreneurial groups.

After having become acquainted in brief outline with the history of the
Moscow-Łódż dispute and the central issues around which it revolves, we
want to make our own comparison of the competitive conditions of the two
industrial regions in all their main aspects, in order to arrive at an
objective assessment of these issues on the basis of quantitative
evidence.

_2. Conditions of Industrial Production in Poland and Russia_

1. _Fuel_. One of the conditions of production that is by far the most
important for any factory industry is fuel. For Polish industry this
factor is seen by many researchers as the decisive one in its
development, and is regarded as the most important in its competitive
struggle with Russian industry. So says the report of the
above-mentioned commission of 1886: “Fuel is undoubtedly the factor of
production that constitutes the most important difference in conditions
of production between the _gubernias_ [provinces] of central Russia and
the Kingdom of Poland.”^(CV) Polish industry possesses large and rich
coal-mining districts, while the center of Russian industry, the Moscow
region, lies far away from the coal mines of the Donets Basin [Donbas]
and is in the main forced to rely on more expensive wood or peat. “The
price of wood in Moscow province goes higher every day, and according to
the calculations of the engineer Belikov, the cost on the average is
between 11.6 and 13.1 kopecks per pood of wood. Peat, whose use in the
factories is growing rapidly and which is already being used in Moscow
to the extent of 100,000 cords annually, comes to 12 and even 16 kopecks
per pood, mainly due to high transportation costs, and its use is in any
case only to a factory’s advantage if it is in the close vicinity of the
peat bog.” In Moscow, Russian coal costs 13.3 kopecks [per pood] (from
Tula), 17.5 (from Ryazan), and 25 (from the Donbas). English coal also
costs 25 kopecks per pood. “How much more relatively expensive the
most-used fuels, wood and peat, are—given at the same time the
impossibility of replacing them by still more expensive coal—and how
vital this question is for Russian industry, can be judged by the
following: Average heat production, according to the same engineer
Belikov, is 2,430 degrees (F.C.) to 2,700 degrees for wood; for Moscow
peat it is 1,920 to 2,800 degrees; the same heat production for coal is
3,280 degrees for that from Tula, but for coal from the Donbas and for
English coal it goes far above 5,000 degrees.”^(CVI)

Polish industry finds itself in quite a different situation with regard
to fuel. The average price of coal in the main centers of
industry—Sosnowiec, Łódż, and Warsaw—are, respectively, 2.4–4.95
kopecks, 11.5 kopecks, and 13 kopecks per pood, thus costing less than
wood in Moscow, while heat production is of course significantly
greater.^(CVII)

Calculated per unit of product, outlays for fuel amount to:^(CVIII)

_Per pood of cotton yarn_

_In Poland_

_In Moscow_

_In St. Petersburg_

38 kopecks

90 kopecks

53 kopecks

These figures suffice to show the great advantage that Polish industry
has in regard to fuel over its Russian competition.

Professor Schulze-Gävernitz nevertheless believes it possible to assert
that “natural advantages are of no benefit to Polish industry. Certainly
cheaper fuel is pointed to, but according to [D.I.] Mendeleyev’s data,
compared with the above-mentioned report, this advantage declines to the
extent that Moscow goes over to naphtha fuel (for one pood of bituminous
coal in Łódż, 12–13 kopecks; for the same heat value in naphtha, 12.75
kopecks).”^(CIX)

With regard to that point, the following should be noted. First, a pood
of bituminous coal does not cost 12–13 kopecks in Łódż, as Professor
Schulze-Gävernitz says, but 8.75–13.5 (or 8.3–14.7), and a pood of
naphtha coal,⁴¹ i.e., a quantity of naphtha corresponding calorifically
to a pood of coal, costs not 12.75 kopecks, but 13–20 kopecks, thus
significantly more than coal in Poland.^(CX) Second, for the present,
naphtha accounts for only 20.5 percent of fuel in the Moscow region in
general—in particular, it accounts for 29.4 percent in the cotton
industry in Moscow and Vladimir provinces^(CXI)—and so naphtha does not
affect the conditions of production among the overwhelming majority of
the factories in this region.

But third, as far as the future of this fuel method goes, Professor
Mendeleyev⁴² says in his essay dedicated to the naphtha industry: “The
use of this (naphtha residue) as a fuel today, where there is no
possibility of utilizing the bulk of the naphtha obtained (as a result
of the lack of a pipeline to carry naphtha from Baku to Batum), is a
most natural phenomenon, although a unique and temporary one.”^(CXII)
“For normal fuel needs, particularly for fueling steam engines, where
any sort of fuel is suitable, _the use of a fuel as costly as naphtha
residue can find wide circulation only temporarily, in those
transitional moments of industrial activity in the nation where industry
has not had time to ‘make its bed’ properly_; but today that means, in
all countries presumably, that the normal condition is—the use of
coal.”^(CXIII) And still further. “The use today of 130 million poods of
naphtha residue in Russia must be regarded as a temporary phenomenon,
which depends, on the one hand, on the lack of demand for naphtha on the
world market, and, on the other, on the lack of productivity in the
extraction of coal and of its distribution throughout Russia,
particularly in the center and the southeast.” “The construction of
railroad lines from the Donets coal basin to the Volga, and various
measures directed toward utilization of naphtha supplies in Baku and
toward cheap export of coal from the Donbas, form the current tasks of
Russia’s industrial development, _and must [necessarily] put an end to
today’s widespread, irrational use of naphtha residue from Baku for
steam boilers_.”^(CXIV)

The above quotations, which express the opinion of the best judges on
this question, suffice in our opinion to demonstrate that in the
comparative valuation of fuels in Poland and in the Moscow region,
naphtha fuel in the latter must be disregarded, as a temporary
phenomenon. What is now called “naphtha residue” is not some actual
by-product of [petroleum] production, but a product of naphtha
extraction itself,⁴³ which is very insufficiently utilized only as a
result of the lack of a market, and to a great extent it is used for
fuel rather than for lighting: thus among exports from Baku, in 1891,
for example, for every pood of naphtha produced, there corresponds 1.40
poods of naphtha residue, and in 1894 as much as 2.73 poods. Thus the
so-called residue actually forms the main product, and naphtha on the
other hand the by-product. The abnormality of this phenomenon appears in
the quality of the product itself. The “residue” so obtained explodes at
50 degrees, 40 degrees, and even 30 degrees centigrade, while the normal
explosion temperature for real naphtha residue cannot be lower than
140–120 degrees. This cheap fuel also has costly results: in the course
of the years 1893 and 1894, 20 vessels of the Astrakhan Steamship
Company that were fueled with this “residue” were destroyed by outbreaks
of fire.^(CXV) Another disadvantage of this type of naphtha fuel is the
fact that this residue, because of its chemical composition, is in fact
used in much greater quantities to produce a specific effective heat
than would be the case with real naphtha residue. The greater
consumption of this residue sometimes amounts to 40 percent.^(CXVI)⁴⁴
This was confirmed as an established fact by the administration of the
St. Petersburg-Moscow railroad line. This makes the most important
advantage of naphtha fuel—its cheapness—for the most part completely
illusory. Here and there some are already beginning to renounce the use
of naphtha residue, as with the Russian Southeastern Railroad, which
recently returned to coal. Certainly the consumption of naphtha residue
in the central industrial region will in the next few years increase
before it will decrease, particularly as a result of overproduction and
lower prices. With the Russian government’s current vigor in promoting
capitalism and pushing aside all obstacles in its way, however, the use
of naphtha will soon be reduced to its rational purpose, and factories
will be reduced to using wood and coal. In the end, however, Poland’s
advantage remains in full force, for “in general fuel is half as
expensive in Poland as in Moscow.”^(CXVII)

_2. Labor power_. This aspect of industrial activity is usually cited as
proof that Poland has less favorable conditions than Russia because its
labor is more expensive than the latter’s.^(CXVIII) Wages are in fact
significantly higher in Poland than in Russia, specifically:^(CXIX)

  -------------- ------------------- ------------------ --------------------- -----------------
                 _Cotton Spinning_   _Cotton Weaving_   _Finishing_           _Wool Spinning_
  For men        18.75%              36%                19%                   59%
  For women      42%                 37%                107%                  91%
  For children   14%                 79%                85%                   27%
                 _Wool Weaving_      _Cloth Making_     _Half-wool Weaving_   _Average_
  For men        31%                 13%                60%                   32.2%
  For women      105%                33%                122%                  73.9%
  For children   112%                40%                150%                  60.0%
  -------------- ------------------- ------------------ --------------------- -----------------

Labor time, on the other hand, is significantly longer in Russia than in
Poland. “While the 13- to 14-hour-long workday is very widespread in
Moscow factories, in Poland it is to be found only in nine factories,
and in three of these cases only in separate sections of a factory.
While labor time lasting more than 14 hours is absolutely not a rarity
in Moscow factories and its outer limit is 16 hours, 14-hour labor time
must be described as the outer limit in Poland, and in fact this was
found only in two textile factories.”^(CXX) In general, 10 to 12 hours
were worked in 75 percent of the Polish factories, and so 11 hours can
be taken as the average labor time for Poland. In Moscow, the average
labor time is more than 12 hours. In Poland, night labor is a rare
exception; in Moscow it is widespread. And despite the fact that in
Poland the number of workdays in the year is 292, while in Moscow it is
only 286, for Poland there are nevertheless only 3,212 labor-hours per
year, while the number in Moscow (figured on the basis of only 12 hours
a day) is 3,430 hours, thus 218 hours more.^(CXXI)

These two factors, lower wages and longer labor time, are usually
regarded as important advantages for Moscow industry in its competitive
struggle with Polish manufacturing. Yet we believe that this opinion can
be shown to be premature and superficial.

First, in comparing wages, usually the wages of male workers in Russia
are juxtaposed to those of male workers in Poland, while likewise the
wages of female workers in Russia are compared to those of female
workers in Poland. This is how the 1886 commission for the investigation
of Polish industry, among others, proceeded. This is wrong, as factory
inspector Svyatlovsky perceived, insofar as, in Poland, female and child
labor is far more extensive than in Russia, so that frequently a female
worker in Poland stands counterposed to a male worker in Russia;
therefore, the wages of male Russian workers must frequently be
compared, not with those of _male_ Polish workers, but with those of
female Polish workers.^(CXXII) In fact, the number of women employed in
the Polish textile industry (the industry of most importance with regard
to competition) amounts to more than 50 percent of all factory
personnel, while in the Moscow region female labor amounts to only 37
percent in the cotton industry and only 28 percent in the wool
industry.^(CXXIII)

If the wages of male workers in Russia are compared with those of female
workers in Poland, the picture shifts in many ways to the disadvantage
of the Moscow region, or in any case there is an equalization of
conditions. The average monthly wages in the textile industry are (in
rubles):^(CXXIV)

  -------------- ------------- -------------
                 _in Poland_   _in Russia_
  For men        20.1          15.2
  For women      15.3          8.8
  For children   8.8           5.5
  -------------- ------------- -------------

To obtain true and exact data on relative wage levels in Russia and
Poland, it is necessary to consider the composition of the labor force
in terms of age and sex in both countries as well as nominal wages. The
result thus obtained will in many ways be significantly different from
the foregoing. This above all is the corrective that should be applied
to the usual conclusions drawn from the comparison of wages.

Second, the fact that the Russian worker frequently receives lodging
(and here and there even board) from the factory is often disregarded.
This applies not only to single but also to married workers, whose
families usually live in the same factory barracks. Here heating fuel
[for the workers’ housing] is likewise provided by the factory.^(CXXV)
This should be figured into the wages of Russian workers if one wants to
make an exact comparison. Thus the difference even in nominal wages is
not so greatly to Poland’s disadvantage as would appear from a more
superficial comparison.

But there are far more important additional factors showing that factory
labor in Poland is significantly more intensive than in Russia.

The Polish worker is first of all more intelligent and better educated,
on the average. To the extent that Professor Ianzhul investigated this
question, it was shown that in Russia’s central region the number of
workers who could read and write amounted to 22 to 36 percent of the
total; in Poland the number is between 45 and 65 percent.^(CXXVI)

Furthermore, the Polish worker is better fed than the Russian worker,
and this is especially true for women.^(CXXVII) Third, the workforce in
Poland is a stable layer of the population, devoted exclusively to
factory labor. In Russia, an observable, although gradually decreasing,
portion of the workforce is still made up of peasants who return to the
land in the summer, where they perform rough farm labor instead of the
more exact kind of work in a factory.^(CXXVIII)

Fourth, the Polish worker is far more individualized in his way of life
than the Russian. As was already mentioned, the latter in many cases
lives in factory barracks and the worker’s board is paid for by the
factory. Such a way of life, under certain circumstances, leads to the
stunting of individuality. The Russian worker thus remains constantly
under the control of his employer and is bound by the factory rules even
in his private life. The Moscow factory inspector [Professor Ianzhul]
knew of factories where, as he reported, singing—whether in workplace or
living quarters—is punished by a fine of five rubles; likewise workers
incur a high fine when they pay each other a visit, and so
forth.^(CXXIX) Not infrequently, workers are assigned to an apartment in
a damp factory cellar, or in rooms that are built so low that one almost
has to go on all fours to get into them.^(CXXX) In Poland the situation
is different: the worker always runs his own household, and his housing
is significantly better overall.

According to the unanimous opinion of all researchers who have made wage
labor the subject of their investigation, all the cited
factors—education, better housing and food, individual households, in
short, everything that raises the living standard of the worker—are of
decisive significance for the intensity of his or her activity.^(CXXXI)

Finally, piece-rate wages predominate in Poland, which, it is generally
recognized, raises the intensity of labor to the utmost, while in Russia
the time wage predominates.

All the above-mentioned factors make it apparent to us that the labor of
Polish factory workers is far more intensive in comparison with that of
Russian workers. And this characteristic of the Polish worker so greatly
outweighs his higher nominal wages and shorter work time that _in the
end he is cheaper for the Polish factory owner than the Russian worker
is for his employer_.^(CXXXII)

Reckoned per pood, wages amount to (in rubles):^(CXXXIII)

  ----------- ---------------------- -------------------
              _for cotton fabrics_   _for cotton yarn_
  In Poland   0.77–1.50              0.66–1.20
  In Russia   2 and more             0.80–1.50
  ----------- ---------------------- -------------------

The difference in the length of the workday in Poland and Russia belongs
to the past now, because the workday has recently been reduced by law to
11.5 hours. However, the new measure will primarily be to the advantage
of the Polish industrialists in their competitive struggle, perhaps for
years to come, even if it will, in time, doubtless become a spur to
technical development for the Moscow region. For the Russian worker’s
productivity, whose lower level depends on so many other factors, will
obviously not increase overnight. How justified this conclusion is may
be seen from the fact that already in 1892 the Polish factory owners—in
part to show a friendly face to the workers, who in May of that year had
mounted an impressive strike in Łódż—went to the government with the
request that the workday be reduced to 11 hours throughout the Russian
empire, a project which foundered primarily because of the resistance of
the Moscow industrialists.

3. _Composition of Capital_. This important factor also takes different
shapes in Poland and in the Moscow region. In Poland, the total fixed
capital of a company is in most cases exceeded by the value of its
yearly production. In some cases the latter is even two or three times
greater than the former, but on the average the ratio of fixed capital
to the value of production is 2:3.2.^(CXXXIV) In Russia, particularly in
the central industrial region, this ratio is inverted. Here the value of
production (in a particular branch of industry) is often smaller than
the fixed capital, or at most the same, and only seldom is it
significantly higher. This phenomenon stems from two circumstances.
First, far more is spent on buildings for enterprises in Russia than in
Poland, because construction materials are quite significantly more
expensive.^(CXXXV) Second, the great majority of factories in Russia
include their own factory barracks, which never occurs in
Poland.^(CXXXVI)

If, therefore, what Marx calls the “organic composition of capital” (the
ratio between constant and variable capital) is “higher” in Russia than
in Poland, this has absolutely nothing to do with the higher stage of
development of Russian production, but on the contrary with its
primitive plant, for the most part. This makes necessary a series of
expenditures that have nothing to do with the actual production process.
As a result, all other conditions of production and sale being equal,
the Polish industrialists are able to realize a greater profit from the
sale of their goods on the Russian market, in comparison with the
Russian entrepreneurs. In addition, Polish labor, as was shown, is far
more intensive.

4. _The turnover time for capital_ is much shorter in Poland than in
Russia. First, reserves of fuel and raw materials are stocked for long
periods in Russia. The high prices and the general shortage of fuel in
the interior of Russia mean, for the Russian entrepreneur, the necessity
of laying out large sums of money for the purchase of forests or peat
bogs. In this way almost every large Moscow factory has put a more or
less substantial amount of dead capital into forests and bogs. In
addition, wood and especially peat are cheaply and easily delivered only
in winter; therefore every Moscow factory lays in reserves of these
fuels for a full year, even for two years.^(CXXXVII) In Poland, because
of the short distances involved, stocks of coal are laid in for only one
to four weeks, at most for three months. Similarly, in Russia stocks of
raw materials, particularly cotton, are laid in for lengthy periods, in
Poland only for two to six months.

Second, the Polish industrialist realizes his product much more quickly
than does the Russian entrepreneur. The Poles grant their customers only
3 to 6 months’ credit, the Russians 12 to 18 months. The Poles,
following the English and German model, produce on orders obtained by
their traveling agents; the Russians produce according to their own
estimates, often stocking for two or three years. This factor also
signifies that Polish industrial capital—_ceteris paribus_⁴⁵ —is better
equipped for the competitive battle.

5. _The concentration of production_ is significantly greater in Poland
than in Russia. The value of production per factory in those branches of
industry not levied with excise duties averaged in rubles:^(CXXXVIII)

  ----------- -------- -------- -------- -------- -------- --------
              _1885_   _1886_   _1887_   _1888_   _1889_   _1890_
  In Russia   50,824   52,248   54,601   58,237   58,972   57,578
  In Poland   57,875   63,860   71,894   74,051   71,305   71,248
  ----------- -------- -------- -------- -------- -------- --------

The difference is still greater if particular branches of production are
compared. In the coal industry, for example, the situation is as
follows. If the number of pits and shafts as well as the quantity of
production in Russia are taken to be 100, then one finds in Poland in
1890 6.8 percent pits, 6.2 percent shafts, 70.6 percent
production.^(CXXXIX)

Even with the number of mineshafts being 16 times smaller, therefore,
coal extraction in Poland equals more than eleven-sixteenths of Russian
coal extraction. Five firms account for 85 percent of the entire yearly
production of the Dabrowa region (1893).^(CXL)

In other branches, such as the cotton industry, the gross product per
factory is greater in Russia. The smaller concentration of this sort of
production in Poland has to do with special circumstances, however,
which to go into here would lead us into too much detail and which in
any case have nothing to do with the degree of technological
development. On the contrary, in Poland, as we will soon see, the yearly
value of production per worker is in this as in most branches greater
than in Russia.

6. _The technology_ of production, lastly, forms the most important
difference between Polish and Russian industry. We will compare the most
significant branches of production in both countries in terms of
technology.

To begin with the textile branch, first the _cotton industry_
shows:^(CXLI)

  -------- ------------- ------------ --------- --------------------
  _1890_   _Factories_   _Spindles_   _Looms_   _Steam Horsepower_
  Russia   351           2,819,326    91,545    38,750
  Poland   94            472,809      11,084    13,714
  -------- ------------- ------------ --------- --------------------

_1890_

_Production (in thousands of rubles)_

_Workers_

_Male_

_Female_

Russia

208,581

103,916

83,941

Poland

31,495

10,474

9,535

The technical superiority of the Polish cotton industry is clear from
the above comparison. In comparison with the Russian industry, it has:
_10 percent of the workers, 15 percent of the production, 35 percent of
the steam power_.

For every worker there is 1,110 rubles production yearly in Russia and
1,574 rubles in Poland, that is, 42 percent more. Steam power amounts to
204 for every 1,000 workers in Russia, to 186 for every 1 million rubles
of production; it amounts to 685 for every 1,000 workers in Poland, to
439 for every 1 million rubles of production, thus 236 percent and 136
percent more, respectively, in Poland.

Finally, the use of female labor is greater in Poland than in Russia. In
the latter, female workers make up 44.7 percent of the personnel, in the
former 47.6 percent. According to other accounts, which we noted above
and which inspire more confidence because they were ascertained not from
summary bureaucratic statistics but by a special commission, the use of
female labor in Poland is much higher, and in Russia, on the contrary,
much lower.

  -------- ------------- ------------ --------- --------------------
  _1890_   _Factories_   _Spindles_   _Looms_   _Steam Horsepower_
  Russia   164           77,474       11,784    2,230
  Poland   168           245,892      4,016     6,667
  -------- ------------- ------------ --------- --------------------

_1890_

_Production (in thousands of rubles)_

_Workers_

_Male_

_Female_

Russia

21,585

14,471

7,050

Poland

26,199

8,486

6,670

Roughly the same result is obtained by comparing the _wool industry_ in
Poland and in Russia. This comparison shows:^(CXLII)

For Poland, in comparison with Russia, this comes out to: _workers 70.4
percent, production 121 percent, steam power 299 percent;_ thus for
every worker in Russia 1,003 rubles production annually, for every
worker in Poland 1,729 rubles, that is, 72 percent more. Steam power
amounts to 104 for every 1,000 workers in Russia, to 103 for every 1
million rubles of production; it amounts to 440 for every 1,000 workers
in Poland, to 254 for every 1 million rubles of production.

Thus if we take 100 as the number for the steam power per 1,000 workers
or 1 million rubles of production in Russia, then we find the same in
Poland to be 323 percent and 146 percent more, respectively. In the use
of female labor, we see here an even greater difference between Poland
and Russia than in the cotton industry, specifically 32.7 percent female
workforce in Russia, 44 percent in Poland. The technical superiority of
the Polish textile industry is even more evident in the fact that higher
grades of spinning yarn and finer sorts of cloth are manufactured in
Poland in many branches than in Russia.

Let us turn to the second most important branch of capitalist
production, the _coal industry_. We have already mentioned the strong
concentration of this branch in Poland. The product extracted annually
is as follows:^(CXLIII)

_Coal in poods_

 

_from 1 pit_

_from 1 shaft_

In the southern Russian region

678,000

240,000

In Poland

7,500,000

2,985,000

(+1,006%)

(+1,144%)

(Here and below we compare the Polish coalfields with those in southern
Russia in particular, because that is where Russia’s biggest coal
reserves are, and they are the most important for the future.)

A corresponding relationship is discovered when the quantity of
production, the number of workers employed, and the steam power used are
compared:^(CXLIV)

  ------------------------ --------------- ----------- -------------------------------------
  _1890_                    _Steam power_   _Workers_   _Production (in millions of poods)_
  Russia                        6,701        30,077                    213.4
  Southern Russia region        5,856        25,167                    183.2
  Poland                       10,497         8,692                    150.8
  ------------------------ --------------- ----------- -------------------------------------

Thus, while in Poland (in 1890) one worker extracted 17,348 poods of
coal, in Russia the amount was only 7,096 poods per worker and in the
southern Russian region in particular, 7,281 poods, approximately two
and half times less than in Poland.

  --------------------------- --------------------------- -------------------
  _Steam power amounts to:_   _for every 1,000 workers_   _for every shaft_
  Russia                      223                         8
  South Russian district      233 (100%)                  —
  Poland                      1,208 (+419%)               202
  --------------------------- --------------------------- -------------------

From 1890 to 1894, the amount of steam power in Polish mining rose by
more than 50 percent: from 10,497 to 15,934.^(CXLV)

Of the other important branches of industry we want to single out the
_sugar industry_.

Sugar-beet growing itself is carried on in a significantly more rational
way in Poland than in the two Russian sugar production regions. For
example, the average beet harvest per desyatin⁴⁶ in the years 1882–90
was:^(CXLVI)

  --------------------- ------------------------
  Central Russia        73.2–125.3 berkovets⁴⁷
  Southwestern Russia   80.1–114.4 berkovets
  Poland                88.0–127.6 berkovets
  --------------------- ------------------------

In the year 1895:

  --------------------- ----------------------
  Central Russia        51.1–117.4 berkovets
  Southwestern Russia   90.0–121.2 berkovets
  Poland                94.3–144.5 berkovets
  --------------------- ----------------------

Likewise, the quality of the Polish beet is much higher than the
Russian. The sugar content of the juice and its purity are:^(CXLVII)

_1890–91_

_Sugar content_

 

_in juice_

_purity_

Southwestern Russia

13.49%

80.85%

Central Russia

13.63%

78.94%

Poland

14.81%

85.20%

The same superiority of Polish technology is shown by the higher yield
of white sugar from the beet juice and the lower yield of
molasses.^(CXLVIII)

In 1881–82 to 1890–91 this was on average:

  --------------------- --------------- ------------
                        _White sugar_   _Molasses_
  Central Russia        7.0–9.47%       3.29–4.24%
  Southwestern Russia   7.7–10.48%      3.60–4.31%
  Poland                8.2–11.39%      1.53–2.28%
  --------------------- --------------- ------------

Finally, the utilization of processing by-products is far more intensive
and more widespread in the Polish sugar industry than in the Russian. In
1890–91, of 182 factories in the central and southern regions, 10 with
125 osmosis devices conducted the extraction of sugar from molasses by
osmosis; of 40 factories in Poland, 24 had 206 osmosis devices.

The above comparative analysis of the most important conditions of
production shows that Polish industry is considerably better equipped
than Russian and especially central Russian industry. Certainly it is a
well-established fact that the Moscow region for its part has an
important advantage in the cotton industry, namely the abundance of
water, while in this respect the Łódż region suffers from a tremendous
shortage, as has been mentioned. On the other hand, Poland lags behind
in one of the most important branches of the economy—the iron
industry—relative to the natural wealth of Russia, so that it must
obtain part of the ore and likewise coke for its ironworks from the
southern Russian region. In addition, metal production in the Donbas
region is also much more concentrated than in Poland. It is furthermore
true that Moscow is located much closer than Poland to the important
market outlets for the textile industry, the eastern part of Russia and
Asia. However, the advantages that we find in every branch on the Polish
side—more capable labor power, cheaper fuel, higher technology in the
production process and trade—could in our opinion outweigh numerous
advantages of Russian industry. For all the cited factors have an
invariant significance, indeed become more decisive in the competitive
struggle with every passing day. How very much the significance of
industry’s distance from markets has already receded into the
background, compared with its technical superiority, was recently proved
by the amazing spread of the sale of German products in England, and
even in the English colonies. Within one and the same customs zone, of
course, the outcome of competition in the market depends to a still
greater degree on the stage of development of production, i.e., on just
those factors that Polish industry has on its side. This is confirmed,
among other things, by the fact that the Polish iron industry, for
example, despite the relative lack of natural advantages, which has been
mentioned, is offering intensely bitter competition to the iron industry
in southern Russia and is developing, along with the southern Russian
iron industry, more rapidly than in any other region of the
empire.^(CXLIX)

Along with the Polish industrial sector, industry in St. Petersburg is
also shaping up into a progressive and technologically rather highly
developed Russian industrial region, and it is a particularly favorable
circumstance for Poland that in the most important markets it is in
competition with the Moscow region—the most anachronistic industrial
region in Russia, which is unique in the Empire in its long workday, low
wages, truck system, [i.e., paying wages with goods instead of cash]
barracks housing for the workforce, and enormous stocks of raw
materials—in short, its economic backwardness.

The coexistence of such different levels of production as are
represented by Polish and St. Petersburg industry, on the one hand, and
Moscow industry, on the other, is only possible because of two
circumstances: first, the vastness of the Russian market, in which all
competitors are able to find sufficient room for themselves; and second,
the hothouse atmosphere created by the [Russian government’s] tariff
policy, which has made this enormous market the exclusive monopoly of
the domestic entrepreneurs—both Russian and Polish.

_3. Economic Ties Between Poland and Russia_

After the foregoing, it is clear that—if free competition was the only
decisive factor in the battle between Polish and Russian industry—the
future of the former would be assured, at least to the degree that the
capitalist development of the Russian Empire is granted a shorter or
longer term by the general fate of the world economy.

However, we have already mentioned the other important factor that is of
the greatest significance for the future of Polish capitalism: we mean
_the economic policy of the Russian government_. It is all the more
necessary to throw some light on precisely this factor, since the
question (as is well known) stirred up so much dust a few years ago, and
one even comes across the notion that since the middle of the 1880s a
real “era of persecution” has dawned for Polish industry.

Actually there are grounds enough to regard all assertions of this sort
a priori as baseless. The best and last touchstone for all relevant
government economic measures—the growth of industry in Poland up to the
present moment, and still at the same impetuous tempo—sufficiently
proves (it should seem) that all the uproar about Polish industry’s
approaching end was wrong. The following tables eloquently display the
factual details of this growth:

[]

As can be seen from the above table, the growth in the seven-year period
1885–92 amounted to: 69 percent in industry as a whole, 70 percent in
the textile industry (specifically, 40 percent in cotton spinning and
weaving, 77 percent in the wool and cloth industry, 101 percent in all
other branches); in mining over the ten-year period 1885–95: 352 percent
for pig iron, 229 percent for steel, 103 percent for coal; only in the
production of iron do we see a decline, of 14 percent, as in recent
times a vigorous development of steel production at the expense of iron
production becomes observable in Poland and southern Russia. Still more
interesting than the growth during the most recent period (1885–95) is
the comparison of this decade with the previous period (1871–85), which
is held to be the time of Poland’s greatest economic prosperity. The
increase, in absolute numbers, amounted to:

_Branches not subject to excise tax_

_TextileIndustry_

_Pig Iron_

_Iron_

_Steel_

_Coal_

_(in millions of rubles)_

_(in millions of poods)_

In the 14-year period 1871–85

90.4

48.6

1.1

5.7

96.7

In the 7-year period 1885–92

93.5

46.7

—

—

—

In the 10-year period 1885–95

—

—

8.8

4.9

112.5

Thus, in view of the above figures, not only does speculation about the
incipient decline of Polish industry rest on complete ignorance of the
facts, but it is clear, on the contrary, that industry has grown more in
the last seven- to ten-year period than in the preceding 14-year period.
This becomes most clear when we calculate the growth in both periods _by
year_. The average yearly growth in the later period was greater than in
the preceding one, specifically: 107 percent in industry as a whole, 90
percent in the textile industry,^(CL) 20 percent in the production of
iron and steel, of coal 63 percent, of pig iron 1,020 percent.

On the other hand, at the end of the first part of our work we also
cited Polish industry’s recent conquests in Russian and Asian markets
into the 1890s. The body of Polish capitalism thus seems to exhibit not
one symptom that would justify the claim that it is pining away from
some internal malady; on the contrary, the much cried-over invalid grows
and blooms “as splendidly as on the first day.” But because the question
was once raised and for years agitated public opinion in Poland, and
also because it is interesting and important enough in itself, it seems
appropriate to go into this question more fully and, by a thorough
examination of the subject, derive an explanation of what the situation
is and can be with regard to the economic policy of the Russian
government in general and toward Poland specifically.

With regard to all the statements we have mentioned or quoted about the
anti-Polish policy [of the Russian government], it is characteristic
that they are based exclusively on particular measures and decrees,
sometimes in the sphere of customs policy, sometimes in that of the
railway rates system. But it is obvious that no real understanding of
government policy can be reached by this road. For first of all, what is
being referred to in the case at hand is a most extremely variable
quantity: a tariff imposed today, or a railroad rate introduced today,
will be lifted tomorrow. This is, in fact, what happened, for example
with the differential tariff on raw cotton, which amounted to 15 kopecks
in gold more on the Polish border than at the rest of Russia’s borders.
When it was introduced in 1887, a wail of lamentation went up among the
Polish cotton-factory owners, and it was said that Polish industry had
received its deathblow. The differential tariff also played the leading
role as proof that “the era of persecution” had begun, and it was
denounced at every opportunity. But then this tariff difference was once
again lifted in the year 1894, on the grounds of the Russian-German
trade agreement, making way for a single tariff on cotton at all Russian
borders. The same was the case with the differential tariff on coal and
coke at the western border, which was frequently represented as a
measure aimed directly against the Polish iron industry (see
Schulze-Gävernitz, “Der Nationalismus in Russland und seine
wirthschaftlichen Träger,” this page and after him the English _Blue
Book_, Vol. X., this page). But in 1894 this tariff was likewise reduced
by half. In the same way, railroad rates were changed in part every
year, indeed sometimes even more frequently. Thus the actual tariffs and
rail rates _by themselves_ do not provide a firm foothold from which to
gain an insight into Russia’s economic policy.

To arrive at a thorough understanding of this policy, it is necessary to
disregard particular measures for the present, to look deeper into the
economic relations of Poland and Russia on the one hand and their
political interests on the other, and to seek to derive from this the
economic policy of the latter. Only by following the guidelines thus
obtained will it be possible to trace the particular measures of this
policy back to their real significance.

First of all, then, what is the nature of the economic ties between
Poland and Russia? If one were to form an opinion under the immediate
impression of the Łódż-Moscow entrepreneurs’ battle, one would be
inclined to assume that the Polish and Russian bourgeoisies form two
completely separate camps, whose interests run directly counter to one
another at every point and who battle against each other using all
available means. Such a notion would nonetheless be utterly wrong.

What precludes such a sharp difference in interests from the outset is
the thoroughgoing _division of labor_ that exists between the industries
of these two countries. As we have seen, Poland is for Russia a source
of supply for yarn, machines, coal, etc., etc., while Russia furnishes
Poland with raw wool, raw iron, coke, and cotton.

Such a relationship already presupposes that the interests of some
_Polish_ manufacturers coincide with the interests of Russian
raw-materials producers, and that the interests of some _Russian_
manufacturers coincide with those of Polish producers of half-finished
goods. This is confirmed by abundant data. The producers of South
Russian wool, the planters of Central Asian cotton, exercise pressure on
the system of railroad rates in their own interest to keep transport of
their raw product to the Polish manufacturers as cheap as possible.
Russian wool weavers likewise seek to encourage the transport of Polish
yarn to Russia as much as possible, etc., etc.

Furthermore, from the fact that the battle between the manufacturers and
the producers of raw materials and half-finished goods is fought out in
the sphere of the _common tariff policy_ of the two countries, it
follows that the battling parties from Poland would often unite with
those from Russia in order to march, hand in hand, with the national
enemy against their own brothers. The history of Russian-Polish industry
provides examples in quantity. In the year 1850, for example, the
Russian government, under the pressure of joint petitions by Polish and
Russian wool weavers, reduced the tariff rate on wool yarn. But no
sooner had this happened than Polish and Russian spinners, in a touching
accord, besieged the government to again push up the tariff rate on
yarn, which happened in 1867.^(CLI) Beginning in 1882, the government
was solicited by the machine producers to increase the tariff on foreign
machinery. “In this connection the initiative was that of the Riga
manufacturers, who were followed by the others in _Warsaw_, Kiev,
Kharkov, and Odessa with great unanimity.”^(CLII) However, when the
government had obeyed this wish and increased the tariffs on machinery,
a storm of petitions arose from the landed proprietors, again from all
over the Empire without differentiation, against the increased price of
agricultural machinery.

Just these two examples give us quite a different picture of the
relationship between the Polish and Russian bourgeoisies, in their
collective endeavors as in their competitive ones. Neither of the two
national capitalist classes appears from the inside as a closed phalanx,
but on the contrary is fissured, torn by conflicts of interest, split by
rivalries. Yet, on the other hand, these different groups, unmindful of
the national quarrel, reach out their hands to one another in order to
deal their own countrymen an opportune blow to the wallet in the
glorious prizefight for profits. Thus it is not national but capitalist
parties that are found opposed on the industrial chessboard, not Poles
and Russians, but spinners and weavers, machine producers and
landowners, and on the flags waving over the combatants one sees not the
one-headed and two-headed eagles,⁴⁸ but only the international emblem of
capitalism. Finally, the government unexpectedly appears in the strange
role of an indulgent mother, who impartially hugs all her profit-making
children to her broad bosom, even though they are constantly squabbling
with each other, and seeks to appease now the one, now the other, at the
expense of the consumers. The above phenomena recur countless times in
the history of Polish and Russian industry, and are of such decisive
importance for the question under consideration here that it is well
worthwhile to give a few more typical cases as examples. It is, for
example, most highly instructive to observe how the two main
opponents—the entrepreneurs of the Łódż and Moscow districts, whom one
would be inclined to accept as representatives of the interests of,
respectively, the Polish and Russian bourgeoisies as a whole—try at
every opportunity to trip up the other industrial districts of their own
countries. Thus the Łódż cotton manufacturers, in their above-mentioned
polemic, seek to turn the jealousy of the Moscow manufacturers away from
themselves and toward the old Polish wool industry district of
Bialystok. They assure their adversaries: “If one can speak of
competition, then far more dangerous to Moscow is Bialystok and its
district.”^(CLIII) Meanwhile, these same Łódż entrepreneurs most humbly
and obediently denounce their blood brothers of the Sosnowiec district
to the Russian government, pointing to the fact that in the latter a
full third of the workforce are German subjects, while in the Łódż
district—thank God—the figure is only 8 percent. No less brotherly
sentiment is displayed by the Moscow capitalists when they come to speak
of the affairs of their comrades in the other Russian industrial
regions. So we hear them bewail the result of a plan for the regulation
of waterways worked out by the Ministry of Transport: “The small
expenditures, as with those of many millions, are allotted exclusively
to Russia’s western and southern zones. The whole central region of
Russia has been almost entirely forgotten. This region, this neglected
center of Russia, containing key Russian provinces, is relatively poor
in waterways,” and so forth in the same weepy tone.^(CLIV) Here the
jealousy of the Moscow capitalists gushes forth with impartiality and
true internationalism against all other industrial districts in the
Empire without distinction, against Poland and the Volga region, against
the Baltic provinces and the Dnieper region.

The following example shows how elastic the notion of national
solidarity and the “Fatherland” can be for the Polish capitalists under
certain circumstances. In the year 1887 a large Warsaw steel factory was
relocated to Yekaterinoslav province in southern Russia, to be nearer to
sources of supply of raw iron and coke. Two years later, its
owners—Polish capitalists—together with the English, Belgians, Russians,
etc., who hold the iron district of southern Russia under their
domination—sent a most humble and obedient petition to the government in
which they complained about the advantages of the _Polish_ iron industry
and the competition from that quarter and beg for an increased railroad
rate on Polish iron for the protection of the “Fatherland’s”
industry—this time, the industry in southern Russia.

Last, a classic example of this situation was provided in recent years
by the question of the railroad rates for grain. In 1889 new, strongly
differential rates were introduced for grain as part of the general
regulation of the Empire’s rail system, to facilitate exports to other
countries from the provinces lying deep in the interior of Russia.
However, the result was that masses of grain and flour from the cities
of the interior, particularly the Volga region, were sent to the regions
lying near the border, thus bringing on a rapid fall in the price of
grain in the southern provinces on the Black Sea, in the Baltic
provinces, and finally in Poland. Injured in their most virtuous
sentiments, the landowners in all these parts of the Empire cried bloody
murder, most of all the Polish landowners, who in the beginning tried to
take this opportunity to again step forward in the name of all Poland,
oppressed by cheap grain. Yet hardly was their national defense crowned
by success and the execrated railroad rate partially annulled in the
beginning of 1894, when a group of Polish entrepreneurs and merchants
entreated the Department of Railroads in St. Petersburg, _by telegram_,
to maintain the earlier rate in order, as they put it, not to make bread
more costly for the people.^(CLV) Thus the scene shifted from moment to
moment, and from a fight between two national parties the question of
the railroad rate for grain turned into a dispute between the landed
proprietors and the industrialists in Poland. Here the latter marched
together with the Russian landowners of the central provinces, while the
Polish landowners took the field jointly with the Russian landowners of
all the border districts.^(CLVI)

This motley grouping of interests was particularly evident in the
deliberations on grain tariffs in St. Petersburg in October 1896. On the
one side stood the representatives of the Volga district, whose case, as
we have seen, was at the same time that of the Polish industrialists; on
the other side, the landed proprietors of Livonia, Vitebsk, Odessa, the
Polish landowners, and also, what is most interesting, the landowners of
the Moscow district. Here Poles and Muscovites appeared on the best of
terms, and the Polish landowners and millers declared themselves in full
agreement with the program of Prince [A.G.] Shcherbatov, the chairman of
the Moscow Agricultural Society.^(CLVII)⁴⁹ Almost as if to underline the
conflict of interests between industry and agriculture in Poland itself,
on the other hand, Chairman Maksimow, of the Polish representation
(among others), objected: If Poland were permitted to sell its factory
products unhindered in the Russian interior, then it would be highly
inconsistent to forbid access to Poland to agricultural products from
the interior of Russia.^(CLVIII)

After the citation of the above examples, which we do not want to pile
too high, it ought to be regarded as a proven fact that the interests of
the Polish and Russian entrepreneurial groups absolutely do not
contradict each other on all points, that, much more often, they tend to
mesh together. But also, on the whole, Polish industry is tied up with
several important sections of the Russian bourgeoisie by a solidarity of
interests, above all with the two most important factors of economic
life: the institutions of transport, on the one hand, and those of
credit and trade, on the other. It is obvious that the development of
Polish industry and, together with this, of the Polish market in Russia
is directly in the interests of the Russian credit, commissions, and
railroad corporations. To again pull out only two from the abundance of
striking examples: the administration of the Russian rail line from
Ryazan to the Urals turned to the Warsaw entrepreneurs in the fall of
1894 with the offer to hand over space in all its stations, free of
charge, so that the Polish factory owners could have permanent displays
of goods there to encourage Poland’s market in the Volga region.^(CLIX)
Thus, while the Moscow factory owners wanted to do battle with their
Polish competitors over every market in Russia, the Russian railroad
corporations invited this same Polish competition to forge ahead with
its goods as deeply as possible into the interior of Russia.

Another characteristic case took place recently as a result of the new
tariff on cotton. As long as the above-mentioned difference in customs
rates was maintained on the western border, the Łódż factory owners, in
order to get around the troublesome tariff, got their cotton via Libau
and Odessa, i.e., by means of Russian railroads. When the customs
difference was annulled in 1894, cotton transport returned to the old
land routes: Bremen-Alexandrovo and Trieste-Granica, thus to German and
Austrian railroads. Now the latter used this opportunity to set very low
freight rates for cotton and so to monopolize this transport for
themselves at the expense of the Odessa-Łódż line. The loss of
transport, however, hit the Russian railroads hard, and so the
Department of Railroads in St. Petersburg railway has recently turned to
the Łódż factory owners with the question of how much to decrease the
freight rates on the Russian lines so that cotton transport would once
more go via Odessa. The Łódż factory owners dictated a rate decrease of
30 percent.^(CLX) Likewise the Russian banks, in their own interest, are
promoting Polish sales in Russia whenever possible.^(CLXI) Once again
national borders clash with capitalist interests, and what the national
banner might want to tear asunder is nevertheless firmly bound together
by capitalist interest.

Finally, there is another area in which the most touching harmony of
interests prevails between the whole Polish and the whole Russian
bourgeoisie, where they are of one heart and soul: the jealous
protection of the profits sought in the domestic market from foreign
competition. One can encounter in one section of the Western European
press the view that the Polish entrepreneurs are greater believers in
free trade than the Russian. Nothing could be more mistaken. In the deep
conviction that Russian and Polish workers were created solely to
produce surplus value for them, Polish and Russian consumers to assist
the realization of surplus value, the Russian government to fend off any
invasion of foreign competition into this holy Empire—in this conviction
the Polish entrepreneurs are just as firm and unshakable as the
Russians. When it comes to taking a stand in defense of these
“fundamental rights” of the capitalist constitution vis-à-vis the
government, then the Łódż and Moscow factory owners, still bearing the
bruises they just inflicted on each other, go shoulder to shoulder into
battle. In 1888, one year after the two adversaries, as was mentioned,
had sent a petition to the government in which they most sharply fought
each other on the question of domestic competition, the Moscow
entrepreneurs submitted a series of “most humble and obedient” petitions
in regard to tariff policy: on increasing the entry tariffs for products
of the textile industry, on reimbursing tariffs paid on raw materials
when exported by manufacturers to foreign countries, etc.—all demands
that had also frequently been made now as well as previously by the Łódż
manufacturers.^(CLXII) With reason, then, this organ [_Kraj_] of the big
industrialists of Poland, in discussing this action by the Moscow
entrepreneurs, wrote that while much used to be said about the conflict
of interests between the two industrial regions, now this petition shows
that there is also a community of interests between the two, and indeed
on the most important questions.^(CLXIII)

The same harmony is evident when it comes to defending the monopoly in
profits against the “Germans.” The Moscow factory owners, as has been
shown, saw in the strong representation of German elements in the Polish
bourgeoisie a tempting pretext to lend their calico and fustian
interests a becomingly patriotic look in the battle against Łódż. When
they called on the government for a crusade against the Germans on the
Vistula River, they believed they were striking the Polish bourgeoisie
right in the heart. When, however, the government issued its well-known
decree in 1887,⁵⁰ and when, because of this decree, there was talk on
many sides of an era of persecution against the Polish bourgeoisie, then
it turned out that the Polish bourgeoisie expressed their
dissatisfaction on quite unexpected grounds: namely, for them the
Russian government’s anti-German measures were not nearly energetic and
radical enough. For, as they expressed it, “The government’s decree of
two years ago concerning language examinations for foreigners brought
about an advantageous change, in that it opened up a sphere of action
for native forces … Correspondents from Łódż and inhabitants there have
already reported a certain improvement in this situation, _although it
is still far from what it could and should be_.”^(CLXIV)

We have reviewed the many cases of coincidence of interests between the
Polish and Russian bourgeoisies. The picture that emerges is absolutely
different from that which might be obtained under the immediate
impression of the battle cries from Łódż and Moscow. On countless,
extremely important questions, the Polish and the Russian bourgeoisies
are bound together in a solidarity of interests, in particular groups as
much as on the whole. What has created this community of interests is,
first, the division of labor in production, which in many ways unified
the two into a single productive mechanism; second, still more
important, the common tariff borders, which breed solidarity against the
outside and merge the entire Polish-Russian bourgeoisie—from the
standpoint of the market—into a “national” capitalist class. Finally,
there is the common market, which bred an important mutual dependency
between Polish production on the one hand and Russian transport on the
other. And, as is generally known, this fusion of Russian and Polish
economic interests advances every day. This is also, in part, a direct
result of the general direction of current Russian tariff policy, which
in effect closes the way into Russia not only to foreign manufactured
goods but also to foreign raw materials, and creates advantages for
domestic raw-materials production, and in pursuit of this task it does
not shy away from the greatest sacrifices—out of the pockets of Russian
and Polish consumers and taxpayers.

Forced by prohibitive tariffs, Polish industry is changing gradually
from the use of German coke and iron ore over to that from the Donets
Basin, from American and Indian to Central Asian cotton, from Saxon and
Silesian to South Russian wool.^(CLXV) To the same extent, the
interdependence of Polish and Russian production is growing, and the
interests of more and more new circles of the Russian bourgeoisie are
becoming tied in with the successes or failures of Polish industry.

Certainly just as much enmity, competition, and rivalry grow out of
these same relations between the Polish and Russian bourgeoisies. The
same industrial division of labor, the common tariff boundaries, and the
common markets turn the most varied groups within the bourgeoisie into
enemies, and every particular instance of solidarity of interests
corresponds to a conflict of interests. As the examples have shown us,
landed property opposes industry, production opposes transport, and
within each of these groups one region opposes the others and every
individual capitalist opposes all the others. But what we glimpse here
is a typical picture of capitalist economy, as it puts forth its
blossoms in every country. It is the fundamental law of this form of
production—_bellum omnium contra omnes_⁵¹—that is expressed here, and
that has nothing to do with national contradictions and borders. Indeed,
on the contrary, it ceaselessly wipes away these contradictions and
borders within the capitalist class. Certainly if the conflicts of
economic interests coincide with national borders within one and the
same state, this creates a broad basis, circumstances permitting, for
national aspirations. This can only be the case, however, insofar as the
enemy nationalities represent different, inherently antagonistic forms
of production; if, for example, one country represents small business,
the other large industry, one natural economy, the other money economy.
In the given case, however, the situation is totally different, since
Poland and Russia have gone through a combined development from a
natural to a money economy and from small to large industry. Their
antagonism, when and where it comes to light, arises not from the
dissimilarity but rather the homogeneity of economic structure, and
exhibits the characteristics of all capitalist _competitive battles_
within one and the same economic mechanism.

The competitive Łódż-Moscow dispute is nothing but a fragment of this
general war. Superficially puffed up to supposedly represent Poland’s
national duel with Russia in the economic battlefield, this dispute in
its fundamentals reduces itself to an argument between the Łódż fustian
barons and the Moscow calico kings. Following international custom, the
two capitalist parties sought first to cover over the trivial cotton
object of contention with an ideological national cloak and then to bang
the drum as loudly as though their very necks were at stake.

Nonetheless, in reality neither one nor the other party represents the
interests of the whole Polish and Russian bourgeoisies. On the contrary,
both have countless opponents among their own countrymen. Nor is the
fiery competitive battle over domestic markets decisive to or
characteristic of the relationship of the disputants. Their rivalry over
the domestic markets is contradicted by their solidarity of interests on
a whole series of other vital capitalist issues.

In the entire capitalist development of Poland and Russia, which
proceeds from an ever stronger bond between the production and exchange
of the two countries, the Łódż-Moscow cotton dispute plays an
infinitesimally tiny role—if one is not led astray by the behavior of
the squabbling entrepreneurs and keeps the wider perspective of the
whole capitalist chessboard in view.^(CLXVI)⁵²

Only now, from the basis of these material interests, can the economic
policy of the Russian government be evaluated and explained. Russia’s
main concern since the 1870s, as is well enough known, is the promotion
of capitalism. To this end the prohibitive tariff policy is followed,
the hothouse atmosphere of monopoly prices and profits created in the
Empire, the costly means of transport built, subsidies and premiums
awarded to “needy” capitalists, etc., etc. From this standpoint, the
development of capitalism in Poland (just as in other parts of the
Empire) appears as partial realization of the government’s own program,
its retrogression as a thwarting of this program. But still more
important than the Russian government’s own economic designs are the
objective tendencies of the Russian economy. The bourgeoisie, promoted
and protected by the government, already plays a significant role in
Russia. The government must now seriously reckon with the bourgeoisie’s
interests, but also wants to carry through its own. However, the
interests of the Russian bourgeoisie, as has been shown, are interwoven
with those of the Polish bourgeoisie in the most diverse ways. There is
no point at which Polish industry could be dealt a serious and lasting
body blow without at the same time grievously wounding the vital
interests of one or another group of the Russian bourgeoisie.

The notion that Russia is destroying or could destroy Polish capitalism
assumes that Russian economic policy could be made the exclusive tool of
the interests of the handful of Moscow calico manufacturers, an
assumption based on a misunderstanding of the nature of the bourgeoisie
just as much as of the nature of a capitalist government. Given the
splits and contradictions of interest within the capitalist class, the
government can represent the interests of the latter only _as a whole_;
it cannot continually take the standpoint of any particular group of the
bourgeoisie without being forced away from this standpoint again by the
opposition of the other groups. Even the Russian government—although
absolutist—is no exception to this rule. For even in Russia the
bourgeoisie is a political tool of the government only to the extent
that the government is the tool of the bourgeoisie’s economic interests.
Were the absolutist Russian government to make itself exclusively the
lawyer for the Moscow cotton interests and trample on Polish and
therefore Russian capitalist interests for this purpose, it could not
help but call forth strong bourgeois opposition to the government in
Russia itself. The end result of such a policy could even be efforts by
the Russian and Polish bourgeoisies for a reform government that would
know how to safeguard their interests as a whole better than the
existing regime. It is from this direction, then, that the question of
the future of Polish capitalism is decided: _were it to be injured by
the Russian government, the government’s efforts would fall to pieces
through the violent opposition of the bourgeoisie in Russia and Poland_.

From this standpoint we can also reduce the whole question of the
alleged persecution of Polish industry to its true value. All the
measures that are usually introduced as proof of Russian anti-Polish
economic policy have one common characteristic: namely, that they are
all directed to keeping Polish industry from the use of foreign raw
materials and to the purchase of Russian raw materials. This was the
case with the differential tariffs on cotton, on coal, on raw iron. All
these measures were proclaimed not for the advantage of Russian
industries competing with Poland and not with the purpose of destroying
Polish industry, but to the advantage of Russian raw-materials
production, which was also tied to Polish industry, and with the purpose
of achieving _a particular configuration_ of Polish industry. Precisely
the same Russian interests that called forth these measures would form
the greatest obstacle to a government policy directed at the destruction
of Polish industry.

Yet from the same necessity of satisfying all the so very contradictory
interests of the different groups of the bourgeoisie, there arises for
the government the necessity of moving in an increasingly zigzag course
in its economic policy. All laws of the capitalist method of production
are merely “laws of gravity,” i.e., laws that do not move in a straight
line on the shortest route, but on the contrary proceed with constant
deflections in contrary directions. The government’s general policy of
promoting capitalism, correspondingly, can only be realized as it favors
now this capitalist faction, now that. The examples of Russian customs
and railroad rate policy given above showed crudely the zigzag course of
the Russian government, which at one time protects manufacture at the
expense of semi-finished manufacture, at another time takes care of the
latter at the expense of the former, at one time patronizes coal mining
over iron works, at another time patronizes the iron works at the
expense of the “coal interests,” favoring sometimes the landowners,
sometimes the industrialists. This characteristic of the government’s
economic policy also means that it can temporarily and on various
questions deeply offend one or another _Polish_ capitalist group; this
is not only not impossible, but follows directly, necessarily, from the
nature of the situation. The differential railroad rate for grain, etc.,
was of this type. However, if all these temporary and one-sided
phenomena are torn out of their complicated economic context and puffed
up into a doctrine of Russia’s anti-Polish economic conspiracy, then
what is involved is a complete lack of perspective and overview of the
totality of this policy. In the same way, the exaggeration of the
skirmish between Łódż fustian and Moscow calico into a deep gulf between
the interests of Polish and Russian capitalism reveals the lack of an
overview of the totality of the capitalist community of interest. There
can be no doubt that the Moscow district, more than any other, has up
until now enjoyed particularly loving care from the government,
expressed in gifts of every sort. This policy, however, is merely the
concrete expression of the encouragement of Russian capitalism in
general, since the central district (where nearly a third of the
Empire’s industry and approximately two-thirds of its textile industry,
by value, is concentrated) forms its main branch. The cost of this
favoritism toward the Muscovites has not, however, been borne so much by
the other industrial regions of the Empire, which in most cases (for
example, the customs policy), on the contrary, also benefit, but much
more by the other branches of the economy, above all agriculture. In
fact, the enmity between the Russian landowners and the Moscow
industrialists is much more lasting and bitter than that between Moscow
and Łódż. An interesting spotlight on the alleged “national” policy of
the Russian government, on the other hand, is thrown by the well-known
fact that the southern coal and iron region, which is coddled the most
and is absolutely overwhelmed with patronage—at the expense of the
Russian metal industry in the Urals as well as the Moscow industrial
interests—is a region whose exploitation is mainly in foreign hands:
Belgian and English capitalists.

It is as superficial as it is erroneous to ascribe to the Russian
government an economic policy of “Great Russian nationalism,” in the
ethnographic sense. Such a policy exists only in the imagination of the
reporter led astray by external appearances. In fact, the tsarist
government—just as any other in today’s world—maintains not a national
but a class policy; it makes a distinction among its subjects, not
between _Poles_ and _Russians_, but only between those who are
“established” [_die_ “_gründen_”] or “have money” [“_besitzen_”] and
those who work for a living.^(CLXVII)

_4. Russia’s Political Interests in Poland_

Above, we have dealt with the economic relations between Russia and
Poland, and those unquestionably represent the leading feature in the
shape of Russia’s economic policy toward Poland. Nevertheless, it would
be one-sided to see this policy as determined simply and solely by the
interests of the Russian bourgeoisie. For the present, the absolutist
government of Russia is more able than that of any other country to
carry through its own political interests, its sovereign interests, as
well. In this connection, however, the historic state of affairs between
the Russian government and Polish industry has formed a unique
relationship. It is easy to see that absolutism’s interests in terms of
Poland are based above all on maintaining and fortifying the annexation.
Since the Congress of Vienna, Russia’s special attention has been
directed to tenaciously suppressing all traces of national opposition in
Poland, particularly that of the social class which is the pillar of the
opposition, the nobility. In this endeavor, Russian absolutism saw in
Poland’s industrial bourgeoisie a desirable ally. To bind Poland to
Russia through material interests, and to create a counterweight to the
nationalist ferment of the nobility in a capitalist class arisen under
the very wing of the Russian eagle, a class disposed toward servility
not through any tradition of a national past but through an interest in
its future—this was the aim of Russian policy, which it followed with
its usual iron consistency. It must be admitted that the Russian
government did not err in its choice of means, and that it had correctly
sensed the nature of the Polish bourgeoisie. Hardly had manufacture
sprouted in Poland, hardly had it tasted the honey of the Russian
market, when the Polish entrepreneurs felt themselves ready for their
historic mission: to serve as the support in Poland for the Russian
annexation. Already in 1826 the Polish Finance Minister [Franciszek
Ksawery] Drucki-Lubecki⁵³ was delegated to St. Petersburg with the most
humble entreaty to completely abolish the customs border between Russia
and Poland, “so that the two countries would indeed form a single whole
and Poland belong to Russia.”^(CLXVIII) In this declaration, the entire
political program of the Polish bourgeoisie was stated concisely: the
complete renunciation of national freedom in exchange for the mess of
pottage of the Russian market. Since that time, the Russian government
has never ceased supporting the Polish bourgeoisie. We have cited the
long list of laws that have been issued since the 1820s to aid
industrial colonization of Poland and the development of manufacture,
the “iron fund” for the subsidy of industry, the establishment of the
Polish Bank, endowed with every conceivable privilege, etc., etc.

This policy was most energetically maintained in the later period; even
in the time of Nicholas I we see the Russian government issuing new
decrees to the same effect. Nothing was neglected which might transform
the noble, rebellious Pole into a capitalist, tame Pole. And the Polish
bourgeoisie showed that it possesses a grateful heart, for it has never
ceased to thwart and betray national stirrings in Poland with all its
might; its disgraceful conduct in the Polish uprisings supplies
sufficient evidence of this fact. The most important milestone of this
tendency in Russian policy was the abolition of the Russian-Polish
customs border in 1851. A historian intimate with the pertinent archives
of the Russian government and the best authority on the history of
Russian customs tariffs, the Russian author Lodyzhenskii, wrote on this
subject:

The lifting of the customs line between the Empire and the Kingdom was
primarily the result of _motives of a political character_. As is well
known, an intellectual ferment of a partly _national_ and partly
socialist character began in Europe in the 1840s. This ferment, in which
the population of Russian Poland also participated, disturbed the
Russian government up to a certain point and moved it to seek out ways
to unite _Poland with Russia as firmly as possible_. One of the main
factors that hindered the drawing together of the two countries was
their economic separation.^(CLXIX)

Thus to eliminate this “separation,” to fetter Poland to Russia by the
material interests of its bourgeoisie, the customs border was abolished.
The Russian government still holds to the same standpoint today, and
still greets the growing Polish market in Russia as the chain that most
tightly shackles the annexed country to Russia. Thus Mendeleyev wrote in
his preface to the official report on Russian industry to the Chicago
World’s Fair in 1893: “The products of this and many other Polish
factories find a constantly growing market all over Russia. Through the
competition of this industrial region with the Moscow region, the basic
goal of Russia’s protectionist policy was achieved, on the one hand, and
on the other, the assimilation of Poland with Russia, which is
appropriate to the peaceable outlook of the Russian people [read: the
Russian government—R. L.].”^(CLXX) This special role that the Polish
bourgeoisie plays toward the Russian government as the bulwark of the
annexation also is important in explaining the main point under
discussion, i.e., the future of Polish capitalism. It requires, in fact,
an enormous dose of naïveté to assume that the Russian government, which
has given itself precisely the task of cultivating capitalism in Poland
and has for more than half a century used all the means at its disposal
to do so, now intends to demolish that same capitalism, force the Polish
bourgeoisie over to the opposition, and thus want only destroy its own
handiwork. And indeed, solely out of love for the Moscow entrepreneurs,
to whose complaints and lamentations the Russian government has turned a
deaf ear for half a century! Unfortunately, the Russian government knows
better how to protect its ruling interests. What these interests are in
regard to Poland we know from the mouths of its representatives: “the
peaceable assimilation” of Poland with Russia, i.e., the strengthening
of its rule in Poland at any price. This declaration was made in 1893,
long after the presumed new course of Russian policy was supposed to
have begun.

The best evidence of our interpretation is provided by the recent
history of Russia’s relations with _Finland_. Here we find on a small
scale an exact repetition of Russia’s earlier policy in Poland. Finland,
at present, remains cut off from the tsarist Empire by a customs border
and maintains an independent customs policy toward foreign countries
much more liberal than Russia’s. Finnish industry is now enjoying all
the advantages that have already helped Polish industry to blossom.
Likewise Finnish products, particularly those of the metal industry,
have found access to Russia thanks to, among other things, lower customs
at the Russo-Finnish border than at Russia’s other borders, and is now
giving Russia’s domestic industry fierce competition. The Russian
entrepreneurs, to whom this is a thorn in the side, have, of course, not
neglected to set in motion a “most humble and obedient” campaign to
protect the “Fatherland’s” industries against “foreign” rivals—exactly
like the campaign against Poland. The government has, under this
pressure, likewise twice raised the tariffs against Finland as an
economically foreign region, because of its independent customs policy,
in 1885 and 1897.

If the Russian government were now to make the interests of this or that
group of entrepreneurs the consistent plumb line for its economic policy
toward the non-Russian-speaking sections of the Empire, then it would
consequently have had to continue along the road to cutting Finland off
from Russia with a Chinese wall. But precisely the opposite is in fact
the case. The government has already ordered the total lifting of the
Russian-Finnish customs border, scheduled for the year 1903, and _the
absorption of Finland into the imperial Russian customs zone_. Thus will
the “Fatherland’s” industries be freed of uninhibited “foreign”
competition. And if this has not happened even sooner, it is not
consideration for the lamentations of the Russian mill owners that is
responsible, but the trade agreement with Germany, through which the
tsarist Empire has bound itself for a number of years. It is clear that
the impending reform means the beginning of the end of Finnish
independence in _political_ terms, even if it proceeds first toward
demolishing its economic independence.⁵⁵ Here we have before us once
more a portion of the general policy of tsarism, which passes over all
particular interests in order to spiritually level the various parts of
the Empire through the system of Russification, on the one hand, and on
the other, to give the unity of the Empire a firm material frame by this
economic welding process, and to press the whole thing together in the
iron clamps of absolute power—a policy with which we have already become
acquainted in Poland.

Of course not everything in the world goes according to the wishes of
the rulers. While the Russian government economically incorporates
Poland into the Empire and cultivates capitalism as the “antidote” to
national opposition, at the same time it raises up a new social class in
Poland, the industrial proletariat, a class that is forced by its
situation to become the most serious opponent of the absolutist regime.
And if the proletariat’s opposition cannot have a national
character,^(LV) so it can under the circumstances be even more
effective, in that it will logically answer the solidarity of the Polish
and Russian bourgeoisie with the political solidarity of the Polish and
Russian proletariat.^(CLXXI)  ⁵⁶ But this distant consequence of its
policy cannot divert the Russian government from its present course; for
the time being, it sees in the capitalist development of Poland only the
class of the bourgeoisie. As long as Russia seeks to maintain its rule
over Poland in this way, the full blossoming of industry in Poland will
remain inscribed in the program of the government. Thus those who await
a government policy directed toward the economic separation of Poland
take for future phenomena that which belongs to the past, and their
insufficient knowledge of history for deeper insight into the future.

_5. Russia’s Economic Interests in the Orient_

Of the highest significance for the question we are dealing with,
finally, is the new direction in Russian foreign economic policy that
has become evident in the last ten years. Up until that time, Russia’s
efforts were directed to satisfying its needs for manufactured goods and
raw materials through its own production, and emancipating itself from
foreign imports. Today its efforts go further; today Russia wants to
venture out into the world market and challenge the other capitalist
nations on foreign ground. To be sure, this tendency does not stem from
the Russian bourgeoisie. Because of the peculiar economic-political
development of Russia, politics frequently seizes the initiative in
promoting economic development in pursuit of its own interests.

While industry in most capitalist countries, to the extent that the
boundaries of the internal market are too narrow, pushes the government
to acquire new markets by conquest or treaty, in Russia, on the
contrary, tsarist policy sees in industrial exports a means of bringing
the countries of Asia, initially chosen as prospective political booty,
into economic dependence on Russia. Therefore, while the Russian
industrialists for the most part do not lift a finger to win a place in
the world market, the government spurs them incessantly in that
direction. Everything has been done to impart energy and a thirst for
exports: exhortations, invitations, expeditions to investigate new
market areas, the construction of colossal railroads such as the
Trans-Siberian and the Chinese Eastern, rebates on customs and taxes on
exported goods,^(CLXXII) and finally, direct subsidies to this end. The
countries first in consideration here are: China, Persia, Central Asia,
and the Balkan states. In 1892 an expedition under the direction of
Professor [Alexei M.] Pozdneyev, which was to serve scientific as well
as commercial ends, was sent to _Mongolia_.⁵⁷ Even earlier the Russians
had introduced a postal system there, which was also run by them. In the
following year an official of the Finance Ministry, Tomara, was sent to
_Persia_ to investigate the trade situation there and, particularly
important, the reconstruction of the Persian port of Enzeli⁵⁸ was begun
in order to support Russian trade. In the same year the Russian Finance
Ministry worked out a draft regarding the improvement of the routes from
the Russian border to Tehran, Tabriz, and Meshed and the establishment
of a Russian bank in Persia. In 1896, in order to monopolize the market
in eastern Siberia for its own merchants and drive the English from the
field, Russia decided to eliminate the free trade zones on the Amur
River and at the port of Vladivostok, which had extended to all goods
except those on which an excise had been levied in Russia. However, the
most important measure by which the government hoped to give a boost to
Russian trade in Central Asia was the costly construction of the
Trans-Caspian Railway.⁵⁹ Russia directed no less—or more exactly, even
more—attention toward China. A short time ago China’s trade with foreign
countries was taken care of by German, French, and English banks.¹⁷³

Therefore, in 1896, the Russian government hurried to found a Russian
bank in Shanghai. “One task of the bank,” wrote the organ of the Russian
Finance Ministry at the time, “is to consolidate Russia’s economic
influence in China and to thereby create a counterweight to the
influence of other European nations. From this standpoint it is
particularly important that the bank try to draw as close to the Chinese
government as possible, that it collect taxes in China, undertake
operations that will bring it into contact with the Chinese treasury,
pay interest on the Chinese state debt,” and so on.^(CLXXIV) The other
Russian measures, for example the construction of the Chinese Eastern
Railroad,⁶⁰ are well enough known.

An official inquiry was made recently into the result of these efforts
so far, and they turned out to have been an almost total fiasco. In
every country where the government wanted to create a market for Russian
goods, they would have had to overcome stiff competition from German,
French, but above all English industry, and the Russian entrepreneurs
had not even remotely risen to this task. Russia was no match for other
nations even in its own national territory in eastern Siberia, as long
as it had to face them in free competition. Imports in the most
important Siberian port, Vladivostok, amounted to:^(CLXXV)

_In thousands of rubles_

 

_from Russia_

_from foreign countries_

1887

2,016

3,725

1888

2,121

3,763

1889

2,385

3,325

One consequence of this state of affairs was the above-mentioned
decision by Russia to take eastern Siberia into the Empire’s tariff
zone.

Russian exports to China are likewise hardly worth mention in comparison
to those of other nations. Out of total imports of nearly 330 million
rubles, Russia participated with only approximately 4.5
million:^(CLXXVI)

_In thousands of rubles_

1891

4,896

1892

4,782

1893

4,087

1894

4,488

A similar picture has been provided by the uproar about trade with
_Central Asia_. The Trans-Caspian Railway built by Russia, on which such
great hopes were set, proved to be a really first-rate trade route—for
the English, who now have obtained a way of getting around the high
transit duty in Afghanistan. Russian exports to the Trans-Caspian,
Khiva, Bukhara, and Turkestan have, after a brief upswing, begun to sink
again in the last few years. Of the most important items on record, the
exports were as follows:^(CLXXVII)

_Year_

_In thousands of rubles_

_1888_

_1889_

_1890_

_1891_

_1892_

_1893_

Total

1,141

1,296

1,685

2,922

2,102

1,854

Products of textile industry

201

245

541

671

397

538

Sugar

422

457

531

1,048

516

510

English imports from India, on the contrary, grew rapidly during the
same period thanks to the Russian rail system, as has been officially
confirmed from the Russian side. Bukhara, for example, received from the
four main stations on this line:^(CLXXVIII)

_In thousands of poods_

_1888_

_1889_

_1890_

_1891_

_1892^(CLXXIX)_

_1893_

_Total_

Russian products

572

1,176

1,863

923

267

244

5,045

English products

1,160

4,209

8,516

12,761

4,443

16,154

47,243

Russia’s exports to _Afghanistan are_ in just as bad a way. Imports of
products of the Russian textile industry [by that country] amounted to
163,245 poods in 1888–90 (25 months), 10,000 poods in 1893 (12 months),
that is, approximately eight times less in the latter year.^(CLXXX)

Relatively speaking, Russian trade in Persia has had the best success.
Russian cotton products make up approximately 30 percent of Persian
consumption, and imports of these products amounted to 48,000 poods per
year in 1887–90, and 73,000 poods per year in 1891–94.^(CLXXXI)

In the northern provinces of Gilan and Mazanderan, the Russian textile
industry has almost supplanted the English, but, in total Persian
imports, Russia, according to official evidence, plays a very small role
for the meantime. This despite the fact that Russian industry finds
itself in the most advantageous situation, since the Persians and
Armenians living in the Caucasus, carrying on trade at their own risk,
serve Russian industry as the most suitable agents, while the merchants
of other nations must have recourse to business on commission, and that
only in Persia’s larger cities.

The total picture of Russia’s exports to its most important Asian
markets appears as follows:^(CLXXXII)

_1894_

_In millions of rubles_

_to Persia_

_to China_

_to Central Asia_

Total

12

4.5

3.8

Food

7.5

0.1

1.7

Manufactured goods

3.5

3.4

0.4

Raw materials and half-finished goods

—

0.7

0.9

We see that the Russian government’s program in Asia is still far from
being realized, and that, in any case, the result attained corresponds
in no way to the amount of effort made in this direction. It would be an
error to trace this back to the technological backwardness of Russian
industry alone. Certainly Russia is behind other industrial states in
this regard, in a whole series of important branches of industry, such
as the metal and wool industries, etc., and in order to be able to take
up the competitive battle successfully on the world market it would have
to unconditionally improve its methods of production. But there is a
further and no less important factor involved, which has largely
frustrated the government’s plans in Asia up until now. For even where
Russian industry could have easily won a victory over the English,
according to the competent testimony of individual
researchers^(CLXXXIII) and even the British consuls in Persia—for
example, in the production of lower grades of cotton cloth—the Russian
industrialists up until now have not been able to go very far. The
reason is the entire habitual mode of life [_Habitus_] of the Russian
entrepreneurs, especially those of Moscow, and this was the product of
the many years of Russia’s protective tariff policy. Pampered by the
government with all sorts of gifts and patronage, spoiled by enormous
monopoly profits, spoiled further by a colossal domestic market and
immunity from outside competition, the Moscow entrepreneurs felt neither
the desire nor the need to expose themselves to the rough weather of the
world market and contented themselves with normal profits. It is, so to
speak, profit-hypertrophy which makes the Muscovites so sluggish and
apathetic in the search for possible new markets; they see foreign trade
as, at most, a means to either pocket higher export subsidies or to get
a huckster’s one-time profit by fraudulent goods deliveries and the
clumsiest cheating. If neither the one nor the other is in the offing,
then the Moscow manufacturer answers the orders that might pour in from
outside with stubborn silence.

This method of doing business is clearly shown in connection with Asia.
Thus, for example, the Russian calico massively imported to Bukhara and
Khiva in 1890 and 1891 was manufactured in such a way that the Moslems
could have used it much less for clothing than for dyeing New Year’s
eggs. In subsequent years the population understandably turned back to
English products, and this, more than the cholera epidemic and the bad
harvest, brought about the precipitous fall in Russian imports in the
years 1892 and 1893.^(CLXXXIV) Just as telling is the story of the sugar
trade with Asia. So long as the excise tax was rebated on the export of
sugar, these exports went rapidly to Persia and Bukhara; when the
rebates were suspended, the business once more seemed pointless to the
Russians, and exports sank suddenly from 1,047,996 poods in 1891 to
516,021 poods in 1892 and 150,128 in 1893.^(CLXXXV) Another interesting
side of the Muscovites’ commercial spirit is revealed in their trade
with Siberia, where they managed to first send out travelers with
samples to win orders, then afterwards declined to fill these
orders.^(CLXXXVI) Finally, the Muscovites’ energy comes to the fore most
glaringly in their business with China; approached from there with
requests for the establishment of trade relations, they retorted to this
importunate demand with silence.^(CLXXXVII)

After exhaustive examination of the results of Russia’s Asian trade, the
organ of Russia’s Finance Ministry likewise came to the following
conclusion: “The characteristic traits of the non-commercial Slavic
(meaning here: Russian) race and the absolute apathy and indolence of
the Moscow entrepreneurs are expressed as crudely as they are completely
in our trade with Central Asia.”^(CLXXXVIII) The causes of the failure
of the Russian market in Asia are formulated in almost the same words by
other papers of different viewpoints—_Novosti, Novoye Vremya_, and the
_Sankt-Peterburgskie Vedomosti_, among others.^(CLXXXIX) And recently
the organ of the Finance Ministry happened to speak once again on the
same theme: “Only Persia,” it wrote in January 1897, “can be called a
market for the products of our cotton industry; the attempts to conquer
the Chinese and Central Asian markets for ourselves can so far not be
viewed as successful, and what is partly to blame is our inability to
adjust to the demands and customs of the customers, but above all the
fact that our entrepreneurs at the moment have it too good at home to
want to bother with foreign markets.”^(CXC)

Thus it appears that the very essence of the Moscow entrepreneurs, and
particularly their efforts to maintain a privileged place by means of a
totally artificial Chinese wall, are incompatible with the current
tendency of Russian foreign policy and in fact go directly against it.
It is clear that the most effective remedy for all Moscow’s indolence
and its trade practices, as well as for technological backwardness,
would be Russia’s transition to a liberal tariff policy, which would
tear the Moscow district out of the hothouse atmosphere of monopoly and
confront it with foreign competition in its own country. To us there is
little doubt that the interests of absolutism in Asia, on the one hand,
and the expansion of capitalist agriculture and the interests of the
landowners, on the other, will sooner or later pull Russia down the road
to a more moderate tariff policy. But above all a remedy can be created
only in one way, namely by sharpening competition _within_ the Russian
customs borders, i.e., so that Moscow is ruthlessly abandoned to the
unlimited competition of the progressive industrial districts of Poland
and St. Petersburg. This viewpoint is also that which the more
influential Russian press, such as _Novoye Vremya_, stressed explicitly
in connection with the debate over the tsarist Empire’s interests in
Asia.^(CXCI) That the government, for its part, is now in fact preparing
to do away with Moscow’s economic rut and to force the Muscovites toward
modern production and trade methods is best proved by the most recent
law on the maximum workday, which indicates the most abrupt break with
Moscow’s present methods of production, while it also appears as a
realization of the _Polish_ project of 1892.

To the same degree to which Moscow’s economic conservatism is a drag on
current Russian policy and becomes more so every day, Polish industry
appears once more as tsarism’s comrade in arms. We have shown by the
comparison between the competitive conditions of Polish and central
Russian production how far ahead of Moscow Poland is in terms of
technology. For this reason alone, capitalist Poland, as the most
progressive industrial district in Russia, which, through competition,
unceasingly spurs the others, particularly Moscow, toward technological
improvements, realizes the Russian government’s current program. But the
Polish industrialists are also running ahead of the Russians
specifically in the opening up of Asian markets. We have seen how
seriously and thoroughly they prepared themselves for this task. Without
awaiting the invitation of the government, they themselves seize the
initiative and with their own hands forge trade links with foreign
countries.

In the only country where Russian trade is relatively flourishing, in
Persia, the products of the Polish textile industry make up nearly half
of the total textile imports from Russia—approximately 40 percent of the
imports via the most important junction, Baku.^(CXCII) To Poland also
belong the initiatives toward trade relations with Persia, in many
respects: as early as 1887, thus before the government had turned its
attention to this country, Poland had set about opening up its own trade
agency and warehouse in Tehran.^(CXCIII)

Łódż also immediately made use of the Trans-Caspian Railway to advance
into Central Asia with its goods along with St. Petersburg and
Moscow.^(CXCIV) It is the Warsaw district that provides the largely
immigrant strata of the populations of Bukhara and Turkestan with
glassware, faience, and porcelain, while the inferior Moscow products
are bought by the poorer natives.^(CXCV) Łódż is, at this point, the
only industrial district in the Empire whose textile industry’s products
have found entry into Constantinople and the Balkan countries.^(CXCVI)
Already in 1887 Poland had taken up trade relations with Romania and
Bulgaria.^(CXCVII) Recently Łódż began to send cotton products directly
to Sofia.^(CXCVIII) Indeed, the Polish bourgeoisie, through the use of
the Trans-Siberian rail line, may make Warsaw the center of the new,
large European-Asian trade routes.^(CXCIX) “The British manufacturer,”
wrote the English consul in Warsaw, “may be prepared to find in them
(the Polish entrepreneurs) formidable rivals in the markets of the
East.”^(CC)

In this way Polish capitalism is working hand in hand with tsarist
policy in Asia.

From these so diametrically opposed attitudes of Moscow and Poland
toward the aims set by Russian policy, there also follows a totally
different current in the public opinion of the two districts. Stronger
and stronger grows the party favoring domestic free trade, favoring
technological progress, the party that opposes the official guardianship
and defense of backward industries, and therefore is sympathetic toward
the Polish district; and the Moscow entrepreneurs stand more and more
isolated with their ancestral belief in the Trinity: guarantees,
bonuses, subsidies. The anti-Moscow temper clearly expressed itself on
the occasion of Moscow’s petition to the 1893 annual fair in Nizhny
Novgorod for the imposition of a tax on Polish traveling agents. Thus we
read in _Novosti_:

During the same fair … these same representatives of protectionism
composed and sent to the Finance Minister a petition regarding a special
tax on the traveling salesmen of the Łódż factories, with the
unconcealed intention of liberating the Moscow industrial district from
Łódż’s competition. According to healthy common sense, the Moscow
manufacturers should, in the interests of Russian industry and of
Russian consumers, merely follow the admirable example of the Łódż
manufacturers and employ traveling salesmen, bring the producers closer
to the consumers, and so cheapen and make easier the market for its own
products. But not nearly so much entrepreneurial spirit lies with the
customs and habits of these protection-coddled practical men; they
prefer to try various pranks against their competitors.^(CCI)

And, finally, a characteristic excerpt from the official government
organ in Warsaw, the _Varshavskii Dnevnik_ [Warsaw Journal], on the
general tasks of Russia’s industrial foreign policy:

With the opening up of these new markets in Central Asia and Persia, we
count on the flourishing of our industries, and we repeat that it is
very much to be deplored that the lion’s share of the profits go to
foreign countries, while only the crumbs remain for our poor workers
(!). Our trade with Central Asia and Persia has not yet struck deep
roots, and the representatives of Russian trade still have many
victories to win over English competition to conquer those markets for
Russia. _In view of the common enemy, the Moscow and Polish
entrepreneurs should join forces in order to strive together toward the
same goal … Russia’s main goal in the Asian market is at this moment to
exclude English goods. It would be a subsidiary question which of the
Empire’s industrial districts contributes more to the achievement of
this goal_, if only the profits of industry on the banks of the Vistula
went exclusively to the native population and not, as is the case, to
increase the capital for German entrepreneurs, employees, and workers.
Were those industries in the hands of Russia or Poland, then we would be
far stronger in our battle with England, and our dominance in Central
Asia would be secured.^(CCII)

Understandably, the government organ does not neglect to deal a blow in
passing at the German industrialists, who are heavily represented in
Polish industry; it charges them with ignoring Russian national
interests, exclusive, egotistical concern for the “German” interests of
their own pockets, etc. But in the main, we find here the actual
situation of the moment, pointedly expressed: In view of the present
tasks in the world market, the domestic rivalries of the Polish and
Russian entrepreneurs stand completely in the background. Insofar as
differences exist between them, the blame will be pushed onto the
Germans, an element hated just as much by the Polish bourgeoisie, as we
have seen. Polish industry in itself, its development, its flourishing,
appear here in a new light, as lying directly in the interests of the
tsarist government: Once it has served to additionally consolidate the
Russian conquest in Poland, tsarism is now assigning Polish capitalism
the flattering role of serving in Asia as the harbinger of tsarism’s
coming appetite for conquest. Indeed, Poland now plays the leading role,
as we saw, in the realization of this lofty task, while Moscow’s star,
i.e., the special Muscovite economic policy, is slowly waning. The new
Russian law on the maximum workday signifies that even in the Russian
Empire the lovely days of Aranjuez⁶¹—the days of primitive capitalist
accumulation—are almost past.


CONCLUSION

Our task is finished. We believe that we can conclude from the foregoing
that all apprehensions about the future of Polish industry—at least
insofar as they relate to the danger threatened by the Russian
government—are quite groundless and nothing but an uncritical,
superficial reflection of the intimate entrepreneurial wrangle between
the Łódż and Moscow entrepreneurs. If one looks deeper into the
situation, one must arrive at the conclusion that Poland, in economic
terms, not only does not have any separation from Russia in store, but,
rather, the tendencies arising from the general internal nature of
large-scale capitalist production itself are binding Poland much more
strongly to Russia with every passing year. It is an inherent law of the
capitalist method of production that it strives to materially bind
together the most distant places, little by little, to make them
economically dependent on each other, and eventually transform the
entire world into one firmly joined productive mechanism. This tendency,
of course, works most strongly within one and the same state, within the
same political and tariff borders. The capitalist development of Poland
and Russia has yielded this result. As long as both countries were
predominantly agricultural and indeed natural-economy countries, thus
until the 1860s, they remained economically foreign to each other and
each represented for itself a closed whole with particular economic
interests. Since factory production began here and there on a larger
scale, however, since natural economy gave way to money economy, since
industry became a determining factor in the social life of both
countries, the self-containment of their material existence has more and
more disappeared. Exchange and the division of labor have strung
thousands of threads between Russia and Poland, and these manifold
economic interests are so intertwined that the Polish and Russian
economies today increasingly constitute a single complex mechanism.

The process portrayed above is mirrored in many different ways in the
consciousness of the different factors in Polish public life. The
Russian government sees Poland as a tool for its plans for rule,
believes that Poland has unconditionally surrendered to its power and
that it has founded a thousand-year empire of despotism. The Polish
bourgeoisie sees in this a fundamental of its own class rule in the
country and an inexhaustible source of riches; it indulges in the
sweetest dreams of the future in its thoughts about Asia and believes
itself able to build a thousand-year empire of capital. The various
nationalist elements of Polish society perceive the entire social
process as a unique, great national misfortune, which mercilessly
shattered their hopes for the reconstruction of an independent Polish
state. They sense instinctively the power of the economic bonds which
capitalism has created between Poland and Russia and, without being able
to hold back the fatal process in reality, they can at least put an end
to it in their own imagination; they cling in desperation to this
illusion and expect the Russian government itself to nullify Poland’s
hated capitalist development with its own hands and so recreate a basis
for nationalism.

We believe that the Russian government, the Polish bourgeoisie, and the
Polish nationalists have all equally been struck with blindness, and
that the capitalist fusion process between Poland and Russia also has an
important dialectical side that they have completely overlooked. This
process is bringing to fruition in its own womb the moment when the
development of capitalism in Russia will be thrown into contradiction
with the absolutist form of government, and then tsarist rule will be
brought down by its own works. Sooner or later, the hour will strike
when the same Polish and Russian bourgeoisie that is today pampered by
the tsarist government will become weary of their political attorney,
absolutism, and will checkmate the king. Moreover, this capitalist
process is moving with impetuous haste toward the moment when the
development of the productive forces in the Russian Empire becomes
irreconcilable with the rule of capital and when, in the place of
private commodity economy, a new social order based on planned,
cooperative production will appear. The Polish and Russian bourgeoisies
are hastening this moment with their combined forces; they cannot make
one step forward without increasing and pushing forward the Polish and
Russian working classes. The capitalist fusing of Poland and Russia is
engendering as its end result that which has been overlooked to the same
degree by the Russian government, the Polish bourgeoisie, and the Polish
nationalists: the union of the Polish and Russian proletariats as the
future receiver in the bankruptcy of, first, the rule of Russian
tsarism, and then the rule of Polish-Russian capital.


LIST OF WRITINGS USED⁶²

_In Polish_

F. Rodecki, _Obraz geograficzno-statystyczny Krolestwa Polskego_
(Geographical-Statistical Depiction of the Kingdom of Poland), Warsaw[:
Drukarni Antoniego GaŁęzowskiego i Kompanii,] 1830.

O. Flatt, _Opis miasta Lódzi pod wzgledem historycznym, statystycznym i
przemyslowym_ (Historical, Statistical and Industrial Description of the
City of Łódż), Warsaw[: Drukarnia Gazety,] 1853.

Dr. T. Rutowski, _W sprawie przemyslu krajowego_ (On the Question of the
Country’s Industry), Kraków[: Drukarnia Zwiazkowa], 1883.

W. Zalęski, _Statystyka porównawcza Królewstwa Polskiego_ (Comparative
Statistics of the Kingdom of Poland), Warsaw, 1876.

J[an] Bloch, _Przemysl fabryczny Królewstwa Polskiego, 1871–1880_ (The
Factory Industry of the Kingdom of Poland. 1871–80), Warsaw[: Drukarni
Cotty], 1884.

_Encyklopedia Rolnicza_ (Agricultural Encyclopedia), Vol. 1,
Warsaw[:Drukarnia Artystyczna Saturnina Sikorskiego], 1890; Vol. 2,
Warsaw[: Drukarnia Artystyczna Saturnina Sikorskiego,] 1891; Vol. 3,
Warsaw[: Drukarnia Artystyczna Saturnina Sikorskiego,] 1894.

J[an] Bloch, _Landed Property and Its Indebtedness_, Warsaw, 1890.

J[an] Bloch, _O Selskokhozaistvennom Melioratzionnom Kreditye v Rossi i
Inostrannykh Gosudarstvakh_ (Agricultural Amelioration Credit in Russia
and Foreign States), Warsaw, 1892.

J[an] Bloch, _The Peasants’ Bank and Parcelization_, Warsaw, 1895.

L. Górski, _Our Mistakes in Agriculture_, Warsaw, 1874.

Dr. J[an] Banzemer, _Obraz przemyslu w kraju naszym_ (A Picture of
Industry in Our Country), Warsaw[: Drukarni Noskowskiego], 1886.

_Magazines_

(monthly)

_Ateneum_, Warsaw.

(weekly)

_Przeglad Tygondniowy_ (Weekly Review), Warsaw.

_Kraj_ (Our Country), St. Petersburg.

_Prawda_ (Truth), Warsaw.

_Newspapers_

_Gazeta Handlowa_ (Newpaper of Commerce), Warsaw.

_Gazeta Polska_ (Newspaper of Poland), Warsaw.

_Kurjer Warszawski_ (Warsaw Courier), Warsaw.

_In Russian_

M. Zaveleiskii, _Statistika Tsarstva polskogo_ (Statistics of the
Kingdom of Poland), St. Petersburg, 1842.

I. Poznanskii, _Proizvoditelnye sily Tsarstva polskogo_ (Productive
Forces of the Kingdom of Poland), St. Petersburg, 1880.

K. Lodyzhenskii, _Istoriia russkogo tamozhennogo tarifa_ (History of the
Russian Tariff). St. Petersburg, 1886.

_Istoriko-statisticheskii obzor promyshlennosti Rossii_
(Historico-Statistical Review of the Industry of Russia), D. A.
Timiriazev, ed., 2 vols., St. Petersburg, 1883.

Ivan I. Ianzhul, _Istoricheskii ocherk razvitiia fabrichno-zavodskoi
promyshlennosti_ (Historical Sketch of the Development of Factory
Industry), Moscow, 1887.

_Fabrichno-zavodskaia promyshlennost i torgovlia Rossii. Vsemirnaia
kolumbova vystavka v Chikago 1893_ (Factory Industry and Trade of
Russia. Report for the Chicago World’s Fair 1893), Departament Torgovli
I Manufaktur Ministerstvo Finansov (issued by Department of Trade and
Manufactures of the Ministry of Finances), St. Petersburg, 1893.

_Zemledelie i Lesnaia Promyshlennost’ Rossii. Vsemirnaia kolumbbova
vystavka v Chikago 1893_ (Russia’s Agriculture and Forest Industry.
Report for the Chicago World’s Fair 1893), Rossiia, Departament Gornogo
Dela, Ministervo Gosudarstvennykh imushchestv (issued by Russia’s
Department of Agriculture, Ministry of State Properties), St.
Petersburg, 1893.

_Gornaia Promyshlennost Roissii. Vsemirnaia kolumbbova vystavka v
Chikago 1893_ (Russia’s Mining Industry. Report for the Chicago World’s
Fair 1893), Rossiia, Departament Gornog Dela, Ministervo
Gosudarstvennykh imushchestv (issued by the Mining Department of
Russia’s Ministry of State Properties), St. Petersburg, 1893.

G. Simonenko, _Sravnitel’naia statistika Tsarstva Pol’skago I drugikh
evropeiskikh stran_ (Comparative Statistics of the Kingdom of Poland and
of Other European Countries), Warsaw[: Tipografiia Meditsinskoi gazety],
1879.

_Petitions by the Imperial Free Economic Society concerning the Revision
of Russia’s Tariffs_, St. Petersburg, 1890.

P. A. Orlov, _A Register of the Factories of European Russia, including
the Kingdom of Poland and the Grand Duchy of Finland_, St. Petersburg,
1881.

_Materials on Trade and Industrial Statistics of Russia: Data concerning
the Factory Industry in Russia for the Years 1885–1887_, St. Petersburg:
Trade Department of Russia’s Ministry of Finance, 1889.

_Materials on Trade and Industrial Statistics of Russia: Data concerning
the Factory Industry in Russia for the Year 1888_, St. Petersburg: Trade
Department of Russia’s Ministry of Finance, 1891.

_Materials on Trade and Industrial Statistics of Russia: Data concerning
the Factory Industry in Russia for the Year 1889_, St. Petersburg: Trade
Department of Russia’s Ministry of Finance, 1891.

_Materials on Trade and Industrial Statistics of Russia: Data concerning
the Factory Industry in Russia for the Year 1890_, St. Petersburg: Trade
Department of Russia’s Ministry of Finance, 1893.

_Materials on Trade and Industrial Statistics of Russia: Data concerning
the Factory Industry in Russia for the Year 1891_, St. Petersburg: Trade
Department of Russia’s Ministry of Finance, 1894.

_Materials on Trade and Industrial Statistics of Russia: Data concerning
the Factory Industry in Russia for the Year 1892_, St. Petersburg: Trade
Department of Russia’s Ministry of Finance, 1895.

_Reports of the Members of the Commission for Investigation of the
Factory Industry in the Kingdom of Poland_, St. Petersburg, 1888.

A.S., _Bor’ba mezhdu Moskvoi y Lodzem_ (The Conflict between Moscow and
Łódż), St. Petersburg, 1889.

_Materialy po statistiki parovykh mashin v rossiiskoi imperii_
(Materials for Statistics on Steam Engines in the Russian Empire),
Rossiia, Tsentral’nyi statisticheskii komitet (issued by the Central
Statistical Committee of Russia), St. Petersburg, 1888.

Vladimir Sviatlovskii, _Fabrichnyi rabochii_ (The Factory Worker),
Warsaw, 1889.

_Proizvoditel’nye sily Rossii_ (The Productive Forces of Russia. For the
regional industrial exhibition at Nizhny Novgorod), Rossiia,
Ministerstvo Finansov (issued by the Ministry of Finance), St.
Petersburg, 1896.

S. Sharapov, _Sobranie sochinenii_ (Collected Works), St. Petersburg,
1892.

I. I. Ianzhul, _Report of the Factory Inspector for the Moscow Region_,
St. Petersburg, 1884.

I. I. Ianzhul, “The Factory Worker in Central Russia and in the Kingdom
of Poland,” in the monthly journal _Vestnik Evropy_ (European Herald),
St. Petersburg), Vol. 1, February issue, 1888.

K. V. Davydov, _Report of the Factory Inspector for the St. Petersburg
Region_, St. Petersburg, 1886.

Dr. Peskov, _Report of the Factory Inspector for the Vladimir Region_,
St. Petersburg, 1886.

_Memorandum of the Warsaw Stock Exchange Commission_, on railroad rates
for grain. (This work not available from booksellers.⁶³)

N. P. Iasnopol’skii, _Geograficheskoe raspredelenie istochnikov
gosudarstvennykh dokhodov v Rossii_ (Geographic Distribution of the
Sources of State Revenues in Russia), Kiev, 1890.

_Sibir’ i sibirskaia magistral.’ Vsemirnaia kolumbbova vystavka v
Chikago 1893_ (Siberia and the Great Siberian Railroad. Report for the
World’s Fair in Chicago), Rossiia, Departament Torgovli, Ministervto
Finansov (issued by the the Department of Trade of Russia’s Finance
Ministry), St. Petersburg, 1893.

R. Mikhailov, “Investigation of Naphtha Residue,” _Zapiski russkogo
tekhnicheskogo obshchestva_ or _Zapiski Imperatorskogo russkogo
tekhnicheskogo obshchestva_ (Proceedings of the Imperial Russian
Technical Society), St. Petersburg, No. 1, January 1898.

Y[evstafy] M[ikhailovich] Dement’ev, _Fabrika: chto ona daet naseleniiu
i chto ona u nee beret_ (The Factory: What It Gives to the Population
and What It Takes Away), Moscow, 1893.

_Journals_

_Trudy Imperatorskogo Svobodnogo Ekonomicheskogo Obshchestva_
(Proceedings of the Imperial Free Economic Society), published twice a
month in St. Peterburg.

_Vestnik Finansov, Promyshlennosti i Torgovli_ (Bulletin of Finance,
Industry, and Trade), published weekly in St. Petersburg by the Ministry
of Finance.

_Newspapers_

_Novosti_ (News), St. Petersburg.

_Novoe Vremia_ (New Times), St. Petersburg.

_Sibir_ (Siberia), St. Peterburg.

_Sankt-Peterburgskie Vedomosti_ (St. Petersburg News), St. Petersburg.

_Torgovo-Promyshlennaya Gazeta_ (Newspaper of Trade and Industry), St.
Petersburg.

_In other languages_

_Blue Book_. Royal Commission on Labor, Foreign Reports, Vol. X, Russia,
London[: Eyre and Spottiswoode,] 1894.

Th[omas] Brassey, _Work and Wages_ [London: Bell and Daldry,] 1872.

_Diplomatic and Consular Reports_ [on Trade and Finance]. [British]
Foreign Office. Annual Series:

On the Trade of the Kingdom of Poland, No. 128 [London: Her Majestry’s
Stationary Office], 1887.

On the Trade of Warsaw, No. 321 [London: Her Majestry’s Stationary
Office,] 1888.

On the Trade of Poland, No. 1286 [London: Her Majestry’s Stationary
Office,] 1893.

On the Trade of the District of the Consulate-General at Warsaw, No. 863
[London: Her Majestry’s Stationary Office,] 1891.

On the Trade of the District of the Consulate-General at Warsaw, No.
1183 [London: Her Majestry’s Stationary Office,] 1893.

On the Trade of the District of the Consulate-General at Warsaw, No.
1449 [London: Her Majestry’s Stationary Office,] 1894.

On the Trade of the District of the Consulate-General at Warsaw, No.
1535 [London: Her Majestry’s Stationary Office,] 1895.

_Foreign Office. Miscellaneous Series Reports:_

On the Peasantry and Peasant Holdings in Poland, No. 355 [London: Her
Majestry’s Stationary Office,] 1985.

On the Position of Landed Proprietors in Poland, No. 347 [London: Her
Majestry’s Stationary Office,] 1895.

[Gerhart von] Schulze-Gävernitz, “Der Nationalismus in Russland und
seine wirtschaftlichen Träger” (Nationalism in Russia and Its Economic
Spokesmen), _Preussische Jahrbücher_ (Prussian Yearbooks), Vol. 75,
Jan.–March, 1894.

S. G., “Die industrielle Politik Russlands in dessen polnischen
Provinzen” (The Industrial Policy of Russia in Its Polish Provinces),
_Neue Zeit_ (Stuttgart), 1893–94, Vol. II, No. 51.

Karl Marx, _Das Kapital: Kritik der politischen Ökonomie_, Vol. 3,
Hamburg[:Otto Meissner], 1890.

L[ujo] Brentano, _Über das Verhältnis von Arbeitslohn und Arbeitszeit
zur Arbeitsleistung_ (On the Relation of Wages and Labor Time to
Productivity), Leipzig[: Duncker & Humboldt], 1893.



BACK TO ADAM SMITH!¹


Previously in this venue Ed[uard] Bernstein reviewed an earlier work by
Dr. [Richard] Schüller on “Classical Political Economy and its
Antagonists”;² now a continuation of these studies has appeared under
the title “The Political Economy [_Wirtschaftspolitik_] of the
Historical School.”³

The theme in itself is, without a doubt and for several reasons, among
the most interesting. Above all, this is because the historical school⁴
essentially represents the only real national product of the German
bourgeoisie in the area of economic theory. In Germany, as elsewhere,
the classical liberal period was simply an offshoot of English
classicism; but the romantic course of [Karl Ludwig von] Haller and
[Adam Heinrich] Müller, however influential it may have been in
practice, hardly deserves to be called a school of political economy.⁵
[Haller and Müller] made no attempt to advance a positive economic
theory and seemingly [their] only literate adherent was, as far as we
know, the famous [Karl Ernst] Jarcke who, according to [Ludwig] Börne,
was called to the Austrian council from its Prussian counterpart in
order to advocate Metternichian policies.⁶ Likewise, [Friedrich] List’s
“national system” of political economy must be seen rather as a
dilettantish attempt than a theoretical doctrine.⁷ Only the historical
school offered an entire system of economic doctrine and acquired a
numerous following of disciplinary experts and practical men.

It should be added, moreover, that in its internal history the
historical school presents an accurate mirror image of the history of
the German bourgeoisie. A study of the doctrines, methods, and
developmental phases of this school would at the same time deliver a
sketch of the development of the German bourgeoisie itself—if, that is,
it were treated in relation to the facts of economic and social life.

That Dr. Schüller conceived his task in the manner that we have
described cannot at all be confirmed. What he offers is rather a very
sketchy series of portraits of significant classical-liberal,
reactionary-romantic and historical theoreticians, to which is attached
a bundle of general observations, equally simply thrown together, about
the different methods of those theoretical tendencies.

Dr. Schüller fully correctly points to the _deductive method_ of
research as the most salient characteristic of classical-liberal
political economy, and also as the basis of the progressive effects of
its practice. Equally correct is his assertion that the abandonment of
the deductive research method would have as its consequence the lack of
any firm principles; and this would result in theoretical infertility
and political-economic backwardness. Schüller’s whole thing is a warm
plea for the method of classical economics and an appeal to today’s
economists to return to this method. But why the historical school
abandoned the research methods of the classicists and how, considering
their shallowness and backwardness, to explain their broad and
long-lasting influence in German national-economy—to these questions we
find no answer from Dr. Schüller. And yet, only through a palpable
explication of these questions can something palpable become of
Schüller’s appeal to contemporary economists in which his entire
analysis culminates.

The undivided dominance of the classical economic doctrine at the
beginning of our century, even in Germany, is generally known. It is not
at all much of an exaggeration, that, as [Alexander von der] Marwitz
wrote to Rahel [Varnhagen] in the year 1810, next to Napoleon, Ad[am]
Smith is the most powerful monarch in Europe.⁸ In Prussia all the
statesmen of the Stein–Hardenberg period⁹ were students of Ad[am] Smith.
Most of official government proclamations bear the clear stamp of the
classical doctrine. Indeed, even the high ranks of the military—[August
Neidhardt von] Gneisenau, [Gerhard von] Scharnhorst, [Job von]
Witzleben¹⁰—were warm followers of classical liberalism. Smith’s
theories were the Bible of the entire reform period in Germany that for
a short time following the disaster at Jena challenged the hardcore
reaction.¹¹

But precisely therein lay the reason why these theories had to lead to
opposition. The progressive Stein–Hardenberg reforms arose not from a
strong bourgeois movement, not from the society itself. They were rather
elicited from the ruling circles by the French attacks and simply
imposed by those social circles. Then they soon called forth opposition
from two camps: on the one hand, from the side of the feudal Junker
class for whom it was a matter of preserving serfdom and, on the other
hand, from those elements of the middle class that felt themselves and
their interests threatened by the modern reforms, mainly from the
artisan class that was still strong at that time but that was severely
damaged by the abolition of the guild order and also by the English
imports favored by liberal trade policy.

In the first case the opposition expressed itself in Haller’s and
Müller’s reactionary-romantic direction; in the latter, in the older
historical school of [Friedrich Julius Heinrich] Soden, [Heinrich]
Luden, [Friedrich von] Cölln among others.¹² If in both cases one takes
into account the nature of the social foundation from which the two
economic directions rebelling against the classical school emerged, then
their different theoretical character is easily explained.

The rebellious Junkers, whose protest against the inauguration of
bourgeois development found its expression in Haller’s romantic school,
posited against the reforms that they criticized a very particular,
consistent “ideal” medieval feudalism. Just as clear, consistent, and
powerful as the Metternichian reaction, as the era of the Holy
Alliance,¹³ was the theoretical expression of this politics: the
economic theory of the romantic school. It proceeded from certain firm
“principles,” namely from the principles of the feudal natural economy,
that were consistently applied to all questions of political economy.

It was otherwise in the second oppositional camp. If the existence of
the middle-class guild-stratum, the master artisans and tradesmen, was
threatened by the innovations, it could, on the other hand, not possibly
yearn for the times of the undivided rule of feudalism whose iron force
left it with bloody wounds. These elements were capable of formulating a
specific, positive political-economic programme in the same small degree
that they themselves formed a closed social whole. Fluctuating between
modern bourgeois development and feudal tradition, fearing the
detriments of the one as much as those of the other, they only managed
to combat now liberal political economics from a feudal standpoint, then
the romantic theories from a liberal standpoint, always rejecting the
consequences of the starting point and getting stuck somewhere in the
middle.

The character of the later historical school founded by [Bruno]
Hildebrand and [Wilhelm] Roscher is fundamentally different.¹⁴ If in the
earlier case we see the petite bourgeoisie of the guilds protesting
against the emerging bourgeois order in the name of the medieval mode of
production, now it is the modern bourgeoisie itself that raises an
objection to the consequences of its own class rule.

With inexorable logic, classical political economy led in the end to an
about-face toward self-criticism, toward a critique of the bourgeois
order. In England, Ricardo represents the immediate starting point of an
entire school of English socialists ([William] Thompson, [John] Gray,
[John Francis] Bray, among others); in France [Jean Charles Léonard de]
Sismondi follows in the footsteps of [Jean-Baptiste] Say, the first
diluter of classical economy; in Germany we find socialist tones already
in [Karl Heinrich] Rau, who was followed by [Johann Heinrich von] Thünen
und [Johann Karl] Rodbertus;¹⁵ with Marx the about-face of classical
economy into its opposite, the socialist analysis of capitalism, is
completed.

One could repudiate the socialist critique, and its consequences, only
if one had transcended the starting point, classical economics. The
results of the investigation of the bourgeois commodity economy, as the
classical doctrine proffered them in a tightly bound system, did not let
themselves simply be either corrected or negated. There remained no
possibility other than to combat the investigation itself, its method.
If the goal of classical economics was knowledge of the foundations and
fundamental principles of the bourgeois economy, the historical [school]
conversely set as its task the mystification of the internal relations
of this economy. For the old historical school, the aversion to the
“levelling” or “categorical” [character] of classical liberalism¹⁶ was
merely a protest on behalf of medieval diversification and
specialization of the relations that corresponded to the social
character of the pre-capitalist mode of production. Here, for
Roscher-[Karl] Knies-Hildebrand, the “historical” critique of the
classical “absolute theories” is a protest of bourgeois society against
the recognition of its own inner laws.¹⁷ Because the purpose, the
“historical” calling, the _raison d’être_, of the newer historical
school was the veiling of these laws, it thus elevates the
_misrecognition_ [_Verkennung_] of the laws of social economy to a
scientific dogma, to an economic method.

_Suum cuique_:¹⁸ The upsurge of the English bourgeoisie was reflected in
the erection of the grandiose doctrinal edifice of the classical school,
in the creation of political economy; the emergence of the German
bourgeoisie found its intellectual expression in the self-decomposition
and abdication of economics as a science.

Sufficient reason for the historical school’s lack of principles, which
Dr. Schüller justly chastised although without plausible explanation, is
found in the actual historical relations in Germany, in the history of
the bourgeoisie, in the increasingly glaring class antagonisms. And
likewise, the fact that Roscher’s school, despite its pitiful scientific
condition and practical sterility, could succeed in attaining such
widespread influence is much better explained by the same actual
relations than by the circumstance that “the principle directions of the
economic and social questions of the present are still in caught up in
developmental flux.”

Exactly the opposite! Not because the socialist doctrine of political
economy (for this is clearly the principle tendency corresponding to the
social questions of the present) had not yet emerged, but because it had
already attained a high level of development, i.e. it was against this
doctrine that the historical school arose in reaction.

Because he does not treat the question in relation to its social
foundation, Dr. Schüller commits the double error: for one, of
considering the old historical direction in the first decades of the
century as one and the same school as that of Roscher whose doctrine was
fundamentally different; and furthermore of situating the latter as a
result of the absence of a socialist tendency [_Richtung_] rather than
conversely as a reaction against the socialist critique.

Dr. Schüller’s study wants to be more than a scientific monograph. As we
have already mentioned, it fades off into the appeal that the current
generation of German economists might return to the methods of classical
economy if it wants instead to approach the problems of contemporary
social life with the same understanding that the classicists brought to
the problems of their time.

This well-meaning appeal, “Back to the Classical Method!”—which clearly
represents the guiding thoughts of both of Schüller’s economic works—is
doubtless very congenial as a desire to bring a fresh draft of air into
the stuffy atmosphere of contemporary German political economy. Only,
with this advice Dr. Schüller displays once again that, because of his
treatment of economic problems apart from their relation to their
respective social foundation, the understanding of both the essence of
the classical school that he so admired and of contemporary tasks eludes
him.

Dr. Schüller traces the greatness of classical economics back to its
deductive method, to its treatment of economic problems according to
principles. But the deductive method, taken abstractly, is a purely
formal scholastic method that says absolutely nothing about the essence
of the research method practiced by the Smith’s school. If it were just
a matter of a “dragging in of universal, preconceived principles into
research,” then there are still many others who could be seen alongside
the classical economists. If, as formulated by Dr. Schüller, the
deductive principles of Smith and Ricardo are called economic freedom,
labor mobility, and free trade, then the same could be said of Adam
Müller’s and Haller’s patrimonial jurisdiction, serfdom, patriarchal
state, etc. As deductions, they are methodologically of equal value. But
no one at this time preached such weighty denunciations of the
historical school’s lack of principles, no one preached with such pathos
the necessity of “eternal laws” as the starting point of economic
analysis, as did precisely the romantic school.

If therefore the deductive method of classical economics led to the deep
understanding of the bourgeois economy, while Haller’s and Müller’s
romantic deductions led only to great esteem for their bearers from the
crown prince Friedrich-Wilhelm IV and from Metternich, then that
obviously lies in the fact that the classical-liberal deductions
corresponded to social development of their time, because they
corresponded to the essence of the bourgeois economy.

However, because the general foundations of the bourgeois economy became
the absolute “principles” of Ad[am] Smith’s and [David] Ricardo’s
research, for the classicists the modern commodity economy came to
represent the absolute, the _normal human_ [economy]. And this was the
actual basic principle from which they proceeded; this was the real
secret of their miracle-working deductive method.

It was precisely this unlimited and fully untroubled belief in what is
human normality, in, so to speak, the natural right of the capitalist
commodity economy, that allowed the classical political economists that
lack of self-examination [_Unbefangenheit_] in research, that lack of
consideration of the consequences, that audacious flight to the heights
from which they captured with a genial glance the internal relations of
the bourgeois mode of production.

The doubts that later arose about the bourgeois order produced on the
one hand the vulgar-economic apologists who turned their gaze away from
research into the general laws to the rationalization of individual
occurrences and, on the other hand, the resignation of the historical
school that rejected in advance any research into the foundations of the
economy and declared the task of economic science to be the simple
description of that which has been and that which is. The bourgeois mode
of production forms the foundation and the starting point of all of
these economic schools. The belief in the absoluteness and normality of
the bourgeois order, however, is peculiar to the classical school, which
is precisely what made it _classical_.

This circumstance explains not only the general scientific successes of
Smith’s school, but also the specific characteristics of its research
methods. Cosmopolitanism, the levelling treatment of people, the
individualism, the notion of economic self-interest as the sole
foundation of all actions, etc., everything that its historical critics
attribute to it and chastise as sinful, derives from the same notion of
the universal human normality of the capitalist commodity economy, of
the commodity producer as the normal human being _par excellence_.

Only, it was this same notion that set certain objective limits to the
research of Smith’s school—its subjectively unabashed nature, wholly
lacking in self-examination. The innermost essence of the bourgeois mode
of production, its real secret, can only be deciphered when it is
studied in motion, in its historical relativity. And it is precisely
this that is excluded _a priori_ by the conception of the commodity
economy as the normal, absolute form of social production.

Let us take an example. Untroubled by any social consequences, classical
economics saw human labor as the single value-producing factor and
pursued this theory through to that crystallized clarity that we find in
Ricardo’s formulation.

But the fundamental difference between Ricardo’s and Marx’s labor theory
of value—a difference not only misunderstood by bourgeois economics, but
also mostly misjudged in the popularization of Marx’s doctrine—is that
Ricardo, corresponding to his universal, natural-rights conception of
the bourgeois economy, also held the creation of value to be a _natural_
attribute of human labor, of the individual, concrete labor of
individual people.^(I)

Marx, on the other hand, recognized value as an _abstraction_, an
abstraction made by the society under particular conditions, and arrived
thereby at a differentiation of the two sides of commodity-producing
labor: concrete, individual labor and undifferentiated social labor—a
differentiation from which the solution to the _money riddle_ springs to
the eye as though illuminated by the glow of a bulls-eye lantern.¹⁹

In order, however, to keep separate the dual character of labor—the
laboring people and the value-creating commodity producers— that sat
together _statically_ in the lap of the bourgeois economy, Marx already
had to differentiate _dynamically_, in the sequence of historical time,
the commodity producer from the working individual in general, that is,
to recognize commodity production as simply a historically particular
form of social production. In a word: in order to decipher the
hieroglyphics of the capitalist economy, Marx had to approach his
research with a deduction _diametrically opposed_ to that of the
classicists: instead of approaching the matter with the belief in the
bourgeois mode of production as the human norm, he approached it with
the insight into its historical transitoriness; he had to invert the
_metaphysical deduction_ of the classicists into its opposite—into the
_dialectical_.²⁰

The progress of political economy beyond Smith–Ricardo, its further
development, was thus brought about precisely by _overcoming_ the
deductive method of this school, the return to which Schüller preaches
still today. This not only because this method, as noted, sets solid
limits on knowledge, but also because these limits had already been
reached by the classicists. In Ricardo’s doctrine the classical economic
method had already achieved the most of which it was capable, and it was
thrown into the dustbin, not merely as an dangerous instrument that
turned against the society being studied, but also as one that was
scientifically spent. A return to the method of the classical school
would not lead to a new upswing in economics, as Dr. Schüller opines,
but would affect a giant retreat. That such a return is _scientifically_
impossible is proven precisely by Marx’s work that represents a direct
continuation of the classical doctrine.

But this return is also _socially_ impossible. And this is proven on the
other hand by the degeneration of the science of classical economics
into both vulgar economics and the historical school. Since the rise of
these tendencies, the social relations that have undermined that
sanguine classical belief in the absolute character of the capitalist
commodity economy have only developed further and in the same direction.
Not only are class antagonisms visibly becoming incomparably more
glaring, but the self-negation of the capitalist mode of production has
also become an obvious fact. It is impossible again to make free trade
into the starting point of bourgeois economic policy that it once was
while a general return to protective tariffs was taking place; it is
just as impossible to begin with the dogma of free competition while
production is being increasingly monopolized by cartels. Today, the
“principles” of Adam Smith and Ricardo belong, both scientifically and
also socially, to the past.

Schüller’s exhortation (not sounded for the first time) to return to the
method of classical economics is interesting moreover as a fragment of
that general “return” that seems to be the watchword of bourgeois social
science. Back to Kant in philosophy,²¹ back to Adam Smith in economics!
A convulsive reaching backward toward already superseded positions that
is a reliable sign of the hopelessness into which the bourgeoisie has
strayed, intellectually as well as socially. But there is no return—just
as little in science as in the actual development of society.

But there is only a “forward” along the path of the _dialectical method_
that Marx has already taken. All those young political economists, who
are, like Dr. Schüller, genuine enough not to find satisfaction in the
muddle, in the lack of system or intellect and of the head in
contemporary bourgeois economics, and [who are] brave enough to
sacrifice class prejudice to scientific knowledge, must become clear
about this. Bourgeois theoreticians have for decades been forced to feed
upon Marx’s doctrine from which every halfway clever thought that
appears among them is directly or indirectly derived.^(II)

Just as bourgeois society has before it only the alternative of
developing into a socialist society or perishing, so too has political
economy only the choice of proceeding along the track opened by Marx or
declaring its bankruptcy as a science.



INTRODUCTION TO POLITICAL ECONOMY¹


I. WHAT IS POLITICAL ECONOMY?

_1_

Political economy is a curious science. Difficulties and conflicting
opinions arise at the very first step on its terrain, with the most
basic question of all: What is the specific object of this science? The
simple worker, who has only a rather vague idea of what political
economy teaches, will ascribe his lack of understanding to his own
inadequate general education. Yet, in some respects, he shares his
misfortune here with many learned doctors and professors, who write
thick volumes about political economy and deliver lectures to young
people studying at the universities. Incredible as it sounds, the fact
is that most specialists in political economy themselves have a very
confused notion as to what the real object of their specialism is.

Since it is the custom for these learned gentlemen to work with
definitions, that is, to reduce the nature of the most complex things to
a few well-ordered sentences, we shall seek by way of example to find
out from one official representative of political economy what this
science is basically about. Let us listen first of all to what the doyen
of the German professorial world, the author of countless frightfully
thick textbooks on political economy, the founder of the so-called
“historical school,”² Wilhelm Roscher, has to say on the subject. In his
first major work, _Grundlagen der Nationalökonomie. Ein Hand- und
Lesebuch für Geschäftsmänner und Studierende_ [Fundamentals of Political
Economy. A Handbook and Textbook for Businessmen and Students], which
appeared in 1854 and has since gone through twenty-three editions, we
read in Chapter 2, paragraph 16:

We understand by political economy the theory of national economic life,
the theory of the laws of development of the national economy, of the
economic life of the nation (philosophy of national economic history
according to [Hans Karl Emil] von Mangoldt).³ This links up in one
direction, like all sciences of national life, with consideration of the
individual person; it expands in the other sense to the study of
humanity as a whole.⁴

Does this help “businessmen and students” understand what “national
economic theory” is? It is precisely—the theory of national economy.⁵
What are horn-rimmed spectacles? Spectacles with a horn-rim. What is a
pack-ass? An ass on which burdens are packed. An extremely simple
procedure, in fact, for explaining to little children the use of
compound words. The only trouble is that anyone who does not already
know the meaning of the words in question will be none the wiser, no
matter which way round the words are placed.

Let us turn to another German scholar, who currently teaches political
economy at the University of Berlin, a luminary of official science
famous “far across the land, down to the blue sea,” in other words
Professor [Gustav von] Schmoller. In the great collective work of German
professors edited by Professors [Johannes] Conrad and [Wilhelm] Lexis,
_Handwörterbuch der Staatswissenschaften_ [Concise Dictionary of the
Political Sciences],⁶ Schmoller gives the following answer to the
question what this science might be, in an essay on economic theory:

I would say that it is the science that seeks to describe, define, and
explain in causal terms national economic phenomena as a coherent whole,
which naturally presupposes that national economy has already been
correctly defined. At the center of this science stand those phenomena
of division and organization of labor, of commerce and the distribution
of income, of social economic institutions, supported by particular
forms of private and public law, that are typically found among
present-day civilized peoples, and that, controlled by the same or
similar mental forces, produce similar or identical arrangements or
forces, presenting in their total description a statics of the present
economic civilized world, a kind of average constellation. Starting from
this point, the science has gone on to investigate the differences
between particular national economies, the various forms of organization
here and there, and thus to inquire as to the combination and series in
which these different forms emerge, and has in this way come to the
notion of a causal development of forms and a historical succession of
economic conditions; it has thus added to the static treatment a dynamic
one. And as, from its first appearance, it already came by way of
ethical-historical value judgments to the positing of ideals, it has
continued to maintain this practical function to a certain degree.
Alongside theory, it has posited practical lessons for life.^(I)

Phew! Let’s pause for breath. What was all that? Social economic
arrangements—private and public law—mental forces—similar and the
same—the same and similar—statistics—statics—dynamics—average
constellation—causal development—ethical-historical value
judgments … For ordinary mortals, this has the same numbing effect as a
millwheel turning in the brain. In his insistent drive for knowledge,
and his blind confidence in the spring of professorial wisdom, he makes
the painful effort of going through the whole nonsense twice and three
times, trying to extract some conceivable meaning. Unfortunately this is
all needless trouble. What we’re offered is precisely nothing but
echoing phrases, hollow words screwed together. An unmistakable sign of
this is that anyone who thinks clearly, and has a genuine mastery of his
subject matter, also expresses himself clearly and understandably.
Someone who expresses himself in obscure and high-flown terms, if he is
not a pure philosophical idea-constructor or a fantasist of religious
mysticism, only shows that he is himself unclear about the matter, or
has reason to avoid clarity. We shall go on to show that the obscure and
confusing language of bourgeois scholars as to the nature of political
economy is not accidental, but actually expresses two things: both the
unclearness of these gentlemen themselves, and their tendentious,
stubborn rejection of a real explanation of the question.

That the clear definition of the nature of political economy is indeed a
contentious question is suggested by a certain external circumstance.
This is the fact that the most contradictory views are expressed as to
the _age_ of this science. For example, the late Adolphe Blanqui—a
well-known historian and professor of political economy at the
University of Paris, and brother of the famous socialist leader and
Commune fighter Auguste Blanqui⁷ —started the first chapter of his
_History of Political Economy_,⁸ published in 1837, with the following
epigraph: “Political economy is older than people think. The Greeks and
the Romans already had their own.” Other writers on the history of
political economy, however, for instance the former _Dozent_ at the
University of Berlin, Eugen Dühring, consider it important to stress
that political economy is much younger than people generally believe:
according to them, this science only properly arose in the second half
of the eighteenth century.^(II)

To cite socialist judgments on this question, Lassalle in the preface to
his classic polemical text of 1864 against Schulze-Delitzsch, _Kapital
und Arbeit_ [Capital and Labor], made the following assertion:
“Political economy is a science that is only at its beginnings and still
to be constructed.”⁹ Karl Marx, for his part, gave the first volume of
his economic masterwork _Capital_ that appeared three years later,
representing the fulfillment of the expectation expressed by Lassalle,
the subtitle “Critique of Political Economy.” In this way, Marx placed
his own work outside the previous political economy, considering this as
something confined and superseded, and setting out to criticize it. It
is clear that a science that one lot of people maintain is almost as old
as the written history of humanity, a second lot that it is scarcely a
century and a half old, a third lot that it is still in diapers, and
others again that it has already run its course and the time has come
for its critical burial—it is clear that such a science presents a
rather peculiar and tangled problem.

We would receive equally poor advice if we were to ask one of the
official representatives of this science to explain the remarkable fact
that political economy, as currently prevailing opinion holds, only
arose so late, scarcely a hundred and fifty years ago. Professor
Dühring, for example, in a great flood of words, argues that the ancient
Greeks and Romans had scarcely any scientific notion of
political-economic matters, only “unsound,” “superficial,” “most
commonplace” ideas taken from everyday experience, while the whole of
the Middle Ages was extremely “unscientific.”^(III) Which learned
explanation does not take us a single step forward, not to mention the
fact that it is also quite misleading, particularly in its
generalization about the Middle Ages.

A different original explanation is offered by Professor Schmoller. In
the same essay that we cited above from the _Handwörterbuch der
Staatswissenschaften_, he tells us:

For several centuries, individual private and social economic facts were
observed and described, individual truths of national economy
recognized, and economic questions discussed in systems of ethics and
law. These relevant individual parts could only be united when questions
of national economy acquired previously unsuspected importance for the
ruling and administration of states, from the seventeenth through to the
nineteenth century, when numerous writers concerned themselves with them
and instruction of students in them became necessary, while at the same
time the rise of scientific thinking in general led to the accumulated
propositions and truths of national economy being combined, by way of
certain fundamental ideas—such as money and exchange, state economic
policy, labor and the division of labor—into connected systems, as was
attempted by major writers of the eighteenth century. Since this time,
national economic theory or political economy has existed as an
independent science.^(IV)

If we briefly summarize this long speech, we obtain the lesson:
individual political-economic observations, which existed as separate
facts for a long while, came together in a particular science when this
was required for the “ruling and administration of states”—i.e.
governments—and it became necessary for this purpose to teach political
economy in universities. What a wonderful and classic explanation from a
German professor! First a chair is founded, when this is “required” by
the praiseworthy government, to be occupied by an assiduous professor;
then of course the corresponding science has also to be created,
otherwise what could the professor teach? Doesn’t this remind us of the
master of court ceremonies who maintained that there would always have
to be monarchies, otherwise what would be the function of a master of
ceremonies? For the basic contention here is indeed that political
economy came into being because the governments of modern states needed
this science. The command of the powers that be is the genuine birth
certificate of political economy. It is completely in character with the
way of thinking of a present-day professor who, as scientific valet of
the Reich government of the day, agitates “scientifically” as need
arises for certain naval, customs or tax proposals, or as a battlefield
hyena preaches chauvinist national hatred and intellectual cannibalism
during a war—it is completely in character to imagine that the financial
needs of princes, the interests of “royal treasuries,” a word of command
from governments, is all that is needed to conjure a new science out of
the ground. For the rest of humanity, however, those not paid out of the
exchequer, such a notion has its difficulties. Above all, this
explanation only raises a new puzzle. For we then have to ask: what
happened so that around the seventeenth century, as Professor Schmoller
maintains, the governments of modern states suddenly felt a need to dupe
their dear subjects according to scientific principles, whereas for
countless centuries they had managed quite successfully in the
old-fashioned way, without such principles? Should we not turn all this
upside down and see the new-fangled needs of “royal treasuries” as
simply a modest consequence of that great historical transformation out
of which the new science of political economy arose around the middle of
the nineteenth century?

In brief, after failing to learn from this learned guild what political
economy actually deals with, we do not even know when and why it arose.

_2_

One thing, at any rate, is established: in all the definitions of
bourgeois specialists we have cited above, it is always a question of
“national economy.” And “political economy” is only a foreign word for
the theory of national economy. The concept of national economy stands
at the center of discussion for all official representatives of this
science. What then actually is this national economy? Professor Bücher,
whose work _Die Entstehung der Volkswirtschaft_ [The Rise of the
National Economy] enjoys a high reputation both in Germany and abroad,
offers the following information:

The national economy is formed by the totality of arrangements,
dispositions and procedures that the satisfaction of the needs of an
entire nation demands. This national economy, again, breaks down into
numerous particular economies, which are connected with one another by
trade, and dependent on one another in a variety of ways as a result of
the fact that each undertakes particular tasks for all the others and
has the others undertake such tasks for it.^(V)

Let us try to translate this learned “definition” into the language of
ordinary mortals.

If the first thing we hear is the “_totality_ of dispositions and
procedures” that are designed to satisfy the needs of an entire nation,
we are forced to consider everything possible: factories and workshops,
agriculture and stock-raising, railways and warehouses, but also church
preaching and police surveillance, ballet performances, civil servants
and observatories, parliamentary elections, national guards and military
associations, chess clubs, dog shows and duels—for all these and an
endless chain of other “dispositions and procedures” serve today to
“satisfy the needs of an entire nation.” The national economy would then
be everything that takes place under the sun, and political economy a
universal science “of all things and more,” as the Latin tag goes.

The generous definition of the Leipzig professor evidently has to be
restricted somewhat. Very likely he only wants to refer to “arrangements
and procedures” that serve to satisfy the _material_ needs of a nation,
or more precisely, the satisfaction of such needs by material things.
And even then the “totality” would be far too widely conceived, and
easily float off again into the mist. Yet we shall try to find our way
here as best we can.

People all need, in order to live, food and drink, a protecting roof,
clothing in cold regions, as well as all kind of articles of daily use
in the home. These things may be simpler or more refined, be supplied
sparingly or abundantly, but they are indispensable for the existence of
any human society and must consequently be constantly produced by
people—we are not in the land of Cockaigne.¹⁰ In every kind of culture,
as well, there are all kinds of objects that serve to improve life and
satisfy intellectual and social needs, such as weapons for defense
against enemies: among the so-called savages, dance masks, bows and
arrows and idols; for us, luxury goods, churches, machine-guns and
submarines. The production of all these articles requires, in turn,
various natural materials, as well as the various tools with which they
are produced. These materials, too, such as stones, wood, metal, plants
etc., are obtained from the earth by human labor, and the tools that are
used in this connection are likewise the product of human labor.

If this rough-hewn notion is temporarily satisfactory, we could conceive
the national economy as follows: each nation constantly creates by its
own labor a mass of things that are necessary for life—food, clothing,
buildings, household articles, jewelry, weapons, religious objects,
etc.—using the materials and tools that are indispensable for their
production. The way in which a nation performs all this labor, how it
distributes the goods produced among its individual members, how it
consumes them and produces them afresh in an endless cycle—all this
together forms the economy of the people in question, a “national
economy.” This would then be more or less the meaning of the first
sentence in Professor Bücher’s definition. But we have to go into rather
more detail.

“This national economy, again, breaks down into numerous particular
economies, which are connected with one another by trade, and dependent
on one another in a variety of ways as a result of the fact that each
undertakes particular tasks for all and has others undertake such tasks
for it.” Here we come up against a new question: What are these
“particular economies” that the “national economy,” which we have taken
pains to conceive properly, breaks down into? The first thing that
suggests itself would be individual households, family economies.
Indeed, each nation in the so-called civilized countries does consist of
a number of families, and each family as a rule also conducts its
“economy.” This private economy consists in the family obtaining certain
monetary incomes, whether from the employment of its adult members or
from other sources, with which it in turn meets its needs for food,
clothing, housing, etc.; and in this connection, if we think of a family
economy, it is usually the housewife, the kitchen, the wash-tub and the
nursery that form the center of this notion. Are these then the
“individual economies” into which the “national economy” breaks down? We
get into a certain confusion here. The national economy, as we have just
understood it, involves first and foremost the production of all those
goods that are used as food, clothing, housing, furniture, tools and
materials for life and labor. At the center of the national economy
stands _production_. In family economies, on the other hand, we see only
the _consumption_ of the objects that the family obtains ready-made out
of its income. We know that most families in modern states today buy
almost all their foodstuffs, clothing, furniture, etc. ready-made from
shops or markets. In the domestic economy meals are prepared only with
bought foodstuffs, and clothes generally made from bought material. Only
in very backward rural districts are there still peasant families who
provide for most of their needs by their own household work. Of course
there are on the other hand, even in modern states, many families who do
produce various industrial products at home, such as domestic weavers
and garment workers; there are even, as we know, whole villages where
toys and similar things are produced on a mass scale domestically. But
here the product manufactured by these families belongs exclusively to
the entrepreneur who ordered it and paid for it; not the slightest part
of it goes into their own consumption, into the economy of the
home-working family. For their own household economy, these domestic
workers buy everything ready-made out of their meager wages, in the same
way as other families. Bücher’s statement that the national economy
breaks down into many individual economies would thus lead to something
like the following result: the _production_ of the means of existence of
a whole nation “breaks down” simply into the _consumption_ of means of
subsistence by individual families—a statement that looks much like
utter nonsense.

An additional doubt also arises. According to Professor Bücher, these
“individual economies” are “connected with one another by exchange” and
completely dependent on one another because “each undertakes particular
tasks for all others.” What kind of exchange and dependence does this
mean? Is it for example exchange between friends and neighbors, of the
kind that takes place between various private families? But what does
such exchange actually have to do with the national economy, with the
economy as a whole? Any capable housewife, indeed, will maintain that it
is better for the household and for domestic peace that as little
exchange as possible takes place between neighbors in different houses.
And as to precisely what this “dependence” involves, it is impossible to
see what “tasks” the household economy of pensioner Meyer is supposed to
undertake for the household economy of headmaster Schulze and “all
others.” We have clearly taken a completely wrong turn here, and have to
tackle the question from a different direction.

It evidently cannot be individual family households into which Professor
Bücher’s “national economy” breaks down. Shouldn’t it rather be such
things as factories, workshops, and agricultural holdings? One fact
seems to confirm that this leads us onto the correct path. All these
businesses are where various things really are produced and manufactured
that serve the maintenance of the whole nation, while on the other hand
there is real exchange and mutual dependence among them. A factory
making trouser buttons, for example, is completely reliant on the
tailoring workshops where it finds outlets for its goods, while the
tailors in turn can’t produce proper trousers without buttons. On the
other hand, the tailoring workshops need materials, and this makes them
reliant on the weavers of cotton and wool, who in turn depend on
sheep-rearing and the cotton trade, etc., etc. Here we really can see a
ramified connection of production. It is of course rather pompous to
speak of “tasks” that each of these businesses “undertakes for all
others,” when what we have is the most ordinary sale of trouser buttons
to tailors, of wool to spinning plants, and the like. But we have to
accept such flowery language as unavoidable professorial jargon, as they
love to wrap the profitable little deals of the business world in a bit
of poetry and “ethical value judgments,” as Professor Schmoller so
nicely puts it. It is just that still more serious doubts arise at this
point. The individual factories, agricultural holdings, coalmines and
iron works are said to be so many “individual economies” into which the
national economy “breaks down.” But this concept of an “economy,” at
least as we have now conceived the national economy, must evidently
include within a certain orbit both the manufacture of means of
subsistence and their use, both production and consumption. In these
factories, workshops, mines and plants, however, only production takes
place, and indeed only for others. What are consumed here are only the
materials and tools that are needed for labor. The finished product, for
its part, in no way enters into consumption within the same business.
Not a single trouser button is consumed by the manufacturer and his
family, let alone by the factory workers, nor are iron tubes consumed by
the iron-works proprietor’s family. Besides, if we try to define the
“economy” more closely, we must always understand by it something whole,
to a certain extent entire unto itself, more or less the production and
consumption of the most important means of subsistence required for
human existence. Today’s individual industrial and agricultural
businesses, however, as every child knows, only produce a single
product, or at most a few products, which would be far from sufficient
for human maintenance, most of these moreover being not at all
consumable, just one part of a food product, or a raw material or tool
needed for this. Present-day production facilities are precisely just
fragments of an economy, having no meaning and purpose of their own in
economic terms, so that they immediately strike even the untutored eye
as not forming any “economy” by themselves, but only a shapeless little
splinter of an economy. So if we say that the national economy, i.e. the
totality of arrangements and procedures that serve to satisfy the needs
of a people, breaks down again into individual economies, which are
factories, workshops, mines, etc., we could equally well say that the
totality of biological arrangements that serve to perform the functions
of the human organism is the human being itself, which breaks down again
into several individual organisms that are the nose, ears, legs, arms,
etc. The present-day factory, in fact, is no more an “individual
economy” than the nose is an individual organism.

This route too thus leads to an absurdity—proof that the artful
definitions of bourgeois scholars, constructed simply on the basis of
external characteristics and word-splitting, have an evident reason in
this case to circumvent the true heart of the matter.

Let us now attempt to subject the concept of national economy to a
closer examination.

_3_

We are told about the needs of a nation, about the satisfaction of these
needs in an interconnected economy, and in this way about the economy of
a nation. Political economy would then be the science that explains to
us the nature of this national economy, i.e. the laws according to which
a nation creates and increases its wealth by labor, distributes this
among individuals, consumes it and creates it afresh. The object of the
investigation should thus be the economic life of a whole nation, in
contrast with a private or individual economy, whatever the latter might
mean. It appears to confirm this notion that the epoch-making book
published in 1776 by Adam Smith, who is seen as the father of political
economy, bore the title _The Wealth of Nations_.¹¹

The first thing we must ask, however, is whether there really is such a
thing as the economy of a nation. Do nations each conduct a separate
household, a closed economic life? Since the expression “national
economy” is especially popular in Germany, let us turn our attention to
this country.

The hands of German workers, male and female, produce each year
tremendous quantities of all kinds of useful products. But is all this
produced just for the use of the population living in the German Empire?
We know that an enormous proportion of German products, growing every
year, is dispatched to other countries and parts of the world, for the
use of other nations. German iron products go to various neighboring
European countries, and further afield to South America and Australia;
leather and leather goods go from Germany to all European states; glass
products, sugar and gloves find their way to England; animal hides to
France, England and Austria-Hungary; the dye-stuff alizarin¹² to
England, the United States and India; phosphates for artificial
fertilizer to the Netherlands and Austria-Hungary; coke to France; coal
to Austria, Belgium, the Netherlands and Switzerland; electrical cable
to England, Sweden and Belgium; toys to the United States; German beer,
indigo, aniline and other coal-tar dyes, German pharmaceuticals,
cellulose, gold articles, stockings, cotton and woolen materials and
clothes, and German locomotive rails are dispatched to almost all
trading countries across the world.

Conversely, however, the German people are reliant at every turn in
their labor, as well as in daily consumption, on products of other
countries and nations. We eat bread from Russian wheat and meat from
Hungarian, Danish and Russian cattle; the rice that we consume comes
from the East Indies and North America, tobacco from the Dutch East
Indies and Brazil; we receive cocoa beans from West Africa, pepper from
India; lard from the United States; tea from China; vegetables from
Italy, Spain and the United States; coffee from Brazil, Central America
and the Dutch East Indies; meat extract from Uruguay; eggs from Russia,
Hungary and Bulgaria; cigars from the island of Cuba; pocket watches
from Switzerland; sparkling wine from France; cattle hides from
Argentina; feathers for beds from China; silk from Italy and France:
flax and hemp from Russia; cotton from the United States, India and
Egypt; fine wool from England; jute from India; malt from
Austria-Hungary; linseed from Argentina; certain kinds of coal from
England; lignite from Austria; nitre¹³ from Chile; quebracho for tanning
from Argentina; construction timber from Russia; cork from Portugal;
copper from the United States; tin from the Dutch East Indies; zinc from
Australia; aluminum from Austria-Hungary and Canada; asbestos from
Canada; asphalt and marble from Italy; cobblestones from Sweden; lead
from Belgium, the United States and Australia; graphite from Ceylon,
phosphoric lime from America and Algeria; iodine from Chile …

From the simplest foodstuff eaten every day to the most sought-after
luxury goods and the materials and tools needed for them, the greater
part come directly or indirectly from foreign countries, entirely or in
one or other component, and are the product of other people’s labor. To
make our life and work possible in Germany, we have almost all other
countries, peoples and parts of the world work for us, and we work in
turn for all these countries.

In order to get an idea of the enormous scope of this exchange, let us
cast a glance at the official statistics for imports and exports.
According to the _Statistisches Jahrbuch für das Deutsche Reich_
[Statistical Yearbook of the German Empire], 1914 edition,¹⁴ Germany’s
total trade (net of goods arriving in Germany for re-export) was as
follows.

Germany imported in 1913:

  ------------------------------- -------------------- ---------------------
  Raw materials                   to the value of      5,262 million marks
  Semi-finished products                               1,246 million marks
  Finished products                                    1,776 million marks
  Foodstuffs and consumer goods                        3,063 million marks
  Live animals                                         289 million marks
  ------------------------------- -------------------- ---------------------

In total, 11,638¹⁵ million marks, or close to 12 thousand million.

In the same year, Germany exported:

  ------------------------------- ---------------------
  Raw materials                   1,720 million marks
  Semi-finished products          1,159 million marks
  Finished products               6,642 million marks
  Foodstuffs and consumer goods   1,362 million marks
  Live animals                    7 million marks
  ------------------------------- ---------------------

In total, 10,891 million marks or nearly 11 billion marks. Germany’s
annual foreign trade thus amounts to more than 22 billion marks.

The situation is the same, to a greater or lesser extent, in other
modern states, precisely those with which political economy has been
exclusively concerned. All these countries produce for one another,
partly even for the most far-flung parts of the world, while likewise
consuming all along the line products from all other parts of the world.

In the light of such a tremendously developed reciprocal exchange, how
are we to draw the borders between the “economy” of one nation and that
of another? Should we speak of so many “national economies” as if these
could be treated as separate territories in economic terms?

Of course, the increasing international exchange of goods is no new
discovery, unknown to bourgeois scholars. Official statistical surveys
and their annually published reports have long since made the facts
reported the common property of all educated people; businessmen and
industrial workers, moreover, know them from their daily life. The fact
of rapidly increasing world trade is so universally known and recognized
today that it can no longer be challenged or doubted. But how is this
question conceived by the academic specialists in political economy? As
a purely external chance connection, as the export of a so-called
“surplus” in the products of one country over and above its own needs
and the import of what is “lacking” in its own economy—a connection that
in no way prevents them from continuing to speak as before of the
“national economy” and “national-economic theory.”

Professor Bücher, for example, proclaims, after he has lectured us at
length about the present-day “national economy” as the highest and final
stage of development in the series of historical economic forms:

It would be a mistake to conclude from the successful easing of
international trade in the liberal age that the era of national economy
is on the decline and making way for an era of world economy … We
certainly see today in Europe a series of states that renounce national
autonomy in their provision of goods to the extent that they are forced
to obtain considerable quantities of their food and consumer goods from
abroad, while their industrial production capacity has grown far beyond
the national need and supplies regular surpluses that have to seek their
utilization in foreign lands. But the existence alongside one another of
such industrial and raw-material producing countries that are mutually
reliant, this “international division of labor,” should not be taken as
a sign that humanity is on the brink of reaching a new stage of
development, and be opposed to earlier stages under the name of a _world
economy_. For, on the one hand, no economic stage has guaranteed
complete ability to satisfy its own needs in the long term; each leaves
certain gaps, which have had to be filled in one way or another. On the
other hand, at least up to this time, no signs of this so-called world
economy have yet appeared that depart from those of the national economy
in their essential characteristics, and it is very doubtful whether such
will appear in the foreseeable future.^(VI)

Still bolder is Professor Bücher’s younger colleague [Werner] Sombart,
who declares point-blank that we are not moving into a world economy,
but on the contrary increasingly departing from this:

The civilized peoples, I would rather maintain, are today (as far as
their overall economy goes) not fundamentally more, but rather less
linked with one another by trading relations. The individual national
economy today is not more but actually less involved in the world market
than a hundred or fifty years ago. At least … it would be wrong to
assume that international trade relations are acquiring a relatively
growing importance for the modern national economy. The opposite is the
case.

Professor Sombart is convinced that “individual national economies are
becoming ever more complete microcosms [i.e. small closed worlds—R.L.]
and that the internal market increasingly overshadows the world market
in importance for all lines of trade.”^(VII)

This blatant foolishness, which recklessly flies in the face of all
daily perceptions of economic life, most happily underlines the stubborn
reluctance of the gentlemen of the scholarly guild to recognize the
world economy as a new phase of development of human society—a
reluctance that it is well worthwhile to note, and whose hidden roots we
shall go on to examine.

So, because at “earlier economic stages,” for example at the time of
King Nebuchadnezzar, “certain gaps” in people’s economic life were
filled by exchange, _present-day_ world trade has nothing to teach us,
and we still have a “national economy.” That is Professor Bücher’s
opinion.

How indicative this is about the crude historical conception of a
scholar whose fame is based precisely on supposedly acute and deep
insights into economic history! With the help of a fatuous schema, he
brings the international trade of the most varied stages of economy and
civilization, separated by millennia, under a single category. Of course
there never has been any social form without exchange, and there is not
today. The oldest prehistoric discoveries, the most primitive caves used
as dwellings by “antediluvian” human beings, the most primitive graves
from early times, all give evidence of a certain exchange of products
already between distant regions. Exchange is as old as human culture
itself, it has ever been a constant accompaniment of this and its most
powerful promoter. In this general knowledge, quite vague in its
generality, our scholar now drowns all particularities of different
eras, levels of civilization and economic forms. Just as all cats are
grey in the dark, so in the obscurity of this professorial theory all
forms of exchange, no matter how diverse, are one and the same. The
primitive exchange of an Amerindian tribe in Brazil, who every now and
then happen to exchange their uniquely woven dance masks for the
artfully made bows and arrows of another tribe; the gleaming warehouses
of Babylon, where the splendors of Oriental court life were accumulated;
the ancient market of Corinth, where at the new moon Oriental cloth,
Greek pottery, paper from Tyre, Syrian and Anatolian slaves were offered
for sale to rich slave-owners; the medieval maritime trade of Venice,
supplying luxury goods to European feudal courts and patrician
houses—and the present-day capitalist world trade, which has brought
East and West, North and South, all the oceans and corners of the world
into its net, and year in, year out moves tremendous quantities of goods
hither and thither—from the beggar’s daily bread and firewood through to
the artworks most sought after by rich connoisseurs, from the simplest
fruit of the soil through to the most complicated tool, from human
labor-power, the source of all wealth, through to the deadly instruments
of war—all this is one and the same for our professor of political
economy: simply the “filling” of “certain gaps” in the independent
economic organism! …

Fifty years ago, Schulze von Delitsch taught the German workers that
each person nowadays first of all produced for himself, but “those
products he does not need himself … he exchanges for the products of
others.”^(VIII) Lassalle’s response to him remains unforgettable:

Herr Patrimonialrichter¹⁶ Schulze! Have you no idea at all about the
real pattern of social labor today? Didn’t you come from Bitterfeld and
Delitzsch? In what century of the Middle Ages are you still living with
these ideas? … Have you no inkling that social labor today is precisely
characterized by the fact that each person produces precisely what he
cannot use himself? Have you no inkling that this has to be so, ever
since the rise of modern industry, that the form and essence of
present-day labor lies in this, and that without the sharpest emphasis
on this point it is impossible to understand a single page of our
present-day economic conditions, not a single one of our present-day
economic phenomena?

According to you, then, Herr Leonor Reichenheim in Wüste-Giersdorf
produces first of all the cotton yarn that he needs for himself. The
surplus, which his daughters cannot work up into more stockings and
nightshirts for him, he exchanges.

Herr Borsig first of all produces machines for his family’s needs. He
then sells the surplus machines.

The workshops making mourning clothes provide first of all for deaths in
their own families. But if there are too few of these, and some mourning
clothes are left over, they exchange them.

Herr Wolff, proprietor of the local telegraph office, first has messages
come in for his own instruction and pleasure. And when he’s had his
fill, if there are any left over, he exchanges them with the
stock-exchange sharks and newspaper editorial offices against their
surplus newspaper reports and shares! …

In conclusion, it is precisely the distinctive character of labor in
_earlier_ periods of society, to be sharply emphasized, that at this
time people produced first of all for their own needs and parted with
the surplus, i.e. they principally pursued a natural economy.

And it is again the distinctive character, the specific determination of
labor in _modern_ society, that each produces only what he in no way
does need, i.e. that everyone produces exchange-values, whereas
previously they produced use-values.

And do you not understand, Herr Schulze, that this is the necessary
“form and manner of performing labor,” ever more prevailing, in a
society in which the division of labor has developed to such a degree as
it has in modern society?^(IX)

What Lassalle tried here to explain to Schulze about capitalist private
enterprise applies more each day now to the economic pattern of highly
developed capitalist countries such as England, Germany, Belgium or the
United States, in whose footsteps the others are following one after the
other. And the attempt by the progressive patrician from Bitterfeld to
mislead the workers was only more naïve, but no cruder, than the
tendentious arguments of a Bücher or Sombart against the concept of a
world economy today.

Punctilious civil servant that he is, the German professor loves proper
order. For the sake of order, he also likes to arrange the world nicely
into the pigeon-holes of a scientific schema. And in the same way as he
places his books on the shelves, so he has also divided the different
countries onto two shelves: on the one hand, countries that produce
industrial goods and have “a surplus” of these; on the other, countries
that pursue agriculture and stock-raising and whose products meet a
shortage in other lands. This is how international trade arises, and
what it is based on.

Germany is the one of the most industrialized countries in the world.
According to this schema, its most vigorous trade should be with a large
agricultural country such as Russia. How is it then that Germany’s most
important trading partners are the two other most industrialized
countries: the United States and Britain? Germany’s trade with the
United States in 1913 amounted to 2,400 million marks, and with Britain
to 2,300 million; Russia only came in third place. And especially as
regards exports, the leading industrial state in the world is precisely
the greatest customer for German industry: with 1,400 million marks’
worth of annual imports from Germany, England stands in first position,
leaving all other countries far behind. The British Empire, including
its colonies, takes a good fifth of German exports. What does the
professorial schema say about this remarkable phenomenon?

Here industrial countries, there agricultural ones—that is the rigid
skeleton of world economic relations with which Professor Bücher and
most of his colleagues operate. Back in the 1860s, however, Germany was
an agricultural country; it had a surplus of agricultural products and
had to obtain the most necessary industrial goods from England. Since
then, it has also been transformed into an industrial country, and the
most powerful rival to England. The United States is doing the same as
Germany did in the 1870s and 80s, in a yet briefer interval; it is
already well along this path. America is still one of the largest
grain-producing countries in the world, along with Russia, Canada,
Australia and Romania, and according to its last census (which dates
from 1900) as many as 36 percent of its total population is still
employed in agriculture. At the same time, however, the country’s
industry is striding forward at an unmatched speed, so that it presents
a dangerous contender to England and Germany. We could set up a prize
competition for our great faculties of political economy to define
whether the United States, in Professor Bücher’s schema, should be
classified as an agricultural state or an industrial one. Russia is
slowly following on the same path, and as soon as it casts off the
fetters of an obsolete form of state it will catch up, thanks to its
tremendous population and inexhaustible natural wealth, and appear in
our own lifetimes alongside Germany, England and the United States as a
powerful industrial country, if it does not indeed overshadow them. The
world is precisely not a rigid skeleton, unlike the wisdom of a
professor; it is living, moving and changing. The polar opposition
between industry and agriculture, from which international exchange is
supposed to emerge, is thus itself something fleeting; it will steadily
shift ever more from the center of the modern civilized world to its
periphery. What is happening meanwhile with trade within this ambit of
civilization? According to Bücher’s theory it should steadily dwindle.
But instead—a miracle!—trade is growing ever greater between the
industrial countries themselves.

Nothing is more instructive than the picture that the development of our
modern economic region offers in the last quarter of a century. Despite
the fact that there have been real orgies of tariff raising in all the
industrial countries and major states of Europe, as also in America,
i.e. mutual artificial barriers to “national economies,” world trade has
not stopped developing in this period—it has pursued a furious course.
And that increasing industrialization and world trade go hand in hand,
even a blind person can see from the example of the three leading
countries: England, Germany and the United States.

Coal and iron form the core of modern industry. Coal production from
1885 to 1910 rose as follows:

  ---------------------- ------------------------------
  in England             from 162 to 269 million tons
  in Germany             from 74 to 222 million tons
  in the United States   from 101 to 455 million tons
  ---------------------- ------------------------------

Pig iron production rose in the same period

  ---------------------- -------------------------------
  in England             from 7.5 to 10.2 million tons
  in Germany             from 3.7 to 14.8 million tons
  in the United States   from 4.1 to 27.7 million tons
  ---------------------- -------------------------------

At the same time, annual foreign trade (imports and exports) rose from
1882 to 1912

  ---------------------- -------------------------------------
  in England             from 13,000 to 27,400 million marks
  in Germany             from 6,200 to 21,300 million marks
  in the United States   from 5,500 to 16,200 million marks
  ---------------------- -------------------------------------

If however we take the total foreign trade (imports and exports) of
_all_ the more important countries on earth in recent years, this rose
from 105,000 million marks in 1904 to 165,000 million in 1912. That
means a growth of 57 percent in eight years! There is not even a close
parallel to this breath-taking pace of economic development in the whole
of previous world history—“the dead ride swiftly.”^(X) The capitalist
“national economy” seems in a hurry to exhaust the limits of its
capacity, to shorten the remission period in which it can justify its
existence. And what does the schema of “certain gaps” and the clumsy
dance between industrial and agricultural countries have to say about
this?

Yet there is no longer such a puzzle in modern economic life.

Let us take a closer look at the tables for German imports and exports,
instead of resting content with total sums of goods exchanged or their
major economic categories; let us examine as an experiment the most
important kinds of German trade.

Two facts immediately strike the most superficial observer. The first is
that in several cases one and the same type of commodity figures in
_both_ columns, even if in different quantities. Germany sends enormous
quantities of machinery abroad, but it also imports machinery from
abroad to the considerable annual sum of 80 million marks. Likewise,
coal is exported from Germany while at the same time foreign coal is
imported into Germany. The same holds for cotton goods, woolen yarn and
finished goods, also for hides and skins, and many other goods that are
not included in this table. From the standpoint of a crude opposition
between industry and agriculture, which our professor of political
economics uses like Aladdin’s lamp to illuminate all the secrets of
modern world trade, this remarkable duplication is quite
incomprehensible; it even appears completely absurd. What is happening
here? Has Germany a “surplus over and above its own needs,” or on the
contrary “certain gaps”? Both in coal and in cotton goods? And in cattle
hides? And a hundred more! Or is a “national economy” supposed always to
show some kind of “surplus” and “certain gaps”? Aladdin’s lamp is
flickering insecurely. Clearly the observed facts can only be explained
if we assume that there exist more complicated and far-reaching economic
connections between Germany and other countries, a ramified and detailed
division of labor that allows for certain kinds of the same products to
be produced in Germany for other countries, other kinds abroad for
Germany, creating a continuous to and fro in which individual countries
appear only as organic parts of a greater whole.

Besides, anyone must be struck at first glance in the table above by the
fact that imports and exports do not appear here as two separate
phenomena in need of explanation, on the one hand by “gaps” in a
country’s own economy, on the other by its “surpluses,” but that they
are instead linked causally together. Germany’s tremendous cotton import
is quite evidently not the result of its population’s own needs, but is
rather designed from the start to make possible the great export of
cotton goods and clothing from Germany. Likewise, the connection between
the import of wool and the export of woolen goods, and between the
tremendous import of iron from abroad and the tremendous export of iron
goods of every shape and form, and so on. Thus Germany imports in order
to be able to export. It does not artificially create “certain gaps” so
as to subsequently transform these gaps into as many “surpluses.” The
German “microcosm” thus appears from the start, in all its dimensions,
as a fragment of a greater whole, as a single workshop in the world.

_In 1913_

_Germany imported_

_million marks_

_Germany exported_

_million marks_

Cotton, raw

607

Machines of all kinds

680

Wheat

117

Iron products

652

Wool, raw

413

Coal

516

Barley

390

Cotton goods

446

Chopper ore

335

Woolen goods

271

Cattle hides

322

Paper and paper products

263

Iron ore

227

Skins for fur

225

Coal

204

Iron ingots

205

Eggs

194

Silk goods

202

Skins for fur

188

Coke

147

Chilean nitre

172

Aniline and other dyestuffs

142

Raw silk

158

Clothing

132

Rubber

147

Copper goods

130

Pine planks

135

Leather uppers

114

Cotton yarn

116

Leather goods

114

Woolen yarn

108

Toys

103

Pine, raw

97

Sheet iron

102

Calf skins

95

Woolen yarn

91

Jute

94

Iron tubing

84

Machines of all kinds

80

Cattle skins

81

Lamb, sheep and goat skins

73

Iron wire

76

Cotton goods

72

Rails, etc.

73

Lignite

69

Pig iron

65

Wool, combed

61

Cotton yarn

61

Woolen goods

43

Rubber goods

57

But let us examine this “microcosm” rather more closely, in its “ever
more perfect” self-satisfaction. Let us imagine that by some kind of
social and political catastrophe the German “national economy” were
actually cut off from the rest of the world and left to its own devices.
What picture would this then present?

Let us start with the daily bread. German agriculture has twice as high
a yield as that of the United States; in terms of quality it holds first
place among the world’s agricultural countries, and it is only outdone
by the still more intensive cultivation of Belgium, Ireland and the
Netherlands. Fifty years ago, Germany with an agriculture that was then
far more backward was one of the granaries of Europe; it fed other
countries with the surplus of its own bread. Today, despite the higher
yield, German agriculture is not nearly sufficient to feed its own
people and its own cattle: a sixth of the foodstuffs needed have to be
obtained from abroad. In other words, if the German “national economy”
were to be cut off from the world, a sixth of the population, some 11
million Germans, would be deprived of their sustenance.

The German people spend 220 million marks each year on coffee, 67
million on cocoa, 8 million on tea, 61 million on rice; they spend at
least another 10 million marks on various spices, and 134 million on
imported tobacco. All these products, which even the poorest people
today cannot dispense with, which are part of everyday habit and
subsistence, are not produced in Germany at all (or, as in the case of
tobacco, only in small quantities), since the German climate is unsuited
to them. If Germany were to be permanently closed off from the world
economy, the subsistence of the German people, which corresponds to its
present level of civilization, would collapse.

Let us turn from food to clothing. Both the underwear and the outer
clothing of the broad mass of people are today made entirely from
cotton, the underwear of the richer bourgeoisie from linen and their
outer garments from fine wool and silk. Neither cotton nor silk are
produced in Germany at all, and no more is the highly important textile
jute or the finest wool, Britain having a world monopoly on these;
Germany also has a great shortfall in hemp and flax. If Germany were
permanently cut off from the world, both raw materials from abroad and
outlets for exports would disappear, and all classes of the German
people would be deprived of their most essential clothing; the Germany
textile industry, which together with the clothing industry today
provides a livelihood for 1,400,000 adult and juvenile workers of both
sexes, would be ruined.

We can go on. The backbone of today’s large-scale industry is what is
known as heavy industry, i.e. machine production and metallurgy; and the
backbone of these is metal ore. In 1913, Germany consumed some 17
million tons of pig iron. Its own production of pig iron also amounts to
17 million tons. At first glance, it might look as if the German
“national economy” could cover its own needs in terms of iron. But the
production of pig iron requires iron ore, and we find that Germany’s own
demand for iron ore alone amounts to some 27 million tons, a value of
more than 110 million marks, while 12 million tons of higher-quality
iron ore costing more than 200 million marks, ore without which the
German metal industry could not continue, is obtained from Sweden,
France and Spain.

The other metals present more or less the same picture. Against an
annual consumption of 220,000 tons of zinc, Germany produces 270,000
tons itself, out of which 100,000 tons is exported, while more than
50,000 tons of metal is obtained from abroad to cover its needs. The
zinc ore needed is again only partly obtained in Germany, some half a
million tons to the value of 50 million marks. 300,000 tons of
higher-quality ores costing 40 million marks have to be imported. With
lead, Germany imports 94,000 tons of finished metal and 123,000 tons of
ore. And with copper, finally, German production with an annual
consumption of 241,000 tons depends on imports¹⁷ from abroad for as much
as 206,000 tons. Tin, for its part, is completely obtained from abroad.
If Germany were cut off from the world for an extended period, the basis
for the existence of German metal production, which employs 662,000
workers, along with the machine industry that provides a living for
1,130,000 workers of both sexes, would disappear consequent on the
supply of the most valuable metals, along with the enormous outlet
abroad for German iron products and machinery. And a whole series of
other branches of production that depend on these raw materials and
tools, such as those supplying them with raw and ancillary materials,
would collapse along with the metal and machine industries, for example
coal mining, as well as those that produce means of subsistence for the
immense armies of workers in these branches of industry.

We should also mention the chemical industry with its 168,000 workers,
which produces for the entire world. Likewise the wood industry, which
employs 450,000 workers today, but which would have to close down most
of its operations without foreign timber and construction wood. Also the
leather industry, which in the absence of foreign hides as well as the
large market it has abroad, would make its 117,000 workers redundant. We
should mention the precious metals gold and silver, which provide the
money material and are accordingly the indispensable foundation of all
present-day economic life, but which are scarcely produced at all in
Germany. Let us bear all this in mind, and then ask, what is this German
“national economy”? Assuming, in other words, that Germany were to be
really and permanently cut off from the rest of the world and had to
conduct its economy quite alone, what would become of present-day
economic life and along with it Germany’s whole contemporary
civilization? One branch of production after another would collapse,
each in turn pulling the other down with it, a tremendous mass of
proletarians would find themselves without employment, the whole
population would be deprived of the most essential means of subsistence,
consumer goods and clothing, trade would be deprived of its foundation,
the precious money metal, and the entire “national economy” would become
a heap of rubble, a shattered wreck! …

This is what these “certain gaps” in German economic life actually
amount to, and likewise the “ever more perfect microcosm” that
self-evidently floats in the blue ether of professorial theory.

But stop! What about the world war of 1914, the great experimental test
of the “national economy”? Has this not vindicated Bücher and Sombart
most convincingly? Has it not shown an envious world how excellently the
German “microcosm” remains capable of existence, healthy and powerful
even in hermetic isolation from world trade, thanks to sturdy state
organization and the performance of German technology? Hasn’t the food
supply of the people been entirely met without foreign agriculture, and
haven’t the wheels of industry kept moving despite foreign export
outlets?

Let us examine the facts.

Food supply, first of all. This was not remotely met by German
agriculture alone. Several million adult men in the army were supplied
for almost the whole duration of the war by foreign countries: Belgium,
northern France, and parts of Poland and Lithuania. To feed the German
people, therefore, the surface of its own “national economy” was
expanded by the whole area of the occupied regions of Belgium and
northern France, and in the second year of the war by the western part
of Russia, which had to meet a large part of the shortfall in German
provisioning out of its own agricultural production. An additional
counterpart to this was the lamentable deficit in the nutrition of the
domestic population of those foreign territories, which in turn—Belgium
is an example—were supported by charity from the products of American
agriculture. A second additional factor was the rise in price of all
provisions in Germany by between 100 and 200 percent, and the terrible
malnutrition of the broadest strata of the domestic population.

Then there is industrial machinery. How could all this be kept going
without the supply of foreign raw materials and other means of
production, the tremendous scale of which we already know? How could
such a miracle happen? The solution to the riddle is extremely simple
and no miracle is involved. German industry could remain active simply
and solely because it was indeed continuously supplied with the
indispensable raw materials from abroad, which it obtained in three
ways: firstly from the large stocks that Germany already possessed of
cotton, wool, copper, etc., in various forms, and which only needed to
be taken out of their hiding places and made available; secondly, from
the stocks that it laid hands on in other countries: Belgium, northern
France, parts of Poland and Lithuania, by means of military occupation;
and thirdly, by the continuing supply from abroad, which by the
intermediary of neutral countries (and Luxembourg) did not stop right
through the whole of the war. If we add to this the fact that an
indispensable precondition of this entire “war economy” and its smooth
progress was also an enormous reserve of foreign precious metal
deposited in German banks, it turns out that the hermetic isolation of
German industry and trade from the rest of the world is just as much a
legend as is the adequate supply of the German population by domestic
agriculture, and that the supposed self-sufficiency of the German
“microcosm” during the World War was based on a couple of fairy-tales.

Finally, we come to the outlet for German industry, which we showed was
provided to such a high degree by all other parts of the world. For the
duration of the war this was replaced by the state’s own military needs.
In other words, the most important branches of industry: metallurgy,
textiles, leather and chemicals, underwent remodeling and were
transformed exclusively into industries supplying the armed forces.
Since the costs of the war were borne by German tax-payers, this
transformation of industry into war industry meant that the German
“national economy,” instead of sending a large part of its products for
exchange abroad, surrendered them to continuing destruction in the war,
burdening the future products of the economy for decades to come with
the loss arising, by way of the public credit system.¹⁸

If we take all this into account, it is clear that the miraculous
success of this “microcosm” during the war represented in every respect
an experiment in which the only question was how long it could be
extended without the artificial construction collapsing like a house of
cards.

One further glance at a remarkable phenomenon: If we consider Germany’s
foreign trade in its total amounts, it is striking that its imports are
significantly greater than its exports: the former amounted in 1913 to
11,600 million marks, the latter to 10,900 million. And this
relationship was in no way an exception for the year in question, but
can be noted for an extended number of years. The same holds for Great
Britain, which in 1913 showed imports to a total of 13,000 million marks
and exports to 10,000 million. How is such a phenomenon possible?
Perhaps Professor Bücher can explain it for us with his theory of the
“surplus” over a country’s own needs and of “certain gaps.”

If the economic relations between the different “national economies”
amount to no more than the fact that, as the professor teaches us, these
“national economies,” just as at the time of Nebuchadnezzar, cast off
certain “surpluses,” i.e. if simple commodity exchange is the only
bridge over the void dividing one of these “microcosms” from another, it
is clear that a country can import exactly as much in goods from abroad
as it exports of its own. But in simple commodity exchange money is only
an intermediary, and the foreign products are paid at the end of the day
in one’s own commodities. How then can a “national economy” manage the
artifice of permanently importing more from abroad than it exports from
its own “surplus”? Perhaps the professor will jest with us that the
solution is the simplest thing in the world, the importing country only
needs to settle the excess of its imports over its exports in cash.
“Only,” indeed! The luxury, year in year out, of filling the bottomless
pit of its foreign trade with a considerable sum of money that will
never be seen again is something that at most a country with rich gold
and silver mines of its own could afford, which is not the case with
either Germany or France, Belgium or the Netherlands. Besides, there is
a further amazing surprise: not only does Germany steadily import more
goods that it imports, it also imports more money! In 1913, German
imports of gold and silver came to 441.3 million marks, its exports to
102.8 million, a relationship that has been approximately the same for
years. What does Professor Bücher with his “surpluses” and “gaps” have
to say about this puzzle? The magic lamp is flickering gloomily. Indeed,
we begin to suspect that behind the puzzling character of world trade
there must in fact be quite other kinds of economic relations between
individual “national economies” than simple commodity exchange; to
regularly obtain from other countries more than you give them is
evidently only possible for a country that has some kind of economic
claim over others that is completely different from exchange between
equals. And such claims and relations of dependence between countries
exist in fact at every turn, although these professorial theories know
nothing of them. One such dependence relationship, in the simplest form,
is that between a so-called mother country and its colony. Great Britain
draws from its largest colony, India, an annual tribute of more than
1,000 million marks. And we accordingly see that India’s exports of
goods are some 1,200 million marks greater than its imports. This
“surplus” is nothing more than the economic expression of the colonial
exploitation of India by British capitalism—whether these goods are
directly bound for Great Britain, or whether India has to sell to other
states each year goods to a value of 1,200 million marks specifically
for the purpose of paying this tribute to its British exploiters.^(XI)
But there are also other relationships of economic dependence that are
not based on political rule. Russia annually exports around 1,000
million marks’ worth more of goods than it imports. Is it the great
“surplus” of agricultural products over the needs of its own “national
economy” that drains this immense flow of goods each year out of the
Russian Empire? But the Russian peasant, whose corn is taken out of the
country in this way, is well known to suffer from scurvy due to
undernourishment, and often has to eat bread mixed with tree bark! The
massive export of his grain, through the mechanism of a financial and
taxation system designed for this purpose, is a matter of life or death
for the Russian state, in order to meet its obligations to foreign
creditors. Since its notorious defeat in the Crimean war,¹⁹ and its
modernization by the reforms of Alexander II,²⁰ the Russian state
apparatus has been financed to a high degree by capital borrowed from
Western Europe, principally from France. In order to pay interest on the
French loans, Russia has to sell each year large quantities of wheat,
timber, flax, hemp, cattle and poultry to Britain, Germany and the
Netherlands. The immense surplus of Russian exports thus represents the
tribute of a debtor to his creditors, a relationship matched on the
French side by a large surplus of imports, which represents nothing
other than the interest on its loan capital. But in Russia itself, the
chain of economic connections runs further. The borrowed French capital
has served principally in the last few decades for two purposes: railway
building with state guarantees, and armaments. To this end, Russia has
developed since the 1870s a strong heavy industry—under the protection
of a system of high customs tariffs. The borrowed capital from the old
capitalist country France has fueled a young capitalism in Russia, but
this in turn requires for its support and expansion a considerable
import of machinery and other means of production from Britain and
Germany as the most technologically advanced industrial countries. A tie
of economic connections is thus woven between Russia, France, Germany
and Britain, in which commodity exchange is only a small part.

Yet this does not exhaust the manifold nature of these connections. A
country like Turkey or China presents a new puzzle for our professor. It
has, contrary to Russia but similarly to Germany or France, a large
surplus of imports, amounting in many years to almost double the
quantity of exports. How can Turkey or China afford the luxury of such a
copious filling of the “gaps” in their “national economies,” given that
these economies are not nearly in a position to export corresponding
“surpluses”? Do the Western powers offer the crescent and the realm of
the pigtail each year a present of several hundred million marks, in the
form of all kinds of useful goods, out of Christian charity? Every child
know that both Turkey and China are actually up to their necks in the
jaws of European usurers, and have to pay the British, German and French
banks an enormous tribute in interest. Following the Russian example,
both Turkey and China should on the contrary show a surplus of exports
of their own agricultural products in order to be able to pay this
interest to their West European well wishers. But in both these two
countries the so-called “national economy” is fundamentally different
from the Russian. Certainly, the foreign loans are likewise used
principally for railway building, port construction and armaments. But
Turkey has virtually no industry of its own, and cannot conjure this out
of the ground of its medieval peasant subsistence agriculture with its
primitive cultivation and tithes. The same is true in a slightly
different way for China. And so not only the whole of the population’s
need for industrial goods, but also everything necessary for transport
construction and the equipment of army and navy, has to be imported
ready-made from Western Europe and constructed on site by European
entrepreneurs, technicians and engineers. The loans are indeed
frequently tied in advance to supplies of this kind. China, for example,
obtains a loan from German and Austrian banking capital only on
condition that it immediately orders a certain quantity of armaments
from the Skoda works²¹ and Krupp;²² other loans are tied in advance to
concessions for the construction of railways. In this way, most European
capital migrates to Turkey and China already in the form of goods
(armaments) or industrial capital in kind, in the form of machinery,
iron, etc. These latter goods are not sent for exchange, but for the
production of profit. Interest on this capital, along with further
profit, is squeezed from the Turkish or Chinese peasants by the European
capitalists with the help of a corresponding taxation system under
European financial control. The bare figures of a preponderance of
imports for Turkey or China, and corresponding European exports, thus
conceal the particular relationship that obtains between the rich
big-capitalist West and the poor and backward East that it bleeds dry
with the help of the most modern and developed communications facilities
and military installations—and with it the galloping ruin of the old
peasant “national economy.”

A still different case is presented by the United States. Here we again
see, as in Russia, an export figure well above that of imports—the
former came to 10,200 million marks in 1913, the latter to 7,400
million—but the reasons for this are fundamentally different from the
Russian case. Right from the beginning of the nineteenth century, the
London stock exchange has absorbed vast quantities of American loans and
shares; speculation in American company formation and stocks, until the
1860s, regularly announced like a fever patient’s thermometer an
impending major crisis for British industry and trade. Since then, the
outflow of English capital to the United States has not ceased. This
capital partly took the form of loan capital to cities and private
companies, but mostly that of industrial capital, whether American
railway and industrial stocks were sold on the London stock exchange, or
English industrial cartels founded branches in the US in order to
circumvent the high tariff barrier, or else to take over companies there
by purchasing their shares, in order to get rid of their competition on
the world market. The United States possesses today a highly developed
heavy industry that is advancing every more swiftly, and that, while it
continues to attract money capital from Europe, itself exports
industrial capital on an increasing scale—machinery, coal—to Canada,
Mexico and other Central and South American countries. In this way the
United States combines an enormous export of raw materials—cotton,
copper, wheat, timber and petroleum—to the old capitalist countries with
a growing industrial export to the young countries embarking on
industrialization. The United States’ great surplus of exports thus
reflects the particular transitional stage from a capital-receiving
agricultural country to a capital-exporting industrial one, the role of
an intermediate link between the old capitalist Europe and the new and
backward American continent.

An overview of this great migration of capital from the old industrial
countries to the young ones, and the corresponding reverse migration of
the incomes drawn from this capital and paid as annual tribute by the
young countries to the old, shows three powerful streams. England,
according to estimates from 1906, had already invested 54,000 million
marks by this time in its colonies and elsewhere, from which it drew an
annual income of 2,800 million marks. France’s foreign capital at this
time amounted to 32,000 million marks, with an annual income of at least
1,300 million. Germany, finally, had invested 26,000 million, which
yielded 1,240 million annually. These great main streams, however,
ultimately break down into smaller tributaries. Just as the United
States is spreading capitalism further on the American continent, so
even Russia—itself still fueled completely by French capital, and
English and German industry—is already transferring loan capital and
industrial products to its Asian hinterland, to China, Persia and
Central Asia; it is involved in railway construction in China, etc.

We thus discover behind the dry hieroglyphs of international trade a
whole network of economic entanglements, which have nothing to do with
simple commodity exchange, which is all that the professorial wisdom can
notice.

We discover that the distinction Herr Bücher makes between countries of
industrial production and countries of raw-material production, the
flimsy scaffolding on which he hangs the whole of international
exchange, is itself only a crude product of professorial schematism.
Perfume, cotton goods and machines are all manufactured goods. But the
export of perfume from France only shows that France is the country of
luxury production for the thin stratum of the rich bourgeoisie across
the world; the export of cotton goods from Japan shows that Japan,
competing with Western Europe, is undermining the traditional peasant
and handicraft production throughout East Asia, driving it out by
commodity trade; while the export of machinery from England, Germany and
the United States shows that these three countries are themselves
propagating heavy industry to all regions of the world.

We thus discover that one “commodity” is exported and imported today
that was unknown in the time of King Nebuchadnezzar as well as in the
whole of the antique and medieval periods: _capital_. And this commodity
does not serve to fill “certain gaps” in other countries’ “national
economies,” but quite the reverse—opening up gaps, rifts and splits in
the edifice of traditional “national economies,” and acting like
gunpowder to transform these “national economies” sooner or later into
heaps of rubble. In this way, the “commodity” capital spreads still more
remarkable “commodities” on an ever more massive scale from various old
countries to the whole world: modern means of transport and the
destruction of whole indigenous populations, money economy and an
indebted peasantry, riches and poverty, proletariat and exploitation,
insecurity of existence and crises, anarchy and revolutions. The
European “national economies” extend their polyp-like tentacles to all
countries and people of the earth, strangling them in a great net of
capitalist exploitation.

_4_

Cannot Professor Bücher believe in a world economy, despite all this?
No. For the scholar explains, after he has carefully surveyed all
regions of the world and discovered nothing: I cannot help myself, I see
nothing in the way of “special phenomena” that “deviate in essential
characteristics” from a national economy, “and it is much to be doubted
whether such things will appear in the foreseeable future.”^(XII)

Let us now leave trade and trade statistics completely aside, and turn
directly to life, to the history of modern economic relations. Just a
single small passage from the great colorful picture.

In 1768, [Richard] Arkwright built the first mechanically driven cotton
spinning plant in Nottingham, and in 1785 [Edmund] Cartwright invented
the mechanical loom. The immediate result in England was the destruction
of handloom weaving and the rapid spread of mechanical manufacture. At
the start of the nineteenth century there were, according to one
estimate, around a million handloom weavers; they were now fated to die
out, and by 1860 no more than a few thousand remained in the whole
kingdom, out of more than half a million factory workers in the cotton
sector. In 1863, Prime Minister [William] Gladstone spoke in Parliament
of the “intoxicating augmentation of wealth and power”²³ that the
English bourgeoisie had obtained, without the working class winning any
share of this.

The English cotton industry draws its raw material from North America.
The growth of factories in Lancashire conjured up immense cotton
plantations in the southern United States. Blacks were imported from
Africa for the deadly work on these plantations, as well as those of
sugar, rice and tobacco. The African slave trade expanded tremendously,
whole tribes were hunted down in the “dark continent,” sold off by their
chiefs, transported across immense stretches over land and sea, to be
auctioned in America. A literal black “_Völkerwanderung_”²⁴ took place.
At the end of the eighteenth century, in 1790, there were by one
estimate only 697,000 blacks; by 1861 there were over four million.

The colossal extension of the slave trade and slave labor in the South
of the United States triggered a crusade by the Northern states against
this un-Christian atrocity. The massive import of English capital in the
years 1825–60 made possible a vigorous railway construction in the
Northern states, the beginnings of their own industry and with it a
bourgeoisie enthusiastic for more modern forms of exploitation, for
capitalist wage-slavery. The fabulous business of the Southern planters,
who could drive their slaves to death within seven years, was all the
more intolerable to the pious Puritans of the North because their own
climate prevented them from establishing a similar paradise in their own
states. At the instigation of the Northern states, slavery in every form
was abolished for the whole of the Union in 1861.²⁵ The Southern
planters, whose deepest feelings were injured, answered this blow with
open revolt. The Southern states declared their secession from the
Union, and the great Civil War broke out.

The immediate effect of the war was the devastation and economic ruin of
the Southern states. Production and trade collapsed, the supply of
cotton was interrupted. This deprived English industry of its raw
material, and in 1863 a tremendous crisis broke out in England, the
so-called “cotton famine.” In Lancashire, 250,000 workers lost their
jobs completely, 166,000 were only employed part-time, and just 120,000
workers were still fully employed. The population of this district was
racked by poverty, and 50,000 workers asked Parliament in a petition to
vote funds to enable their families to emigrate. The Australian states,
which lacked the labor-power required to begin their capitalist
development—after the indigenous population had been almost completely
exterminated by the European settlers—declared that they were prepared
to accept unemployed proletarians from England. But the English
manufacturers protested vigorously against the emigration of their
“living machinery,” which they would need again themselves as soon as
the anticipated revival of industry took place. The workers were refused
the funds for emigration, and had to bear the full weight of the crisis
and its terrors.

Denied American supply, English industry sought to obtain its raw
material elsewhere, and turned its attention to the East Indies. Cotton
plantations were feverishly started here, and rice cultivation, which
had provided the daily food of the population for millennia and formed
the basis of their existence, had to give way in large areas to the
profitable projects of speculators. In the wake of this suppression of
rice cultivation, the next few years saw an extraordinary price rise and
a famine that carried off over a million people in Orissa alone, a
district north of Bengal.

A second experiment took place in Egypt. To take advantage of the
opportunity provided by the American Civil War, the Egyptian khedive,
Ismail Pasha, began cotton plantations as rapidly as possible. A real
revolution took place in the country’s property relations and rural
economy. Large area of peasant land were stolen, being declared royal
property and transformed into very large-scale plantations. Thousands of
workers were driven to forced labor on the plantations at the end of the
whip, to build dams and canals for the khedive, or to pull ploughs. But
borrowing the money needed to obtain the most modern steam-ploughs and
hulling machines led to the khedive sinking ever deeper in debt to
English and French bankers. This large-scale speculation ended with
bankruptcy after only a year, when the end of the American Civil War
brought the price of cotton down by three-quarters in the space of a few
days. The result of this cotton period for Egypt was the rapid ruin of
its peasant agriculture, the rapid collapse of its finances, and finally
the swift occupation of the country by the English army.²⁶

Meanwhile the cotton industry made new conquests. The Crimean War of
1855 [interrupted] the supply of hemp and flax from Russia, leading to a
major crisis of linen production in Western Europe. The collapse of the
old system in Russia, with the Crimean War, was followed right away by a
political transformation, the abolition of serfdom, liberal reforms,
free trade and the rapid building of railways. A new and stronger market
for industrial products was thus opened up within this great empire, and
the English cotton industry was the first to penetrate the Russian
market. At the same time, in the 1860s, a series of bloody wars opened
up China to English trade.²⁷ England dominated the world market, and the
cotton industry made up half its exports. The period of the 1860s and
70s was the time of most brilliant business deals for the English
capitalists, as well as the time when they were most inclined to
guarantee their “hands” and secure “industrial peace” by small
concessions to the workers. It was in this period that the English trade
unions, with the cotton spinners and weavers in the lead, achieved their
most striking successes, as well as the time when the revolutionary
traditions of the Chartist movement²⁸ and the Owenite ideas²⁹ finally
died out among the English proletariat, ossifying into conservative
trade unionism.

But the page soon turned. Everywhere on the continent that England
exported its cotton products there gradually developed a local cotton
industry. Already in 1844, the hunger revolts of the handloom weavers in
Silesia and Bohemia³⁰ had been the first heralds of the March revolution
[of 1848].³¹ In the English colonies, too, an indigenous industry arose.
The cotton factories of Bombay soon competed with the English, and in
the 1880s helped to break England’s monopoly on the world market.

In Russia, finally, the rise of cotton manufacture in the 1870s
inaugurated the age of large-scale industry and protective tariffs. In
order to circumvent the high tariff barrier, whole factories along with
their staff were taken from Saxony and the Vogtland³² to Russian
Poland,³³ where the new manufacturing centers of Lodz and Zgierz³⁴ grew
into big cities at a Californian pace. In the early 1880s, unrest in the
Moscow-Vladimir cotton district forced the first labor protection laws
in the tsarist empire. In 1896, 60,000 workers from the St Petersburg
cotton plants carried out the first mass strike in Russia.³⁵ And nine
years later, in June 1905, 100,000 workers in Lodz, the third center of
the cotton industry, with German workers among their leaders, erected
the first barricades of the great Russian revolution …

Here we have, in a few lines, 140 years in the history of a modern
branch of industry, a history that winds its way through all five
continents, hurls millions of human lives hither and thither, erupting
in one place as economic crisis, in another as famine, flaming up here
as war, there as revolution, leaving in its wake on all sides mountains
of gold and abysses of poverty—a wide and blood-stained stream of sweat
from human labor.

These are convulsions of life, actions at a distance, that reach right
into the innards of nations, while the dry figures of international
trade statistics give only a pale reflection of them. In the century and
a half since modern industry was first established in England, the
capitalist world economy has taken shape at the price of the pains and
convulsions of the whole of humanity. It has seized one branch of
production after another, taken hold of one country after another. With
steam and electricity, fire and sword, it has obtained entry into the
most remote corners of the earth, has torn down all Chinese walls, and
through an era of world crises, periodic common catastrophes, it has
initiated the economic interconnection of present-day humanity.³⁶ The
Italian proletarian, expelled from his misery at home by Italian
capital, who migrates to Argentina or Canada, finds there a ready-made
new yoke of capital imported from the United States or England. And the
German proletarian who remains at home and tries to make an honest
living, is dependent for his weal and woe at every turn on the course of
production and trade throughout the world. Whether he finds work or not,
whether his wage is sufficient to feed his wife and children, whether he
is condemned to spend several days of the week in enforced idleness, or
to work day and night in infernal overtime—all this constantly varies
depending on the cotton harvest in the United States, the wheat harvest
in Russia, the discoveries of new gold or diamond mines in Africa, the
outbreak of revolution in Brazil,³⁷ tariff battles, diplomatic turmoil
and war across five continents. Nothing is so striking today, nothing
has such decisive importance for the whole shape of today’s social and
political life, as the yawning contradiction between an economic
foundation that grows tighter and firmer every day, binding all nations
and countries into a great whole, and the political superstructure of
states, which seeks to split nations artificially, by way of border
posts, tariff barriers and militarism, into so many foreign and hostile
divisions.

But none of this exists for Bücher, Sombart and their colleagues! For
them, all that exists is the “ever more complete microcosm”! They see
far and wide no “special phenomena” that would “depart in essential
characteristics” from a national economy. Is this not puzzling? Would a
similar blindness on the part of the official representatives of science
be conceivable for phenomena that leap to the eye of any observer in
their plenitude and their dazzling, lightning-like intensity, in any
area of science other than that of political economy? Certainly in
natural science, a professional scholar who tried to express the view
publicly that the earth did not revolve round the sun, but the sun and
all other stars revolved round the earth as their center, who maintained
that he “did not know any phenomena” that would contradict this view “in
essential characteristics”—such a scholar could be sure of being met by
the Homeric laughter of the entire educated world, and would end up
having his mental health examined at the instigation of troubled
relatives. Of course, 400 years ago not only did the spread of such
views go unpunished, but anyone who undertook to refute them publicly
would himself run the risk of ending on the scaffold. In those days,
preservation of the mistaken view that the earth was the center of the
universe and the heavenly bodies was a pressing interest of the Catholic
church, and any attack on the imagined majesty of the earth in the
universe was at the same time an assault on the spiritual rule of the
church and its tithes on the earth. In those days, accordingly, natural
science was the ticklish nerve center of the prevailing social system,
and mystification in this realm was an indispensable instrument of
subjugation. Today, under the rule of capital, the ticklish point of the
social system is no longer faith in the mission of the earth in the blue
heaven, but rather faith in the mission of the bourgeois state on earth.
And because thick fog is already rising and gathering over the powerful
waves of the world economy, because storms are in preparation here that
will brush away the “microcosm” of the bourgeois state like a henhouse
in an earthquake, the scientific “Swiss guards” of the rule of capital
stand before the gate of their stronghold, the “national state,” ready
to defend it to the last gasp. The first word of present-day political
economy, its basic concept, is a scientific mystification in the
interest of the bourgeoisie.

_5_

Political economy is frequently defined for us in the simple formula
that it is “the science of people’s economic relations.” Those who offer
this kind of formulation believe they have navigated the reefs of the
“national economy” and the world economy by universalizing the problem
into something indefinite and speaking of “people’s” economic relations
in general. Tossing the problem up into thin air, however, does not make
it any more clear, but may well just confuse it even more, as the
question then arises as to why and wherefore this special science of
“people’s” economic relations—i.e. of _all_ people at all times and in
all circumstances—should be necessary.

Let us take any example we like of people’s economic relations, as
simple and transparent as possible. Let us place ourselves in the time
when the present world economy did not yet exist, when commodity trade
flourished only in the towns while in the countryside a natural economy
still prevailed, i.e. production for one’s own need, with the large
landed proprietors as well as on the small peasant holdings. Let us
take, for example, the relations described by Dugald Stewart in the
Scottish highlands in the 1850s:

In some parts of the Highlands of Scotland … every peasant, according to
the Statistical Account, made his own shoes of leather tanned by
himself. Many a shepherd and cottar too, with his wife and children,
appeared at Church in clothes which had been touched by no hands but
their own, since they were shorn from the sheep and sown in the
flax-field. In the preparation of these, it is added, scarcely a single
article had been purchased, except the awl, needle, thimble, and a very
few parts of the ironwork employed in the weaving. The dyes, too, were
chiefly extracted by the women from trees, shrubs, and herbs.³⁸

Alternatively, we can take an example from Russia, where only a
relatively short time ago, in the late 1860s, the peasant economy could
be commonly described as follows:

The land that he [the farmer of the Viasma district in the province of
Smolensk—R.L.] cultivates provides him with food and clothing, almost
everything that is necessary for his existence: bread, potatoes, milk,
meat, linen, cloth, sheep pelts and wool for warm clothing … All that he
buys with money are boots and a few personal items such as belt, cap and
gloves, as well as some necessary household equipment: iron and wooden
dishes, poker, kettle and the like.^(XIII)

Today there are still peasant economies of this kind in Bosnia and
Herzegovina, in Serbia and Dalmatia. If we were to put to one of these
self-sufficient peasants in the Scottish Highlands or Russia, Bosnia or
Serbia the usual professorial questions of political economy about
“economic purpose,” “creation and distribution of wealth” and the like,
he would stare at us in amazement. As to the reason why he and his
family work, or to put it in scholarly terms, the “motivating force”
that drives their “economic activity.” he would exclaim: Well, we have
to live, and food doesn’t just drop from the sky. If we didn’t work,
we’d die of starvation. So we work to get by, to eat our fill, to put
clothes on our back and have a roof over our head. As to _what_ we
produce, “what orientation” we give our labor, that’s another foolish
question! We produce what we need, what any peasant family needs to
live. We grow wheat and rye, oats and barley, we plant potatoes, we keep
a few cows and sheep, chickens and ducks. In winter we do the spinning,
which is women’s work, while men are busy with axes, saws and hammers
making whatever the house needs. You can call this a “rural economy” or
a “business,” whatever you like, but at all events we have to do a bit
of everything, as all kinds of things are needed in the home and the
fields. How do we “divide” these tasks? Another strange question! The
men naturally do what needs male strength, the women take care of the
house, the cows and the henhouse, the children help with this and that.
Or are you saying that I should send my wife to chop wood while I milk
the cows myself? (The good man is unaware—we can add here—that there are
many primitive peoples, for example the Brazilian Amerindians, where it
is precisely the woman who gathers wood in the forest, digs up roots and
goes to pick fruit, while among the herding peoples of Africa and Asia
men not only look after the cattle but also milk them. In Dalmatia
today, you can still see a woman carrying a heavy load on her back with
a strong man complacently riding his donkey alongside, puffing away at
his pipe. This “division of labor” seems just as natural to them as it
appears obvious to our own peasants that the man should chop wood and
his wife milk the cows.) And besides, this question about my “wealth”!
That again, every child in the village understands. A wealthy peasant is
one who has a full barn, a well-stocked stable, a respectable flock of
sheep and a large henhouse; a peasant is poor if he runs short of flour
already by Easter, and water drips through his roof when it rains. What
does an “increase in wealth” depend on? No question about it. If I had a
larger plot of land, I would naturally be richer, and if in summer,
Heaven forbid, we had a heavy hailstorm, everyone in the village would
be impoverished in the space of twenty-four hours.

Here we have let the peasant patiently answer the learned questions of
political economy, but we are certain that, before the professor who
arrived with his notebook and fountain pen to make a scientific study of
such a peasant household in the Scottish Highlands or Bosnia had asked
even half of his questions, he would already have been shown out of the
door. In fact, all relationships in this kind of peasant economy are so
simple and self-evident that their dissection with the scalpel of
political economy seems an idle game.

The objection can of course be made that we perhaps chose an unfortunate
example, by focusing on a tiny self-sufficient peasant household whose
extreme simplicity is determined by its scanty resources and dimensions.
So let us take another example. Leaving the small peasant household to
continue its modest existence in a remote corner of the world, we turn
our attention to the highest summit of a powerful empire, the household
of Charlemagne. This sovereign, who made the Germanic Empire the most
powerful in Europe at the start of the ninth century, undertaking no
fewer than fifty-three crusades for the expansion and strengthening of
his realm,³⁹ and uniting under his scepter not just present-day Germany
but also France, Italy, Switzerland, the northern part of Spain, Holland
and Belgium, was also very concerned with economic conditions on his
lands and estates. He drafted personally a special legislative decree on
the economic principles of his estates, consisting of seventy
paragraphs, the celebrated “_Capitulare de villis_,”⁴⁰ i.e. law about
landed estates, a priceless gem of historical survival which has happily
come down to us through the dust and mildew of the archives. This claims
very special attention for two reasons. Firstly, most of Charlemagne’s
estates subsequently developed into powerful imperial cities: Aachen,
Cologne, Munich, Basel and Strasbourg, for example, along with several
other towns, were at this time agricultural estates of the emperor.
Secondly, Charlemagne’s economic institutions became a model for all
major spiritual and temporal landed estates of the early Middle Ages;
these adopted the survivals of ancient Rome and the refined way of life
of its noble villas, transplanting them into the coarser milieu of the
young Germanic warrior nobility, and his prescriptions for the
cultivation of vineyards and gardens, fruit and vegetables, fowl, etc.
were an act in the history of civilization.

Let us take a closer look at this decree. The great emperor demanded
here, above all else, to be served honestly and have his properties
looked after so that his subjects living on them were protected against
poverty; they should not be overburdened with labor; if they worked at
night, they were to be compensated for this. But the subjects for their
part were to take diligent care of the vineyards and put the pressed
wine into bottles to avoid damage. If they evaded their duties they were
chastised “on the back or elsewhere.” The emperor also lay down that
bees and geese were to be kept on his domains; the birds were to be kept
well and increased. The stocks of cows and brood mares were also to be
expanded, and the greatest care taken of sheep.

We desire, the emperor continued, that our woods are managed properly,
that they are not uprooted and that sparrowhawks and falcons are kept
there. Fat geese and chickens should be always available for us; eggs
that are not consumed in the household should be sold on the market.
Each of our estates should keep a store of good featherbeds, mattresses,
covers, tableware of copper, lead, iron and wood, chains, kettle-hooks,
axes and drills, so that nothing needs to be borrowed from other people.
The emperor further prescribed that an exact account be kept of the
harvests from his estates, and he lists: vegetables, butter, cheese,
honey, oil, vinegar, turnips “and other trifles,” as it says in the text
of the famous decree. He continues that on each of his estates there
should be various artisans, a sufficient number fluent in every craft,
and he again lists the precise kinds in detail. He also made Christmas
Day the date on which he required accounts of his wealth, and the
smallest peasant did not count each head of stock and each egg on his
holding more carefully than the great Charlemagne. Paragraph 62 of the
decree states: “It is important that we know what and how much we have
of all these things.” And he again lists: oxen, mills, wood, ships, wine
stocks, vegetables, wool, linen, flax, fruit, bees, fish, hides, wax and
honey, old and new wine, and whatever else was supplied to him. He adds,
as generous consolation for the dear subjects who were to supply all
this: “We hope that all this does not appear too hard to you, for you
can demand the same for your part, since everyone is lord of his
property.” Further, we find exact prescriptions as to the way in which
wines should be packed and transported, these apparently being a
particular concern in the great emperor’s governance: “Wine should be
carried in barrels with firm iron hoops and never in skins. As for
flour, this is to be carried in doubled crates and covered with leather,
so that it can be brought across rivers without damage being done. I
also want exact account to be made of the horns of my goats, male and
female, as well of the skins of the wolves that are shot each year. In
the month of May, merciless war against the young wolf cubs should not
be neglected.” Finally, in the last paragraph, Charlemagne lists all the
flowers, trees and plants that he wants to have tended in his garden:
roses, lilies, rosemary, gherkins, onions, radishes, caraway, etc. The
famous decree more or less comes to an end with a list of varieties of
apple.

This is a picture of the imperial economy in the ninth century, and
although we have here one of the most powerful and richest princes of
the Middle Ages, anyone must admit that his economy, along with the
principles on which it was managed, are surprisingly reminiscent of the
dwarf-size peasant holding that we considered above. Here too, the
imperial landlord, if we were to put to him the familiar basic questions
of political economy about the nature of wealth, the purpose of
production, the division of labor, etc., etc., would refer with a royal
wave of the hand to the mountains of grain, wool and flax, the barrels
of wine, oil and vinegar, the stables full of cows, oxen and sheep. And
we would be equally at a loss to know what “laws” of political-economic
science were to be investigated and deciphered in this economy, since
all the connections, cause and effect, labor and its result, are as
clear as day.

The reader might draw our attention here, once again, to the fact that
we have taken a misleading example. It is clear after all from
Charlemagne’s decree that this was not dealing with the public economic
relationships of the Germanic Empire, but rather with the private
economy on the emperor’s estates. But it would certainly be a historical
error for anyone to try to oppose these two concepts in the context of
the Middle Ages. The capitulary does indeed refer to the economy on the
estates and properties of Charlemagne, but he managed this economy as
ruler, not as a private person. Or more accurately: the emperor was a
lord on his domains, but likewise any noble lord in the Middle Ages,
i.e. in the time _after_ Charlemagne, was more or less such an emperor
on a small scale, i.e. he was by virtue of his free noble domain a
legislator, tax collector and judge for the population on his estates.
The very form of Charlemagne’s economic dispositions, as we have
mentioned them, shows that these were indeed acts of government: they
make up one of his sixty-five laws or capitularies which, drafted by the
emperor, were made known at the annual imperial assemblies of his
magnates. And the regulations about radishes and iron-clad wine barrels
derive from the same fullness of power and are drafted in the same style
as, for example, the admonitions to the bishops in his “_Capitula
episcoporum_,”⁴¹ in which Charles gives the bishops a box on the ears
and warns them energetically not to curse, not to get drunk, not to
visit places of ill-fame, not to keep women or charge too high a price
for the holy sacraments. We may go where we please in the Middle Ages,
but nowhere in the countryside do we find an economic enterprise for
which Charlemagne’s does not offer a model and a type, whether it is the
estates of noble lords or the simple peasant holding, whether we have an
individual peasant family operating for itself or a communally operating
mark⁴² community.

What is most striking in both examples is that here the needs of human
life directly govern and determine labor, and the result thus
corresponds so exactly to intention and need that the relationships
maintain, whether on a greater or smaller scale, this surprising
simplicity and transparency. Both the small peasant on his holding and
the great monarch in his court know quite exactly what they want to
achieve by their production. And no magic is required to know this: both
want to satisfy the natural human needs for eating and drinking,
clothing and the conveniences of life. The only difference is that the
peasant sleeps on a straw sack and the great lord on a soft featherbed,
one drinks beer and mead, or just plain water, while the other has fine
wine on his table. But the basis of the economy and its task of directly
satisfying human needs remains the same. The result corresponds in the
same self-evident way to the labor that proceeds from this natural task.
Here too, again, there are differences in the labor process: the peasant
works along with his family members, and the fruits of his labor
correspond to the extent of his holding and his share in the common
land; more precisely—since we are speaking here of medieval serf
labor—he what is left over after providing dues and labor services for
the lords and the church. The emperor or any other noble lord does not
work himself, but has his subjects and subordinates work for him. But
whether a peasant and his family work for themselves, or all together
under the management of a village headman, or under the lord’s bailiff,
the result of this labor is still nothing other than a particular sum of
means of subsistence in the wider sense, i.e. precisely what is
required, and more or less in the amount required. No matter which way
you look at an economy of this kind, there is no puzzle to be found in
it that could only be solved by profound investigation and a special
science. The slowest-witted peasant in the Middle Ages knew precisely
what his “wealth”—or rather, his poverty—depended on, leaving aside the
natural phenomena that visited both lord’s and peasant’s lands from time
to time. He knew quite precisely that his distress as a peasant had a
very simple and direct cause: first of all the boundless extraction of
labor services and dues on the part of the lords, and secondly the theft
by these same lords of common lands—woods, meadows and waters. And what
the peasant knew he cried aloud to the world in the peasant wars, and
showed by setting fire to the houses of his bloodsuckers. What remains
for scientific investigation here is only the historical origin and
development of those relationships, the question as to how it could
happen that throughout Europe the formerly free peasant landholdings
were transformed into noble estates extracting dues and tolls, the
formerly free peasantry into a mass of subjects liable to serf labor and
later also to monetary dues.

The situation looks completely different as soon as we turn to any
phenomenon of _present-day_ economic life. Let us take for example one
of the most remarkable and outstanding phenomena: the _trade crisis_. We
have all experienced already several major crises of trade and industry,
and are familiar from our own observation with the process classically
described by Frederick Engels in the following terms:

Commerce is at a standstill, the markets are glutted, products
accumulate, as multitudinous as they are unsalable, hard cash
disappears, credit vanishes, factories are closed, the mass of the
workers are in want of the means of subsistence; bankruptcy follows upon
bankruptcy, execution upon execution. The stagnation lasts for years;
productive force and products are wasted and destroyed wholesale, until
the accumulated mass of commodities finally filter off, more or less
depreciated in value, until production and exchange gradually begin to
move again. Little by little the pace quickens. It becomes a trot. The
industrial trot breaks into a canter, the canter in return grows into
the headlong gallop of a perfect steeplechase of industry, commercial
credit, and speculation, which finally, after breakneck leaps, ends
where it began—in the ditch of a crisis.⁴³

We all know that a commercial crisis of this kind is the terror of every
modern country, and the way in which such a crisis is heralded is
already very instructive. After a spell of some years of prosperity and
good business, a vague rumor begins in the press here and there, with
reports of some disturbing news about bankruptcies on the stock
exchanges; then the spots in the press become larger, the stock exchange
ever more turbulent, the central bank raises the discount rate, making
the supply of credit more difficult and limited, until news about
bankruptcies and unsalable stocks falls like a cloudburst. The crisis is
then in full swing, and the struggle now is about who bears
responsibility. The business people blame the brusque refusal of credit
by the banks, the banks blame the speculative craze of the stockbrokers,
they in turn blame the industrialists, the industrialists blame the lack
of money in the country, and so on. And when business finally begins to
get under way again, it is once more the stock exchange and the
newspapers that note the first signs of improvement, until hope, calm
and security again appear for a while. What is remarkable about all
this, however, is the fact that the crisis is seen and treated by all
those involved, by the whole society, as something that stands outside
the realm of human will and human calculation, like a blow of fate
inflicted on us by an invisible power, a test from heaven of the same
order as a severe storm, an earthquake or a flood. Even the language in
which the newspapers like to report a crisis is fond of such expressions
as “gloomy clouds are gathering over the formerly bright skies of the
business world,” or, if a sharp increase in the discount rate is
announced, they inevitably use the headline “Storm Signal,” just as we
later read about the thunder passing and the horizon brightening. This
way of writing expresses rather more than mere fatuousness on the part
of the ink coolies of the business world, it is precisely typical of the
strange effect of the crisis, its apparently law-like character. Modern
society notes its approach with terror, it bends its neck and trembles
at the hail-like blows, it awaits the end of the test and then raises
its head again, at first timid and unbelieving, then finally relieved.

This is precisely the way that, in the Middle Ages, people awaited the
outbreak of a great famine or plague, the way that country folk today
suffer a heavy thunderstorm and hail: the same helplessness and
impotence in the face of a severe trial. And yet famine and plague, even
if ultimately social phenomena, are initially and immediately the
results of natural phenomena: a harvest failure, the spread of
disease-inducing germs and the like. Thunder is a basic event of
physical nature, and no one, at least at the present stage of science
and technology, is able to bring about a thunderstorm or to avert one.
But what is this modern crisis? It consists, as we know, in too many
commodities being produced without finding an outlet, with the result
that trade and industry come to a halt. The production and sale of
commodities, trade and industry—all these are purely human relations. It
is people themselves who produce commodities, and people themselves who
buy them; trade is conducted between one person and another, and in the
circumstance that make up the modern crisis we do not find a single
element that lies outside of human action. It is therefore nothing other
than human society itself that periodically provokes the crisis. And yet
we also know that the crisis is a real trial for modern society, that it
is expected with dread and suffered with desperation, that it is not
wanted or wished for by anyone. Apart from a few stock-exchange sharks
who try to enrich themselves quickly during a crisis at the expense of
others, but frequently fail in the process, the crisis is for everyone
at the very least a danger or a disturbance. No one wants the crisis,
and yet it comes. People create it with their own hands, yet they do not
intend it for anything in the world. The medieval peasant on his little
plot produced partly what his lord required, partly what he himself
needed: grain and meat, provisions for himself and his family. The great
medieval lord had others produce for him what he wanted and needed:
grain and meat, fine wines and fine clothes, means of subsistence and
luxury goods for himself and his household. Present-day society however
produces what it neither wants nor can use: crises. It periodically
produces means of subsistence that it cannot consume; it suffers
periodic hunger alongside tremendous stocks of unsold products. Need and
satisfaction, the purpose and the result of labor, no longer match;
between them stands something unclear and puzzling.

Let us take another example, all too well known to workers of all
countries: _unemployment_. Unemployment is no longer, like crises, a
cataclysm that visits society from time to time. It has become today, to
a greater or lesser degree, a constant and everyday accompaniment to
economic life. The most well-organized and well-paid categories of
workers, who keep lists of their unemployed, show an uninterrupted
series of figures for each year, even each month and week; these figures
fluctuate substantially, but they never completely peter out. How
powerless present-day society is in the face of unemployment, this
dreadful scourge of the working class, is shown each time that the scale
of this evil becomes so great that it forces legislative bodies to
concern themselves with it. The regular course of such discussions,
after a lengthy to-ing and fro-ing, culminates in the decision to
conduct an inquiry, an investigation, into the present number of
unemployed. The main thing here is to measure the present state of the
evil, as the level of water is measured with a depth gauge in times of
flood, and in the best case weak palliative measures are taken in the
form of support for the unemployed—generally at the cost of those in
work—with a view to dampening the effects of the evil, without the
slightest attempt being made to do away with the evil itself.

In the early years of the nineteenth century, Reverend [Thomas] Malthus,
the great prophet of the English bourgeoisie, proclaimed with the
heart-chilling brutality that was characteristic of him:

A man born into a world already occupied, whose family has no means of
supporting him or of whose labor society has no need, has not any right
to demand any portion whatever of food. He is really one too many on the
land. No cover is laid for him at the great banquet of Nature. Nature
tells him to go away, and does not delay herself to put the order into
execution.⁴⁴

Official society today, with its characteristic “social-reforming”
hypocrisy, scorns such crass expressions. In practice, however, it
finally tells the unemployed proletarian, “whose labor it does not
need,” to “go away” in one way or another, quickly or slowly, to leave
this world—the increasing figures of disease, infant mortality and
crimes against property during every great crisis speak for themselves.

The comparison we have made between unemployment and flood even shows
the striking fact that we are less _impotent_ in the face of elemental
events of a physical kind than we are towards our own, purely social,
purely human affairs! The periodic spring floods that do such damage in
the east of Germany are ultimately only the result of the current
neglected state of water management. The present level of technology
already affords sufficient means for protecting agriculture from the
power of water, even for making good use of this power; it is just that
these methods can only be applied at the highest level of a large-scale,
interconnected, rational water management, which would have to refigure
the whole area affected, appropriately disposing arable zones and
meadows, building dams and sluices, and regulating rivers. A great
reform of this kind can certainly not be undertaken, partly because
neither private capitalists nor the state are willing to provide the
resources for such an project, partly because on the large scale that
would be needed, the barriers of a whole range of private landowning
rights would be infringed. But society today does have the resources for
tackling the water danger and harnessing the raging element, even if it
is not in a position to use them at this time. On the other hand, this
society has not discovered a method for combating unemployment. And yet
this not an element, a natural phenomenon of physics, but a purely human
product of economic relations. And once again here we come up against an
economic puzzle, a phenomenon that no one intended, no one consciously
strove for, but which all the same appears with the regularity of a
natural phenomenon, over people’s heads as it were.

But we need in no way take the case of these striking phenomena of
present-day life, crises or unemployment, calamities and cases of an
extraordinary nature, which in popular imagination form an exception to
the usual course of things. Let us take one of the most familiar
examples from everyday life, repeated a thousand times in all countries:
_the fluctuating prices of commodities_. Every child knows that the
prices of goods are in no case fixed and unchangeable, but on the
contrary, go up and down almost daily—sometimes, indeed, every hour. If
we pick up a newspaper, and turn to the report on the commodities
market, we can read the price movements of the previous day: wheat
rather weak in the morning, somewhat livelier in the afternoon, rising
towards the close of business, or else falling. The same goes for copper
and iron, sugar and vegetable oil. And likewise with shares in different
industrial firms, government and private bonds, on the stock market.
Price fluctuations are a constant, daily, quite “normal” phenomenon of
contemporary economic life. These price movements, moreover, cause a
daily and hourly change in the wealth of those who possess all these
products and papers. If the cotton price rises, then the wealth of all
dealers and manufacturers who have stocks of cotton in their warehouses
also rises temporarily; if prices fall, their wealth dwindles similarly.
If copper prices rise, then the owners of shares in the copper mines
grow richer, and if these fall, they grow poorer. In this way, people
can become millionaires or beggars in a few hours as a result of simple
fluctuations in price, as reported in a stock-market telegram, and this
is the essential basis of the whole giddiness of stock-market
speculation. The medieval lord could grow richer or poorer as a result
of a good or a bad harvest, or enrich himself as a robber baron making a
good catch by waylaying a passing merchant, or—and this was the most
well-tested and favored method—increase his wealth by pressing more out
of his peasant serfs than he managed previously, by increasing the
services and dues he demanded. Today, a man can suddenly become rich or
poor without doing the slightest thing himself, without lifting a
finger, without any kind of natural event, even without anyone having
given him something or violently robbing him. Price fluctuations are
likewise a secretive movement, guided behind people’s backs by an
invisible power, and causing a continuous shift and fluctuation in the
distribution of social wealth. The movement is noted in the same way as
temperature is indicated on a thermometer, air pressure on a barometer.
And yet commodity prices and their movements are obviously a purely
human affair, with no magic involved. It is no one but people themselves
who produce commodities with their own hands and determine their prices,
simply that here again their action gives rise to something that no one
intended or had in mind; here again, the need, end and result of
people’s economic action come into blatant imbalance.

What is the reason for this, and what are the obscure laws that make
people’s own economic life today bring about such strange events behind
their backs? This can only be revealed by scientific investigation. It
has become necessary to solve all these puzzles by way of strenuous
investigation, deep reflection, analysis and comparison, in other words
to make explicit the hidden connections that bring it about that the
results of people’s economic action no longer coincide with their
intentions and their will—in sum, their consciousness. The lack of
consciousness within the social economy thus becomes a task for
scientific research; and here we have arrived directly at the root of
political economy.

In recounting his journey around the world, Darwin says of the
inhabitants of Tierra del Fuego:

They often suffer from famine: I heard Mr. Low, a sealing-master
intimately acquainted with the natives of this country, give a curious
account of the state of a party of one hundred and fifty natives on the
west coast, who were very thin and in great distress. A succession of
gales prevented the women from getting shellfish on the rocks, and they
could not go out in their canoes to catch seal. A small party of these
men one morning set out, and the other Indians explained to him, that
they were going a four days’ journey for food: on their return, Low went
to meet them, and he found them excessively tired, each man carrying a
great square piece of putrid whale’s-blubber with a hole in the middle,
through which they put their heads, like the Gauchos do through their
ponchos or cloaks. As soon as the blubber was brought into a wigwam, an
old man cut off thin slices, and muttering over them, broiled them for a
minute, and distributed them to the famished party, who during this time
preserved a profound silence.^(XIV)

So much for the life of one of the most backward peoples on earth. The
limits within which their will and deliberate ordering of their economy
can operate are here still extremely narrow. People here are still
completely tied to the apron strings of external nature, and depend on
its favor and disfavor. But within these narrow limits, the organization
of the whole small society of some hundred and fifty individuals
prevails. Concern for the future is only expressed in the wretched form
of a stock of putrid whale’s blubber. But this putrid stock is divided
between everyone with due ceremony, and everyone similarly participates
in the work of seeking food, under planned leadership.

Let us turn to a Greek _oikos_, the household economy of antiquity with
slaves, which by and large also formed a “microcosm,” a little world
unto itself. Here extreme social inequality already prevails. Primitive
need has been transformed into a comfortable surplus of the fruits of
human labor. Physical labor has become the curse of some, idleness the
privilege of others, with those who work even becoming the property of
the non-workers. Yet here again, this relationship of domination
involves the strictest planning and organization of the economy, the
labor process and distribution. The determining will of the master is
its foundation, the whip of the slave overseer its sanction.

On the feudal manor of the Middle Ages, the despotic organization of
labor receives early on the visage of a detailed code elaborated in
advance, in which the plan and division of labor, the duties of each as
well as their claims, are clearly and firmly defined. On the threshold
of this period of history stands that fine document that we have already
cited: Charlemagne’s “_Capitulare de villis_,” which still revels
joyously and brightly in the wealth of physical enjoyments to which the
economy is completely directed. At its end we have the baneful code of
services and dues which, dictated by the unrestrained financial greed of
the feudal lords, led to the German peasant war⁴⁵ of the sixteenth
century,⁴⁶ and made the French peasant still 200 years later into that
miserable and semi-bestialized creature who was only shaken to struggle
for his human and civil rights by the shrill alarm clock of the great
Revolution. But, until the broom of revolution swept away the feudal
manor, this peasant was still in the misery of the relationship of
direct mastery that firmly and clearly defined the relations of the
feudal economy as an unavoidable fate.

Today we have neither masters nor slaves, neither feudal barons nor
serfs. Freedom and equality before the law have in formal terms done
away with all despotic relationships, at least in the old bourgeois
states; in the colonies, as is well known, these same states have
frequently themselves introduced slavery and serfdom. Everywhere that
the bourgeoisie is at home, _free competition_ rules economic relations
as their one and only law. This means the disappearance from the economy
of any kind of plan or organization. Of course, if we look at an
individual private firm, a modern factory or a large complex of
factories and plants such as Krupp’s, alternatively a great agricultural
enterprise such as those of North America, we find here the strictest
organization, the most far-reaching division of labor, the most refined
planning based on scientific knowledge. Here everything works
beautifully, directed by a _single_ will and consciousness. But we
scarcely leave the factory or farm gate than we are met already with
chaos. Whereas the countless individual components—and a private firm
today, even the most gigantic, is only a fragment of the great economic
network that extends across the whole earth—whereas the fragments are
most strictly organized, the whole of the so-called “national economy,”
i.e. the capitalist world economy, is completely unorganized. In the
whole, which stretches across oceans and continents, no plan, no
consciousness, no regulation prevails; only the blind reign of unknown,
uncontrolled forces plays its capricious game with people’s economic
fate. There is indeed, still today, an over-powerful lord that governs
working humanity: _capital_. But its form of government is not despotism
but _anarchy_.

And it creates this anarchy by having the social economy bring about
results that are unexpected and puzzling even to the people involved; it
turns the social economy into a phenomenon that is foreign to us and
alienated, whose laws we have to discover in the same way as we
investigate the phenomena of external nature, which govern the life of
the vegetable and animal realms, changes in the earth’s crust and the
movements of heavenly bodies. Scientific knowledge must subsequently
discover the meaning and rule of the social economy, which no conscious
plan has dictated in advance.

It is now clear why bourgeois political economists find it impossible to
clearly pinpoint the nature of their science, to put their finger into
the wound of their social order, to denounce it in its inherent
criminality. To discover and confess that anarchy is the life element of
the rule of capital means in the same breath to pronounce a death
sentence, it means saying that its existence is only granted a temporary
reprieve. It is clear now why the official scientific advocates of the
rule of capital seek to conceal the matter with every kind of
word-spinning, to direct attention away from the core to the outer
shell, from the global economy to the “national economy.” At the very
first step across the threshold of political-economic knowledge, with
the first fundamental question as to what political economy actually is
and what is its basic problem, the paths of bourgeois and proletarian
knowledge already diverge. With this first question, however abstract
and immaterial for present social struggles it may appear at first
sight, a special tie is already drawn between political economy as a
science and the modern proletariat as a revolutionary class.

_6_

Once we adopt the perspective we have now reached, many things that
first appeared uncertain now become clear.

To start with, the question of how old political economy is. A science
whose task is to disclose the laws of the anarchic capitalist mode of
production could naturally not arise earlier than this mode of
production itself, not before the historical conditions for the class
rule of the modern bourgeoisie had gradually been assembled by political
and economic changes over the centuries.

According to Professor Bücher, of course, the origin of the present-day
social order was something extremely simple, having little to do with
preceding economic development. It was in fact the result of the
superior will and elevated wisdom of absolutist princes.

“The construction of the _national economy_,” Bücher explains—and we
already know that for a bourgeois professor the concept “national
economy” is only a mystifying description of capitalist production—

is essentially a result of the political centralization that began with
the rise of the territorial state model towards the end of the Middle
Ages, and is reaching its culmination today with the creation of the
unitary national state. The concentration of economic powers goes hand
in hand with the bending of political special interests to the higher
purposes of the whole. In Germany, it was the larger territorial princes
who sought to bring the modern state idea to expression, in struggle
with the landed aristocracy and the cities.^(XV)

But princely power also wrought the same great deeds in the rest of
Europe—in Spain, Portugal, England, France, and the Netherlands.

In all these countries, if to a varying degree, the struggle with the
separate powers of the Middle Ages took place: the great nobles, the
cities, provinces, spiritual and temporal corporations. Initially, it
was a question of abolishing the independent circles that stood as an
obstacle in the way of political concentration. But at the underlying
foundation of the movement that led to the development of princely
absolutism, there still slumbered the world-historical idea that the new
and greater tasks of human civilization required a united organization
of whole peoples, a great living community of interest, and this could
only arise on the basis of a common economy.^(XVI)

We have here the finest flowering of that serviceability in matters of
thought that we have already noted among German professors of political
economy. According to Professor Schmoller, the science of political
economy arose at the command of enlightened absolutism. According to
Professor Bücher, the whole capitalist mode of production is simply the
fruit of sovereign will and the heaven-storming plans of absolutist
princes. It would of course be very unfair to the great Spanish and
French despots, not to mention their petty German counterparts, to raise
the suspicion that in their boisterous games with the arrogant feudal
lords at the end of the Middle Ages, or their bloody crusades against
the cities of the Netherlands, they troubled themselves with any kind of
“world-historical ideas” or “tasks of human civilization.” This would
mean turning historical events upside down.

Certainly, the establishment of large centralized bureaucratic states
was an indispensable precondition for the capitalist mode of production,
yet it was just as much itself only a _consequence_ of the new economic
requirements, so that it would be far more justifiable to turn Bücher’s
proposition around and declare that the construction of political
centralization was “essentially” a fruit of the maturing “national
economy,” i.e. of capitalist production.

But if absolutism had an incontestable share in this process of
historical preparation, it played this part with the same stupid lack of
thought of a blind instrument of historical developmental tendencies,
and could likewise contradict these same tendencies whenever the
occasion arose. Thus the medieval despots by the grace of God considered
the cities allied with them against the feudal lords simply as objects
for blackmail, which they betrayed again to the feudal lords at the
first opportunity. Thus they viewed the newly discovered regions of the
world, with all their population and culture, immediately and
exclusively as a suitable field for the most brutal, pernicious and
crude plunder, to fill the “princely treasuries” with gold nuggets as
quickly as possible, for a “higher cultural purpose.” In the same way,
later, we had the stubborn resistance to interposing between the “grace
of God” rulers and their “loyal peoples” that sheet of paper, called a
bourgeois parliamentary constitution, which is just as indispensable for
the unhindered development of the rule of capital as is political unity
and the large centralized states themselves.

It was in fact quite other powers at work, great shifts in the economic
life of the European nations as they emerged from the Middle Ages, that
pioneered the move to the new form of economy.

Once the discovery of America and the circumnavigation of Africa, i.e.
the discovery of the sea route to India, had led to an unforeseen
upswing and a shift in trade, the dissolution of feudalism and the guild
regime was a powerful tendency in the towns. The violent conquests, land
acquisitions and plundering expeditions in the newly discovered lands,
the great spice trade with India, the extension of the slave trade
supplying black Africans to the American plantations, very soon created
in Western Europe new wealth and new needs. The small workshop of the
guild artisan with all its fetters proved an impediment on the necessary
expansion of production and its rapid progress. The great merchants
created a way out by gathering artisans together in large factories
outside the city precincts, so as to have them produce more speedily and
better, untroubled by the narrow-minded guild regulations.

In England, the new mode of production was introduced by a revolution in
the agricultural economy. The blossoming of wool manufacture in
Flanders, with its great demand for wool, gave English feudal nobles the
impulse to transform large expanses of agricultural land into
sheep-walks, which meant the larger part of the English peasantry being
driven out of house and home. This meant the creation of a massive
number of property-less workers, proletarians, at the disposal of the
emerging capitalist manufacture. The Reformation worked in the same
direction, with the confiscation of church properties, some of which
were handed to the court nobility and speculators, others squandered,
with the greater part of their peasant population likewise driven from
the soil. The manufacturers and capitalist farmers thus found a massive
poor and proletarianized population, outside both feudal and guild
restrictions, who, after a long martyrdom of vagabond existence, and
bloody persecution by law and police, found a safe haven in wage slavery
for the new class of exploiters. There immediately followed also the
great technological transformations in manufacturing, which made it
possible increasingly to use greater numbers of unskilled wage
proletarians in place of skilled artisans or alongside them.

All this pressure and striving towards new relationships came up against
feudal barriers and the misery of decomposing conditions. The natural
economy that was determined by feudalism and in its very nature, as well
as the impoverishment of the popular masses by the limitless pressure of
serfdom, naturally restricted the domestic market for manufactured
goods, while at the same time the guilds continued to fetter the most
important condition of production, labor-power, in the towns. The state
apparatus with its endless political fragmentation, its lack of public
security, its jumble of tariff and trade-policy confusion, inhibited and
burdened the new trade and production at every turn.

It was clear that the rising bourgeoisie in Western Europe, as
representative of free world trade and manufacture, had in some way or
another to clear all these obstacles out of the way, if it did not want
to completely renounce its world-historical mission. Before it broke
feudalism to pieces in the great French Revolution, it first struggled
with it critically, and the new science of political economy thus arose
as one of the most important ideological weapons of the bourgeoisie in
its struggle against the medieval feudal state and for the modern state
of the capitalist class. The new economic order that was breaking
through appeared right away in the form of new and rapidly arising
riches, which poured over West European society and stemmed from quite
different, more profitable and apparently inexhaustible sources than the
patriarchal methods of feudal peasant slavery, which in any case had
already reached the end of their natural life. The most striking source
of the new enrichment was at first not the emerging new mode of
production, but rather its pacemaker, the powerful upswing of world
trade on the emergence from the Middle Ages—in the rich Italian
commercial republics on the Mediterranean and in Spain, where the first
questions of political economy arose, as well as the first attempts to
answer them.

What is wealth? How do states become wealthy, and how are they made
poor? This was the new problem, once the old notions of feudal society
had lost their traditional validity in the whirlpool of new relations.
Wealth is gold, for which anything can be bought. Trade therefore
creates wealth. So those states become rich that are in a position to
bring much gold into the country and not let any out. World trade,
therefore, along with colonial conquests in the newly discovered lands
and manufactures that produce goods for export, must be promoted by the
state, while the import of products from abroad, which would draw gold
out of the country, is forbidden. This was the first doctrine of
political economy, which appeared in Italy already at the end of the
sixteenth century, and came to prevail generally in the seventeenth
century in England and France. And no matter how crude this doctrine
was, it did offer the first sharp break with the mental universe of
feudal natural economy, the first bold criticism of it, the first
idealization of trade, of commodity production, and in this form—of
capital: in sum the first program of a state policy after the hearts of
the young bourgeoisie struggling to advance.

The focus soon switched from the merchant to the commodity-producing
capitalist, but still only cautiously, under the mask of humble servant
in the anteroom of the feudal lord. Wealth is by no means gold, which is
simply the mediator in commodity trade, so the French _lumières_⁴⁷
proclaimed in the eighteenth century. What a childish confusion to see
gleaming metal as the firm basis of fortune! Can I eat metal if I’m
hungry, or can it protect me from the winter cold? Didn’t the Persian
king Darius, with all his gold treasure, suffer from dreadful pangs of
thirst on the battlefield, and would have willingly given it all away
for a sip of water?⁴⁸ No, wealth means the gifts of nature in foodstuffs
and materials, with which all of us, king and beggar alike, satisfy our
needs. The more lavishly a population satisfies its needs, the wealthier
a state is, as it can draw all the more in tax. But who is it that
coaxes nature to make corn into bread, to make the thread from which we
spin our clothes, the wood and ore from which we build houses and
machinery? Agriculture! It is agriculture, not trade, that forms the
true fount of wealth. The mass of the agricultural population,
accordingly, the peasant masses whose hands create the wealth of
everyone, must be rescued from their boundless misery, protected from
feudal exploitation, raised up to well-being! (And in this way I shall
also find a market for my goods, the manufacturing capitalist quietly
adds.) The great lords of the land, therefore, the feudal barons, into
whose hands the whole wealth of agriculture flows, should be the only
ones who pay taxes and maintain the state! (Which means, the capitalist
again murmurs into his beard with a smile, that I also need pay no
taxes.) Agriculture, accordingly, work in the bosom of nature, need only
be freed from all the chains of feudalism, for the springs of wealth to
flow in their natural abundance for people and state, and the supreme
happiness of all people to stand automatically in a necessary harmony
with the whole.⁴⁹

If in these Enlightenment doctrines could be clearly heard already the
approaching rumble of the storming of the Bastille [in 1789], the
capitalist bourgeoisie soon felt strong enough to throw off the mask of
obsequiousness, place itself sturdily in the foreground and demand
without beating about the bush the restructuring of the whole state to
suit them. Agriculture was in no way the only source of wealth, Adam
Smith declared in England in the late eighteenth century. All wage labor
that was harnessed to commodity production created wealth, whether on
the farm or in manufacture! (Any kind of _labor_, said Adam Smith; but
for him and his followers—who were already no more than a mouthpiece for
the emerging bourgeoisie—people who labored were by nature capitalist
wage-laborers!) For all wage-labor created, besides the most necessary
wage for the worker’s own subsistence, also rent to maintain the lord of
the land and a profit as the wealth of the owner of capital, the
entrepreneur. And this wealth was all the greater, the larger the number
of workers in a workshop who were harnessed to labor under the command
of a single capital, and the more detailed and meticulous the division
of labor among them. This then was the true natural harmony, the true
wealth of nations: from any kind of work, a wage for the laborers, a
wage that kept them alive and forced them to further wage-labor; a rent
sufficient for the careless life of the lords; and a profit attractive
enough to make it worthwhile for the entrepreneur to pursue his
business. _Everyone_ is provided for without the clumsy old methods of
feudalism. Promoting the “wealth of nations,” therefore, meant promoting
the wealth of the capitalist entrepreneur, who keeps the whole system in
motion and with it the golden vein of wealth—the bleeding of wage-labor.
Away then with all chains and obstacles of the good old days, as well as
the more recent paternal methods of the state. Free competition, the
free blossoming of private capital, the whole apparatus of taxation and
state in the service of the capitalist entrepreneur—and everything will
be for the best in this best of all worlds!

This was the economic gospel of the bourgeoisie, with all the wrappings
peeled away, and with it political economy finally acquired its
fundamental and true form. Of course, the practical reform proposals and
advice of the bourgeoisie to the feudal state came to grief as
hopelessly as all historic attempts to pour new wine into old bottles.
In twenty-four hours the hammer of revolution succeeded in doing what
half a century of reforming patchwork had failed to do. It was in fact
the conquest of political power that provided the bourgeoisie with the
conditions of their supremacy. But political economy, along with the
philosophical, social and natural-rights theories of the age of
Enlightenment, was above all a means for acquiring self-consciousness, a
formulation of the class consciousness of the bourgeoisie and as such a
precondition and impulse for the revolutionary act. Even in its palest
offshoots, the work of bourgeois world-renovation in Europe was fed by
the ideas of classical political economy. The bourgeoisie in England, in
its stormy period of struggle for free trade, with which it inaugurated
its supremacy on the world market, drew its weapons from the arsenal of
Smith and Ricardo. And even the reformers of the
Stein-Hardenberg-Scharnhorst era, who wanted to give Prussia’s feudal
plunder a more modern touch after the blows received at the battle of
Jena,⁵⁰ if only to enhance its capacity for survival, developed their
ideas from the doctrines of the English classics, so that the “young
German”⁵¹ political economist [Alexander von der] Marwitz could write in
1810 that along with Napoleon, Adam Smith was the most powerful ruler in
Europe.⁵²

If we understand then why political economy first arose some hundred and
fifty years ago, its later destiny becomes clear from the same point of
view. If political economy appears as a science of the particular laws
of the capitalist mode of production, its existence and function are
evidently linked to the existence of this, and lose their foundation
once this mode of production ceases to exist. In other words: political
economy as a science has played out its role as soon as the anarchic
economy of capitalism makes way for a planned economic order,
consciously organized and managed by the whole of working society. The
victory of the modern working class and the realization of socialism
accordingly mean the end of political economy as a science. This is
where a particular connection arises between political economy and the
class struggle of the modern proletariat.

If it is the task and object of political economy to explain the laws of
the origin, development and spread of the capitalist mode of production,
it is an unavoidable consequence that it must as a further consequence
also discover the laws of the decline of capitalism, which just like
previous economic forms is not of eternal duration, but is simply a
transitional phase of history, a rung on the endless ladder of social
development. The doctrine of the emergence of capitalism thus logically
turns into the doctrine of the decline of capitalism, the science of the
mode of production of capital into the scientific foundation of
socialism, the theoretical means of the bourgeoisie’s domination into a
weapon of the revolutionary class struggle for the liberation of the
proletariat.

This second part of the general problem of political economy has of
course not been solved by either French or English scholars from the
bourgeois class, still less their German counterparts. One man drew the
final consequences of the theory of the capitalist mode of production, a
man who stood from the start on the class position of the revolutionary
proletariat: Karl Marx. With this, socialism and the modern workers’
movement was placed for the first time on an unshakeable foundation of
scientific knowledge.

Socialism goes back for thousands of years, as the ideal of a social
order based on equality and the brotherhood of man, the ideal of a
communistic society. With the first apostles of Christianity, various
religious sects of the Middle Ages, and in the German peasants’ war, the
socialist idea always glistened as the most radical expression of rage
against the existing society. But in this ideal form, which could
commend itself to any social milieu at any time, socialism remained no
more than a golden fantasy, as unachievable as the appearance of the
rainbow against the background of clouds.

It was in the late eighteenth and early nineteenth century that the
socialist idea first appeared with vigor and force, freed from religious
enthusiasm, but rather as an opposition to the terror and devastation
that emerging capitalism wreaked on society. Yet this socialism too was
basically nothing but a dream, the invention of individual bold minds.
If we listen to the first forerunner of the revolutionary uprisings of
the proletariat, Gracchus Babeuf, who carried out an attempted coup
during the great French Revolution for the forcible introduction of
social equality,⁵³ the only fact on which he was able to base his
communist strivings was the gaping inequality of the existing social
order. He did not tire, in his passionate articles and pamphlets,
likewise in his speech in his own defense before the tribunal that
sentenced him to death, of painting this in the most dismal colors. His
gospel of socialism was a monotonous repetition of charges against the
inequality of the existing order, against the sufferings and pains, the
misery and humiliation, of the working masses, at whose expense a
handful of idle people grow rich and rule. It was enough for Babeuf that
the existing social order deserved to collapse, and it could in fact
have been overthrown a hundred years earlier if there had been a group
of determined men to seize state power and introduce a regime of
equality, as the Jacobins⁵⁴ of 1795 sought to seize political power and
introduce the republic.

The socialist ideas represented by the three great thinkers: [Claude
Henri] Saint-Simon and [Charles] Fourier in France, [Robert] Owen in
England, in the 1820s and 30s, with far greater genius and brilliance,
relied on quite different methods, but essentially rested on the same
foundation. Certainly, none of these three had in mind a revolutionary
seizure of power for the realization of socialism; on the contrary, they
were, like the whole generation that followed the great Revolution [of
1789], disappointed by all social overthrow and all politics, and avowed
supporters of purely peaceful propaganda methods. Yet the basis of the
socialist idea was the same for all three: in essence, this was simply
the project and invention of a mind of genius, who recommended its
realization to tortured humanity, in order to redeem them from the hell
of the bourgeois social order.

These socialist theories thus remained, despite the force of their
criticisms and the spell of their future ideals, without significant
influence on the real movements and struggles of contemporary history.
Babeuf and his handful of friends sank like a frail bark in the powerful
counter-revolutionary wash, without at first leaving any trace but a
short illuminating line on the pages of revolutionary history.
Saint-Simon and Fourier only founded sects of enthusiastic and talented
supporters, who after a while scattered or took new directions, after
they had spread rich and fertile stimulus in terms of social ideas,
criticisms and initiatives. It was Owen who had most effect on the mass
of the proletariat, yet even his influence, after inspiring an elite
troop of English workers in the 1830s and 40s, subsequently disappeared
without trace.

A new generation of socialist leaders emerged in the 1840s: [Wilhelm]
Weitling in Germany, [Pierre Joseph] Proudhon, Louis Blanc and Blanqui
in France. The working class, for its part, had already embarked on
struggle against the rule of capital, it had given the signal for class
struggle in the elemental insurrections of the Lyons silk weavers in
France,⁵⁵ and in the Chartist movement in England. But there was no
direct connection between these spontaneous stirrings of exploited
masses and the various socialist theories. The revolutionary proletarian
masses did not have a definite socialist goal in mind, nor did the
socialist theorists seek to base their ideas on a political struggle of
the working class. Their socialism was to be realized by cleverly
thought-out arrangements, such as Proudhon’s “people’s bank” for fair
exchange of goods, or Louis Blanc’s producer associations.⁵⁶ The only
socialist who counted on political struggle as a means to carry out the
social revolution was Blanqui, who was in this way the only genuine
representative of the proletariat and its revolutionary class interest
in this period. But his socialism was basically a project that was
achievable at any time, as the fruit of the determined will of a
revolutionary minority and a sudden overthrow that this would achieve.

The year 1848 was to see both the culmination and the crisis of this
earlier socialism in all its varieties. The Paris proletariat,
influenced by traditions of earlier revolutionary struggle and roused by
various socialist systems, passionately clung to the vague ideas of a
just social order. As soon as the bourgeois monarchy of Louis-Philippe
was toppled,⁵⁷ the Paris workers used their position of power to demand
from the terrified bourgeoisie the realization now of the “social
republic” and a new “organization of labor.” For the achievement of this
program, the proletariat afforded the provisional government the
celebrated timeframe of three months, during which time the workers
starved and waited, while the bourgeoisie and petty-bourgeoisie quietly
armed and prepared the subjection of the workers. The period ended with
the memorable butchery of June, in which the ideal of a “social
republic” achievable at any time was drowned in the streaming blood of
the Paris proletariat.⁵⁸ The revolution of 1848 did not introduce the
realm of social equality, but rather the political rule of the
bourgeoisie and an unprecedented upswing of capitalist exploitation
under the Second Empire.

At the same time, however, that socialism of the old schools seemed
buried forever beneath the demolished barricades of the June
insurrection, the socialist idea was placed on a completely new footing
by Marx and Engels. These two sought the basis for socialism not in
moral repugnance towards the existing social order nor in cooking up all
kinds of possible attractive and seductive projects, designed to smuggle
in social equality within the present state. They turned to the
investigation of the _economic_ relationships of present-day society.
Here, in the laws of capitalist anarchy itself, Marx discovered the real
starting-point for socialist efforts. If the French and English classics
of political economy had discovered the laws by which the capitalist
economy lived and developed, Marx took up their work half a century
later precisely at the point where they had broken this off. He
discovered for his part how these same laws of the present-day social
order acted towards their own downfall, by increasingly threatening the
existence of society with the spread of anarchy and forming a chain of
devastating economic and political catastrophes. It was thus, as Marx
showed, the developmental tendencies of the rule of capital itself that
at a certain stage of their maturity made necessary the transition to a
planned mode of production, consciously organized by the whole working
society, if the whole of society and human culture were not to collapse
in the convulsions of unleashed anarchy. And the rule of capital
hastened this fateful hour ever more energetically by bringing together
its future gravediggers, the proletarians, in ever greater masses, by
spreading itself over all corners of the earth, producing an anarchic
world economy and in this way creating the basis for the proletariat of
all countries to combine in a revolutionary world power for the
abolition of capitalist class rule. In this way socialism ceased to be a
project, a beautiful fantasy or even an experiment of particular groups
of workers in separate countries. As the common program of political
action of the international proletariat, socialism is _a historical
necessity_, since it is a fruit of the economic developmental tendencies
of capitalism.

It is clear then why Marx placed his own economic doctrine outside
official political economy, calling it a “critique of political
economy.” The laws of capitalist anarchy and its future downfall that
Marx brought to light are certainly a continuation of the political
economy that was created by bourgeois scholars, but a continuation whose
final results stand in very sharp contrast to the points of departure of
this. The Marxian doctrine is a child of political economy, but a child
that cost its mother her life. Political economy found its completion in
Marx’s theory, but also its conclusion as a science. What is still to
follow—apart from the detailed development of Marx’s doctrine—is simply
the transformation of this doctrine into action, i.e. the struggle of
the international proletariat for the realization of the socialist
economic order. The end of political economy as a science thus amounts
to a world historical act: its transformation into the practice of a
world economy organized according to a plan. The final chapter of
political-economic doctrine is the social revolution of the world
proletariat.

The particular connection between political economy and the modern
working class thereby proves to be a reciprocal relationship. If
political economy, as this was extended by Marx, is on the one hand more
than any other science the indispensable basis for proletarian
enlightenment, on the other hand the class-conscious proletariat of
today forms the only comprehending and receptive audience for the
doctrine of political economy. At an earlier time, it was only with the
decaying ruins of the old feudal society before their eyes that
[François] Quesnay and [Pierre] Boisguilbert in France, Adam Smith and
[David] Ricardo in England, full of pride and enthusiasm for the young
bourgeois society and with a firm belief in the impending thousand-year
rule of the bourgeoisie and its “natural” social harmony, fearlessly
directed their penetrating gaze into the depths of the laws of
capitalism.

Since then, the proletarian class struggle that has risen ever more
powerfully, and especially the June insurrection of the Paris
proletariat, has long since destroyed the faith of bourgeois society in
its divine mandate. Since it has eaten from the tree of knowledge of
modern class antagonisms, it shuns the classical nakedness in which it
showed itself to the creators of its own political economy. It is clear
today however that it was these scientific discoveries from which the
spokesmen for the modern proletariat drew their most deadly weapons.

For several decades now, therefore, it is not just socialist political
economy, but bourgeois political economy as well, in so far as this is
genuinely scientific, that finds a deaf ear among the possessing
classes. Unable to understand the teachings of their own great
ancestors, and still less to accept the Marxian teaching that emerged
from these and tolls the death knell of bourgeois society, today’s
bourgeois scholars produce under the name of political economy an
inchoate brew of garbage from all kinds of scientific ideas and
self-interested confusions, no longer pursuing the goal of investigating
the real tendencies of capitalism, but only striving for the opposite
aim of concealing these tendencies in order to defend capitalism as the
best, eternal, and only possible economic order.

Forgotten and betrayed by bourgeois society, scientific political
economy now seeks its audience only among the class-conscious
proletarians, finding with them not just theoretical understanding but
also vigorous fulfillment. It is political economy more than anything
else to which Lassalle’s well-known words apply: “If science and the
workers, these two opposite poles of society, embrace one another, they
will overwhelm in their arms all obstacles of civilization.”^(XVII)


III. MATERIAL ON ECONOMIC HISTORY (I)

_1_

Our knowledge of the earliest and most primitive economic forms is very
recent. In 1847, Marx and Engels wrote in the first classic proclamation
of scientific socialism, the _Communist Manifesto_, that “the history of
all hitherto existing society is the history of class struggles.”⁵⁹ But
around the very same time that the creators of scientific socialism
announced this notion, it began to be shaken by new discoveries on all
sides. Almost every year brought formerly unknown insights into the
ancient economic conditions of human society, leading to the conclusion
that there must have been enormous stretches of time in past history in
which there were not yet class struggles, since there was no division
into different social classes, no distinction between rich and poor, and
no private property.⁶⁰

In the years 1851 to 1853, the first of Georg Ludwig von Maurer’s
epoch-making works was published in Erlangen, the _Einleitung zur
Geschichte der Mark-, Hof-, Dorf- und Stadt-Verfassung und der
öffentlichen Gewalt_ [Introduction to the History of the Mark, Court,
Village and Town Constitution],⁶¹ casting a new light on the Germanic
past and the social and economic structure of the Middle Ages. Several
decades before, in some particular places—Germany, the Nordic countries
and Iceland—people had already stumbled upon remarkable survivals of
age-old agricultural arrangements that indicated the former existence of
common ownership of land in those places, the existence of an agrarian
communism. At first, however, no one knew what to make of these
survivals. According to an earlier point of view, widespread since the
writings of [Justus] Möser and [Nikolaus] Kindlinger, the cultivation of
the soil in Europe was undertaken by individual households, each of whom
was allocated a separate holding that was the household’s private
property. Only in the later Middle Ages, it was believed, were the
formerly scattered dwellings brought together into villages for the sake
of greater security, and the formerly separated household plots bundled
together as village ones. Improbable on closer consideration as this
notion appears, the most unbelievable thing is what has to be assumed
about its origin, i.e. that dwellings often quite far removed from one
another were torn down simply to rebuild them in a different place, and
further, that each person voluntarily gave up the convenient situation
of his private fields around his house, which he was free to cultivate
how he liked, in order to receive land that was divided into narrow
strips scattered across open fields, whose cultivation was completely
dependent on his fellow-villagers—unlikely as this theory was, it
continued all the same to prevail until the mid nineteenth century.
Maurer was the first to combine these various particular discoveries
into a bold and wide-ranging theory, and he demonstrated conclusively,
on the basis of immense factual material and the profoundest research in
old archives, proclamations and legal institutions, that common property
in land did not arise for the first time in the late Middle Ages, but
was rather the typical and general age-old form of the Germanic
settlements in Europe from the very beginning. Two thousand years ago
and still earlier, in that first misty age of the Germanic people, who
did not yet have any written history, the prevailing conditions were
fundamentally different from those of today. There was then among the
Germans no state with written obligatory laws, no divide between rich
and poor, rulers and workers. They formed free _tribes_ and _clans_,
which wandered across Europe for a long time until they settled first
temporarily and eventually permanently. The first cultivation of land in
Germany, as Maurer showed, was undertaken not by individuals, but by
whole clans and tribes, as it was in Iceland by larger societies known
as _frändalid_ and _skulldalid—_i.e. friendships and retinues.⁶² The
oldest information about the ancient Germans, which we have from the
Romans, authenticates this notion, as does the examination of
institutions that have survived. The first peoples who populated Germany
were migrating pastoralists. Like other nomads, stock raising and the
possession of rich meadows for this was their main concern. In the long
run, however, they could not exist without agriculture as well, as was
also the case with other migrant peoples old and new. And it was
precisely in this condition of nomadic economy mixed with agriculture,
yet with stock-raising still apparently their main activity and
cultivation something subordinate, that Julius Caesar found the Germanic
populations of the Suevi or Swabians.⁶³ Similar conditions, customs and
institutions were also noted among the Franks, Allemanni, Vandals⁶⁴ and
other Germanic tribes. All these Germanic populations settled as
coherent tribes and clans, rapidly cultivating the land and gathering
together whenever more powerful tribes pressed one way or another, or
their pasture was no longer sufficient. Only when the migrating tribes
had become peaceful and none of the others any longer pressed them, did
they remain for a longer time in these settlements and thus gradually
acquired fixed territories. This settling down, however, whether at an
earlier or a later date, whether on virgin land or on former Roman or
Slavic possessions, took place by whole tribes and clans. In this
process, each tribe, and each clan within a tribe, took over a
particular area, which then belonged in common to everyone involved. The
ancient Germans did not know any _meum_ and _tuum_⁶⁵ in connection with
land. Each clan rather formed as it settled a so-called mark community,
which cultivated, partitioned and worked in common the land that it
held. Each individual received by lot a share of the fields, which he
was only given to use for a definite time, the strictest equality being
observed in this sharing of the land. All economic, legal and general
affairs of these mark communities, which generally also formed a
“hundred” of arms-bearing men, were handled by the assembly of mark
members itself, and this also chose the mark leader and other public
officials.

It was only in mountain, forest or marshy districts, where lack of space
or cultivable land made denser settlement impossible, as for example in
the Odenwald,⁶⁶ Westphalia and the Alps, that the Germans settled as
individual households. Yet these too formed into communities, with
meadows, woods and pastures rather than fields being the common property
of the whole village, the so-called “common land” (_Allmende_), and all
public affairs being dealt with by the mark community.

The tribe, as the ensemble of many such mark communities, generally
around a hundred, most often came into play only as the highest judicial
and military unit. This mark-community organization, as Maurer showed in
the twelve volumes of his great work, formed the foundation as well as
the smallest cell of the whole social network, from the very start of
the Middle Ages through to quite recent modern times, with feudal
manors, villages and towns, in different modifications, all emerging out
of it, and its ruins can be seen right to the present day in certain
districts of Central and Northern Europe.

When the first discoveries of age-old common property in land in Germany
and the Nordic countries became known, the theory was put forward that
this was a particular and specifically Germanic institution, which could
only be explained in terms of the particularities of the Germanic
national character. Although Maurer himself was quite free from this
national view of Germanic agricultural communism, and pointed out
similar examples among other peoples, it generally remained a fixed
assertion in Germany that the old rural mark community was a peculiarity
of Germanic public and legal relations, an emanation of the “Germanic
spirit.” Yet almost at the same time as Maurer’s first publications on
the ancient village communism of the Germans, new discoveries came to
light in a quite different part of the European continent. Between 1847
and 1852, the Westphalian Baron von Haxthausen, who had traveled in
Russia in the early 1840s at the invitation of Tsar Nicholas I,
published in Berlin his _Studien über die inneren Zustände, das
Volksleben und insbesondere die ländlichen Einrichtungen Russlands_
[Studies on the Internal Conditions of Russia, the Life of its People
and Especially its Rural Institutions].⁶⁷ From this work the world
learned to its astonishment that in the east of Europe fully analogous
institutions still persisted. The age-old village communism, whose ruins
in Germany had to be unveiled with difficulty from the overlays of later
centuries and millennia, was suddenly found alive and kicking in the
enormous empire to the east. In both the book mentioned above, and in
his later work published in 1866 in Leipzig on _Die ländliche Verfassung
Russlands_ [The Rural Constitution of Russia],⁶⁸ Haxthausen demonstrated
that the Russian peasants knew nothing of private property in fields,
meadows and woods, the village as a whole being the real owner of these,
while individual peasant families obtained only temporary use of parcels
of land—by drawing lots just as with the ancient Germans.⁶⁹ In Russia,
at the time when von Haxthausen traveled and investigated, serfdom was
still in full force, and at first glance it was thus all the more
striking that under the rigid surface of a harsh serfdom and a despotic
state apparatus the Russian village presented a little closed-off world
unto itself, with rural communism and the communal handling of all
public affairs by the village assembly, the _mir_.⁷⁰ The German
discoverer of these peculiarities explained the Russian rural commune as
a product of the ancient Slavic family community, as this is still found
among the southern Slavs of the Balkan countries and as it fully existed
in the Russian law books of the twelfth century and later. Haxthausen’s
discovery was seized on with jubilation by a whole intellectual and
political tendency in Russia, by _Slavophilism_.⁷¹ This tendency, bent
on a glorification of the Slavic world and its particularities, its
“unspent force” as against the “lazy West” with its Germanic culture,
found in the communist institutions of the Russian peasant community its
strongest point of support over the next two or three decades.⁷²
Depending on the respective reactionary or revolutionary branch that
Slavophilism divided into, the rural community was seen either as one of
the three authentic basic Slavic institutions of Russiandom: Greek
Orthodox belief, tsarist absolutism, and peasant-patriarchal village
communism, or conversely as a suitable point of support for introducing
a socialist revolution in Russia in the immediate future, and thus
making much earlier than in Western Europe the leap directly into the
promised land of socialism.⁷³ The opposing poles of Slavophilism both
completely agreed, however, that the Russian rural community was a
specifically Slavic phenomenon, explicable in terms of the particular
national character of the Slavic tribes.

In the meantime, another moment in the history of the European nations
had appeared, bringing them into contact with new regions of the world
and making them very perceptibly aware of particular public institutions
and age-old cultural forms that belonged neither to the Germanic nor to
the Slavic orbit. This time it was not a matter of scientific
investigations and learned discoveries, but rather the heavy-handed
interests of the European capitalist states and their experiences in
practical _colonial policy_. In the nineteenth century, in the age of
capitalism, European colonial policy struck out on new paths. It was no
longer, as in the sixteenth century with the first attack on the New
World, a matter of the speediest plunder of the treasures and natural
wealth of the newly discovered tropical lands in terms of precious
metals, spices, valuable adornments and slaves, in which the Spanish and
Portuguese had achieved so much. Nor was it a matter of important
opportunities for trade, with various raw materials from overseas
countries being imported for the European market, and valueless trash
and plunder being pressed on the indigenous peoples of these countries,
in which the Dutch of the seventeenth century were the pioneers and
served as a model for the English. Now, as well as these earlier methods
of colonization, which are still in full bloom here and there today and
have never gone out of style, we had a new method of more persistent and
systematic exploitation of the population of the colonies for the
enrichment of the “home country.” This was designed to serve two
purposes: first, the actual seizure of land as the most important
material source of wealth in each country, and second, the continuous
taxation of the broad mass of the population. In this double effort, the
European colonial powers necessarily came up against a remarkable
rock-hard obstacle in all these exotic lands, i.e. the particular
property institutions of the indigenous peoples, which opposed a most
stubborn resistance to plundering by the Europeans. In order to seize
land from the hands of its former proprietors, it was first necessary to
establish who these proprietors were. In order not just to decree taxes,
but also to be able to collect them, it had to be established who was
liable for such taxes. Here the Europeans in their colonies came upon
relationships quite foreign to them, which directly overturned all their
notions of the sanctity of private property. The English in South Asia
had the same experience of this as the French did in North Africa.

The conquest of India by the English, begun in the early seventeenth
century with the gradual seizure of the entire coastline and Bengal,
only ended in the nineteenth century with the subjection of the highly
important Punjab in the north. After political subjection, however, came
the difficult work of the systematic exploitation of India. Everywhere
they went, the English experienced the greatest surprise: they found the
most varied peasant communities, large and small, which had occupied the
land for millennia, cultivating rice and living in quiet, orderly
conditions, but—oh horror!—no private owner of the land was to be found
anywhere in these tranquil villages. No matter whom you asked, no one
could call the land or the parcel he worked _his own_, i.e. no one was
allowed to sell, lease, mortgage it or pawn it for arrears of taxation.
All the members of these communities, which sometimes embraced whole
large clans, sometimes only a few families who had branched off from the
clan, stuck doggedly together, and ties of blood were everything to
them, while individual ownership was nothing. Indeed, the English to
their amazement were forced to discover on the banks of the Indus and
the Ganges similar models of rural communism against which even the
communist customs of the ancient Germanic mark or Slavic village
community seemed almost like the fall into private property.

As the English tax authorities reported from India in 1845, “We can see
no permanent shares. Each possesses the share that he cultivates only as
long as the agricultural work continues. If a share is left untilled, it
falls back into common land and can be taken over by anyone else, on
condition that he cultivates it.”^(XVIII)

At the same time, a government report on the administration of Punjab
from 1849 to 1851 stated:

It is highly interesting to observe how strong the sentiment of blood
kinship is in this community, and the consciousness of stemming from a
common ancestor. Public opinion so strictly insists on the maintenance
of this system that we not uncommonly see how persons are allowed into
it even if their ancestors had not participated in this common ownership
for one or even two generations.^(XIX)

“With this form of possession of land,” wrote the report of the English
state council on the Indian clan community, “no member of the clan can
prove that he owns this or that part of the common land, but only that
he possesses it for temporary use. The products of the common economy
are placed in a common bank, from which all needs are met.”^(XX) Here,
therefore, we have no distribution of the fields at all, even for the
agricultural season; the peasants of the community possess and work
their fields undividedly and in common, they bring the harvest into a
common village store, which the capitalist eye of the English had to see
as a “bank,” and fraternally meet their modest needs from the fruits of
their common labor. In the northwestern corner of the Punjab, close to
the border with Afghanistan, other very remarkable customs were
encountered, which scorned any notion of private property. Here, while
the fields were indeed divided and even periodically changed around, it
was not—what a miracle!—individual families that exchanged their plots
with one another, instead whole villages rotated their land every five
years, with the whole community migrating. As the English tax
commissioner James wrote from India in 1852 to his superiors: “I cannot
fail to mention a most peculiar custom that has persisted in some
districts until today: I mean the periodic exchange of lands between
individual villages and their subsections. In some districts only fields
are exchanged, in others even dwelling houses.”^(XXI)

Once again, therefore, we have the particular characteristics of a
certain family of peoples, this time an “Indian” peculiarity. The
communist institutions of the Indian village community, however,
indicate their traditional age-old character both by their geographical
location and particularly by the strength of blood ties and kinship
relations. It was precisely the earliest forms of communism preserved in
the oldest inhabited parts of India, the north-west, that clearly
indicated the conclusion that communal property along with strong ties
of kinship was attributable to thousand-year-old customs, linked with
the first settlements of the immigrant Indians in their new home,
present-day India. Sir Henry Maine, professor of comparative law at
Oxford and former member of the government of India, took the Indian
rural community as the subject of his lectures as early as 1871,⁷⁴
placing it alongside the mark communities that Maurer had demonstrated
in Germany and [Erwin] von Nasse in England,⁷⁵ as age-old institutions
of the same character as the Germanic rural communities.

The venerable age of these communist institutions also struck the amazed
English in a further way, i.e. by the stubbornness with which they
resisted the tax and administration skills of the colonizers. It took a
struggle of decades, with every kind of coup de main, enormity, and
unscrupulous attack on the people’s old laws and prevailing notions of
right, before they could bring about an incurable confusion of all
property relations, general insecurity and the ruin of the great mass of
peasants. The old ties were broken, the quiet seclusion of village
communism torn asunder and replaced by discord, disharmony, inequality
and exploitation. The result was enormous _latifundia_ on the one hand,
and an immense mass of millions of dispossessed peasant tenants on the
other. Private property celebrated its entry in India, and with it
typhus and scurvy due to hunger became a constant presence in the
marshes of the Ganges.

But even if, in the wake of the discoveries of the English colonizers in
India, this ancient rural communism, already now found among three such
major branches of the great Indo-Germanic family of peoples—Germanic,
Slavic and Indian—was seen as an ancient peculiarity of the
Indo-Germanic group of peoples, uncertain as this ethnographic concept
may be, the concurrent discoveries of the French in Africa already went
far beyond this orbit. What we had here were discoveries that showed
among the Arabs and Berbers of North Africa exactly the same
institutions as had been found at the heart of Europe and on the Asian
continent.

Among the Arabic nomadic herdsmen, land was the property of the clan.
This clan property, so the French scholar [Rodolpho] Dareste wrote in
1852,⁷⁶ was handed down from generation to generation, and no individual
Arab could point to a piece of land and say: This is mine.

Among some branches of the Kabyles,⁷⁷ who had been completely Arabized,
the clan associations had already very much decayed, yet the power of
the clans still remained strong: they took common responsibility for
taxes; they bought livestock together for division among the different
branches of a family as food; in all disputes over possession of land
the clan council was the highest authority; settlement among the Kabyles
always required the agreement of the clans; and the clan council
likewise disposed of uncultivated lands. The prevailing rule, however,
was the undivided property of a family, which did not just include in
the present-day European sense an individual couple, but was rather a
typically patriarchal family, like that of the ancient Israelites as
described in the Bible—a large circle of kinship, consisting of father,
mother, sons and their wives, children and grandchildren, uncles, aunts,
nephews and cousins. In this circle, said another French researcher,
[Aristide] Letourneux, in 1873,⁷⁸ it was the custom for the oldest
family member to dispose of the undivided property, though he was in
fact _chosen_ for this office by the family, while in all more important
cases, in particular where the sale and purchase of land was involved,
the whole family council had to be consulted.

This was the situation with the population of Algeria at the time that
the French colonized it. France had the same experience in North Africa
as the English had in India. Everywhere, the European colonial policy
met with stubborn resistance on the part of age-old social associations
and their communistic institutions, which protected individuals from the
exploitative grip of European capital and European financial policy.

At the same time as these new discoveries, a half-forgotten memory from
the first days of European colonialism and its quest for booty in the
New World now appeared in a new light. The yellowed chronicles of the
Spanish state archives and monasteries preserved the curious tale from
centuries ago of the miraculous South American country where already in
the age of the great discoveries the Spanish conquistadores had found
the most remarkable institutions. The hazy reports of this South
American land of marvels found their way into European literature
already in the seventeenth and eighteenth centuries, reports of the
empire of the Incas, which the Spanish had discovered in what is now
Peru and where the people lived with complete common property under the
paternal theocratic government of generous despots. The fantastic ideas
of this legendary communist realm in Peru persisted so stubbornly that
in 1875 a German writer could refer to the Inca kingdom as “almost
unique in human history” in being a social monarchy on a theocratic
foundation, in which “the greater part of what the Social Democrats
strive for today as their conceived ideal, but at no time have
achieved,” was carried out in practice.^(XXII) In the meantime, however,
more exact material on this remarkable land and its customs had
appeared.

In 1840, an important original report by Alonzo de Zurita, one-time
auditor to the royal council in Mexico, on administration and agrarian
relations in the former Spanish colonies, was published in French
translation.⁷⁹ And in the mid-nineteenth century, even the Spanish
government was stirred to rescue old information about the conquest and
administration of Spain’s American possessions from the archives and
bring it to light. This made a new and important documentary
contribution to the material on social conditions of ancient
precapitalist stages of culture in overseas lands.

Already on the basis of Zurita’s reports, the Russian scholar Maksim
Kovalevsky concluded in the 1870s that the legendary realm of the Incas
in Peru had been simply a country in which the same age-old agrarian
communist relations prevailed that Maurer had already found in many
places among the ancient Germans, and that were the predominant form not
just in Peru but also in Mexico and throughout the new regions of the
world conquered by the Spanish. Later publications made possible an
exact investigation of the old Peruvian agrarian relations, and revealed
a new picture of primitive rural communism—again in a new part of the
world, among a different race, at a quite different cultural stage and
in a quite different era, than had been the case with previous
discoveries.

Here we had an age-old agrarian communist constitution, which—prevailing
from time immemorial among the Peruvian tribes—was still fully alive and
well at the time of the Spanish invasion. Here too, a kinship
association, the clan, was the only proprietor of the land in each
village, or in a few villages together, and here too, the arable land
was divided into lots and distributed annually by lot to the members of
the village; here too public affairs were settled by the village
community, which also elected the village head. Indeed, on the distant
continent of South America, among the Amerindians, living traces were
found of a communism so far-reaching as seemed quite unknown in Europe:
there were immense common buildings, where whole clans lived in common
quarters with a common burial place. It was said of one such quarter
that it was occupied by more than 4,000 men and women. The capital of
the so-called Inca emperor, the town of Cuzco, consisted of several such
common quarters, each of which bore the particular name of a clan.⁸⁰

From the mid-nineteenth century, therefore, through to the 1870s, a
wealth of material came to light that eroded and soon tore to shreds the
old idea of the eternal character of private property and its existence
from the beginning of the world. After agrarian communism had been
discovered as a peculiarity of the Germanic people, then as something
Slavic, Indian, Arab-Kabyle, or ancient Mexican, as the marvel state of
the Peruvian Inca and in many more “specific” races of people in all
parts of the world, the conclusion was unavoidable that this village
communism was not at all a “peculiarity” of a particular race of people
or part of the world, but rather the general and typical form of human
society at a certain level of cultural development. The first reaction
of official bourgeois science, i.e. political economy, was obstinately
to resist this knowledge. The English school of Smith and Ricardo, which
prevailed throughout Europe in the first half of the nineteenth century,
simply denied the possibility of common property in land. Just as
earlier on the crude ignorance and narrow-mindedness of the first
Spanish, Portuguese, French and Dutch conquerors in newly discovered
America completely failed to understand the agrarian relations of the
indigenous population, and in the absence of private owners simply
declared the whole land “property of the emperor,” available to the
exchequer, so in the age of bourgeois “enlightenment,” the great
luminaries of political-economic learning proceeded in the same way. In
the seventeenth century, for example, the French missionary
[Jean-Antoine] Dubois wrote about the Indians: “The Indians possess no
property in land. The fields that they work are the property of the
Mongol government.”⁸¹ And a medical doctor of the Montpellier faculty,
François Bernier, who traveled the lands of the great Mogul in Asia and
published in Amsterdam in 1699 a very well-known description of these
countries, exclaimed in amazement: “These three states, Turkey, Persia,
and India, have denied the concept of _meum_ and _tuum_ in relation to
the ownership of land, a concept that is the foundation of everything
fine and good in the world.”⁸² Exactly this same crass ignorance and
lack of understanding of everything that appeared different from
capitalist culture was shown by the scholar James Mill, father of the
celebrated John Stuart Mill, when he wrote in his history of British
India: “On the basis of all the facts we have considered, we can only
reach one conclusion, that landownership in India fell to the conqueror,
for if we were to assume that he was not the landowner, we would not be
in a position to say who the owner was.”⁸³

The idea that ownership of land simply belonged to the Indian peasant
communities who had worked it for millennia, that there could be a
country, a great social culture, in which land was not a means for
exploiting the labor of others, but simply the foundation of the
existence of working people themselves, was something that the brain of
a great scholar of the English bourgeoisie was unable to accept. This
almost touching limitation of the intellectual horizon to the four walls
of the capitalist economy only shows that the official science of the
bourgeois enlightenment has an infinitely narrower horizon and
cultural-historical understanding than the Romans had two thousand years
ago, with their generals like Caesar, and historians like Tacitus,
handing down to us extremely valuable insights and descriptions on the
economic and social relations of the Germanic barbarians that they saw
as strange and savage.

Just as today, so previously too, bourgeois political economy as the
intellectual defense forces of the prevailing form of exploitation had
less understanding than any other science of different forms of culture
and economy, and it was reserved for branches of science that were
somewhat more removed from the direct conflict of interest and struggle
between capital and labor, to recognize in the communist institutions of
earlier times a generally prevailing form of economic and cultural
development at a certain stage. It was jurists such as Maurer and
Kovalevsky, and the English law professor and state councilor for India,
Sir Henry Maine, who first came to understand agrarian communism as an
international primitive form of development that appeared among all
races and in all parts of the world. And it was a legally trained
sociologist, the American Lewis Henry Morgan, who discovered the
necessary social structure of primitive society as the basis for this
economic form.⁸⁴

The great role of kinship ties among the ancient communist village
communities struck scholars, both in India and in Algeria, as well as
among the Slavs. In the wake of Maurer’s studies, it was established in
the case of the Germans that it was always in the form of clans, i.e.
kinship groups, that they pursued their settlement in Europe. The
history of the antique Greeks and Romans showed all along the line that
the clan had always played the greatest role for them, as a social
group, an economic unit, a legal institution and a closed circle of
religious practice. Finally, almost all reports of travelers in
so-called savage countries agreed remarkably on the fact that, the more
primitive a people was, the greater the role of kinship ties in the life
of that people, and the more that these governed their economic, social
and religious relations and ideas.⁸⁵

Scientific research was thus presented with a new and highly important
problem. What actually were these kinship ties that were so important in
ancient times, how had they come to be formed, what was their connection
with economic communism and economic development in general? On all
these questions, it was Morgan who first offered an insight in his
epoch-making book _Ancient Society_. Morgan, who had spent a large part
of his life among an Indian tribe of Iroquois in the state of New York,
and had made a most thorough study of the conditions of this primitive
hunting people, came by comparing his own results with facts known about
other primitive peoples to a new and wide-ranging theory about the forms
of development of human society over the immense expanses of time that
preceded any historical information. Morgan’s pioneering ideas, which
retain their full validity today despite the wealth of new material that
has since appeared and corrected several details of his presentation,
can be summarized as follows.

1. Morgan was the first to bring scientific order into prehistoric
cultural history, both by defining its particular stages and also by
revealing the underlying driving force of this development. Until then,
the immense temporal extents of social life that preceded any written
history, as well as the social relations of the primitive peoples still
living today, with all their motley wealth of forms and stages, formed
an uncharted chaos, from which only individual chapters and fragments
had been brought to light by scientific research here and there. In
particular, the descriptions “savagery” and “barbarism,” which were
customarily used as a summary description of these conditions, had only
a meaning as _negative_ concepts, descriptions of the lack of everything
that was considered characteristic of “civilization,” i.e. of
well-mannered human life as seen through contemporary eyes. From this
point of view, properly mannered social life, appropriate to human
dignity, began only with those conditions described in written history.
Everything that belonged to “savagery” and “barbarism” indifferently
formed only an inferior and embarrassing stage prior to civilization, a
half-animal existence which present-day civilized humanity could only
regard with condescending disparagement. Just as the official
representatives of the Christian church regard all primitive and
pre-Christian religions as simply a long series of errors in the quest
of humanity for the only true religion, so for the political economists
all primitive forms of economy were merely unsuccessful attempts that
preceded the discovery of the one true form of economy: that of private
property and exploitation with which written history and civilization
begins. Morgan dealt this conception a decisive blow by portraying the
whole of primitive cultural history as an equally valid—indeed an
infinitely more important—part in the uninterrupted developmental
sequence of humanity, infinitely more important both on account of its
infinitely longer duration in comparison with the tiny section of
written history, and also on account of the decisive acquisitions of
culture that were made precisely in that long dawn of human social
existence. By filling the descriptions “savagery,” “barbarism” and
“civilization” for the first time with a positive content, Morgan made
them into precise scientific concepts and applied them as tools of
scientific research. For Morgan, savagery, barbarism and civilization
are three sections of cultural development, separated from each other by
quite particular material characteristics, and themselves each breaking
down into a lower, middle and upper stage, which again are distinguished
by particular concrete achievements and advances. Pedantic know-alls
today may rail that the middle stage of savagery could not simply begin,
as Morgan believed, with fishing, the upper stage with the invention of
the bow and arrow, and so on, since in several cases the sequence was
the other way round, and in other cases was dependent on natural
conditions—objections that can indeed be made against any historical
classification, if this is conceived as a rigid schema of absolute
validity, an iron fetter on knowledge instead of a living and flexible
guideline. Morgan’s epoch-making service remains exactly the same, that
he originated the investigation of prehistory with this first scientific
classification of preconditions, just as it is Linnaeus’s service to
have supplied the first scientific classification of plants. Yet there
is one great difference. [Carl] Linnaeus, as we well know, took as the
basis of his systematization of plants a very usable but purely external
characteristic—the sexual organs of plants—and this first makeshift had
later, as Linnaeus himself well recognized, to make way for a deeper
natural classification from the standpoint of the developmental history
of the plant world. Morgan, on the contrary, made his most fruitful
contribution to research precisely by the choice of the basic principle
on which he built his system: he made the starting point of his
classification the proposition that it is the kind of social labor,
_production_, that in each historical epoch from the first beginnings of
culture plays the main role in determining human social relations, and
that its decisive advances are likewise so many milestones in this
development.

2. Morgan’s second great achievement bears on the family relations of
primitive society. Here too, on the basis of comprehensive material that
he obtained by an international survey, he laid down the first
scientifically founded sequence of developmental forms of the family,
from the earliest forms of quite primitive society through to today’s
prevailing monogamy—i.e. legally established permanent marriage of a
single couple, with the dominant position of the man. Of course, here
too material has emerged to require several corrections of detail to
Morgan’s developmental schema of the family. The basic lines of his
system, however, as the first ladder of human family forms derived
strictly from the idea of development, from the grey of prehistory
through to the present, remain a lasting contribution to the treasury of
social science. This area, too, Morgan enriched not simply by his
systematic conception, but also by a fundamental idea of genius about
the relationship between the family relations of a society and its
prevailing kinship system. Morgan was the first to draw attention to the
striking fact that among many primitive peoples the actual relations of
sexuality and descent, i.e. the actual family, do not coincide with the
kinship categories that people ascribe one another, or with the
reciprocal duties that derive from these ascriptions. He was the first
to find an explanation for this puzzling phenomenon purely in
materialist and dialectical terms. “The family,” he says, “represents an
active principle. It is never stationary, but advances from a lower to a
higher form as society advances from a lower to a higher
condition.… Systems of consanguinity, on the contrary, are passive;
recording the progress made by the family at long intervals apart, and
only changing radically when the family has radically changed.”⁸⁶

We find, then, that among primitive peoples, systems of consanguinity
remain valid that correspond to an earlier and already superseded form
of family, just as people’s ideas and notions generally remain tied for
a long while to conditions that have been superseded by the actual
material development of society.

3. On the basis of the developmental history of family relations, Morgan
offered the first exhaustive investigation of the ancient clan
associations that are found at the beginning of historical tradition
among all civilized peoples—among the Greeks and Romans, the Celts and
Germans, the ancient Israelites—and that still exist among most
primitive peoples that survive today. He showed that these associations
resting on blood relationship and common descent are on the one hand
only a high stage in the development of the family, while on the other
hand they are the basis of the whole social life of peoples—in those
long stretches of time when there was not yet a state in the modern
sense, i.e. no organization of political compulsion on a fixed
territorial basis. Each tribe, which itself consisted of a certain
number of clan associations, or, as the Romans called them, _gentes_,
had its own territory, which belonged to it as a whole, and in each
tribe the clan association was the unit in which a common household was
run communistically, in which there were no rich and poor, no idlers and
workers, no masters and slaves, and where all public affairs were dealt
with by the free vote and decision of all. As a living example of these
relations that all peoples of present-day civilization went through,
Morgan described in detail the _gens_⁸⁷ organization of the American
Indians, which was in full bloom at the time of the conquest of America
by the Europeans:

All the members of an Iroquois gens were personally free, and they were
bound to defend each other’s freedom; they were equal in privileges and
in personal rights, the sachem and chiefs claiming no superiority; and
they were a brotherhood bound together by the ties of kin. Liberty,
equality, and fraternity, though never formulated, were cardinal
principles of the gens. These facts are material, because the gens was
the unit of a social and governmental system, the foundation upon which
Indian society was organized. A structure composed of such units would
of necessity bear the impress of their character, for as the unit so the
compound. It serves to explain that sense of independence and personal
dignity universally an attribute of Indian character.⁸⁸

4. The gentile organization led social development to the threshold of
civilization, which Morgan characterizes as that brief recent epoch of
cultural history in which private property arose on the ruins of
communism and with it a public organization of compulsion: the state and
the exclusive dominance of man over woman in the state, in property
right and in the family. In this relatively brief historical period fall
the greatest and most rapid advances in production, science and art, but
also the deepest fissure of society by class antagonism, the greatest
misery for the mass of the people and their greatest enslavement. Here
is Morgan’s own judgment on our present-day civilization, with which he
concludes the results of his classical investigation:

Since the advent of civilization, the outgrowth of property has been so
immense, its forms so diversified, its uses so expanding and its
management so intelligent in the interests of its owners, that it has
become, on the part of the people, an unmanageable power. The human mind
stands bewildered in the presence of its own creation. The time will
come, nevertheless, when human intelligence will rise to the mastery
over property, and define the relations of the state to the property it
protects, as well as the obligations and the limits of the rights of its
owners. The interests of society are paramount to individual interests,
and the two must be brought into just and harmonious relations. A mere
property career is not the final destiny of mankind, if progress is to
be the law of the future as it has been of the past. The time which has
passed away since civilization began is but a fragment of the past
duration of man’s existence; and but a fragment of the ages yet to come.
The dissolution of society bids fair to become the termination of a
career of which property is the end and aim; because such a career
contains the elements of self-destruction. Democracy in government,
brotherhood in society, equality in rights and privileges, and universal
education, foreshadow the next higher plane of society to which
experience, intelligence and knowledge are steadily tending. It will be
a revival, in a higher form, of the liberty, equality and fraternity of
the ancient gentes.⁸⁹

Morgan’s achievement had wide-ranging significance for the knowledge of
economic history. He placed the ancient communistic economy, which up
till then had only been discovered in isolated individual cases and not
explained, on the broad footing of a consistent and general cultural
development, and particularly of the gens constitution. Primitive
communism, with the democracy and social equality that went together
with it, were thereby shown to be the cradle of social development. By
this expansion of the horizon of the prehistoric past, he showed the
whole present-day civilization, with private property, class rule, male
supremacy, state compulsion and compulsory marriage, as simply a brief
transition phase that, just as it arose itself from the dissolution of
age-old communist society, is bound to make way in turn in the future
for higher social forms. In this way, however, Morgan gave powerful new
support to scientific socialism. While Marx and Engels showed by way of
the economic analysis of capitalism the unavoidable historical
transition of society to the communist world economy in the very near
future, thus giving socialist efforts a firm scientific basis, Morgan in
a certain sense supplied the work of Marx and Engels⁹⁰ with a full and
powerful underpinning, by demonstrating that a communist and democratic
society, even if in different and more primitive forms, embraced the
whole long past of human cultural history prior to present-day
civilization. In this way, the noble survivals of the dim past offered a
hand to the revolutionary efforts of the future, the circle of knowledge
was harmoniously closed, and from this perspective the present-day world
of class rule and exploitation, which presented itself as the one and
only world of civilization, the highest aim of world history, appeared
as a tiny transitional stage on the great forward march of human
culture.⁹¹

_2_

Morgan’s “ancient society” formed as it were a subsequent introduction
to the _Communist Manifesto_ of Marx and Engels. It was only natural
that it should provoke a reaction in bourgeois science. Within two or
three decades from the mid-nineteenth century, the concept of primitive
communism made its entry into science on all sides. As long as it was a
question of honorable “Germanic antiquity,” “Slavic tribal
peculiarities’, or the historical excavation of the Peruvian Inca state
and the like, these discoveries did not overstep the realm of scientific
curiosities, without contemporary significance or any direct connection
to the interests and struggles of today’s bourgeois society. So much so
that staunch conservative or moderately liberal statesmen such as Ludwig
von Maurer or Sir Henry Maine could claim the greatest merit for these
discoveries. Soon, however, such a connection was established, in two
different directions. Colonial policy, as we have seen, involved a
collision of palpable material interests between the bourgeois world and
primitive communist conditions. The more that the capitalist regime
began to establish itself as all-powerful in Western Europe after the
mid-nineteenth century, in the wake of the storms of the February
revolution of 1848, the sharper this collision grew. At the same time,
and precisely after the February revolution, a new enemy within the camp
of bourgeois society, the revolutionary workers’ movement, played an
ever-greater role. After the June days of 1848 in Paris, the “red
specter” never again vanished from the public stage, and in 1871 it
reappeared in the dazzling light of the struggle of the Commune, to the
fury of the French and international bourgeoisie. In the light of these
brutal class struggles, primitive communism as the latest discovery of
scientific research showed a dangerous face. The bourgeoisie, clearly
affected in their class interests, scented an obscure connection between
the ancient communist survivals that put up stubborn resistance in the
colonial countries to the forward march of the profit-hungry
“Europeanization” of the indigenous peoples, and the new gospel of
revolutionary impetuousness of the proletarian mass in the old
capitalist countries. When the French National Assembly was deciding the
fate of the unfortunate Arabs of Algeria in 1873, with a law on the
compulsory introduction of private property,⁹² it was repeatedly said,
in a gathering where the cowardice and bloodlust of the conquerors of
the Paris Commune still trembled, that the ancient common property of
the Arabs must at any cost be destroyed, “as a form that supports
communist tendencies in people’s minds.”⁹³ In Germany, meanwhile, the
glories of the new German Empire, the “founders’ time”⁹⁴ and the first
capitalist crash of the 1870s,⁹⁵ with Bismarck’s “blood and iron” regime
and the anti-Socialist law,⁹⁶ greatly inflamed class struggles and made
even scientific research uncomfortable. The unmatched growth of German
Social Democracy,⁹⁷ as the theories of Marx and Engels become flesh,
sharpened to an extraordinary degree the class instinct of bourgeois
science in Germany, and a reaction against the theories of primitive
communism now set in most forcefully. Cultural historians such as
[Julius] Lippert and [Heinrich] Schurtz, political economists such as
[Karl] Bücher, sociologists such as [Carl Nicolai] Starcke, [Edward]
Westermarck and [Ernst] Grosse, now united in a keen combat against the
doctrine of primitive communism, and particularly Morgan’s theory of the
development of the family and the previously universal prevalence of a
kinship constitution with equality between the sexes and general
democracy. This Herr Starcke, for example, in his _Primitive Familie_ of
1888,^(XXIII) called Morgan’s hypotheses about kinship systems a “crazy
dream … not to say a feverish delusion.”^(XXIV) But more serious
scholars, too, such as Lippert, author of the best cultural history that
we have, took the field against Morgan. Basing themselves on obsolete
and superficial reports of eighteenth-century missionaries who were
completely untrained in economics or ethnology, and themselves quite
ignorant of Morgan’s wide-ranging studies, Lippert described the
economic conditions of the North American Indians, the very same people
whose life with its finely developed social organization Morgan had
penetrated more thoroughly than anyone else, as evidence that among
hunting peoples in general there is no common regulation of production
and no “provision” for the totality and for the future, rather nothing
but a lack of regulation and consciousness. The foolish distortion by
narrow-minded European missionaries of the communist institutions that
actually existed among the Indians of North America was taken over by
Lippert quite uncritically, as shown for example by the following
quotation he offers from the history of the mission of the Evangelical
Brothers among the Indians of North America by [Georg Heinrich] Loskiel
in 1789. “Many among them” (the American Indians), says our excellently
oriented missionary,

are so lethargic that they do not plant for themselves, but rather rely
completely on others’ not refusing to share their stores with them.
Since in this way the more diligent do not benefit from their work any
more than the idlers, as time goes on ever less is planted. If a hard
winter comes, so that deep snow prevents them from going hunting, it is
easy for a general famine to arise, which often leads to many people
dying. Hunger then leads them to eat the roots of grass and the inner
bark of trees, particularly of young oaks.⁹⁸

“By a natural connection, therefore,” Lippert adds to the words of his
source, “the relapse into earlier carelessness leads to a relapse to an
earlier way of life.” And in this Indian society, in which no one “may
refuse” to share his store of provisions with others, and in which an
“Evangelical Brother” constructs in a quite evidently arbitrary fashion
the inevitable division between the “diligent” and the “idlers” along
European lines, Lippert finds the best proof _against_ primitive
communism:

Still less at such a stage does the older generation care to equip the
younger generation for life. The Indian is already far removed from
primitive man. As soon as someone has a tool, he has the concept of
ownership, but only limited to this. This concept the Indian already has
at the lower stage; _but in this primitive ownership any communist trait
is lacking; the development begins with the opposite_.^(XXV) [Emphasis
R.L.]

Professor Bücher opposed to the primitive communist economy his “theory
of individual search for food” on the part of primitive peoples, and the
“immeasurable stretches of time” in which “people existed without
working.”^(XXVI) For the cultural historian Schurtz, however, Professor
Bücher with his “insight of genius” is the prophet that he follows
blindly.^(XXVII) The most typical and energetic representative of
reaction, however, against the dangerous doctrines of primitive
communism and the gentile constitution, and against Morgan as the
“church father of German socialism,”^(XXVIII) is Herr Ernst Grosse. At
first sight, Grosse is himself a supporter of the materialist conception
of history, i.e. he attributes various legal, kinship and intellectual
forms of social life to the prevailing relations of production as their
determining factors. “Only a few cultural historians,” he says in his
_Anfänge der Kunst_ [The Beginnings of the Arts] published in 1894,

seem to have grasped the full significance of production. It is however
far more easy to underestimate this than to overestimate it. Economic
activity is likewise the center of life of every cultural form; it
influences all the other factors of culture in the deepest and most
irresistible way, while being itself determined not so much by cultural
factors as by natural ones—geographical and meteorological. It would be
correct in a certain sense to call the form of production the primary
cultural phenomenon, besides which all other branches of culture appear
only as derivative and secondary; not of course in the sense that these
other branches have arisen from the stem of production, but rather
because, despite their independent origins, they have always been formed
and developed under the overwhelming pressure of the prevailing economic
factor.^(XXIX)

It would seem at first sight that Grosse himself had learned his main
ideas from the “church fathers of German Social Democracy,” Marx and
Engels, even if he understandably takes care not to betray with a single
word from which scientific corner he has taken over ready-made his
superiority over “most cultural historians.” Indeed, he is even “more
Catholic than the pope” in relation to the materialist conception of
history. Whereas Engels—along with Marx the joint creator of the
materialist conception of history—assumed for the development of family
relations in primitive times through to the formation of today’s legally
accredited compulsory marriage a progress of forms independent of
economic relations, founded on the interest of preserving and
multiplying the human species, Grosse goes a great deal further. He puts
forward the theory that at all times the form of family is simply the
direct product of the economic relations prevailing at the time.
“Nowhere,” he says, “does the cultural significance of production appear
with such clarity as in the history of the family. The strange forms of
human families, which have inspired sociologists to still stranger
hypotheses, appear surprisingly understandable as soon as they are
considered in connection with the forms of production.”^(XXX)

Grosse’s book published in 1896, _Die Formen der Familie und die Formen
der Wirthschaft_ [The Forms of Family and the Forms of Economy], is
devoted completely to proving this idea. At the same time, however,
Grosse is a determined opponent of the doctrine of primitive communism.
He too seeks to demonstrate that human social development began not with
common property but with private property; he too strives, like Lippert
and Bücher, to show from his standpoint that the further we go back in
ancient history, the more exclusively and all-powerfully the
“individual” and his “individual ownership” prevails. Of course, the
discoveries of primitive village communities in all parts of the world,
and clan associations—or kinship groups as Grosse calls them—in
connection with these, cannot be simply denied. It is just that Grosse
has the clan organization⁹⁹ —and this is his own particular
theory—emerge as the framework of a communist economy only at a
particular stage of development, i.e. with the lower agricultural stage,
to dissolve again at the stage of higher agriculture and make way once
more for “individual ownership.” In this way, Grosse triumphantly turns
the historical perspective established by Morgan and Marx directly on
its head. According to this, communism was the cradle of human cultural
development, the form of economic relations that accompanied this
development for measureless extents of time, only to decline and
dissolve with civilization and make way for private property, this epoch
of civilization facing in turn a rapid process of dissolution and a
return to communism in the higher form of a socialist social order.
According to Grosse, it was private property that accompanied the rise
and development of culture, making way temporarily for communism only at
a particular stage, that of lower agriculture. According to Marx and
Engels, and likewise Morgan, the beginning and end point of cultural
history is common property and social solidarity; according to Grosse
and his colleagues of bourgeois science, it is the “individual” and his
private property. But this is not enough. Grosse is not only an express
opponent of Morgan and primitive communism, but of the whole
developmental theory in the realm of social life, and pours scorn on
those childish minds who seek to bring all phenomena of social life into
a developmental series and conceive this as a unitary process, an
advance of humanity from lower to higher forms of life. This fundamental
idea, which serves as a basis for the whole of modern social science in
general, and particularly for the conception of history and doctrine of
scientific socialism, Herr Grosse combats as a typical bourgeois
scholar, with all the power at his command. _“Humanity,”_ he proclaims
and emphasizes, _“in no way moves along a single line in a single
direction; rather, its paths and goals are just as varied as are the
conditions of life of different peoples.”_^(XXXI) In the person of
Grosse, therefore, bourgeois social science, in its reaction against the
revolutionary consequences of its own discoveries, has reached the same
point that bourgeois vulgar economics reached in its reaction to
classical economics: the denial of the very lawfulness of social
development.^(XXXII) Let us examine this strange historical
“materialism” of the latest champion to defeat Marx, Engels and Morgan.

Grosse has a good deal to say about “production,” he is always referring
to the “character of production” as the determining factor that
influences the whole of culture. But what does he understand by
production and its character?

The economic form that prevails or dominates in a social group, the way
in which the members of this group gain their subsistence, is a fact
whose main features can be directly observed with sufficient assurance
everywhere. We may remain much in doubt as to the religious and social
notions of the Australians, but not the slightest doubt is possible as
to the character of their production: the Australians are hunters and
gatherers of plants. It is perhaps impossible to penetrate the mental
cultural of the ancient Peruvians, but the fact that the citizens of the
Inca empire were an agricultural people is open for anyone to
see.^(XXXIII)

By “production” and its “character,” therefore, Grosse simply means the
particular main source of a people’s sustenance. Hunting, fishing,
pastoralism, agriculture—these are the “relations of production” that
have a determining effect on all other cultural relations of a people.
The first thing to note here is that, if no more than this meager
discovery is involved, Herr Grosse’s exaggeration about “most cultures”
is certainly quite unfounded. The knowledge that the particular main
source that a given people draw on for their sustenance is
extraordinarily important for their cultural development, is in no way
Herr Grosse’s spanking new discovery, but rather an age-old and
honorable element in all doctrines of cultural history. This knowledge
led in particular to the conventional division of peoples into hunters,
pastoralists and agriculturalists, which is found in all cultural
histories and which Herr Grosse finally adopts himself after a great
deal of to-ing and fro-ing. But this knowledge is not only quite old, it
is also quite false—at least in the bland version of it that Grosse
offers. If all we know is that a people lives from hunting, pastoralism
or agriculture, we do not yet know anything about its relations of
production or the rest of its culture. The Hottentots in Southwest
Africa today, whose herds, which formed their previous source of
livelihood, have been taken away by the Germans and who have been
supplied with modern shotguns, have been forcibly made into hunters.¹⁰⁰
The relations of production of this “hunting people,” however, have
nothing at all in common with those of the Indian hunters of California,
who still live in their primitive seclusion from the world, and are
themselves very different from the hunting companies of Canada, which
supply American and European capitalists with tradable animal pelts for
the fur trade. The pastoralists of Peru, who before the Spanish invasion
kept their llamas communistically in the cordilleras under Inca rule,
the Arab nomads with their patriarchal herds in Africa or the Arabian
peninsula, the present-day peasants in the Swiss, Bavarian and Tyrolean
alps, who pursue their long-established _“Alpenbücher”_ in the midst of
the capitalist world, the half-wild Roman slaves who kept the enormous
herds of their masters in the wastes of Apulia, the farmers in today’s
Argentina who fatten up immense herds for the Ohio slaughterhouses and
processed-meat factories—these are all examples of “pastoralism,” each
presenting a totally different type of production and culture. As for
“agriculture,” this embraces such a broad scale of the most varying
kinds of economy and levels of culture—from the ancient Indian clan
community to the modern latifundium, from the tiny peasant holding to
the knightly estates east of the Elbe, from the English tenant system to
Romanian “_jobbaggio_,”¹⁰¹ from Chinese peasant horticulture to
Brazilian slave plantations, from the women’s hoe-tillage of Haiti to
the giant North American farms with steam and electric machinery—so that
Herr Grosse’s showy revelations about the significance of production
only display a glaring lack of understanding of what “production” really
means. It was precisely against this kind of crude and coarse
“materialism,” which takes into consideration only the external natural
conditions of production and culture, and which found its best and most
exhaustive expression in the English sociologist [Henry Thomas] Buckle,
that Marx and Engels directed themselves. What is decisive for the
economic and cultural conditions of people is not the external natural
source of their sustenance, but rather the connections that people form
between one another in their labor. The _social_ connections of
production determine the question: what form of production prevails
among a given people? Only when _this_ aspect of production has been
thoroughly grasped is it possible to understand the determining
influences of a people’s production on its family relations, its
concepts of right, its religious ideas and the development of its arts.
Most European observers, however, find it extraordinarily difficult to
penetrate the social relations of production of so-called primitive
peoples. In contrast to Herr Grosse, who believes he already knows a
world when he knows nothing more than that the Peruvian Incas were an
agricultural people, Sir Henry Maine says: “The characteristic error of
the direct observer of unfamiliar social or juridical phenomena is to
compare them too hastily with familiar phenomena apparently of the same
kind.”^(XXXIV)

The connection between forms of family and “forms of production”
understood in this way is expressed in the following terms by Herr
Grosse:

At the lowest stage, people feed themselves by means of hunting—in the
broadest sense of the term—and by the gathering of plants. This most
primitive form of production is also associated with the most primitive
form of division of labor—the physiologically based division between the
two sexes. While the provision of animal food falls to the man, the
foraging of roots and fruits is the task of the woman. Under these
conditions, the economic center of gravity lies almost always on the
male side, and as a consequence the primitive form of family everywhere
bears an unmistakably patriarchal character. Whatever the ideas about
blood relationships may be, primitive man stands in fact as lord and
master among his wives and children, even if he does not recognize his
progeny as blood relations. From this lowest stage, production can
continue in two directions, according to whether the female or the male
branch of the economy undergoes a further development. But which of
these two branches becomes the stem depends above all on the natural
conditions in which the primitive group lives. If the flora and climate
of the land immediately suggest and reward the conservation and
subsequent care of food plants, then the female branch of plant
gathering gradually develops into plant cultivation. In fact, with
primitive agricultural peoples this occupation is always found in
women’s hands. The economic center of gravity accordingly shifts to the
female side, and as a result we find among all primitive societies that
support themselves predominantly by agriculture a matriarchal family
form or at least the traces of this. The woman stands now at the center
of the family as the main provider and landowner. The construction of a
matriarchy in the strict sense, however, the actual rule of women,
occurs only in very infrequent cases—in particular where the social
group is not exposed to attacks by external enemies. In all other cases,
the man regains as protector the supremacy he lost as provider. In this
way, the family forms develop that prevail among most agricultural
peoples, presenting a compromise between the matriarchal and the
patriarchal direction. A large part of humanity, however, has undergone
a completely different development. Those hunting peoples living in
regions that place difficulties in the way of agriculture, while they
offer animals that are suitable and profitable for domestication, have
advanced not like the former to plant cultivation, but instead to that
of animals. Livestock breeding, however, which gradually developed out
of hunting, appears exactly like its predecessor as a privilege of the
man.¹⁰² In this way, the economic superiority of the male side that is
already present is strengthened, and this relationship finds consistent
expression in the fact that all peoples who feed themselves principally
from livestock stand under the rule of the patriarchal family form.
Besides, the commanding position of the man in stock-raising societies
is further increased by another circumstance that is similarly connected
directly with the form of their production. Stock-raising peoples are
always inclined to warlike entanglements and consequently to the
development of a centralized organization for warfare. The unavoidable
result is an extreme form of patriarchy in which woman becomes a slave
without rights under a husband endowed with despotic power.

But those peaceful agricultural peoples among whom women rules as the
breadwinner in the family, or at least enjoys to some extent a freer
position, are generally subjugated by the warlike stock-raisers and take
over from them, along with other customs, the despotic rule of the man
in the family. “And so we find all civilized nations today under the
sign of a more or less sharply marked patriarchal family form.”^(XXXV)

The remarkable historical destinies of the human family depicted here,
in their dependence on forms of production, thus follow the schema:
hunting period—individual family with male supremacy; stock-raising
period = individual family with still worse male supremacy; period of
lower agriculture = individual family with sporadic female supremacy,
but later subjection of agriculturalists by stock-raisers, i.e. here
individual family with male supremacy; and as the apex of the edifice,
period of higher agriculture = individual family with male supremacy.
Herr Grosse, we can see, is very serious in his rejection of modern
developmental theory. For him there is no development of family forms at
all. History begins and ends with the individual family and male
supremacy. What Grosse does not notice is that after he has showily
promised to explain the origin of family forms from forms of production,
he actually presupposes the family form as something always already
given, i.e. as the individual family, as a modern household, and assumes
this unchanged under _all_ forms of production. What he actually pursues
as different “family forms” with the change of epochs is simply the
question of the relationship of one sex to the other. Male supremacy or
female supremacy—this is the “family form” according to Grosse, which in
a completely harmonious manner he reduces as crudely to an external
characteristic as he simplifies the “form of production” to the question
of hunting, stock-raising or agriculture. That “male supremacy” or
“female supremacy” can embrace dozens of different family forms, that
there can be different kinship systems within the same cultural stage of
“hunters”—none of this exists for Herr Grosse, as little as does the
question of the social relations within a form of production. The
reciprocal relationship of family forms and production forms here comes
down to the following ingenious “materialism”: the two sexes are seen
from the start as business competitors. Whoever feeds the family also
rules in the family, so the philistine believes, and so also does the
civil code. The bad luck of the female sex, however, is that only
exceptionally in history—at the low stage of tillage agriculture—were
they the leading provider of food, and even then they generally had to
give way to the warlike male sex. And so the history of the family form
is basically no more than a history of women’s slavery, in all “forms of
production” and despite all forms of production. The only connection
between family forms and economic forms is thus in the end simply the
slight difference between somewhat milder and somewhat severer forms of
male supremacy. In conclusion, the first message of redemption for
enslaved woman in the history of human culture appears as the Christian
church, which at least knows no distinction between the two sexes in the
blue ether of heaven, even if it still does so on earth. “By this
doctrine, Christianity endowed women with an elevated position before
which the arbitrary will of the male must bow,”^(XXXVI) Herr Grosse
concludes, finally, after wandering far and wide on the waters of
economic history, dropping anchor in the harbor of the Christian church.
How “surprisingly understandable,” then, those forms of family appear
that have inspired sociologists to “strange hypotheses,” when they are
viewed “in connection with the forms of production”!

The most striking thing, however, about this history of the “family
form” is the treatment of the clan association or kin group, as Grosse
calls it. We have seen the tremendous role that clan associations played
in social life at earlier levels of culture. We have seen—particularly
in the wake of Morgan’s epoch-making investigations—that they were the
actual social form of people before the development of the territorial
state, and continued for a long while after to be both the economic unit
and the religious community. How do these facts stand in the light of
the remarkable history of Grosse’s “family forms”? Grosse evidently
cannot simply deny the existence of a kinship constitution among all
primitive peoples. But since this contradicts his scheme of individual
families and the dominance of private property, he seeks to reduce their
significance as close to zero as he can, except for the period of lower
agriculture: “The power of kinship arose with lower agriculture, and it
decays with it as well. Among all higher agricultural peoples, the
kinship order has already either disappeared or in the process of doing
so.”^(XXXVII) Grosse thus lets the “kinship power” and its communist
economy burst into the midst of economic and family history like a
pistol shot, simply to have it fall back and dissolve right away. How
the origin and existence of the kinship order and its functions are to
be explained in the millennia of cultural development before lower
agriculture, since for Grosse they had at this time neither an economic
function nor a social significance vis-à-vis the individual family, and
what these kinships were that led their shadowy existence among hunters
and stock-raisers against the background of separate families with
private housekeeping, remains a private secret for Herr Grosse. Just as
little is he concerned that his story stands in blatant contradiction
with certain generally recognized facts. Kin groups are seen as
acquiring importance only with lower agriculture; they are then
generally linked with the institution of blood revenge, with religious
observance and very frequently with animal names. All these things
however are far older than agriculture, and must therefore according to
Grosse’s own theory derive from relations of production of far more
primitive cultural periods. Grosse explains the kinship order of higher
agriculturalists, such as the ancient Germans, Celts and Indians, as a
legacy from the period of lower agriculture, when they had their roots
in the female rural economy. But the higher agriculture of cultured
peoples did not arise from female tilling, but rather from stock
raising, which was already pursued by men, and where consequently,
according to Grosse, the kin groups were without significance in
relation to the patriarchal family economy. According to Grosse, the
kinship order is meaningless with these nomadic pastoralists, and only
comes to prevail for a while with settlement and agriculture. According
to the most respected scholars, however, the agrarian constitution
followed a quite opposite direction: as long as pastoralists followed a
nomadic way of life, kinship associations were the most powerful in
every respect, whereas with settlement and agriculture the kinship
constitution begins to loosen and decline in relation to the local
association of agriculturalists, whose community of interest is stronger
than the traditional blood ties, and the kinship community is
transformed into the so-called neighborhood community. This was the view
of Ludwig von Maurer, Kovalevsky, Henry Maine and [Emile] Laveleye,¹⁰³
and the same phenomenon has more recently been noted by [Konstantin]
Kaufman among the Kyrgyz and Yakuts of Central Asia.

We should finally mention that Grosse is understandably unable, from his
point of view, to offer the slightest explanation of the most important
phenomena in the field of primitive family relations, such as matriarchy
(mother-right), and confines himself to shrugging his shoulders and
declaring matriarchy “the rarest curiosity in sociology”; that he makes
the incredible assertion that among the Australians ideas of blood
relationship had no influence on their family systems, and the still
more incredible assertion that among the ancient Peruvians there was no
trace of kinship groups; that he bases his ideas about the agrarian
constitution of the Germanic people on Laveleye’s obsolete and
unreliable material; and that finally he echoes the same Laveleye’s
fabulous assertion that “still today” the Russian village community that
prevails among a population of 35 million forms a kinship community with
blood relationship, a “family community,” which is about as true as it
would be to claim that all the inhabitants of Berlin formed “still
today” a great family community. All this specially enables Grosse to
treat the “church father of German Social Democracy,” Morgan, as a dead
dog.

The above examination of Grosse’s treatment of family forms and kinship
gives an idea of how he treats the “forms of economy.” The entire proof
that he directs against the assumption of primitive communism rests on
“yes, but,” with unchallengeable facts being admitted, but others
contrasted to them in such a way that what is unwanted is diminished,
what is wanted is exaggerated, and the result correspondingly dressed up
to look good.

Grosse himself reports of the lower hunters:

Individual possession, which among all lower societies consists
principally if not exclusively in movable goods, is here almost
completely insignificant; the most valuable piece of property, however,
the hunting ground, belongs to all the men of a tribe in common. It
follows that the proceeds of hunting have to be divided from time to
time among all members of a horde. This is reported for example among
the Botocudos¹⁰⁴ (Ehrenreich, “Über die Botocudos,” in _Zeitschrift für
Ethnologie_, XIX, 31¹⁰⁵). In some parts of Australia, similar customs
exist. Thus all members of a primitive group are and remain more or less
equally poor. Since there are no essential differences of wealth, a main
source for the origin of tribal differences is lacking. In general, all
adult men have equal rights within the tribe.^(XXXVIII)

In the same way, “membership of a kin group has in some (!) connections
a fundamental influence on the life of the lower hunter. It ascribes him
the right to use a particular hunting ground, and it gives him the right
and duty of protection and revenge” (this page). Similarly, Grosse
concedes the possibility of a kinship communism among the lower hunters
of central California.

But for all that, the kinship group here is loose and weak, there is no
economic community. “The mode of production of the Arctic hunters
however is so completely individualist that the kinship connection is
scarcely able to resist centrifugal tendencies.”^(XXXIX) Likewise, among
the Australians, the use of the common hunting land “in hunting and
gathering is generally pursued not at all in common, but each individual
family conducts a separate economy.” And in general, “the lack of food
does not permit lasting unification of large groups, but forces them to
disperse” (this page).

Let us turn then to the higher hunters.

_It is true that_ “land among the higher hunters is indeed as a rule the
common property of the tribe or kinship group” (this page), true that we
directly find at this stage large buildings as common quarters for such
groups (this page), while we also learn: “The extensive dams and
defenses that [Alexander] Mackenzie saw in the rivers of the Haidah¹⁰⁶
and that in his estimation must have required the work of the whole
tribe, were supervised by the local chief, without whose permission no
one was allowed to fish. They were thus very likely seen as the property
of the whole village community, to which the fishing waters and hunting
grounds undividedly belonged” (this page).

_But_ “movable property here has acquired such an extension and
importance that despite the equal possession of land a great inequality
of wealth can develop” (this page), and “as a rule, food, so far as we
can see, is no more seen as common property than are other movable
goods. Thus the domestic kinship groups can only to a very limited sense
be described as economic communities” (this page).

We move then to the next higher cultural stage, that of nomadic
stock-raising (pastoralism). Here again Grosse tells us:

_It is true that_ “even the most restless nomads do not roam in
unbounded spaces, they all rather move within a quite firmly limited
region, which is seen as the property of their tribe and which is
frequently divided again among the individual separate families and kin
groups” (this page). Furthermore: “The land in almost the whole region
of stock-raising is the common property of the tribe or kin group” (this
page). “The land is naturally the common property of all kin group
members and as such is divided by the kin group or its chief between the
different families for their use” (this page).

_But_ “the land is not the most valuable possession of the nomad. His
greatest wealth is his herd, and livestock is always (!) the separate
property of the individual families. The stock-raising kin group has
never (!) developed into a community of economy and possession.”

Finally we have the lower agriculturalists. Here, _it is true_ for the
first time that the kinship group is admitted to be a completely
communist economic community.

_But—_and here this “but” follows hard on the heels—here too “industry
undermines social equality” (when Grosse talks of industry he naturally
means commodity production, being unable to differentiate the one from
the other), “creating a movable individual property, which prevails over
the common property in land and destroys this.’ ” And despite the
community of land, “the separation between rich and poor already exists
here.”^(XL) Communism is thus reduced to a brief interval of economic
history, which moreover begins with private property and ends with
private property. _Quod erat demonstrandum_.¹⁰⁷

3

In order to assess the value of Grosse’s schema, we shall turn directly
to the facts. Let us examine the economic form of the most backward
peoples—if only with a fleeting glance. Who are these?

Grosse calls them the “lower hunters,” and says of them:

The lower hunting peoples today form only a small fragment of humanity.
Their imperfect and unfruitful form of production condemns them to
numerical weakness and cultural poverty, and they are everywhere on the
retreat in the face of larger and stronger peoples, now continuing their
existence in inaccessible primal forests and inhospitable deserts. A
large part of these wretched tribes belong to pygmy races.¹⁰⁸ It is
precisely the weakest peoples who are forced by the stronger in the
struggle for existence into the regions most hostile to culture, and
thereby condemned also to cultural stagnation. Yet representatives of
the oldest economic form are still found today on all continents with
the exception of Europe. Africa houses many such hunting peoples who
have grown small; unfortunately, however, we so far have information
only on one of these, the Bushmen of the Kalahari desert¹⁰⁹ [in German
South-West Africa—R.L.]; the lives of the other pygmy tribes are still
hidden in the darkness of the central African forests. If we turn from
Africa to the East, we find first of all in central Ceylon [off the
southern tip of the Indian peninsula—R.L.] the dwarf hunting people of
the Vedda,¹¹⁰ then on the Andaman islands the Mincopie,¹¹¹ in inland
Sumatra the Kubu¹¹² and in the mountain wildernesses of the Philippines
the Aeta¹¹³—three tribes who again belong to the small races. The whole
of the Australian continent was peopled with lower hunting peoples
before the European settlement; and if in the last half of this century
the indigenous peoples have been driven out of the greater part of the
coastal regions by the colonists, they still persist in the deserts of
the hinterland. In America, finally, from the extreme south to the far
north, we find a whole series of groups of an extreme cultural poverty.
In the rain- and storm-lashed mountain wastes around Cape Horn [the
southern tip of South America—R.L.] dwell the inhabitants of Tierra del
Fuego, whom more than one observer has declared to be the poorest and
crudest of all humans. Besides the Botocudos with their evil reputation,
many other hunting tribes still wander through the forests of Brazil,
including the Bororó who are somewhat familiar to us thanks to the
studies of [Karl] von den Steinen.¹¹⁴ Central California [on the west
coast of North America—R.L.] has a number of tribes at a level only
little above the most wretched peoples of Australia.^(XLI)¹¹⁵

Without continuing any further with Grosse, who strangely also counts
the Eskimos¹¹⁶ among the lowest peoples, we shall now dwell on some of
the tribes mentioned above in search of traces of a socially planned
organization of labor.

Let us turn first of all to the Australian cannibals,¹¹⁷ who according
to several scholars exist at the lowest level of culture that the human
race displays on this earth. Among these aborigines we particularly find
the already mentioned primitive division of labor between men and women;
the latter principally see to vegetable food as well as wood and water,
while the men are responsible for hunting and providing animal food.

We also find here a picture of social labor that is the direct opposite
of the “individual search for food” and offers an example right away of
how the most primitive societies see to it that all labor-power needed
is diligently applied, for example:

All the males in the Chepara tribe¹¹⁸ are expected to provide food, if
not sick. If a man is lazy and stays in the camp, he is jeered at and
insulted by the others. Men, women, and children leave the camp early in
the morning for the purpose of hunting for food where they think that
game will be plentiful. The men and women carry the various catches to
the nearest water hole, where fires are made and game is cooked. The
men, women, and children all eat together amicably, the food being
distributed among them by the old men equally to all the men, women, and
children. After the meal, the women carry what is left of the cooked
food to the camp, men hunting by the way.^(XLII)

Now some further information on how production is planned among the
Australian aborigines. This is in fact extremely complicated, and worked
out in the utmost detail. Each Australian tribe is divided into a number
of groups, each one being named after an animal or a plant that it
honors, and possessing a demarcated part of the tribe’s total territory.
One particular territory thus belongs for example to the kangaroo-men,
another to the emu-men (the emu is a large bird similar to an ostrich),
a third to the snake-men (the Australians even eat snakes), etc.
According to the findings of the most recent scientific research, these
“totems,” as we have already mentioned in another connection, are almost
always animals and plants that the aborigines make use of as food. Each
of these groups has its chief, who takes the lead in the hunt. The
animal or plant name and the cult corresponding to it are not an empty
form: each particular group of aborigines is in fact obliged to provide
the animal or plant food of its name, and to take responsibility for the
supply and continuation of this source of food. And each of these groups
does this not for itself, but above all for the _other_ groups in the
tribe. The kangaroo-men, for example, are obliged to provide kangaroo
meat for the rest of the tribe, the snake-men to provide snakes, the
caterpillar-men a certain caterpillar that is seen as a delicacy, and so
on. All this is bound up with strict religious observances and great
ceremonies. It is almost a universal rule, for example, that the people
of a particular group may not eat their own animal or plant totem, or
only in great moderation, although they must provide this for others. A
man in the snake-group, for example, if he kills a snake—even in times
of great hunger—must refrain from eating it himself, but rather bring it
back to the camp for the others. In the same way, an emu-man will only
consume emu meat with extreme moderation, and never take the eggs and
fat of the bird—which are used as a remedy—for himself, but hand them
over to his fellow tribes people. On the other hand, other groups may
not hunt or gather and consume the animal or plant without the
permission of the corresponding totem men. Each year, a festive ceremony
is held by each group, with the object of securing the multiplication of
the totemic animal or plant (by way of singing, wind instruments and
various religious ceremonies), with only the other groups being allowed
to eat it. The time for such ceremonies to take place is decided for
each group by its chief, who is also in charge of the ceremony. And this
time is directly bound up with the conditions of production. In central
Australia, animals and plants suffer from a long dry season, while the
short wet season leads to an increase in animal life and a vigorous
plant growth. Most of the ceremonies of the totem groups are then held
as the good season approaches. According to [Friedrich] Ratzel, it is a
“comic misunderstanding” to say that the aborigines call themselves
after their most important foodstuffs.^(XLIII) In the system of totem
groups briefly indicated above, however, anyone can already recognize at
first glance an elaborate organization of social production. The
individual totem groups are evidently just limbs in an extensive system
of division of labor. All the groups together form an ordered and
planned whole, and each group also conducts itself in a quite ordered
and planned way under a unitary leadership. And the fact that this
system of production assumes a religious form, the form of various food
taboos, ceremonies, etc., merely shows that this production form is of
_age-old date_, that this organization has existed among the aborigines
for many centuries or even millennia, so that it has had time to ossify
into rigid formulas, and what originally were mere expediencies for the
purpose of producing and providing food have become articles of a belief
in secret connections. These connections, discovered by the Englishmen
[Walter Baldwin] Spencer and [Francis James] Gillen, are also confirmed
by another scholar, [James George] Frazer, who expressly says, for
example:

We have to bear in mind that the various totemic groups in totemic
society do not live in isolation from one another; they intermingle and
practice their magic powers for the common good. In the original system,
if we are not mistaken, the kangaroo-men hunted and killed kangaroo for
the benefit of all other totemic groups as well as their own, and it
would have been the same with the caterpillar totem, the hawk totem and
the rest. Under the new system [i.e. in the religious form—R.L.], in
which a totemic group was forbidden to kill and eat its own totem, the
kangaroo-men continued to provide kangaroos, but no longer for their own
consumption; the emu-men continued to see to the multiplication of emus,
although they were no longer allowed to enjoy emu meat; the
caterpillar-men continued their magic arts for the procreation of
caterpillars, even if these delicacies were now destined for other
stomachs.¹¹⁹

In sum, what appears to us today as a religious system was in age-old
times a simple system of organized social production with a far-reaching
division of labor.

If we now turn to the distribution of products among the Australian
aborigines, we find an even more detailed and complex system. Each part
of a wild animal killed, each bird egg found and each handful of fruit
gathered, is carefully allocated according to quite firm rules to
particular members of the society for their consumption. For example,
what the women gather in the way of plant food belongs to them and their
children. The proceeds of the men’s hunting is divided according to
rules that differ from tribe to tribe, but which in all tribes are
extremely detailed. The English scholar [Alfred William] Howitt, for
example, who studied the populations in southeastern Australia, chiefly
in the state of Victoria, found the following kind of distribution:

It is assumed that a man kills a kangaroo at a distance from the camp.
Two other men are with him but are too late to assist in killing it. The
distance from the camp being considerable, the kangaroo is cooked before
being carried home. While the first man lights a fire, the others cut up
the game. The three cook the entrails and eat them. The following
distribution is made. Men 2 and 3 receive one leg and the tail, and one
leg and part of the haunch, because they were present, and had helped to
cut the game up. Man number 1 received the remainder that he carried to
the camp. The head and back are taken by his wife to her parents, the
remainder goes to his parents. If he is short of meat, he keeps a
little, but if, for instance, he has an opossum, he gives it all away.
His mother, if she has caught some fish, may give him some, or his
wife’s parents may give _him some of their share_; and they also would
in such a case give her some next morning. _Children in all cases well
cared for by their grandparents_.^(XLIV)

The following rules prevail in one tribe. With a kangaroo, for example,
the hunter takes a piece near the loin, the father receives the
backbone, ribs, shoulder and head; the mother the right leg and the
younger brother the left foreleg. The father gives the tail and another
piece of the back to his parents, the mother gives a part of the thigh
and the shin to her parents. With a koala, the hunter keeps the left
ribs for himself, the father receives the right hind-leg and mother the
left, the elder brother receives the right foreleg and the younger
brother the left. The elder sister receives a piece along the backbone,
the younger one the liver. The right rib portion belongs to the father’s
brother, a side piece to the maternal uncle, and the head goes to the
young men’s camp.

In another tribe, however, the food obtained is always divided equally
among those present. If a wallaby (a smaller species of kangaroo) is
killed, and there are ten or twelve people, each of them receives a part
of the animal. None of them touches the animal or any part of it until
they have been given their portion by the hunter. If the person who
killed the animal happens not to be present while it is being cooked, no
one touches it until he returns. The women receive equal portions to the
men, and children are carefully seen to by both parents.^(XLV)

These various modes of distribution, which differ from one tribe to
another, also reveal their age-old character by the way that they appear
in ritual forms and are summed up in sayings.^(XLVI) This expresses a
tradition that may go back several millennia, and is seen by each
generation as an unbreakable and strictly maintained rule that has been
handed down. But two particular features of this system stand out very
clearly. Above all, among the Australian aborigines—perhaps those humans
who have remained most backward—it is not only production but also
consumption that is planned and organized as a common social affair; and
secondly, this plan evidently aims at the provisioning and security of
all members of society, according both to their needs in terms of food
and to their productive power. Under all conditions, special care is
taken of old people, who in turn care look after the small children
along with the mothers. The entire economic life of the Australian
aborigines—production, division of labor, distribution of foodstuffs—has
thus been planned and organized in the strictest way from earliest times
by way of firm rules.

From Australia we turn to North America. Here in the West, the sparse
remnants of Indians living on the Isla del Tiburón in the Gulf of
California¹²⁰ and a narrow strip of the adjacent mainland present a
particular interest, thanks to their complete isolation and their
hostility to outsiders, which is how they have preserved their age-old
customs in a very pure state. In 1895, United States scientists
undertook an expedition to study this tribe, and the results of this
were described by the American [William John] McGee.¹²¹ According to his
report, the Seri Indian tribe—the name of this now very sparse people—is
divided into four groups, each of these being named after an animal. The
two largest are the pelican group and the turtle group. The customs,
practices and rules of these groups in relation to their totemic animals
are kept strictly secret, and were very hard to ascertain. But if we
learn right away that the diet of these Indians consists principally of
the meat of pelicans, turtles, fish and other sea creatures, and bear in
mind the previously described system of totemic groups among the
Australian aborigines, we may assume with a high degree of certainty
that also among these Indians off the Californian coast the secret cult
of totemic animals and the division of the tribe into corresponding
groups expresses nothing other than the survivals of an age-old,
strictly organized system of production with a division of labor, that
has ossified into religious symbols. This view is reinforced, for
example, by the fact that the supreme protective spirit of the Seri
Indians is the pelican, but it is also this bird that forms the basis of
that tribe’s economic existence. Pelican meat is the main food, pelican
skins are used as clothing and bedding, as shields, and as the most
important articles of exchange with outsiders. The Seri’s most important
form of labor, hunting, is still practiced according to strict rules.
Hunting pelicans, for example, is a well-organized common undertaking
“with at least a semi-ceremonial character.” Pelican hunts may take
place only at particular times, in such a way that the birds are
protected during their breeding season, so as to secure their progeny.
“The butchery [the massive slaughter of these top-heavy birds presents
no difficulties—R.L.] is followed by a gluttonous feast, in which the
half-famished families gorge the tenderer parts in the darkness, and
noisily carouse in the carnage until overcome by slumber. Next day the
matrons select the carcasses of least injured plumage and carefully
remove the skins.”^(XLVII) The feast lasts for several days, with
various ceremonies being associated with it. This “gluttonous feast,”
therefore, and the noisy “gorging in darkness,” which Professor Bücher
would certainly note as a sign of purely animal behavior, is actually
very well organized—its ceremonial character is sufficient proof of
this. The planned character of the hunt is combined with strict
regulation of distribution and consumption. The common eating and
drinking proceeds in a definite sequence: first comes the chief (who is
also leader of the hunt), then the other warriors in order of age, then
the oldest woman followed by her daughters in order of age, and finally
the children also by order of age, with the girls, particularly those
approaching marriageable age, enjoying certain preference by the
connivance of the women:

[E]very member of the family or clan is entitled to necessary food and
raiment, and it is the duty of every other person to see that the need
is supplied. The stress of this duty is graded partly by proximity (so
that, other things equal, it begins with the nearest person), but
chiefly by standing and responsibility in the group (which again are
reckoned as equivalents of age), whereby it becomes the business of the
first at the feast to see that enough is left over to supply all below
him; and this duty passes down the line in such wise as to protect the
interests of the helpless infant …¹²²

From South America, we have the testimony of Professor [Karl] von den
Steinen about the wild Indian tribe of the Bororó in Brazil. Here again
we have above all the typical division of labor. The women obtain plant
food, look for roots with a pointed stick, climb with great agility up
palm trees, collecting nuts and cutting the palm kernels, seeking fruits
and the like. The women also prepare plant food, and manufacture the
cooking pots. When the women return home, they give the men fruit, etc.
and receive whatever meat is left over. Distribution and consumption are
strictly regulated. According to von den Steinen:

If Bororó etiquette in no way prevents them from sharing their meals,
they have other strange customs for this, which clearly show that tribes
where the proceeds of hunting are scarce have to search somehow for ways
to forestall quarrels and disputes. One rule here is particularly
striking: _no one cooks the game that he has shot himself, but gives it
to someone else to cook!_ The same prudent foresight is practiced for
valuable hides and teeth. If a jaguar is killed, a great feast is held
and the meat is eaten. But _it is not the hunter_ who receives the hide
and the teeth, but rather … the closest relative of the tribesman or
woman who most recently died. The hunter is honored, and is presented by
everyone with macaw feathers [the Bororós’ most prized ornament—R.L.]
and bows decorated by oassú ribbons. The most important measure to
preserve peace, however, is bound up with the office of _medicine
man_,^(XLVIII)

or, as European like to say in such cases, the magician or priest. This
person must be in attendance at the killing of any animal, but it is
particularly important that every animal killed, as well as plant food,
is only distributed and consumed by way of particular ceremonies.
Hunting takes place on the initiative and under the leadership of the
chief. The young and unmarried men live together in the “men’s house,”
where they work together, produce weapons, tools and ornaments, spin,
hold wrestling matches and also eat together, in strict discipline and
order, as we have already mentioned above. “A family one of whose
members dies,” says von den Steinen, “suffers a great loss

For everything that the dead person used is burned, thrown into the
river or placed in the bone-basket, so that he will have no occasion to
return. The hut is then completely evacuated. But the bereaved are given
presents, bows and arrows are made for them, and there is also the
custom that, if a jaguar is killed, the hide is given _“to the brother
of the last woman who died or to the uncle of the last man who
died.”_^(XLVIX)

A fully worked-out plan and social organization thus prevails in both
production and distribution.

If we pass through the American mainland down to the most southerly
point, we find here a primitive people at the lowest level of culture,
the Fuegians, who inhabit the inhospitable archipelago at the tip of
South America, the first information on them being brought back to
Europe in the seventeenth century. In 1698, the French government sent
an expedition to the southern ocean, in response to French pirates who
had been plying their trade there for many years.¹²³ One of the
engineers on board kept a diary that has survived, and contains the
following summary information about the Fuegians:

Each family, that is, father and mother, along with those children not
yet married, has its pirogue (a canoe made of tree bark), in which they
carry everything they need. They sleep at night wherever they find
themselves. If there is no ready-made hut, then they build one … They
make a small fire in the middle, around which they lie together on
grass. When they feel hungry, they cook shellfish, which the eldest man
among them distributes in equal portions. The main occupation of the
men, indeed their duty, consists in building huts, hunting and fishing;
looking after the canoes and gathering shellfish falls to the
women … They hunt for whales in the following manner: Five or six canoes
put out to sea together, and when they find a whale they pursue it and
harpoon it with large arrows whose points made of bone or stone are very
skillfully cut … When they kill an animal or a bird, or catch the fish
and shellfish that are their regular food, they divide these among all
the families, since they are ahead of us in possessing almost all their
combined means of subsistence in common.^(L)

From America we turn to Asia. Here we are told the following about the
pygmy tribes of the Mincopie on the Andaman archipelago (in the Gulf of
Bengal) by the English researcher E[dward] H[orace] Man, who spent
twelve years among them and obtained a more exact knowledge of them than
any other European.¹²⁴

The Mincopie are divided into nine tribes, each consisting of a
considerable number of small groups of between thirty and fifty
individuals, though sometimes as many as 300. Each of these groups has
its leader, and the whole tribe has a chief who stands above those of
the individual communities. Yet his authority is very limited; it
consists principally in holding assemblies of all the communities that
belong to his tribe. He is the leader in hunting and fishing and on
migrations, and he also settles disputes. Work within each community is
done in common, with a division of labor between men and women. Hunting,
fishing, obtaining honey, constructing canoes, bows and arrows and other
tools falls to the men, while the women bring in wood and water as well
as planting food, producing ornaments and cooking. It is the duty of all
men and women who stay at home to care for children, the sick and the
aged, and to keep the fires going in the various huts; each person
capable of work is obliged to work for themselves and the community, and
it is also the custom to make sure that there is always a reserve of
food to provide for any strangers who may arrive. Small children, the
weak and the aged are the special object of general attention, and they
have an even better deal in terms of the satisfaction of their daily
needs than do the other members of the society.

The consumption of food is governed by definite rules. A married man may
only eat together with other married men or bachelors, never with other
women or with his own household, unless he is already of a prescribed
age. Unmarried people take their meals separately—male youths in one
place, girls in another.

The preparation of meals is the customary duty of the women, who see to
this while the men are away. But if they are particularly occupied with
obtaining wood and water, as on feast days or after a particularly
successful hunt, then one of the men does the cooking, and when this is
half finished, divides it among those present and leaves the further
preparation to them, which they do on their own hearths. If the chief is
present, he receives the first and indeed the lion’s share, then come
the men and after them the women and children in succession; what
remains belongs to the distributor.

In the manufacture of weapons, tools and other articles, the Mincopie
generally spend a remarkable time and great diligence, being able to
spend hours on end laboriously working a piece of iron with a stone
hammer in order to form a spear or arrowhead, to improve the shape of a
bow, etc. They devote themselves to these tasks even when no immediate
or foreseeable necessity drives them to such efforts. They cannot be
accused of greed—it is said of them—as they often present (a
misunderstood European expression for “distribute”) the best that they
possess, and preserve for their own use objects that are in no way
better worked, still less making better ones for themselves.^(LI)

We conclude this series of examples with a sample from the life of the
primitive peoples of Africa. Here, the pygmy Bushmen of the Kalahari
desert are frequently taken as an example of extreme backwardness and
the lowest stage of human culture. German, English and French
researchers agree in saying that the Bushmen live in groups (hordes),
conducting their economic life in common. Their small bands are marked
by complete equality, in respect of means of subsistence, weapons, etc.
The foodstuffs that they find on their travels are collected in sacks
that are emptied out in the camp. As the German scholar [Siegfried]
Passarge reports: “The day’s harvest then makes its appearance: roots,
tubers, fruits, grubs, rhinoceros birds, bullfrogs, turtles,
grasshoppers, even snakes and iguanas.”^(LII) The booty is then divided
among all.

The systematic gathering of vegetables, for example fruits, roots,
tubers, etc., as well as smaller animals, is the business of women. They
have to supply the horde with supplies of this kind, and the children
help with this. Men will occasionally also bring back something that
they accidentally happen upon, though for them gathering is only a
secondary matter. The main task of men is hunting.^(LIII)

The proceeds of the hunt are consumed by the horde in common. Space and
food are provided around the common fire for traveling Bushmen from
allied hordes. Passarge, as a good European with the intellectual
spectacles of bourgeois society, immediately remarks on the “exaggerated
virtue” with which the Bushmen share the last morsel with others—this
being a token of their cultural incapability!^(LIV)

It is apparent, then, that the most primitive peoples, and particularly
those far removed from settled existence and agriculture, who stand in a
sense at the starting point of the chain of economic development as far
as this is known to us from direct observation, offer a quite different
picture of relations than we see in Herr Grosse’s schema. What we have
on all sides is not “dispersed” and “separate” household economies, but
rather strictly regulated economic communities with typical features of
communist organization. This is a question of the “lower hunters.” As
for the “higher hunters,” the picture of the kinship economy of the
Iroquois, as described for us in detail by Morgan, is quite sufficient.
But stock-raisers, too, provide sufficient material to give the lie to
Grosse’s bold contentions.^(LV)

The agricultural mark community, accordingly, is not the only primitive
communist organization that we find in economic history, but rather the
most developed one, not the first but the last. It is not a product of
agriculture, but rather of the immeasurably long earlier traditions of
communism which, born in the womb of the gens organization, was finally
applied to agriculture, where it precisely reached an apogee that
heralded its own decline. In no way therefore do the facts confirm
Grosse’s schema. If we then ask for an explanation of the remarkable
phenomenon of a communism that emerges in the midst of economic history
only to immediately disappear again, Herr Grosse offers us, with one of
his clever “materialist” explanations:

We have seen in fact that among the lower agriculturalists, the kin
group has particularly acquired so much more force and power than among
the peoples of other cultural forms, because it appears here initially
as a community of dwelling, possession and economy. But the fact that it
has taken such a form here is explained in turn by the nature of the
lower agricultural economy, which unites people, whereas hunting and
stock-raising disperse them.^(LVI)

Spatial “uniting” or “dispersal” of people in work thus decides whether
communism or private property are to prevail. It is a pity that Herr
Grosse has forgotten to enlighten us why woods and meadows, in which
people are most likely to live “dispersed,” precisely remain common
property for longest—in some places down to the present day—whereas the
agricultural land on which people “unite” was the earliest to transfer
to private ownership. And further, why the form of production that
“unites” people more than any other in the whole of economic history,
i.e. modern large-scale industry, far from generating any kind of common
property, has produced the strictest form of private property, i.e.
capitalist property.

We see then that Grosse’s “materialism” is one more proof that it is not
enough to talk about “production” and its importance for the whole of
social life in order to conceive history from a materialist perspective,
and that separated from its other aspect, from its revolutionary idea of
development, historical materialism becomes a crude and ungainly wooden
crutch, instead of, as with Marx, a stroke of genius of the scientific
spirit.

But what this shows above all else is that Herr Grosse, who talks so
much about production and its forms, is unclear about the most
fundamental concepts of relations of production. We have already seen
how what he understands right away by forms of production is such purely
external categories as hunting, stock raising and agriculture. But in
terms of answering the question as to the form of property within each
of these “forms of production”—that is, the question whether there is
common property, family ownership or private ownership, and to whom such
property belongs—Grosse merely distinguishes between categories such as
“landownership” on the one hand and “moveable possessions” on the other.
If he finds that these belong to different owners, he then asks which is
“more important”: the “moveable” possessions on the one hand, or
immoveable landed property on the other. And whichever appears “more
important” to Herr Grosse, he takes as decisive for the form of property
in this particular society. He decides, for example, that among higher
hunters, “moveable possessions have already acquired such an importance”
that they are more weighty than landed property; and since moveable
possessions such as foodstuffs are private property, Grosse does not
recognize any communistic economy here, despite the self-evidence of
common property in land.

But distinctions of this kind made according to purely external
characteristics—such as those of moveable versus immoveable
possessions—do not have the slightest significance for production, and
are more or less on the same level as Grosse’s other distinctions—in
family forms between male supremacy and female supremacy, or in forms of
production between dispersed and uniting activities. “Moveable
possessions,” for example, may consist of foodstuffs or raw materials,
ornaments and cult objects, or tools. They may be produced for a
society’s own use or for exchange. Depending on this, they will have a
very different significance for relations of production. In general,
Grosse judges the production and property relations of different
peoples—and he is here a typical representative of present-day bourgeois
society—according to foodstuffs and other objects of consumption in the
broadest sense. If he finds that such objects of consumption are
possessed and used by individuals, this demonstrates for him the rule of
“individual property” among the people in question. This is the typical
manner in which primitive communism is “scientifically” refuted
today.^(LVII) According to this profound point of view, a community of
beggars which collects and consumes its scanty takings in common, such
as is very common in the East, or a band of thieves who enjoy their
stolen goods together, are pure examples of a “communistic economic
society.” A mark community, on the other hand, which possesses its land
in common and works it together, but in which the fruits are consumed on
a family basis—each family from its piece of land—is called “an economic
community only in a very limited sense.” In short, what is decisive for
the character of production from this point of view is the right of
ownership over means of consumption and not over means of production,
i.e. the conditions of distribution and not those of production. We have
reached here a key point in conceptions of political economy, which is
fundamentally important for the understanding of all economic history.
But we shall now leave Herr Grosse to his fate, and turn our attention
to this question in a more general fashion.

_4_

Anyone who embarks on the study of economic history, and wants to
discover the various forms that the economic relations of society have
presented in their historical development, must first of all be clear as
to what feature of economic relations is to be taken as the touchstone
and measure of this development. In order to find one’s way among the
wealth of phenomena on any particular terrain, and particularly their
historical succession, complete clarity is required as to what element
it is that is as it were the inner axis around which the phenomena
revolve. The particular element that Morgan, for example, took as the
measure of cultural history and touchstone of its present level, was the
development of productive technology. In this way he did indeed grasp
and reveal the root of the whole cultural existence of humanity. For our
purposes here, however, those of economic history, Morgan’s measure is
not sufficient. The technology of human labor precisely shows the stage
that humans have reached in the mastery of external nature. Each new
step in the perfection of productive technology is at the same time a
step in the subjugation of physical nature by the human mind, and
thereby a step in the development of human culture in general. But if we
particularly want to investigate the forms of production in society, the
relationship of people to nature is not enough; what we are interested
in here is first and foremost a different aspect of human labor, i.e.
the relations in which people stand _to one another_ in work; what
interests us is not the technology of production but its social
organization. For the cultural level of a primitive people it is very
important to know that they are familiar with the potter’s wheel and
practice pottery. Morgan takes this important advance in technology as
the marker of an entire cultural period, which he describes as the
transition from savagery to barbarism. But on the basis of this fact we
can still judge very little about the form of production of this people.
For this we would first have to discover a whole series of conditions,
for example who practices pottery in this society, whether all members
of the society or only some of them, for example that it is women who
supply the community with pots, whether the products of pottery are
destined only for the community’s—perhaps a village’s—own use, or rather
serve for exchange with others, whether the products of each person who
practices pottery are used only by themselves, or whether everything
manufactured serves all members of the community in common. We see that
there are ramified social connections in a position to determine the
character of the form of production in a society: the division of labor,
the distribution of products among consumers, exchange. But all these
aspects of economic life are themselves determined by one decisive
factor, production. The fact that the distribution of products and
exchange can only be consequent phenomena is apparent at first glance.
So that products can be distributed among consumers, or exchanged, they
must first of all be manufactured. Production itself is therefore the
first and most important element in a society’s economic life. In the
process of production, however, what is decisive is the relations in
which those who work stand to their means of production. All work
requires particular raw materials, a particular workplace, and
then—particular tools. We already know what a high importance the tools
of labor and their manufacture assume in the life of human society.
Human labor-power intervenes to perform work with these tools and other
dead means of production, and to produce the means of consumption, in
the broadest sense, that are needed for social life. The relation of
those who work to their means of production is the first question of
production and its decisive factor. And by this we do not mean the
_technical_ relation, not the greater or lesser perfection of the means
of production with which people work, nor the way in which they proceed
with their work. We mean rather the _social_ relation between human
labor-power and the dead means of production, i.e. the question as _to
whom the means of production belong_. In the course of time, this
relationship has changed many times. Each time, however, the whole
character of production has changed along with this—the pattern of the
division of labor, the distribution of products, the direction and scale
of exchange, and finally the whole material and intellectual life of
society. According to whether those who work possess their means of
production in common, or individuals each work for themselves, or do not
possess anything but are rather along with the means of production
themselves the property of non-workers as means of production, or are
chained unfree to the means of production, or as free people who possess
no means of production are forced to sell their labor-power as a means
of production—we accordingly have either a communist form of production,
or a small peasant and handicraft one, or a slave economy, or a feudal
economy based on serfdom, or finally a capitalist economy with the wage
system. And each of these economic forms has its particular type of
division of labor, distribution of products and exchange, as well as its
own social, political and intellectual life. It is enough in human
economic history for the relationship between those who work and the
means of production to radically change, for all other aspects of
social, political and intellectual life to change radically as well, so
that a whole new society emerges. Of course, there is a continuing
interaction between all these aspects of a society’s economic life. Not
only does the relationship of labor-power to the means of production
influence the division of labor, the distribution of products and
exchange, but all of these react in turn on the relation of production.
But this kind of action is different. The prevailing kind of division of
labor, distribution of wealth and particularly exchange at a given
economic stage may gradually undermine the relation between labor-power
and the means of production from which they themselves arose. Their form
however is only altered if the relation between labor-power and means of
production has become obsolete and a radical transformation takes place,
a literal revolution. Thus the respective transformations that occur in
the relation between labor-power and means of production form the
visible great milestones on the road of economic history, they mark out
the natural epochs in the economic development of human society.

How important it is for the understanding of economic history to be
clear about what is essential in this history is shown by examining the
partition of economic history that is most current and most celebrated
in German political economy today. We refer to that of Professor Bücher.
In his _Entstehung der Volkswirtschaft_ [The Rise of the National
Economy], Bücher explains how important a correct partition of economic
history into epochs is for its understanding. In pursuit of this task,
however, he does not just tackle the question and show us the result of
his rational investigations, but rather prepares us first for a proper
evaluation of his own work, by holding forth with great complacency on
the inadequacy of all his predecessors.

“The first question,” he says,

that the political economist has to raise, if he wants to understand the
economy of a people in a remote epoch, will be “Is this economy a
_national_ economy? Are its phenomena of the same nature as those of our
present-day exchange economy, or are the two different in nature?” Yet
this question can only be answered if we do not shy away from
investigating the economic phenomena of the past with the same means of
conceptual articulation and psychologically isolating deduction that
have produced such brilliant results for the economy of the present in
the hands of the masters of traditional “abstract” political economy.

We cannot spare the more recent “historical” school the reproach that,
instead of penetrating into the nature of earlier economic epochs by the
above kind of investigation, it has, almost unnoticed, transferred the
customary categories abstracted from the phenomena of the modern
national economy to the past, and has spent so long kneading the
concepts of exchange economy until they seem applicable to all economic
epochs, for better or worse … Nowhere can this be more clearly seen than
in the way that the distinctive features of the present economic mode of
the civilized peoples are characterized in contrast to the economy of
past epochs of peoples of low culture. This is done by proposing
so-called _stages of development_, in indicating which the basic
features of the course of development of economic history are summarized
in a nutshell … All earlier attempts of this kind suffer from the
failing that they do not lead into the essence of things, but stick to
the surface.^(LVIII)

What partitioning of economic history then does Professor Bücher
propose? Let us hear.

If we are to grasp this whole development from a _single_ perspective,
this can only be a perspective that leads us right into the essential
phenomena of political economy, and at the same time also embraces the
organizational aspect of earlier economic periods. This is nothing other
than the relation in which the production of goods stands to their
consumption, recognizable from the length of the path that goods cover
from the producer to the consumer. From this perspective, we can divide
the whole of economic development into three stages, at least for the
peoples of Central and Western Europe, where it can be historically
traced with sufficient exactitude:

1. The stage of self-contained domestic economy (pure subsistence
production, exchange-less economy), at which goods are consumed in the
same economic unit as that in which they are produced;

2. The stage of urban economy (production for clients or stage of direct
exchange), at which goods move directly from the producing economic unit
to the consuming one;

3. The stage of national economy (commodity production, stage of
circulation of goods), at which goods must as a general rule pass
through a series of economic units before they are consumed.^(LIX)

This schema of economic history is interesting first of all for what it
does _not_ contain. For Professor Bücher, economic history begins with
the mark community of European civilized peoples, thus already with
higher agriculture. The whole millennial period of primitive relations
of production that preceded higher agriculture, relations in which
countless populations still find themselves today, Bücher characterizes,
as we know, as “non-economy,” the period of his famous “individual
search for food,” and “non-labor.” For Bücher, economic history starts
with the final form of primitive communism, in which, with fixed
settlement and higher agriculture, the beginnings of the unavoidable
break-up and transition to inequality, exploitation and class society
are already present. If Grosse contests communism for the whole
developmental period prior to the agricultural mark community, Bücher
simply strikes this period out of economic history.

The second stage of “self-contained urban economy” is another
epoch-making discovery that we owe to the “insight of genius” of the
Leipzig professor, as Schurze¹²⁵ would say. If the “self-contained
domestic economy,” for example that of a mark community, was
characterized by the fact that it embraced a circle of individuals who
satisfied all their economic needs within this domestic economy, then in
the medieval town of Western and Central Europe—as it is only this that
Bücher understands by his “urban economy”—the very opposite was the
case. In the medieval town there was no common “economy” of any kind,
but rather—to adopt Professor Bücher’s jargon—as many “economies” as
there were workshops and households of guild artisans, each of whom
produced, sold and consumed for himself—even if under general guild and
town rules. But even taken as a whole, the medieval guild town of
Germany or France was no “self-contained” economic zone, as its
existence was precisely based on reciprocal exchange with the
countryside around, from which it drew foodstuffs and raw materials, and
for which it manufactured handicraft products. Bücher constructs around
each town a self-contained orbit of countryside that he encloses in his
“urban economy,” by conveniently reducing exchange between town and
country simply to exchange with _peasants_ in the immediate
surroundings. And yet the manors of rich feudal lords, who were the best
customers for urban trade and who had their seats partly scattered
across the countryside far from town, partly within the
town—particularly in the imperial and episcopal cities—here, however,
forming a distinct economic zone, Bücher leaves entirely out of account,
just as he completely ignores foreign trade, which was extremely
important for medieval economic relations and particularly for the
long-term destiny of cities. As for what was really characteristic of
the medieval cities, however, that they were centers of _commodity
production_, which became here for the first time the prevailing form of
production, even if on a limited territory, Professor Bücher ignores it.
Conversely, for him, commodity production only begins with the “national
economy”—as we well know, bourgeois political economy likes to describe
the present-day capitalist economic system with this fiction, i.e. as a
“stage” in economic life, whereas what is characteristic is precisely
that it is not just commodity production, but _capitalist_ production.
Grosse calls commodity production simply “industry,” in order to show
the superiority of a professor of economics over a mere sociologist.

But let us turn from these side issues to the main question. Professor
Bücher presents the “self-contained domestic economy” as the first
“stage” of his economic history. What does he understand by this
expression? We have already mentioned that this stage begins with the
agricultural village community. But besides the primitive mark
community, Professor Bücher also counts other historical forms as
belonging to the stage of “self-contained domestic economy,” in
particular the antique slave economy of the Greeks and Romans, and the
medieval feudal manor. The entire economic history of civilized
humanity, from its grey dawn through classical antiquity and the whole
of the Middle Ages down to the threshold of modern times, is brought
together as a single “stage” of production, to which is opposed the
medieval European guild town as the second stage, and the present-day
capitalist economy as the third stage. Professor Bücher thus classes the
communist village community leading its calm existence somewhere in the
mountain valleys of the Punjab, the household of Pericles in the heyday
of Athenian civilization, and the feudal court of the bishop of Bamberg
in the Middle Ages,¹²⁶ as one and the same “economic stage.” But any
child with even a superficial knowledge of history from school textbooks
will understand that relations that are basically different are being
squeezed here into a single category. On the one hand we have in the
communistic agricultural communities a general equality of the mass of
peasants in possession and law, no class differences or at most very
embryonic, while on the other hand, in ancient Greece or Rome as well as
in feudal medieval Europe, we have the most glaring development of
social classes—freemen and slaves, lords and serfs, the privileged and
those with no rights, wealth and poverty or misery. On the one hand the
general duty to work, on the other a clear opposition between the
enslaved mass of working people and the ruling minority of non-workers.
And again, between the ancient slave economy of the Greeks or Romans,
and the medieval feudal economy, there is the powerful distinction that
ancient slavery eventually led to the downfall of Greco-Roman
civilization, whereas medieval feudalism threw up urban guild
handicrafts and urban trade, and in this way eventually generated modern
capitalism within its womb. Anyone, therefore, who brings under one
schema all these economic and social forms, these historical epochs,
that are in fact poles apart, must be applying a highly original measure
to economic epochs. The measure that Professor Bücher applies, in order
to create the night of his “self-contained domestic economy” in which
all cats are grey, he himself explains to us, by assisting our
understanding with a helpfully bracketed parenthesis. “Exchange-less
economy” means that first “stage” stretching from the beginning of
written history to the modern age, which is followed by the medieval
town as the “stage of direct exchange” and then by the present economic
system as the “stage of circulation of goods.” We thus have
non-exchange, simple exchange or and complicated exchange—or to put it
in more usual terms: absence of trade, simple trade, developed world
trade; this is the measure that Professor Bücher applies to economic
epochs. The main and basic problem of economic history for him is
whether the merchant has already made his appearance or not, whether he
is one and the same person as the producer, or a separate person. The
professor is very welcome to his “exchange-less economy,” which is
nothing more than a professorial fantasy, still not discovered anywhere
on earth, and amounting to a historical invention of staggering boldness
in being applied to ancient Greece and Rome, or to the feudal Middle
Ages from the tenth century on. But to take as measure of the
development of production not relations of production but relations of
exchange, to take the merchant as the fulcrum of the economic system and
the measure of all things, even when he does not yet exist—what a
brilliant result of “conceptual articulation, psychological-isolating
deduction,” and above all, what “penetration into the essence of the
matter,” which scorns “sticking to the surface”! Isn’t the old
undemanding schema of the “historical school,” the partition of economic
history into three epochs of “natural economy, money economy and credit
economy,” much better and closer to reality than the pretentious
personal fabrication of Professor Bücher, who not only turns up his nose
at all “previous attempts of this kind,” but takes as his own basic idea
the same rejected “sticking to the surface” of exchange, distorting it
by his pedantic word-spinning into a completely inappropriate schema?

“Sticking to the surface” of economic history is indeed no accident with
bourgeois science. Some bourgeois scholars, such as Friedrich List,
partition economic history according to the outward nature of the most
important sources of food, proposing epochs of hunting, stock raising,
agriculture and industry—partitions that are not even adequate for an
external history of civilization. Others, such as Professor [Bruno]
Hildebrand, partition economic history according to the outward form of
exchange, into natural economy, money economy and credit economy, or
else, like Bücher, into an exchange-less economy, an economy with direct
exchange and one with commodity exchange.¹²⁷ Still others, like Grosse,
take as their starting-point for judging economic forms the distribution
of goods. In a word, the scholars of the bourgeoisie push to the
forefront of historical consideration exchange, distribution,
consumption—everything except the social form of _production_, which is
precisely what is decisive in every historical epoch, and from which
exchange and its various forms, distribution and consumption with their
particular features, always follow as logical consequences. Why is that?
For the same reason that moves them to present the “national economy”
i.e. the capitalist mode of production, as the highest and final stage
of human history, and to dispute its further world-economic development
and associated revolutionary tendencies. The social pattern of
production, that is, the question of the relationship of those who work
to the means of production, is the core point of each economic epoch,
but it is the sore point of every class society. The alienation of means
of production from the hands of those who work, in one or another form,
is the common foundation of all class society, since it is the basic
condition of all exploitation and class rule. To divert attention from
this sore point, and focus on everything external and secondary, is not
so much a deliberate effort on the part of bourgeois scholars as rather
the instinctive refusal of the class whose intellectual representatives
they are to eat the dangerous fruit of the tree of knowledge. And a
thoroughly modern and celebrated professor such as Bücher shows this
class instinct with his “insight of genius,” when with a wave of the
hand he forces such major epochs as primitive communism, slavery and
serfdom, with their fundamentally different types of relation of
labor-power to the means of production, into one little box of his
schema, while permitting himself elaborate hair-splitting in relation to
the history of trade, distinguishing with pedantic self-importance, and
holding up to the light, “domestic work (in brackets: domestic tasks),”
“wage work,” “handicraft,” “work on the customer’s premises,” and
similar fatuous rubbish. The ideologists of the exploited masses, the
first communists, the earliest representatives of socialism, also
wandered in darkness and remained in limbo with their preaching of
equality among men, so long as they directed their accusations and
struggle principally against unjust distribution, or—like some
socialists in the nineteenth century—against modern forms of exchange.
Only after the best leaders of the working class realized that the forms
of distribution and exchange themselves depend on the organization of
production, for which the relationship of working people to the means of
production is decisive, only then were socialist strivings placed on a
firm scientific footing. And on the basis of this unitary conception,
the scientific position of the proletariat is distinguished from that of
the bourgeoisie in its approach to economic history, just as it is in
relation to political economy. If it lies in the class interest of the
bourgeoisie to conceal the crux of economic history—the pattern of the
relationship of labor-power to the means of production—and its changing
historical character, the interest of the proletariat is conversely to
bring this relationship to the fore and make it the measure of a
society’s economic structure. And for this it is not merely
indispensable for workers to bear in mind the great milestones of
history that divide the ancient communistic society from subsequent
class society, but equally too the distinctions between the various
historical forms of class society themselves. Only by being clear about
the specific economic peculiarities of primitive communist society, and
the no less particular features of the ancient slave economy and
medieval serfdom, is it possible to grasp with due thoroughness why
today’s capitalist class society offers for the first time a historical
leverage for the realization of socialism, and what the fundamental
distinction is between the world socialist economy of the future and the
primitive communist groups of primitive times.


IV. MATERIAL ON ECONOMIC HISTORY (II)

_1_

Let us take a look at one of the mark communities that has been
researched most thoroughly in terms of its internal structures—the
German.

As we know, the Germans settled by tribes and clans. In each clan, the
male head of the household was allocated a building site along with a
plot of land in order to set up house and farm there. A portion of the
land was then used for agriculture, and each family would obtain a lot
on it. It is true that according to Caesar,¹²⁸ around the beginning of
the Christian era, one tribe of Germans (the Suevi or Swabians)
cultivated their farmland collectively without first partitioning it
among the families; yet yearly repartitioning of the lots was already a
common practice when the Roman historian Tacitus wrote, in the second
century CE.¹²⁹ In isolated regions, such as around Frickhofen in
Nassau,¹³⁰ yearly repartitioning still survived in the seventeenth and
eighteenth centuries. In the nineteenth century, it was still the custom
in a few regions of the Bavarian Palatinate¹³¹ and on the Rhine to draw
lots for farmland, although they took place at longer intervals: every
three, four, nine, twelve, fourteen or eighteen years. This land, in
other words, was definitively turned into private property only around
the middle of the last century. In a few regions of Scotland as well,
there was repartitioning of farmland up until recently. All of the lots
were originally the same size, matching the average needs of a family as
well as the potential yield of the soil and the labor available.
Depending on the quality of soil in the various regions, they amounted
to fifteen, thirty, forty or more _Morgen_ of land.¹³² In most parts of
Europe, the lots were passed down by inheritance through individual
families, as the repartitioning of land became rare and eventually fell
out of practice in the fifth and sixth centuries. Still, this only
applied to the farms. All of the land that was left over—woodland,
meadows, bodies of water and unused parts—remained the unpartitioned,
collective property of the mark. From the yield of the woodland, for
example, the needs of the community were negotiated and what remained
was distributed.

The pastures were used in common. This unpartitioned mark or common land
survived for a very long time; it still exists today in the Bavarian
Alps, Switzerland and the Tyrol, as well as in France (in the
Vendée¹³³), in Norway and Sweden.

In order to ensure complete equality in the partitioning of farmland,
the land was first divided by quality and situation into a few
fields,¹³⁴ and each field was cut into several narrow strips
corresponding to the number of mark members. If a member of the mark had
doubts about whether he had received an equal share, he was allowed at
any time to call for a new measurement of the total land. Anyone who
resisted him was punished.

But even after periodic repartitioning and allocation by lot fell into
disuse, the _work_ of all members of the mark community, including farm
work, remained totally communal and subject to strict regulation by the
collectivity. This meant above all the general obligation of everyone
possessing a share of the mark to work. Residency alone was not enough
to be an actual member of the mark. For this, each person not only had
to live in the mark, but also had to cultivate his holding himself.
Anyone who failed to cultivate his portion of land for a number of years
lost it for good, and the mark could hand it over to someone else to
cultivate. Work itself was also under the direction of the mark. In the
early period after the Germans established settlements, the centerpiece
of their economic life was stock raising, conducted on communal fields
and meadows under communal village herdsmen. They used fallow land as
pasture for livestock, as well as farmland after the harvest. This
followed already from the fact that the times for seeding and harvest,
the alternation between tilling and fallow years for each field, and the
sequence of sowings, were collectively decided and everyone had to
comply with the general arrangement. Each field was surrounded by a
fence with gates, and was closed from seedtime until harvest; the
opening and closing dates of the field were decided by the entire
village. Each field had an overseer, or field guardian, who had to
uphold the prescribed arrangement as a public official of the mark. The
so-called field processions of whole villages were organized as
festivals; children were also brought to these, and given a box on the
ear to make them remember the boundaries and be able to attest to them
later on.

Stock raising was conducted in common, and the members of the mark were
not allowed to keep individual herds. All the village’s animals were
divided into common herds according to the kind of animal, each with its
own village herdsman and an animal to lead the herd. It was also decided
that the herds should have bells. In each mark, the right to hunt and
fish anywhere on its territory was also common. No snares could be laid,
nor any pits dug, without first notifying the rest of the community.
Mineral ore and the like that was dug out of the subsoil of the mark
from deeper than a ploughshare belonged to the community and not to the
individual finder. The craftsmen needed to reside in each mark. Each
farming family, indeed, made most of the items they needed for everyday
life themselves. They baked, brewed, spun and wove at home. Yet certain
crafts became specialized early on, especially those having to do with
the manufacture of farm implements. Thus, in the woodland community of
Wölpe in Lower Saxony,¹³⁵ the members of the mark were to “have a man of
each craft in the forest to make useful things from wood.”^(LX)
Everywhere, it was decided what amount and kind of wood the craftsmen
were to use, in order to protect the forest and use only what was
necessary for the members of the mark. The craftsmen received their
necessities from the mark and generally lived the same way as the mass
of other peasants. Yet they did not have full rights, partly because
they were transient and not an indigenous element, and partly, which
comes to the same thing, because their main business was not
agriculture, which was then the center of gravity of economic life,
around which public life and the laws and duties of the mark members
revolved.^(LXI) It was not possible, therefore, for just anyone to join
the mark community. The acceptance of an outsider had to be unanimously
approved by all of the members of the mark. Anyone who wanted to
transfer their lot could do so only to another mark member, never an
outsider, and only before the mark tribunal.

At the head of the mark community was the _Dorfgraf_ or village mayor,
in other places called the _Markmeister_ or _Centener_. He was chosen
for this position by the mark members. Not only was this an honor for
the chosen individual, but also a duty; refusal would be penalized. With
the passage of time, the office of mark president became hereditary in
certain families, and because of its power and income, it was then only
a small step before this office could be bought, with the land becoming
a fiefdom, so that the position developed from that of a purely
democratic elected leader of the community into a tool for its
domination. In the heyday of the mark community, however, the mark
president was simply the executor of the wishes of the collectivity. The
assembly of the mark members regulated all communal affairs, reconciled
disputes and imposed punishments. The entire system of agricultural
work, paths and buildings as well as the field and village policing,
were all decided by majority in the assembly. The assembly was also
responsible for calculating from the “mark books,” which had to be kept
on the mark’s business. Maintaining the peace and administering justice
within the mark were carried out under the chairmanship of the mark
president by those in attendance (the “court of jurisdiction”), who
rendered judgments orally and publicly. Only members of the mark were
allowed to attend the tribunal; outsiders were denied entry. The members
of the mark were sworn to help and attest to one another, being
generally required to assist one another in a brotherly and loyal manner
in case of emergency, fire, or enemy attack. In the army, mark members
formed their own battalions and fought side by side. No one was allowed
to abandon his comrade to an enemy spear. When crimes and damages
occurred in the mark or were committed by a member of the mark against
an outsider, the whole mark banded together in solidarity. Members of
the mark were also obliged to harbor travelers and to support the needy.
Each mark originally formed a religious community, and after the
introduction of Christianity—which in the case of the Germanic and Saxon
peoples was quite late, only in the ninth century—the community was a
religious congregation. Finally, the mark typically kept a schoolteacher
for all the village youth.

It is impossible to imagine anything simpler and more harmonious than
the economic system of the old Germanic mark. The entire mechanism of
social life here is open to view. A strict plan and a tight organization
cover everything each individual does and place him as a part of the
whole. The immediate needs of everyday life, and the equal satisfaction
of everyone, is the starting point and end point of the whole
organization. Everyone works together for everyone else and collectively
decides on everything. But what does this organization spring from, what
is it based on, this power of the collective over the individual? It is
nothing other than the communism of land and soil, that is to say, the
common possession of the most important means of production by those who
work. The typical characteristics of the agrarian-communistic economic
organization can be brought out more easily if they are studied
comparatively at an international level, so that it can be grasped as a
global form of production in all its diversity and flexibility.

Let us turn to the old Inca Empire in South America. The territory of
this empire, which consisted of the present-day republics of Peru,
Bolivia and Chile, an area of 3,364,600 square kilometers with a present
population of twelve million inhabitants,¹³⁶ was organized at the time
of the Spanish conquest under [Francisco] Pizarro in the same way it had
been for many centuries before. We find here right away the same
arrangements as among the ancient Germans. Each clan community, around a
hundred men capable of bearing weapons, occupied a particular area that
henceforth belonged to them as their _marca_, even this term curiously
resembling the German.¹³⁷ The mark’s farmland was separated off, divided
into portions and allocated annually to families by lot before the
sowing of crops. The size of the portions was determined by family size,
i.e. according to their needs. The village leader, whose position had
already developed from an elected one into a hereditary one by the time
of the formation of the Inca Empire in the tenth and eleventh
centuries,¹³⁸ received the largest allotted share. In northern Peru, the
male heads of household did not all cultivate their plots of land
themselves, but worked in groups of ten under the direction of a
leader—an arrangement that resembles certain aspects of the Germanic
structure. This ten-man group cultivated in rotation the lots of all of
its members, including those who were absent, on war service, or doing
_corvée_ labor for the Incas. Each family received the products that
grew on its lot. Only those who lived in the _marca_ and belonged to the
clan had the right to a plot of land. Yet everyone was also obliged to
cultivate his plot himself. Anyone who let his field lie fallow for a
certain number of years (in Mexico, it was three) lost his claim to his
land. The plots could not be sold or given away. It was strictly
forbidden to leave one’s own _marca_ and settle in another one, this
fact probably being connected to the strict blood ties of the village
tribes.

Agriculture in the coastal regions, where there is only periodic
rainfall, always required artificial irrigation by means of canals,
which were constructed by the collective labor of the entire _marca_.
There were strict rules governing the use of water and its distribution,
both between different villages and within them. Each village also had
“paupers’ fields,” which were cultivated by all the members of the
_marca_ and whose products the village leaders distributed among the
elderly, widows, and other needy individuals. All land outside the
tilled fields was _marcapacha_ (common land). In the mountainous region
of the country, where agriculture could not thrive, there was modest
livestock farming, consisting almost exclusively of llamas, the basis of
existence for these inhabitants, who periodically brought their main
product, wool, down to the valley in order to trade it with the peasants
for corn, pepper and beans. At the time of the conquest there were
already private herds and significant differences in wealth in the
mountain regions. An average member of the mark probably owned between
three and ten llamas, while a chief might have between fifty and a
hundred. Only the forest, soil and pasture were common property there,
and as well as private herds there were village ones, which could not be
divided up. At certain times, some of the communal herd were slaughtered
and the meat and wool divided among the families. There were no
specialized craftsmen; each family made the necessary household items
itself. There were, however, villages with special skill in a certain
craft, whether as weavers, potters, or metal workers. At the head of the
village was the village leader, originally an elected office but later a
hereditary one, who oversaw the cultivation, but in every important
matter he consulted with the assembly of all adults, which was called
together by sounding a conch shell.

Thus far, the ancient Peruvian _marca_ offers a faithful copy of the
German mark community in all essential characteristics. Yet it offers us
more in our investigation of the essence of this social system by
deviating from the pattern we already know, than it does in its
similarities. What was unique in the old Inca Empire is that it was a
conquered land on which foreign rule was established. The immigrant
conquerors, the Incas, were indeed an Indian tribe, yet they were able
to subjugate the peaceful Quechua¹³⁹ tribes who lived there because of
the isolation in which these lived in their villages, concerned only
with their own _marca_ and its boundaries, unconnected to any larger
territory, and uninterested in anything that existed or occurred beyond
their own borders. This extremely particularistic social organization,
which made the Inca conquest so effortless, was barely touched or
altered by the Incas themselves. Yet they did graft onto it a refined
system of economic exploitation and political domination. Each conquered
_marca_ had to give up a part of its own land for “Inca fields” and
“fields of the sun.” Though these continued to belong to it, their
products had to be turned over to the ruling Inca tribe and its priestly
caste. Similarly, they had to reserve a portion of their livestock in
the mountainous _marcas_ as “herds of the masters” and mark them as
such. The protection of these herds as well as the cultivation of the
fields for the Incas and their priests was based upon the compulsory
labor of all members of the _marca_. On top of this there was compulsory
labor for mining, likewise for public works such as road and bridge
construction under the control of the rulers; a strictly disciplined
military service; and finally a tribute of young girls, who were used by
the Incas for ritual sacrifice or as concubines. This tight system of
exploitation, however, did not interfere with the internal life of the
_marca_ and its communist-democratic organization; even the compulsory
labor and dues were borne communistically as a collective burden of the
mark. Yet what is remarkable is that this communistic village
organization did not simply prove a solid and amenable basis for a
centuries-long system of exploitation and servitude, as so often happens
in history, but that this system was itself organized on a communistic
basis. The Incas who ensconced themselves on the backs of the subjugated
Peruvian tribes themselves also lived in clan groups with mark-type
relations. Their capital, the town of Cuzco, was simply a combination of
a dozen or two collective quarters, each the seat of a communistic
household for a whole clan, complete with a communal burial area, and a
common cult as well. Around these tribal houses lay the mark regions of
the Inca clans, with unpartitioned forests and pastures and partitioned
farmland, which was likewise cultivated in common. Being a primitive
people, these exploiters and rulers had not yet renounced work
themselves; they used their position of domination only to live better
than the dominated and to make more opulent sacrificial offerings. The
modern art of having one’s food supplied by other people’s labor and
making refusal to work an attribute of domination was still foreign to
the nature of this social organization, in which collective property and
the general duty to work were deep-seated customs. The exercise of
political domination was also organized as a collective function of the
Inca clans. The Inca governors appointed to the Peruvian provinces,
analogous in their role to the Dutch residents of the Malaysian
archipelago, were seen as delegates of their clans in Cuzco, where they
retained residency in the collective quarters and participated in their
own mark community. Each year, these delegates returned home for the Sun
Festival in Cuzco¹⁴⁰ to render an account of their official activities
and to celebrate the great religious festival with their fellow
clansmen.

What we have here, as it were, is two social strata, one above the other
yet both internally communistic in their organization, standing in a
relationship of exploitation and subjugation. This phenomenon may seem
incomprehensible at first, being as it is in stark contradiction with
the principles of equality, brotherhood and democracy that form the
basis of the organization of the mark community. But we also have here
living proof of just how little in reality the primitive communist
structures had to do with general freedom and equality. These expanded,
generically valid “principles” applying to all abstract “human beings,”
or all people of the “civilized” countries, i.e., countries of
capitalist civilization, were only a late product of modern bourgeois
society, whose revolutions—in America as well as France—proclaimed them
for the first time. Primitive communist society knew no such general
principles for all human beings; their equality and solidarity grew out
of the traditions of common blood ties and out of common ownership of
the means of production. As far as these blood ties and common ownership
reached, so too did the equality of rights and solidarity of interests.
Whatever lay beyond these limits—which were no wider than the walls of a
village, or at most the territorial boundaries of a tribe—was foreign
and could even be hostile. Indeed, each community based on economic
solidarity could and necessarily was periodically driven into deadly
conflicts of interest with similarly constructed communities because of
the low level of development of production, or because of the scarcity
or exhaustion of food sources due to an increase in population. Brute
struggle, war, had to decide, and its result often meant the eradication
of one of the contending parties, or more frequently, the establishment
of a system of exploitation. It was not devotion to abstract principles
of equality and freedom that formed the basis of primitive communism,
but the pitiless necessities of a low level of human civilization, the
helplessness of humanity in the face of external nature, which forced
them to stick closely together in larger alliances, and to act
methodically and collectively with respect to labor and the struggle for
life as an absolute condition of existence. Yet it was also the same
limited control over nature that confined planning and action with
respect to labor to a relatively quite small area of natural pasture or
reclaimable village settlements, and made this unsuitable for collective
action on a larger scale. The primitive state of agriculture at that
time did not allow for any larger cultivation than that of a village
mark, and for this reason presented strict limits to the solidarity of
interests. And finally, it was the same inadequate development of labor
productivity that also generated periodic conflicts of interest among
the various social alliances, thereby making brute force the only means
to solve such conflicts. War thus became a permanent method for solving
conflicts of interest between social communities, a method that would
prevail through to the highest development of labor productivity—the
total domination of man over nature—that will put an end to material
conflicts of interest between people. If clashes between different
primitive communist societies were indeed a common occurrence, it was
the development of labor productivity at the time that decided the
outcome. When there was a conflict between two nomadic, herding peoples
who had come into conflict over livestock pastures, only brute force
could determine who would remain master of the land and who would be
driven into drought-ridden, inhospitable regions or even be
exterminated. Yet wherever agriculture was already sufficiently
flourishing to nourish people well and securely, without taking up the
entire labor force and the entire lifetime of these individuals, there
was also the foundation for a systematic exploitation of these peasants
by foreign conquerors. And this explains the relations that emerge, as
in Peru, when one communistic community establishes itself as the
exploiter of another.

The unique structure of the Inca Empire is important because it offers
us the key to understanding a whole series of similar patterns in
classical antiquity, especially those in the earliest period of Greek
history. If, for example, we have a brief surviving account how on the
island of Crete, which was ruled by the Dorians,¹⁴¹ the subjugated
people had to hand over their entire harvest, less the sustenance
required for themselves and their families, to the community, to cover
the communal meals of the free men (the ruling Dorians); or that in
Sparta, likewise a Dorian community, there were “state slaves” or
Helots,¹⁴² who were given “from the state” to individuals to work their
farmland, at first this kind of thing presents a puzzle. And a bourgeois
scholar, Professor Max Weber in Heidelberg, proposes a curious
hypothesis based on the standpoint of present-day condition and
concepts, in order to explain these curious historical phenomena:

The dominated population is treated here [in Sparta—R.L.] in the same
manner as in state slavery or bondage. The sustenance of the warriors is
deducted from agricultural production, partly in the collective manner
that we have already mentioned, and partly in such a way that the
individual is dependent on the yield of certain plots of land worked by
slaves that are allocated to him, which are appropriated in one way or
another, later increasingly through inheritance. New allocations of lots
and other kinds of distribution were historically considered to be
practicable and appear to have occurred. Naturally, they are not
reallocation of _farmland_ [“natural” is not something a bourgeois
professor should concede, regardless of what it is about—R.L.] but
rather a kind of reallocation of _ground rent_. Military considerations,
especially a military population policy, determine all the
particulars … The _urban-feudal_ character of this politics is
characteristically expressed in the way that in Gortyn,¹⁴³ the plots of
land occupied by serfs in the estate of a free man are subject to
military law: they form the _kleros_,¹⁴⁴ which is bound to the
maintenance of the military family.

Translated from the academic into regular speech: the farmlands are the
property of the whole community and thus may not be sold nor distributed
after the death of the owner. Professor Weber explains this at another
point as a wise measure “to prevent the fragmentation of wealth” and “in
the interest of maintaining lots appropriate for the class of warriors.”

The organization culminates in a mess-like community dinner table of the
warriors, the “syssities,”¹⁴⁵ and in the communal education of children
by the state, in order to make them into warriors.^(LXII)

In this way the Greeks of the heroic age, the age of Hector and
Achilles—who happily possess the notions of annuities
[_Rentenanstalten_] and the Prussian _Fideikommis_,¹⁴⁶ of officers’
messes with their “class appropriate” champagne toasts—the blossoming,
naked boys and girls of Sparta who enjoyed a national education, are all
transformed into a jail-like institution for cadets such as that at
Gross-Lichterfelde near Berlin.¹⁴⁷

The relations described above will not present much difficulty for
someone familiar with the internal structure of the Inca Empire. They
are undoubtedly the product of a similarly blatantly parasitic dual
structure that has emerged from the subjugation of an agricultural mark
community by another communistic community. The extent to which the
communistic foundation remains in the customs of the rulers as well as
in the situation of the subjugated depends on the stage of development,
the length and the environment of this pattern, all of which can offer a
whole range of gradations. The Inca Empire, where the rulers themselves
still labor, where the landownership of the subjects as a whole is not
yet touched and each social stratum is cohesively organized, can indeed
be viewed as the original form of such exploitative relations, which was
only able to preserve itself for centuries thanks to the country’s
relatively primitive level of culture and isolation from the rest of the
world. The historical information on Crete, drawn from traditional
sources, suggests an advanced stage where the subjugated peasant
community had to hand over all the fruits of its labor less what was
needed for its own subsistence, where the ruling community lived not
from their own labor in the fields, but from the dues paid to them by
the exploited mark community, although this still had its own
consumption in common. In Sparta we find—at a further stage of
development—that the land is no longer seen as belonging to the
subjugated community, but is rather the property of the rulers, being
repartitioned and allotted by lot among _themselves_ in the manner of
the mark community. The social organization of the subjugated is
shattered by the loss of its foundation, ownership of the land; they
themselves become the property of the ruling community, who
communistically, or “for the sake of the state,” hand over the landless
to individual mark members as laborers. The ruling Spartans themselves
continue to live in strict relations characteristic of the mark
community. And similar relations are supposed to have prevailed to a
certain degree in Thessaly,¹⁴⁸ where the previous inhabitants, the
_Penestai_ or “poor people,” were subjugated by the Aeolians,¹⁴⁹ or in
Bithynia, where the _Mariandynoi_ were placed in a similar situation by
Thracian tribes.¹⁵⁰ Such a parasitic existence, however, constantly led
to the seeds of disintegration being also brought into the ruling
community. Conquest, and the imperative to establish exploitation as a
permanent structure, already leads to a considerable development of the
military apparatus, as we see in both the Inca state and the Spartan
ones. This is the first precondition for inequality, for the formation
of privileged classes, in the womb of the originally free and equal mass
of peasants. It only requires favorable geographical and
cultural-historical circumstances, which arouse more refined needs by
contact with more civilized peoples and brisk trade, in order for
inequality to make rapid progress even within the ruling classes, for
the communistic cohesion to weaken, and for private property to enter
the field with its division of rich and poor. The early history of the
Greek world, after its contact with the civilized peoples of the Orient,
is a classic example of such a development. Thus, the result of the
subjugation of one early communistic society by another, whether sooner
or later, is always the same: the unraveling of communistic, traditional
social bonds among both the rulers and the ruled, and the birth of a
totally new social formation in which private property along with
inequality and exploitation, each engendering the other, enter the world
right away. And thus the history of the old mark community in classical
antiquity leads, on the one hand, to the opposition between a mass of
indebted small peasants and an aristocracy that has appropriated
military service, public offices, trade and the undivided communal lands
as large-scale landed property; and on the other hand, to the opposition
between this whole society of free people and the exploited _slaves_. It
was only one step from this differentiated natural economy based on
communal exploitation of a people subjected militarily to introducing
the purchase of individual slaves. And this step was taken quickly in
Greece by virtue of maritime and international trade, with its effects
in the coastal and island states. [Ettore] Ciccotti also distinguishes
between two types of slavery: “The oldest, most significant and most
widespread form of economic servitude,” he says,

which we see at the threshold of Greek history, is not slavery, but a
form of bondage that I would almost like to call vassalage. According to
Theopompus [of Chios]: “Among all Hellenes after the Thessalians and the
Lacedaemonians,¹⁵¹ the inhabitants of the island of Chios in Asia Minor
were the first to use slaves, but they did not acquire them in the same
manner as others … It is clear that the Lacedaemonians and Thessalians
formed their slave class out of Hellenes who previously inhabited this
part of the world they now owned, so that they forced the Achaeans,
Thessalians, Perrebes¹⁵² and Magnetes¹⁵³ into servitude and named these
subjugated peoples Helots and _Penestai_. In contrast, the inhabitants
of Chios acquired barbarian non-Greeks as slaves and paid a price for
them.”

And the reason for this distinction, Ciccotti correctly points out,

lay in the different level of development of the inland peoples on the
one hand and the island peoples on the other. Complete absence or a very
low degree of accumulation of wealth, along with the weak development of
commercial trade, in the one case excluded a direct and growing
production on the part of the owners as well as their direct employment
of slaves, leading instead to the more rudimentary form of tribute and
to a division of labor and formation of a class system that created a
body of armed soldiers out of the ruling class and a farming peasantry
out of the subjugated peoples.^(LXIII)

The internal organization of the Peruvian Inca state reveals to us an
important aspect of this primitive social form, indicating at the same
time a particular historic process of its downfall. A different turn in
the fate of this social form will appear when we trace the subsequent
episode in the history of the Peruvian Indians as well as that of the
other Spanish colonies in America. Here we particularly encounter a
completely new method of domination, which had no parallel with the Inca
rulers, for example. The Spanish, the first Europeans in the New World,
began their rule with the relentless extermination of the subjugated
population. According to the reports of the Spanish themselves, the
number of Indians exterminated in the space of only a few years after
the discovery of America reached a total of between twelve and fifteen
million. “We believe it justified to maintain,” [Bartolomé de] Las Casas
says, “that the Spanish, through their monstrous and inhuman treatment,
have exterminated twelve million people, among them women and
children.”¹⁵⁴ He further states, “In my personal opinion, the number of
those natives murdered in this period exceeded even fifteen
million.”^(LXIV) “On the island of Haiti,” says [Heinrich Gottfried]
Handelmann, “the number of natives before the Spanish encountered them
in 1492 was around one million; by 1508 only sixty thousand of these
million people remained, and nine years later there were only fourteen
thousand, so that the Spanish had to resort to introducing Indians from
the neighboring islands in order to have enough working hands. In 1508
alone, forty thousand natives from the Bahamas were transported to the
island of Haiti and made into slaves.”^(LXV) The Spanish regularly
hunted down the redskins, as described for us by an eyewitness and
participant, the Italian Girolamo Benzoni. “In part because of a lack of
food, and in part out of fear following separation from their fathers,
mothers, and children,” says Benzoni after one such manhunt on the
island of Kumagna, in which four thousand Indians were captured,

the majority of the enslaved natives died on the way to the port of
Cumana.¹⁵⁵ Each time that one of the slaves was too tired to march as
quickly as his comrades, the Spanish stabbed him in the back with their
daggers, inhumanly murdering him out of fear that he wanted to remain in
order to lead a counterattack. It was a heart-breaking scene to see
these poor souls, totally naked, tired, wounded and so exhausted from
hunger that they could hardly stand on their feet. Iron chains bound
their necks, hands and feet. There was not a virgin among them who would
not be raped by these robbers, who were so addicted to this repulsive
debauchery that many of them remained marred by syphilis forever … All
the natives taken as slaves were branded with hot irons. The captains
then took a number of them for themselves, dividing the rest among the
soldiers. They either gambled them away to one another or sold them to
Spanish colonists. Merchants who traded this commodity for wine, flour,
sugar and other daily necessities, transported the slaves to those parts
of the Spanish colonies where there was the greatest demand for them.
During their transport, a number of these unfortunates died from lack of
water and the bad air in the cabins, which was due to the fact that the
traders herded the slaves into the lowest level of the ship without
giving them enough water to drink or enough air to breathe.^(LXVI)

However, in order to relieve themselves of the trouble of pursuing the
Indians and the cost of buying them, the Spanish created a system known
as _repartimientos_ in their West Indian possessions and on the American
mainland.¹⁵⁶ The entire conquered area was divided by the governors into
districts, whose village leaders, _caciques_, were themselves obliged to
supply on demand the number of natives for slavery requested by the
Spanish. Each Spanish colonist periodically received the requested
number of slaves that were delivered to him by the governor under the
condition that he “take the trouble to convert them to
Christianity.”^(LXVII) The abuse of the slaves by the colonists defied
all understanding. Suicide became a salvation for the Indians. “All of
the natives captured by the Spanish,” according to one witness,

were forced by them to do hard and exhausting labor in the mines, away
from their homes and families and under constant threat of beatings. No
wonder that thousands of slaves saw no other possibility than to escape
from their gruesome fate by not only violently taking their own lives,
by hanging or drowning themselves or in other ways, but first also
murdering their wives and children, in order to end an unfortunate and
inescapable situation for everyone all at once. In other cases, women
resorted to aborting their children in the womb or avoiding sexual
contact with men so that they did not have to bear slaves.^(LXVIII)

Through the intervention of the imperial confessor, the pious Father
Garcia [Juan] de Loaysa, the colonists were finally able to have a
decree issued by the Hapsburg emperor, Charles V,¹⁵⁷ summarily declaring
the Indians to be hereditary slaves of the Spanish colonists. Benzoni in
fact says the decree only applied to Caribbean cannibals,¹⁵⁸ but was
extended and applied to all Indians in general. In order to justify
their atrocities, the Spanish systematically spread dramatic horror
stories about cannibalism and other vices of the Indians so that a
contemporary French historian, Marly de Châtel, in his “General History
of the West Indies” (Paris 1569)¹⁵⁹ could write of them: “God punished
them with slavery for their evil and vice, since not even Ham sinned
against his father Noah¹⁶⁰ to the degree of the Indians against the Holy
Father.”^(LXIX) And around the same time the Spaniard [José de] Acosta
wrote in his _Historia natural y moral de las Indias_ (Barcelona, 1591)
about these same Indians, that they were a “good-natured people who are
always ready to prove themselves of service to the Europeans; a people
who, in their behavior, show such a touching harmlessness and sincerity,
that those not completely stripped of all humanity could not treat them
in any other way than with tenderness and love.”^(LXX)

Naturally, there were also attempts to stop the horror. In 1531, Pope
Paul III published a bull decreeing that the Indians were members of the
human race and therefore free from slavery. The Spanish Imperial Council
for the West Indies also made a declaration against slavery, but the
need for these repeated decrees testified more to the fruitlessness of
these attempts than to their sincerity.

What freed the Indians from slavery was neither the pious actions of the
Catholic clergy nor the protests of the Spanish kings, but rather the
simple fact that the Indians’ mental and physical constitution rendered
them worthless for hard slave labor. Against this bare impossibility,
the worst cruelty of the Spanish did not help in the long run; the
redskins died under slavery like flies, fled, took their own lives—in
short, the entire business was thoroughly unprofitable. And only when
the warm and untiring defender of the Indians, Bishop Las Casas, hit
upon the idea of importing the more robust Africans as slaves in place
of the unfit Indians, were the useless experiments with the Indians
immediately abandoned. This practical discovery had a quicker and more
thorough effect than all of Las Casas’s pamphlets on the cruelties of
the Spanish. The Indians were freed from slavery after a few decades and
the enslavement of the Negroes began, which would last for four more
centuries. At the end of the eighteenth century a respectable German,
“good old [Joachim Christian] Nettelbeck” from Kolberg, was the captain
of a ship taking hundreds of Africans from Guinea to Guyana in South
America, where other “good East Prussians” exploited plantations and
sold slaves along with other goods from Africa, herding them into the
lowest parts of the ship, as the Spanish captains had done in the
sixteenth century. The progress of the humanitarian era of the
Enlightenment showed itself in the way that Nettelbeck, to alleviate
their melancholy and to keep them from dying off, allowed the slaves to
dance on the ship’s deck with music and whip cracks every evening,
something to which the more brutal Spanish traders had not yet resorted.
And in 1871, in the late nineteenth century, the noble David
Livingstone, who had spent thirty years in Africa searching for the
sources of the Nile, wrote in his famous letters to the American [James]
Gordon Bennett:

And if my disclosures regarding the terrible Ujijian¹⁶¹ slavery should
lead to the suppression of the east coast slave trade, I shall regard
that as a greater matter by far than the discovery of all the Nile
sources together. Now that you have done with domestic slavery forever,
lend us your powerful aid toward this great object. This fine country is
blighted, as with a curse from above …¹⁶²

Yet the lot of the Indians in the Spanish colonies was not made
significantly better by this transformation. A new system of
colonization simply took the place of the old one. Instead of
_repartimientos_, which were created for the direct enslavement of the
population, the so-called _encomiendas_¹⁶³ were introduced.^(LXXI)
Formally, the inhabitants were awarded personal freedom and full
property rights to their land. But these areas were under the
administrative direction of the Spanish colonists, in particular in the
hands of the descendants of the first _conquistadores_, and these
_encomenderos_ were to be the guardians of the Indians, who were for
their part declared to be legal minors. The _encomenderos_ were supposed
to spread Christianity among the Indians. To cover the cost of
constructing churches for the natives and as compensation for their
labor as guardians, the _encomenderos_ legally acquired the right to
demand “moderate payments in money and in kind” from the population.
These provisions soon were enough to make the _encomiendas_ hell for the
Indians. The land was indeed left to them as the undivided property of
the tribes, but the Spanish only understood, or only wanted to
understand, this to be farmland, land that was under the plough. The
undivided mark as well as unused lands, often even fields left to lie
fallow, were taken over by the Spanish as “waste land.” And they did
this with such thoroughness and shamelessness that [Alonzo de] Zurita
wrote on this subject:

There is not a parcel of land, not a farm, that was not determined to be
the property of the Europeans, without regard for the encroachments onto
the interests and the property rights of the natives, who were thus
forced to leave this land, which had been inhabited by them since
ancient times. Cultivated land was often seized from them, under the
pretext that this was being utilized only to prevent its acquisition by
the Europeans. Thanks to this system, in some provinces the Spanish
expanded their property so widely that the natives had no land left to
cultivate themselves.^(LXXII)

At the same time, the “moderate” payments were increased so shamelessly
by the _encomenderos_ that the Indians were crushed under them. “All of
the belongings of the Indian,” Zurita says,

are not enough to pay the taxes that are levied on him. You meet many
people among the redskins whose assets do not even come to one _peso_
and who live from daily wage-labor; these unfortunates, accordingly,
having nothing left with which to support their families. This is the
reason why so often young people prefer sexual relations out of wedlock,
especially when their parents do not even have four or five _reales_ at
their disposal. The Indians can scarcely afford the luxury of clothing
themselves; many who have no resources to buy themselves clothes are not
able to take communion. It is no wonder, then, that the majority of them
become desperate, since they cannot find any way to acquire the food
needed for their families … During my early travels, I discovered that
many Indians hanged themselves out of despair, after explaining to their
wives and children that they were doing this in the face of the
impossibility of meeting the taxes demanded of them.^(LXXIII)

Finally, in addition to increasing land theft and pressure of taxation,
came forced labor. At the beginning of the seventeenth century, the
Spanish openly returned to the system that had been formally abandoned
in the sixteenth century. Though slavery was abolished for the Indians,
in its place came a unique system of forced wage labor, which did not
significantly differ from the system that preceded it. Already in the
mid-sixteenth century, Zurita portrays for us the situation of the
Indian wage laborers under the Spanish in the following way:

The whole time, the Indians received no other nourishment than
cornbread … The _encomendor_ has them work from morning to night, naked
in the morning and evening frosts, in storms and thunder, without giving
them any food other than half-spoiled bread. The Indians spend the night
under the open sky. Because the wage is only paid at the end of their
term of forced labor, the Indians have no means to buy the necessary
warm clothing for themselves. It is no surprise that under such
circumstances, the work in the _encomenderos_ is utterly exhausting for
them and can be identified as one of the reasons for the Indians dying
off so rapidly.^(LXXIV)

This system of forced wage labor was introduced at the beginning of the
seventeenth century by the Spanish crown, making it officially and
universally legal. The stated reason for the law was that the Indians
would not work voluntarily and that without them the mines could only be
run with great difficulty, despite the presence of the African slaves.
The Indian villagers were thus required to provide the number of workers
demanded (in Peru, a seventh of the population, in New Spain, 4
percent), and these were at the mercy of the _encomenderos_. The deadly
consequences of this system were immediately apparent. An anonymous
memorandum sent to Philip IV, under the title “Report on the Dangerous
Situation of the Kingdom of Chile from the Temporal and Spiritual Point
of View,” stated:

The known cause of the rapid decrease in the number of natives is the
system of forced labor in the mines and on the fields of the
_encomenderos_. Although the Spanish have an enormous number of Negroes
at their disposal, although they have taxed the Indians at a higher rate
than they paid their leaders before the conquest, they nevertheless
regard it as impossible to give up this system of forced labor.^(LXXV)

In addition, forced labor resulted in the Indians in many cases being
unable to cultivate their fields, which the Spanish then used as a
pretext to seize the land for themselves as “waste land.” The ruin of
Indian farming offered a fertile ground for extortion. “Among their
native rulers,” according to Zurita, “the Indians did not know any
usurers.”^(LXXVI) The Spanish taught them very well these blessings of
money economy and taxation. Eaten up by debt, huge lands owned by the
Indians—those that had not already been simply stolen by the
Spanish—fell into the hands of Spanish capitalists, with the assessment
of their value forming a special example of European perfidy. Between
them, the theft of land, taxation, forced labor and usury formed a tight
circle in which the existence of the Indian mark community collapsed.
The traditional public order and customary social bonds of the Indians
were dissolved by the collapse of their economic base—mark community
farming. For their part, the Spanish methodically destroyed it by
disrupting all traditional forms of authority. The village and tribal
chiefs had to be confirmed by the _encomenderos_, who used this
prerogative to fill these positions with their own protégés, the most
depraved subjects of Indian society. Another favorite method of the
Spanish was the systematic instigation of the Indians against their
leaders. Under the auspices of their Christian aims, of protecting the
natives from being exploited by their chiefs, they declared them free
from paying the dues that these had received since time immemorial. “The
Spanish,” writes Zurita, “based on what is happening in Mexico today,
maintain that the chiefs are plundering their own tribes, but they bear
the blame for this extortion, since they themselves and no one else
robbed the former chiefs of their position and income and replaced them
with ones from among their protégés.”^(LXXVII) Likewise, they looked to
instigate mutinies whenever village or tribal chiefs protested against
illicit lands sales to the Spanish by individual members of the mark.
The result was chronic revolts, and an endless succession of legal
proceedings over unlawful land sales among the natives themselves. Along
with ruin, hunger, and slavery, anarchy added to the mix that made the
existence of the Indians hell. The stark result of this
Spanish-Christian guardianship can be summed up in two phrases: the land
going into the hands of the Spanish, and the extinction of the Indians.
“In all the Spanish areas of the Indies,” Zurita writes,

either the native tribes disappear completely or they become much
smaller, although others have claimed the opposite. The natives leave
their dwellings and farms, since these have lost all value for them in
the face of the exorbitant dues in money and kind; they emigrate to
other regions, continuously wandering from one region to another, or
they hide themselves in the forest and run the danger of becoming,
sooner or later, the prey of wild animals. Many Indians end their lives
by suicide, as I personally witnessed several times and learned from
interviews with the local population.^(LXXVIII)

And half a century later, another high official of the Spanish
government in Peru, Juan Ortiz de Cervantes, reported:

The native population in the Spanish colonies grow ever more thin on the
ground; they abandon the areas they formerly inhabited, leaving the soil
uncultivated, and the Spanish have to struggle to find the necessary
number of peasants and herdsmen. The so-called Mitayos,¹⁶⁴ a tribe
without whom work in the gold and silver mines would be impossible,
either completely abandon the cities occupied by the Spanish, or if they
stay, die out at an astonishing rate.^(LXXIX)

We may truly wonder at the incredible tenacity of the Indian people and
their mark community institutions, since remains of both persisted well
into the nineteenth century, despite these conditions.

The great English colony of India shows us another aspect of the fate of
the mark community. Here, as in no other corner of the earth, one can
study the most varying forms of property that represent the history of
several millennia, like [William] Herschel’s “star gages” model of the
sky¹⁶⁵ projected onto a flat surface. Village communities alongside
tribal communities; periodic repartitionings of equal portions of land
alongside lifelong ownership of unequal portions of land; communal labor
alongside private individual enterprise; equal rights of all villagers
to community lands alongside the privileges of certain groups; and
finally, beside all these forms of communal property, private property
in land in the form of smaller subplots of rural land, short-term
leaseholds, and enormous latifundia. All of this could still be observed
in India, as large as life, a few decades ago. Indian legal sources
attest that the mark community in India is an ancient system. The oldest
common law, the Code of Manu¹⁶⁶ from the ninth century BC, contains
countless ordinances concerning border disputes between mark
communities, unpartitioned marks, and the new settlement of daughter
villages on unpartitioned land of older marks. The code knows only
ownership based on one’s own labor; it mentions handicrafts only as a
side-occupation of agriculture; it attempts to rein in the power of the
Brahmins, the priests, by only allowing them to be granted moveable
property. The future indigenous sovereigns, the rajas, appear in these
codes still as elected tribal high chiefs. The two later codes,
Yajnavalkya¹⁶⁷ and Narada,¹⁶⁸ which are from the fifth century,
recognize the clan as the social organization, with public and judicial
authority lying in the hands of the assembly of mark members. These are,
jointly and collectively, responsible for the misdeeds and crimes of
individuals. Standing at the head of the village is the elected mark
leader. Both legal codes advise electing the best, most peace-loving and
most even-handed community member to this office and offering him
unconditional obedience. The Code of Narada already distinguishes
between two kinds of mark communities: “relatives” or clan-based
communities, and “cohabitants” or neighboring communities as local
associations of non-blood relatives. Yet, at the same time, both legal
codes only recognize ownership based on individual labor. Abandoned land
belongs to the person who takes it over for cultivation. Illegal
occupation is still not recognized after three generations if the
individuals in question do not cultivate the land. Up to this point, we
therefore see the Indian people still enclosed within the same primitive
social groups and economic relations, as they existed for centuries in
the Indus region and subsequently in the heroic period of the Ganges
conquest, from which the great folk epics of the _Ramayana_¹⁶⁹ and the
_Mahabharata_¹⁷⁰ were born. It is only in the commentaries on the old
legal codes, which are always the characteristic symptom of deep social
changes and aspirations, that one sees old legal views reinterpreted in
the light of new interests. This is clear proof that up to the
fourteenth century—the epoch of the commentators—Indian society went
through significant adjustments in its social structure. In the
meantime, an influential priestly class had developed, rising above the
mass of peasants both materially and legally. These commentators—just
like their Christian colleagues in the feudal West—seek to “explain” the
precise language of the old legal codes in such a way as to justify
priestly ownership of property and encourage the donation of land to the
Brahmins, and in this way promote the division of the mark lands and the
formation of clerical landed property at the expense of the mass of
peasant farmers. This development was typical of the fate of all
Oriental societies.

The life-and-death question for every form of developed agriculture in
most parts of the Orient is irrigation.^(LXXX)  ¹⁷¹ We see at an early
date in India, just as in Egypt, large-scale irrigation systems as a
solid foundation for agriculture, along with canals, streams and
systematic precautionary measures to protect the land from periodic
flooding. From the outset, all of these large undertakings were beyond
the capacity of the individual mark community, in terms of the forces,
initiative and planning they required. Their direction and execution
were the work of an authority that stood above the individual village
marks, one that could bring labor-power together on a larger scale. Also
required was a mastery of natural laws greater than that available to
the observational and experiential world of the mass of peasants,
enclosed in the limits of their villages. Out of these needs arose the
important function of the priests in the Orient, who were able to direct
large public works such as irrigation systems by virtue of their
observation of nature, this being an integral part of every nature-based
religion; the priests’ exemption from direct participation in
agricultural labor, a freedom that was the product of a certain stage of
development, allowed them to direct the irrigation work. Naturally, over
time, this purely economic function grew into a particular type of
social power held by the priests. The specialization of these members of
society, which emerged from the division of labor, turned into a
hereditary, exclusive caste with privileges over the peasant masses and
an interest in their exploitation. The pace and extent of this process
for a particular people, whether it remained embryonic as in the case of
the Peruvian Indians, or developed into official state rule by the
priestly caste, theocracy, as in Egypt or among the ancient Hebrews, was
always dependent on the specific geographical and historical
circumstances. But it also depended on whether frequent contact with
surrounding peoples allowed a strong warrior caste to emerge outside of
the priestly caste, and raise itself up as a military aristocracy in
competition with or indeed above the priests. In either case, it was the
case again here that the specific, particularistic narrowness of the
ancient communistic mark, with an organization unsuited for larger
economic or political tasks, forced it to cede these functions to forces
that dominated it from outside. These functions so surely offered the
key to the political domination and economic exploitation of the peasant
masses, that all barbarian conquerors in the Orient, whether Mongols,
Persians, or Arabs, were forced, alongside their military power, to take
control of the management and execution of the large public undertakings
required for the agricultural economy. Just as the Incas in Peru
regarded the supervision of artificial irrigation projects and of road
and bridge construction as not only a privilege but a duty, so the
various Asiatic despotic dynasties that succeeded one another in India
applied themselves just as diligently. Despite the formation of castes,
despite despotic foreign rule over the country, and despite political
upheavals, the tranquil village pursued its existence in the depths of
Indian society. Within each village the ancient traditional statutes of
the mark constitution prevailed, continuing beneath the storms of
political history its own calm and unremarked internal history, shedding
old forms and adopting new ones, experiencing prosperity and decline,
dissolution and regeneration. No chronicler ever portrayed these events,
and when world history describes the bold campaign of Alexander [the
Great] of Macedon all the way to the sources of the Indus, and is full
of the battle sounds of bloody Timur and ¹⁷² it remains completely
silent about the internal economic history of the Indian people. It is
only from survivals of the various ancient layers of this history that
we can reconstruct Indian society’s hypothetical pattern of development,
and it is the achievement of Kovalevsky to have unraveled this.
According to Kovalevsky, the various types of agrarian communities that
were still observed in the mid-nineteenth century in India can be placed
in the following historical sequence:

1) The oldest form is that of the pure clan community, comprising the
totality of blood relatives in a clan or kinship group, which owns the
land in common and cultivates it communally. Here the communal land is
therefore unpartitioned, and it is only the products of the harvest, as
well as those in communal storage, that are distributed. This most
primitive type of village community survived only in a few districts of
northern India, its inhabitants largely confined to a few branches
(_putti_) of the old gens. Kovalevsky sees in this, by analogy with the
_zadruga_ of Bosnia-Herzegovina,¹⁷³ the product of a dissolution of the
original blood relationship, which as a result of the growth of the
population, broke up into a number of large families that withdrew from
the community with their lands. In the middle of the previous century
there were still a considerable number of village communities of this
type, some of them with more than 150 members, while others boasted 400.
More predominant, however, was the small village community, which came
together in larger kinship groups on the area of the old gens only in
exceptional cases, i.e. in connection with the sale of land. As a
general rule, they led the isolated and strictly regulated existence
that Marx, using English sources, portrays in a few short passages in
_Capital_:^(LXXXI)

These small and extremely ancient Indian communities, for example, some
of which continue to exist to this day, are based on the possession of
the land in common, on the blending of agriculture and handicrafts and
on an unalterable division of labor, which serves as a fixed plan and
basis for action whenever a new community is started. The communities
occupy areas of from a hundred up to several thousand acres, and each
forms a compact whole producing all it requires. Most of the products
are destined for direct use by the community itself, and are not
commodities. Hence production here is independent of that division of
labor brought about in Indian society as a whole by the exchange of
commodities. It is the surplus alone that becomes a commodity, and a
part of that surplus cannot become a commodity until it has reached the
hands of the state, because from time immemorial a certain quantity of
the community’s production has found its way to the state as rent in
kind. The form of the community varies in different parts of India. In
the simplest communities, the land is tilled in common, and the produce
is divided among the members. At the same time, spinning and weaving are
carried on in each family as subsidiary industries. Alongside the mass
of people thus occupied in the same way, we find the “_chief
inhabitant_,” who is judge, police authority and tax-gatherer in one;
the _book-keeper_, who keeps the accounts of the tillage and registers
everything relating to this; another official, who prosecutes criminals,
protects strangers traveling through and escorts them to the next
village; the _boundary_ man, who guards the boundaries against
neighboring communities; the _water-overseer_, who distributes the water
from the common tasks for irrigation; the _Brahmin_, who conducts the
religious services; the _schoolmaster_, who on the sand teaches the
children reading and writing; the _calendar Brahmin_, or astrologer, who
makes known the lucky or unlucky days for seed-time and harvest, and for
every other kind of agricultural work; a _smith_ and a _carpenter_, who
make and repair all the agricultural implements; the _potter_, who makes
all the pottery of the village; the _barber_, the _washerman_, who
washes clothes, the _silversmith_, here and there the _poet_, who in
some communities replaces the silversmith, in others the schoolmaster.
This dozen or so of individuals is maintained at the expense of the
whole community. If the population increases, a new community is
founded, on the pattern of the old one, on unoccupied land … The law
that regulates the division of labor in the community acts with the
irresistible authority of a law of nature … The simplicity of the
productive organism in these self-sufficing communities which constantly
reproduce themselves in the same form and, when accidentally destroyed,
spring up again on the same spot and with the same name—this simplicity
supplies the key to the riddle of the _unchangeability_ of Asiatic
_societies_, which is in such striking contrast with the constant
dissolution and refounding of Asiatic _states_, and their never-ceasing
changes of dynasty. The structure of the fundamental economic elements
of society remains untouched by the storms that blow up in the cloudy
regions of politics.^(LXXXII)

2) At the time of the English conquest, the original tribal community
had in most cases already been dissolved. From its dissolution, however,
emerged a new form, a kinship community with partitioned agricultural
land, though not equally divided. The unequal lots of land were given to
individual families and their size was based on the family’s
relationship to the tribal ancestors. This form was prevalent in
northwestern India as well as in Punjab. The lots here were neither held
for life nor were they hereditary; they remained in the family’s
possession until such time as the growth of the population or the need
to allocate a lot to a relative who had been temporarily absent made a
repartitioning necessary. Frequently, however, new claims were satisfied
not by a general repartitioning, but by allocating new parcels of
uncultivated communal land. In this way, the familial lots of land were
often—in fact, if not in law—theirs for life, and even inheritable.
Alongside this unevenly partitioned communal land, forests, marshes,
fields, and uncultivated land still belonged in common to all the
families, who likewise utilized them collectively. This unusual
communistic organization based on inequality came into contradiction
with new interests. With each new generation, determining the degree of
kinship became more difficult, the tradition of blood ties faded, and
the inequality of the familial lots of land was increasingly felt as an
injustice by those disadvantaged by it. In many regions, on the other
hand, a mixing of the population unavoidably took place, whether because
of the departure of some of the kinship group, because of war and
extermination of another part of the population, or because of the
settlement and acceptance of new arrivals. Thus, the population of the
community, despite all the apparent immobility and immutability of their
conditions, was indeed subdivided according to the quality of the soil
into fields (_wund_), each family receiving a few strips of land both in
the better, irrigated fields (which were called _sholgura_ from _shola_,
or rice) and in the inferior ones (_culmee_).¹⁷⁴ Reallocations were not
originally periodic, at least before the English conquest, but took
place each time population growth caused a real inequality in the
economic situation of the families. This was especially true in
communities rich in land, which had a supply of utilizable fields. In
smaller communities, repartitioning occurred every ten, eight or five
years, often every year. This was particularly the case where there was
a lack of good fields, making equal distribution each year to all
members of the mark impossible, so that only by rotating the use of the
various fields could an equitable balance be achieved. Thus, the Indian
tribal community ends, as it is disintegrating, by assuming the form
that is historically established as the original German mark community.

With British India and Algeria,¹⁷⁵ we see two classic examples of the
desperate struggle and the tragic end of the ancient communist economic
organization through contact with European capitalism. The picture of
the changeable fate of the mark community would not be complete if we
failed to take into consideration the remarkable example of a country
where history apparently took an entirely different course. In this
case, the state did not seek to destroy the communal property of the
peasants through force, but on the contrary, attempted to rescue and
preserve it with all the means at its disposal. This country is tsarist
Russia.

We do not need to concern ourselves here with the enormous theoretical
debate on the origins of the Russian peasant commune that has gone on
for decades. It was only natural, in complete accord with the general
hostile attitude toward primitive communism among contemporary bourgeois
scholarship, that the “discovery” by the Russian Professor [Boris]
Chicherin in 1858, according to whom the agricultural commune in Russia
was not an original historical product at all, but supposedly an
artificial product of the fiscal policy of tsarism, should have achieved
such a favorable reception and acceptance among German
scholars.^(LXXXIII) Chicherin, who yet again provides proof that liberal
scholars are, as historians, for the most part much more ineffectual
than their reactionary colleagues, still accepts the theory, which has
already been definitively abandoned for Western Europe since Maurer,
that the Russians settled in individual settlements from which communes
developed, supposedly only in the sixteenth and seventeenth
centuries.¹⁷⁶ In this connection, Chicherin derives collective farming
and the imposition of plots of land from the crop rotation of strips of
the common land, collective ownership of the land likewise from boundary
disputes, and the public power of the mark community from the collective
burden of the poll tax introduced in the sixteenth century. Thus, in a
typically liberal fashion, he more or less turns all historical
contexts, causes and consequences upside down.

Whatever one thinks about the antiquity of the peasant agricultural
commune and its origins, it has, in any case, outlived the whole long
history of serfdom as well as its dissolution, through to most recent
times. We shall deal here only with its fate in the nineteenth century.

When Tsar Alexander II enacted his so-called “emancipation” of the
peasants, their own land was sold to them by the lords—following
completely the Prussian example—with the latter being well indemnified
by the treasury in bonds for the worst areas of the land they allegedly
owned, imposing a debt of 900 million rubles,¹⁷⁷ to be repaid at an
annual rate of 6 percent within forty-nine years. This land was not, as
in Prussia, assigned to individual peasant families as private property,
but to whole communities as inalienable and unmortgageable communal
property. The entire community took joint responsibility for the debt
repayment, just as they had for the various taxes and dues, and had a
free hand in assessing the shares of its individual members. This was
the arrangement made for the entire massive area of the Great Russian
peasantry. In the early 1890s, the distribution of landownership in
European Russia (leaving out Poland, Finland, and the region of the Don
Cossacks¹⁷⁸) was as follows: public domains, consisting mostly of
enormous forest regions in the north and of wastelands, encompassed 150
million _dessiatines_;^(LXXXIV) imperial appanages,¹⁷⁹ 7 million; church
and municipal property, somewhat less than 9 million; in private
ownership, 93 million (only 5 percent of this belonging to the peasants,
the rest to the aristocracy), while 131 million _dessiatines_ were
communal peasant property. As late as 1900, there were 122 million
hectares of communal peasant property, against only 22 million that were
the property of individual peasants.¹⁸⁰

Looking at the economy of the Russian peasantry in this enormous area,
as it existed until recently and in part still exists today, it is again
easy to recognize the typical structures of the mark community, as these
existed in Germany and Africa, on the Ganges and in Peru. The mark’s
fields were partitioned, while forests, grasslands and bodies of water
were undivided communal land. With the general prevalence of the
primitive three-field crop rotation, summer and winter fields were
divided according to soil quality into strips (“charts”), and each strip
into smaller segments. The summer strips were distributed in April and
the winter ones in June. With scrupulous observation of equal land
distribution, the diversity of crops had become so developed that in the
Moscow province, for example, there were in both the summer and winter
fields an average of eleven strips each, so that each peasant had at
least twenty-two scattered parcels of land to cultivate. The community
usually reserved plots of land for emergency communal purposes, or laid
up stocks for the same purpose, to which each individual member had to
supply grain. The technical progress of the economy was ensured by each
peasant family being able to keep their land for ten years on condition
that they fertilized it, or each field being divided from the start into
parcels of land that were fertilized from the outset and only
repartitioned every ten years. Most of the flax fields and the fruit and
vegetable gardens were subject to the same rule.

The allocation of various meadows and pastures for the community herds,
the marking of herds, the fencing of meadows and the protection of
fields, as well as decisions over system of rotation, the time for
particular field work, and the date and method of repartitioning—all of
this was a matter for the community, or more specifically, the village
assembly. As far as the frequency of repartitioning was concerned, there
was great diversity. In one particular province, for example,
Saratov,¹⁸¹ nearly half of the 278 village communities studied in 1877
undertook a reallotment each year, while the remainder did this every
two, three, five, six, eight or eleven years. At the same time,
thirty-eight communities that practiced collective fertilization had
given up repartitioning altogether.^(LXXXV)

What is most remarkable about the Russian mark community is the method
of land apportionment. The principle of equal lots common among the
Germans was not prevalent in the Russian case, nor was a determination
based on the needs of the particular family, as in Peru. Instead, the
principle of taxability was the single determining factor. The
government’s concern with taxation continued to dominate the life of the
commune after the peasants’ “emancipation,” and all the village
institutions revolved around taxation. For the tsarist government,
taxation was based on the so-called “audited souls,” that is, all the
male inhabitants of the community without distinction of age, as
determined every twenty years, since the first peasant census under
Peter the Great, by the famous “audits” that were the terror of the
Russian people and tore whole communities apart.^(LXXXVI)

The government taxed the villages on the basis of the number of audited
“souls.” Yet the commune allocated the total amount of tax for which it
was liable on peasant households according to their number of workers,
and it was the tax capacity measured in this way that determined each
household’s portion of land. Rather than a basis of sustenance for the
peasants, land allocation in Russia after 1861 was a basis of taxation.
It was not a benefit to which each household was entitled, but an
obligation imposed on every member of the commune as a state service.
There was nothing more strange than the Russian village assembly for the
partitioning of land. From all sides could be heard protests against the
allocation of too large parcels of land—poor families with no real
workers, made up predominantly of women or children, were generally
spared from being allocated a parcel of land, on grounds of
“powerlessness,” while larger allotments were forced on wealthy peasants
by the mass of poorer peasants. The tax burden that is so central to
Russian village life is also enormous. On top of the debt repayments,
there were also poll taxes, a village tax, church tax, salt tax, etc. In
the 1880s, the poll tax and salt tax were abolished, yet the tax burden
remained so enormous that it devoured all of the peasantry’s economic
resources. According to a statistic from the 1890s, 70 percent of the
peasantry drew less than a minimum existence from their land allotments,
20 percent were able to feed themselves, but not to keep livestock,
while only 9 percent had a surplus above their own needs that could be
taken to market. Tax arrears were therefore a frequent phenomenon of the
Russian village from the “emancipation” onwards. Already in the 1870s,
an average yearly intake of fifty million rubles from the poll tax was
accompanied by an annual deficit of eleven million rubles. After the
poll tax was lifted, the poverty of the Russian village continued to
grow, due to the simultaneous escalation of indirect taxation from the
eighties onward. In 1904, the tax arrears amounted to 127 million
rubles, a debt that was almost completely cancelled because collecting
it had become totally impossible and because of the general
revolutionary ferment. The taxes not only ate up all of the peasants’
income, they also forced them to seek side occupations. One of these was
seasonal farm labor, which brought whole migrations of peoples into the
Russian hinterland, the strongest male villagers moving to the large
aristocratic estates to be hired as day laborers, while their own fields
back home were left in the weaker hands of older, female, and adolescent
workers. The beckoning of the city with its manufacturing industries
offered another possibility. In the central industrial region,
therefore, a class of temporary workers formed who moved to the city
only for the winter, mostly to textile factories, returning to their
villages with their earnings in the spring to work in the fields.
Finally, in many districts, there was industrial domestic work or
occasional agricultural work on the side, such as transport or chopping
wood. And even with all of this, the large majority of the peasant
masses could hardly support themselves. Not only was the whole
agricultural yield swallowed by taxation, but their extra earnings as
well. The mark community, which was collectively liable for the taxes,
was equipped with strong means of enforcement vis-à-vis its members. It
could hire out those in arrears with their taxes for wage labor, and
requisition their earned income. It issued or refused internal passports
to its members, without which a peasant was unable to leave the village.
Finally, it had the legal right to inflict corporal punishment on those
whose taxes were intractably in arrears. Periodically, this made the
Russian village in the enormous stretches of the Russian interior a
horrific sight. Upon the arrival of the tax collectors, a procedure
began for which tsarist Russia coined the term “flogging out those in
arrears.” The entire village assembly appeared, the “evaders” had to
take off their trousers and lay down on a bench, whereupon they were
brutally beaten with a birch by their fellow mark members, one after the
other. The moaning and weeping of those being thrashed—most often
bearded family fathers, even white-haired old men—accompanied the higher
authorities, who, after they had completed their task with the ringing
of bells, went off in their troikas to hunt in another community and
carry out the same punishments. It was not uncommon for a peasant to
spare himself this public punishment by committing suicide. Another
unique product of those circumstances was the “tax beggar,” an
impoverished old peasant who took to begging as a tramp in order to
cobble together the taxes due and bring them back to the village. The
state watched over the mark community, which had been turned into a tax
machine, with severity and persistence. A law of 1881, for example,
decreed that the community could only sell agricultural land if
two-thirds of the peasants made that decision, after which it was still
necessary to get the consent of the ministry of the interior, the
ministry of finance, and the ministry of crown lands. Individual
peasants were allowed to sell their inherited lands only to other
members of the mark community. Taking on a mortgage was forbidden. Under
Alexander III, the village community was robbed of all autonomy and
placed under the thumb of “land captains,” an institution similar to the
Prussian district administrators.¹⁸² Decisions made by the village
assembly required the consent of these officials; repartitionings of
land were undertaken under their supervision, as were tax assessment and
debt collection. The law of 1893 made a partial concession to time
pressure by declaring repartitionings permissible only every twelve
years. Yet, at the same time, withdrawing from the mark community
required the consent of the community and was allowed only on condition
that the person involved contributed his individual portion of the
repayment debt in full.

Despite all of these artificial legal binds that squeezed the village
community, despite the guardianship of three ministries and a swarm of
_chinovniks_ [petty officials], the dissolution of the mark community
could no longer be prevented. There was the crushing tax burden; the
deterioration of the peasant economy as a result of the side activities
in agricultural and industrial work; a shortage of land, especially
pasture and forest, which had already been grabbed by the aristocracy at
the time of emancipation, and a shortage of arable fields due to
increasing population. All of this had two critical effects: the flight
to the city and the rise of usury within the village. To the extent that
the combination of peasant farming and outside work in industry or
elsewhere increasingly served only to pay the tax burden, without ever
providing a real subsistence, membership in the mark community became
like an iron chain of hunger around the necks of the peasants. The
natural desire of the poorer members of the community was to escape from
this chain. Hundreds of fugitives were returned by the police to their
communities as undocumented vagabonds, then made an example of by being
beaten on a bench with rods by their mark comrades. But even the rods
and the enforcement of passport controls proved powerless against the
mass flight of the peasants, who fled from the hell of their “village
communism” to the city under cover of darkness, to plunge definitively
into the sea of the industrial proletariat. Others, for whom family
bonds or other circumstances made escape inadvisable, sought to
accomplish their exit from the agricultural commune by legal means. To
achieve this, they had to contribute their share of the debt repayment,
and were assisted here by moneylenders. Early on, not only the tax
burden but the forced sale of grain on the most unacceptable terms in
order to repay these debts exposed the Russian peasant to usurers. Every
emergency, every bad crop made resort to them unavoidable. And
ultimately, even emancipation from the yoke of the community was
unattainable for most unless they put themselves under the new yoke of
the usurer, paying dues and other services for an incalculable length of
time. While the impoverished peasants sought to flee the mark community
in order to free themselves from misery, many wealthy peasants simply
turned their backs on it and left the commune in order to escape
responsibility for the taxes of the poor. But even where there was less
official departure of wealthy peasants, these individuals, who were in
large part also the village usurers, formed a ruling power over the
peasant masses, and knew how to extract decisions convenient to
themselves from the indebted, dependent majority. Thus, in the womb of a
village community officially based on equality and communal property,
there grew a clear division of classes into a small but influential
village bourgeoisie and a mass of dependent and effectively
proletarianized peasants. The internal breakup of the village
commune—crushed by taxes, eaten by usurers, and internally
divided—eventually made waves outside as well: famine and peasant
revolts were frequent occurrences in Russia in the 1880s, being put down
by the provincial administrations with the same implacability as the tax
executors and the military showed when coming to “pacify” the village.
In many regions, Russian fields became the scene of horrific death by
starvation and bloody turmoil. The Russian _muzhik_ [peasant]
experienced the fate of the Indian peasant, and Orissa¹⁸³ here is
Saratov, Samara, and so on down the Volga.^(LXXXVII) When the revolution
of the urban proletariat finally broke out in Russia in 1904 and 1905,
the peasant insurrections, which had been chaotic up to that point,
became a political factor by their sheer weight, tipping the scales of
revolution and making the agricultural question a central issue. Now, as
the peasants poured over the aristocratic estates like an irresistible
flood, setting the “aristocrats’ nests” on fire with their cry for land,
while the workers’ party formulated the distress of the peasantry into a
revolutionary demand to expropriate state property and the landed
estates without compensation and to place them into the hands of the
peasants, tsarism finally retreated from the centuries-old agrarian
policies that it had pursued with such iron persistence. The mark
community could no longer be resuscitated; it had to be abandoned.
Already in 1902, the axe was taken to the very roots of the village
community in its specific Russian incarnation, with the abolition of
collective liability for taxes. Of course, this measure was actively
prepared by the financial policies of tsarism itself. The treasury could
easily forgo collective liability when it came to direct taxation, now
that indirect taxation had reached such a level that in the budget of
1906, for example, out of a total revenue of 2,030 million rubles, only
148 million came from direct taxes and 1,100 million from indirect
taxes, including 558 million from the spirits monopoly alone, a tax that
was implemented by the “liberal” minister, Count Witte, to combat
drunkenness. The poverty, hopelessness, and ignorance of the peasants
offered the most reliable form of collective liability for punctual
payment of _this_ tax. In 1905 and 1906, the remaining debt in repayment
for emancipation was halved, and it was cancelled altogether in 1907.
The “agrarian reform” implemented in 1907 then had the avowed aim of
creating private peasant property.¹⁸⁴ The means for this were to come
from the parceling of domains, appanages, and, in part, landed estates.
Thus, the proletarian revolution of the twentieth century, even in its
first, incomplete phase, had already destroyed, at the same time, the
last remainders of bondage and the mark community, which had been
artificially preserved by tsarism.¹⁸⁵

_3_

With the Russian village commune, the varied fate of primitive agrarian
communism comes to an end; the circle is closed. Beginning as a natural
product of social development, as the best guarantee of economic
progress, and of the material and intellectual flourishing of society,
the mark community ends here as an abused tool of political and economic
backwardness. The Russian peasant, who is beaten with rods by his fellow
community members in the service of tsarist absolutism, offers the most
horrific historical critique of the limits of primitive communism and
the most evident expression of the fact that even this social form is
subject to the dialectical law that reason becomes unreason, a benefit
becomes a scourge.¹⁸⁶

Two facts spring to mind on close contemplation of the fate of the mark
community in various countries and continents. Far from being a rigid,
unchangeable pattern, this highest and final form of the primitive
communist economic system displays above all endless diversity,
flexibility and adaptability, as seen in its various forms. In each
context, and under all circumstances, it undergoes a silent process of
transformation, which, because of its slow pace, may be hardly apparent
at first from the outside. Inside the society, however, new forms are
always replacing old ones and it accordingly survives under any
political superstructure of native or foreign institutions, its economic
and social life constantly developing and decaying, advancing and
declining.

At the same time, this social form shows an extraordinary tenacity and
stability precisely because of its elasticity and adaptability. It
defies all the storms of political history; or rather it tolerates them
passively, lets them pass and patiently endures for centuries the
strains of every form of conquest, foreign rule, despotism and
exploitation. There is only one contact that it cannot tolerate or
overcome—contact with European civilization, i.e. with capitalism. This
encounter is deadly for the old society, universally and without
exception, and it accomplishes what millennia and the most savage
Oriental conquerors could not: the dissolution of the whole social
structure from the inside, tearing apart all traditional bonds and
transforming the society in a short period of time into a shapeless pile
of rubble.

But this deadly breeze from European capitalism is simply the last and
not the sole factor that brings about the inevitable decline of
primitive society. The seeds of this lie within the society itself. If
we take the various paths of its decline together, those that we know
from a number of examples, this establishes a certain historical order
of succession. Communist ownership of the means of production, as the
basis of a rigorously organized economy, offered the most productive
social labor process and the best material assurance of its continuity
and development for many epochs. But even the progress in labor
productivity that it secured, albeit slowly, necessarily came into
conflict with the communistic organization over time. After the decisive
progress to a higher form of agriculture, with the use of the
ploughshare, had been accomplished and the mark community had retained
its solid form on this basis, the next step in the development of the
technology of production after a certain amount of time necessitated a
more _intensive_ land cultivation, which could only be achieved at that
stage of agricultural technology by more intensive smallholding and by a
stronger and closer relationship of the individual laborer to the soil.
Longer use of the same parcel of land by a single peasant family became
the precondition for its more careful treatment. In both Germany and
Russia, fertilization of the soil led to the gradual abandonment of land
repartitioning. In general, we can identify a trait that is constant
everywhere in the life of the mark community: the movement toward
increasingly long intervals between land reallotments, universally
leading sooner or later to a transition from allotted land to inherited
land. In the same way that the transformation of communal property into
private property keeps pace with the intensification of labor, it is
noticeable that forest and pasture remained communal the longest, while
intensively worked farmland led first to the partitioned mark and then
to hereditary property. Establishing private property in parcels of
arable land does not completely abolish the entire communal economic
organization, which continues to be upheld by crop rotation and enforced
in forest and pastoral communities. The economic and social equality at
the heart of ancient society are still not destroyed by it either.
Initially forms what comes into being is a mass of small peasants, equal
in their living conditions, who can generally continue to work and live
for centuries according to their old traditions. Yet the inheritability
of property certainly opens the gates to future inequality, by the
heritability of holdings and the primogeniture or other settlements that
follow from this, subsequently by their salability or general
alienability.

The undermining of the traditional social organization by the processes
referred to above proceeds extremely slowly. There are other historical
factors at work that accomplish this more quickly and thoroughly, in
particular large-scale public works projects, which the mark community
with its narrow limits is unable to tackle by its very nature. We have
already seen the critical importance that artificial irrigation has for
agriculture in the Orient. The great intensification of labor and
powerful rise in productivity here led to quite different far-reaching
results than the changeover to fertilization in the West. From the
outset, artificial irrigation work is a mass work and a large-scale
undertaking. Precisely because of this, there is no suitable institution
for it within the organization of the mark community, so that special
institutions standing above this had to be created. We know that the
direction of public waterworks lay at the root of the domination by the
priests and every Oriental power. But also in the West, and more
generally, there are various public matters that, though simple in
comparison to contemporary state organization, had nevertheless to be
seen to in every primitive society. These grew with the development and
progress of the society, therefore eventually requiring special organs.
On all sides—from Germany to Peru, from India to Algeria—we can define
the path of development as the tendency in primitive societies to
transform elected public offices to inherited ones.

Initially, however, this turnaround, proceeding slowly and
imperceptibly, is still not a break with the foundations of communistic
society. Rather, the inheritability of these public offices is a natural
result of the fact that here too, by the very nature of primitive
societies, collective experience, tradition and personal, ensures the
successful handling of such offices. Over time, however, the
inheritability of the offices leads unavoidably to the creation of a
small local aristocracy, former servants of the community becoming its
rulers. The undivided mark lands, the _ager publicus_ of the Romans,¹⁸⁷
to which power adhered, served as the economic basis for advancing the
status of this aristocracy. Theft of the undemarcated or unused lands of
the mark is the common method of all indigenous and foreign rulers, who
vault above the peasant masses and subjugate them politically. If the
people in question are isolated from the major centers of civilization,
the aristocracy may not distinguish itself very greatly in its lifestyle
from that of the masses, and may still directly take part in the
production process, while a certain democratic simplicity of customs
covers up differences in wealth. This is the case with the tribal
aristocracy of the Yakut people, which is merely endowed with more
livestock than the ordinary people, and more influence in public
affairs. Following an encounter with more civilized peoples, however,
and vigorous trade, refined taste and relief from labor are soon added
to the privileges of the aristocracy, and a true class differentiation
takes place in society. The most typical example is Greece in the
post-Homeric period.

Thus the division of labor at the heart of primitive society unavoidably
leads, sooner or later, to the breakup of political and economic
equality from inside. One public undertaking, however, plays an
important role in this process and accomplishes the work more
aggressively than do public offices of a peaceful nature. This is
warfare. It is originally a mass affair of the society in question,
subsequently turned, in the wake of advances in production, into the
speciality of certain circles within primitive society in question. The
more advanced, continuous and systematic the labor process of the
society, the less it tolerates the irregularities and the drain of time
and energy resulting from war. If occasional military campaigns are a
direct result of the economic system of hunting and nomadic herding,
agriculture goes together with a great peacefulness and passivity among
the mass of society, so that a special caste of warriors is often needed
for protection. In one way or another, the existence of war, itself just
an expression of the limits of labor productivity, plays an important
role for all primitive peoples and universally leads over time to a new
form of division of labor. The separation of a military aristocracy or
military leadership is the hardest blow that the social equality of the
primitive society must endure. This is why, wherever we learn of
primitive societies, either as survivals from past history or still
existing today, we almost never come across any longer such free and
equal relations as Morgan was able to convey to us with the
serendipitous example of the Iroquois. On the contrary, inequality and
exploitation are everywhere characteristics of the primitive societies
we encounter, being the product of a long history of disintegration,
whether it is a matter of the ruling castes of the Orient, the tribal
aristocracy of the Yakuts, the “great clansmen” of the Scottish Celts,
the military aristocracy of the Greeks, Romans and migrating Germans, or
lastly, to the petty despots of the African empires.

If we look, for example, at the famous empire of Mwata Kazembe in
south-central Africa, to the east of the Lunda empire,¹⁸⁸ into which the
Portuguese penetrated at the beginning of the nineteenth century, we can
see, right in the heart of Africa, in a region hardly touched by
Europeans, primitive Negro social relations in which there is no longer
much equality or freedom to be found. The 1831 expedition of Major
[José] Monteiro and Captain [António] Gamitto, undertaken from the
Zambezi into the interior for scientific and trading purposes, depicts
this as follows. Initially, the expedition came into the land of the
Marawi,¹⁸⁹ primitive hoe farmers living in small, conical palisade
houses and wearing only a loincloth on their bodies. At the time that
Monteiro and Gamitto traveled through Malawiland, it was under the rule
of a despotic leader who went by the title _nede_. He adjudicated all
disputes in his capital city, Muzenda, and no disputing his decision was
allowed. True to form, he convened a council of elders who were
required, however, to agree with his opinion. The land was divided into
provinces, which were governed by _mambos_, and these were then further
divided into districts that were led by _funos_. All of these titles
were hereditary.

On the eighth of August we reached the residence of Mukanda, the
powerful leader of the Chewa.¹⁹⁰ Mukanda, who had been sent a gift of
various cotton goods, red cloth, a number of pearls, salt and
cowries,¹⁹¹ came on the following day, riding into the encampment on a
black man. Mukanda was a man sixty or seventy years old, with a
pleasant, majestic appearance. His only garment consisted of a dirty
cloth that he had wrapped around his hips. He stayed for about two hours
and, when he was leaving, asked everyone in a friendly and irresistible
manner for a gift … The burial of the Chewa leaders is accompanied by
extremely barbaric ceremonies. All of the wives of the departed are
locked up with the corpse in the same hut until everything is ready for
the burial. Then the funeral cortege moves … toward the crypt, and once
it arrives, the favorite wife of the deceased, along with some others,
climb into the crypt and sit down with their legs outstretched. This
living foundation is then covered with draping and the cadaver laid on
top of them, along with six other women who are thrown into the crypt
after having their necks broken. Once the grave is covered, the
terrifying ceremony ends with the impaling of two male youths, who are
arranged on top of the grave, one at the head with a drum, the other at
the feet with a bow and arrow. Major Monteiro, during his stay in
Chewaland, was a witness to one such burial.

From here they went uphill into the middle of the empire. The Portuguese
came to

a barren region, situated high up and almost entirely lacking in
foodstuffs. Everywhere can be seen the signs of destruction by previous
military campaigns, and famine plagued the expedition to a disturbing
degree. Messengers were sent with a few gifts to the next _mambo_, in
expectation of guides, but the messengers returned with the dispiriting
news that they had encountered the _mambo_ and his family close to
starvation and death, completely alone in the village … Even before
reaching the heart of the empire, samples of the barbarian justice that
was part of everyday life there could be seen. It was common to
encounter young people whose noses, hands, ears and other appendages had
been cut off as punishment for some minor offence. On the nineteenth of
November we entered the capital city, where the donkey that Captain
Gamitto was riding caused a stir. Soon we arrived at a road about
forty-five minutes long that was fenced in on both sides by two or three
meter-high fences made of interwoven poles so elaborately constructed
that they looked like walls. In these straw walls there were small open
doors spaced apart from each other. At the end of the road, there was a
small square hut open only to the west, in the middle of which stood a
human figure crudely carved out of wood, seventy centimeters tall, on a
wooden pedestal. In front of the open side lay a heap of more than 300
skulls. Here, the road turned into a large square area, at the end of
which was a large forest only separated from the square by a fence. On
the outside of it, on both sides of the gate, was a line tied on either
side of the gate with thirty skulls strung onto it by way of
ornamentation … Following this was the reception at Mwata’s with all
barbarian pageantry and surrounded by his army of between five and six
thousand men. He sat on a chair covered by a green cloth spread over a
pile of leopard and lion skins. His head covering consisted of a scarlet
conical cap, which was composed of half-meter long feathers. Wrapped
around his forehead was a diadem made of glimmering stone; his neck and
shoulders were covered by a kind of necklace made of shells, square
pieces of mirror, and faux gems. Each of his arms was wrapped in a piece
of blue cloth, decorated with fur, and his forearms also had ornamental
strings made of blue stones. A yellow-, red- and blue-fringed cloth held
together by a belt covered his lower body. His legs, like his arms, were
decorated with blue jewels.

Mwata proudly sat there with seven parasols protecting him from the sun
and swung around the tail of a wildebeest for a scepter, while twelve
Negroes armed with brooms were busy removing every piece of dust from
the ground, every impurity from his holy vicinity. A rather complicated
court surrounded the ruler. First, guarding his throne were two rows of
figures, forty centimeters high, in the shape of the upper body of a
Negro adorned with animal horns, while between these figures sat two
Negroes who burned aromatic leaves in coal pans. The place of honor was
occupied by the two main wives, the first dressed more or less like
Mwata. In the background, the harem of 400 women was assembled, and
indeed these women were completely naked, apart from the aprons on their
lower bodies. In addition, there were two hundred black women who stood
waiting for the slightest command. Inside the quadrangle built by women
sat the highest dignitaries of the kingdom, the _kilolo_, sitting on
lion and leopard skins, each with an umbrella and dressed similarly to
Mwata. There were also several corps of musicians, who made a deafening
noise with their strangely shaped instruments, while a few court
jesters, dressed in animal pelts and horns, ran around completing the
entourage of Kazembe who, armed in this dignified manner, awaited the
Portuguese advance. Mwata is the absolute ruler of this people, his
title meaning simply “lord.” Underneath him are the _kilolo_, or the
aristocrats, who are in turn divided into two classes. Among the more
noble aristocrats are the crown prince, Mwata’s closest relatives, and
the high commanders of his army. But the very lives and property of
these nobles exist only due to Mwata’s absolute power.

If this tyrant is in a bad mood, he will have a person’s ears cut off if
he does not understand a command and asks for it to be repeated, “in
order to teach him to listen more carefully.” Every theft in his kingdom
is punished by the amputation of the ears and hands; anyone who
approaches one of his women or attempts to talk to her is killed or has
all his limbs hobbled. The reputation he has among this superstitious
people is that one cannot touch him without falling prey to his magical
powers. Since it is impossible to avoid all contact with him, the people
have discovered a means to avoid death. Anyone who has dealings with him
kneels down before him, and the lord lays the palm of his hand in a
mysterious manner on the kneeler and thereby absolves him from the death
curse.^(LXXXVIII)

This is a picture of a society that has moved a long way away from the
original foundations of every primitive community, from equality and
democracy. It should not, however, be a foregone conclusion that under
this kind of political despotism, the relations of the mark community,
the communal ownership of the land or communally organized labor cease
to exist. The Portuguese intruders, who recorded precisely the
superficial rubbish about costume and courtesans, have, like all
Europeans, no eyes, no interest and no frame of reference when it comes
to things that run counter to the European system of private ownership.
In any case, the social inequality and despotism of primitive societies
are completely distinct from the inequality that is common in civilized
societies and transplanted now onto the primitive. The increase in
status of the primitive aristocracy and the despotic power of the
primitive leader are all natural products of this society, like all of
its other conditions of life. They are only another expression of the
helplessness of the society with respect to its natural surroundings and
to its own social relations, a helplessness that appears both in magical
cult practices and in the periodic famines that either partly or
completely starve the despotic leader along with the mass of his
subjects. This rule by an aristocracy and a chief is therefore in
complete harmony with the other material and intellectual aspects of the
society, as is clear from the significant fact that the political power
of the primitive ruler is always closely bound up with the primitive
nature religion, with the cult of the dead, and is sustained by it.

From this standpoint, Mwata Kazembe is the Lunda, whom fourteen wives
follow alive into the grave and who rules over the life and death of his
subjects according to his erratic moods, because he believes himself to
be a magician, this being his people’s rock-solid conviction. The
despotic “Prince Kasongo” on the Lomami river who, forty years later,
with great dignity among his noblemen and his people, performed, by way
of greeting the Englishman [Verney Lovett] Cameron, a hopping dance with
his two naked daughters in a woman’s skirt braided with monkey skins and
with a filthy handkerchief on his head, is in fact a much less absurd
and insanely comical phenomenon than the ruler “by the grace of God”
over sixty-seven million members of a people who produced the likes of
[Immanuel] Kant, [Hermann von] Helmholtz and [Johann Wolfgang von]
Goethe. And yet even the worst enemy of this ruler could not call him a
magician.

Primitive communist society, through its own internal development, leads
to the formation of inequality and despotism. It has not yet
disappeared; on the contrary, it can persist for many thousands of years
under these primitive conditions. Such societies, however, sooner or
later succumb to foreign occupation and then undergo a more or less
far-reaching social reorganization. Foreign rule by Muslims is of
special historical significance, since it predated European rule in vast
stretches of Asia and Africa. Everywhere that nomadic Islamic
peoples—whether Mongol or Arab— instituted and secured their foreign
rule, a social process began that Henry Maine and Maksim Kovalevsky
called the _feudalization_ of the land. They did not make the land their
own property, but instead turned their attention to two objectives, the
collection of taxes and the military consolidation of their domination
over the country. Both goals were served by a specific
administrative-military organization, under which the land was divided
into several ethnic groups and given as fiefdoms of a kind to Muslim
officials, who were also tax collectors and military administrators.
Large portions of uncultivated mark lands were utilized for the founding
of military colonies. These institutions, together with the spread of
Islam, implemented a profound change in the general conditions of
existence of primitive societies. Only their economic conditions were
little changed. The foundations and the organization of production
remained the same and persisted for many centuries, despite exploitation
and military pressure. Of course, Muslim rule was not always so
considerate of the living conditions of the natives. For example, the
Arabs on the east coast of Africa operated for centuries from the
Zanzibar sultanate¹⁹² an extensive slave trade in Negroes, which led to
frequent slave raids into the interior of Africa, the depopulation and
destruction of whole African villages, and an escalation of despotic
violence by the native chiefs, who found an enticing business venture in
selling their own subjects or the subjugated members of neighboring
tribes. Yet this transformation in conditions, which had such a profound
effect on the fate of African society, was only accomplished as a
further consequences of European influence: the slave trade in Negroes
developed only after the discoveries and conquests of the Europeans in
the sixteenth century, in order to service the plantations and mines
exploited by the Europeans that were in full bloom in America and Asia.

The intrusion of European civilization was a disaster in every sense for
primitive social relations. The European conquerors are the first who
are not merely after subjugation and economic exploitation, but seize
the very means of production, by ripping the land from under the feet of
the native population. In this way, European capitalism deprives the
primitive social order of its foundation. What emerges is something that
is worse than all oppression and exploitation, total anarchy and that
specifically European phenomenon of the uncertainty of social existence.
The subjugated peoples, separated from their means of production, are
regarded by European capitalism as mere laborers; if they are useful for
this end, they are made into slaves, and if they are not, they are
exterminated. We have witnessed this method in the Spanish, English, and
French colonies. Before the advance of capitalism, the primitive social
order, which outlasted all previous historical phases, capitulates. Its
last remnants are eradicated from the earth and its elements—labor-power
and means of production—are absorbed by capitalism. Early communist
society fell everywhere, in the last instance, because it was made
obsolete by economic progress, making room for new prospects of
development. This development and progress are represented for a long
time by the base methods of a class society, until this too is made
obsolete and pushed aside by further progress. Here too, violence is
merely the servant of economic development.


III. [COMMODITY PRODUCTION]

The task we have set ourselves is as follows. A society cannot exist
without common labor, i.e. without labor with a plan and organization.
And we have found various different forms of this, in all eras. In
present-day society we hardly find it at all: neither rule nor law, nor
democracy, no trace of plan and organization—anarchy. How is capitalist
society possible?¹⁹³

_1_

In order to trace the construction of the capitalist tower of Babel, let
us imagine once again a society with a planned organization of labor.
This may be a society with a highly developed division of labor, in
which not only agriculture and industry are separate, but each
particular branch of both has also become the speciality of a particular
group of working people.^(LXXXIX) In this society there are for example
agriculturalists and foresters, fisherfolk and gardeners, shoemakers and
tailors, locksmiths and blacksmiths, spinners and weavers, etc. etc.
This society, taken as a whole, is endowed with every kind of work and
every kind of product. These products are distributed in greater or
lesser amounts to all members of society, as labor is communal; it is
divided and organized from the start in a planned way by some kind of
authority—whether this is the despotic law of the government, or
serfdom, or any other kind of organization. For simplification, however,
we assume that it is a communist community with communal property, as we
are already familiar with from the Indian example. We only presuppose
for the time being that the division of labor within this community is
far more developed than was historically the case, and assume that one
part of the members of the community devote themselves exclusively to
agriculture, while other kinds of labor are all performed by specialist
artisans. The economy of this community is quite clear to us: it is the
community members themselves who possess the land and the means of
production in common, and their common will also determines what, when
and how much of each product is to be produced. The mass of finished
products, moreover, since these belong equally to all, are distributed
among everyone according to need. Now, however, imagine that one fine
day, in the communist community with this arrangement, common property
ceases to exist, and along with it also common labor and the common will
that regulates this. The highly developed division of labor that has
been attained obviously remains. The shoemaker still sits at his last,
the baker has nothing and knows nothing except his oven, the smith has
only his smithy and only knows how to swing a hammer, etc. etc. But the
chain that formerly connected all these special labors into a common
labor, into the societal economy, is broken. Each person is now on his
own: the farmer, the shoemaker, the baker, the locksmith, the weaver,
etc. Each is completely free and independent. The community no longer
has anything to say to him, no one can order him to work for the whole,
nor does anyone bother about his needs. The community that was
previously a whole has been broken up into individual little particles
or atoms, like a mirror shattered into a thousand splinters; each person
now floats like a piece of dust in the air, as it were, and wonders how
he will manage. What happens now to the community that has been struck
overnight by such a catastrophe? What will all these people left to
their own devices do the next day? One thing is certain right away—they
will carry on working, exactly as they did previously. For as long as
human needs cannot be satisfied without labor, every human society has
to work. Whatever transformations and changes may take place in society,
labor cannot cease for a moment. The former members of the communist
community, therefore, even after the ties between them have been broken
and they are left completely to themselves, will certainly each carry on
working, and since we have assumed that all labor is already
specialized, each of them will continue to pursue only that work that
has become his speciality and for which he has the means of production:
the shoemaker will make boots, the baker will bake bread, the weaver
produce cloth, the farmer grow corn, etc. But a difficulty now
immediately arises. Each of these producers, despite producing extremely
important and immediately needed objects of use—each of these
specialists, the shoemaker, the baker, the smith, the weaver—were until
yesterday all equally esteemed useful members of society, and could not
get by without society. Each had his important place in the whole. Now,
however, the whole no longer exists, each person exists only for
himself. But none of them can live alone, simply from the products of
their own labor. The shoemaker cannot eat his boots, the baker cannot
satisfy all his needs with bread, and even the farmer with the fullest
barn of corn would die from hunger and cold if he had nothing but corn.
Each person has many needs, and can only satisfy a particular one of
these. Each accordingly needs a certain quantity of the products of all
others. They are all dependent on one another. But how is this to be
managed, since we know that no connections and ties between the
individual producers exist any more? The shoemaker urgently needs bread
from the baker, but has no means of obtaining this bread; he cannot
force the baker to supply him, as both alike are free and independent
people. If he wants to enjoy the proceeds of the baker’s labor, this can
evidently be based only on reciprocity, i.e., if he supplies the baker
in turn with a product useful to him. But the baker also needs the
products of the shoemaker, and finds himself in just the same situation
as the latter. This indicates the basis for reciprocity. The shoemaker
gives the baker boots so as to receive bread in return. Shoemaker and
baker exchange their products, and both can now satisfy their needs. It
turns out that, given a highly developed division of labor, a complete
independence of the producers from one another and the absence of any
kind or organization between them, the only way of making the products
of different labors accessible to all is—_exchange_. The shoemaker, the
baker, the farmer, the spinner, the weaver, the locksmith—all
reciprocally exchange their products, and in this way satisfy all their
various needs. Exchange creates in this way a new tie between the
fragmented, individualized and separated private producers. Labor and
consumption, the life of the shattered community, can start up again, as
exchange has given them the possibility of once more all working for one
another, it has again made possible social collaboration, social
production, even in the form of fragmented private production.

But this is indeed a quite new and particular form of social
collaboration, and we need to examine it more closely. Each individual
person now works for himself, producing on his own account, on the basis
of his own will and judgment. In order to live, he now has to produce
products that he himself does not need but that others do. Each works
accordingly for others. In itself, this is nothing special and nothing
new. In the communist community, too, everyone works for everyone else.
What is special now, however, is that each person now only hands over
his product to others by way of exchange, and can only obtain the
products of others likewise by exchange. Everyone must now, in order to
obtain the products they need, produce by their own labor products
designed for exchange. The shoemaker must continue to produce boots that
he does not need himself, that are quite useless to him, a waste of
labor. The only use and purpose they have for him is that he can
exchange them against other products that he needs. He therefore
produces his boots already with the purpose of exchange, i.e. he
produces them as a commodity. Each person now can only satisfy his
needs, only obtain products that others have produced, if he himself
appears with a product that others need and that he has produced with
his labor for this purpose; in other words, each obtains his share of
the products of all others, of the social product, by himself appearing
with a commodity. The product that he has made for exchange is now his
right to demand a portion of the total social product. This total social
product may well no longer exist in the earlier form it took in the
communist community, where it directly represented in its mass and
totality the wealth of the community, and was only then distributed.
Everyone there worked in common on the account of the community and
under the leadership of the community, so that what was produced already
came into the world as a social product. The distribution of this total
product to individuals occurred only subsequently, and only then did the
product enter the private use of individual members of the community.
Now things proceed the other way round: each produces on his own account
as a private person, and it is only in exchange that the finished
products together form a sum that can be viewed as social wealth. The
share of each person, in both social labor and social wealth, is now
represented by the special commodity that he has produced with his labor
and brought for exchange with others. The share of each in the total
social labor, therefore, is no longer represented in a certain quantum
of labor that is allocated to him in advance, but rather in the finished
product, in the commodity, that he supplies as he sees fit.^(XC) If he
doesn’t want to work, then he doesn’t need to, he can just go out for a
walk and no one will scold him in the street, as did indeed happen with
refractory members of the communist community, where idlers were likely
to be sharply reprimanded by the “chief inhabitant,” the head of the
community, or were liable to public contempt at the community assembly.
Now each person is his own unrestricted lord and master, there is no
community authority. But if he does not work, he also receives nothing
in exchange for the products of work. On the other hand, however, today
the individual is not even sure that, no matter how diligently he works,
he will receive the means of subsistence he needs; for no one is
compelled to give him these, even in exchange for his products. Exchange
only comes about if there is a reciprocal need. If no one in the
community needs boots at the moment, the shoemaker may work ever so
diligently, and produce ever such a fine product, without anyone taking
it and giving him bread, meat, etc. in exchange, so that he remains
without what he most needs in order to live. Here again, we see a world
of difference compared with the earlier communist relations in the
community. The community maintained the shoemaker because there was a
general need in the community for boots. He was told by the community
authority how many boots he was to produce, and he worked as it were as
a community servant, a community official, everyone being in exactly
this same position. But if the community kept a shoemaker, it obviously
had to feed him. He received his share from the common wealth just like
everyone else, and this share of his did not stand in any direct
connection with his share in the total work. Of course he had to work,
and he was fed because he worked, because he was a useful member of the
community. But whether he had more or fewer boots to produce this
particular month, even sometimes none at all, he still received the same
means of subsistence, his share of the community’s total resources. Now,
however, he only receives to the extent that his work is needed, i.e. to
the extent that his product is accepted by others in exchange, like for
like. Everyone now works just as he wants, how he wants, as much as he
wants, at what he wants. The only confirmation that he has produced the
right things, what society needs, that he has indeed performed socially
necessary labor, is the _fact_ that his product is accepted by others.
Not all labor, therefore, be it ever so diligent and solid, now has a
definite purpose and value in advance from the point of view of society;
only a product that is exchangeable has value; a product that no one
takes in exchange, no matter how solid, is valueless work, work thrown
away.

Now, therefore, each person, in order to participate in the fruits of
social production, must also participate in social labor, must produce
_commodities_. But the fact that his labor actually is recognized as
socially necessary labor is not something anyone tells him, but rather
something he learns from his commodity being taken in exchange, being
exchangeable. His share in the labor and product of the whole is thus
only assured by his product’s receiving the seal of socially necessary
labor, the seal of exchange-value.^(XCI) If his product remains
unexchangeable, he has then created a worthless product, and his labor
was socially superfluous. Then he is only a private shoemaker, cutting
leather and cobbling boots for his own amusement, standing outside
society, as it were, for society has no interest in his product, and so
the products of society are unavailable to him. If today our shoemaker
has been fortunate enough to make an exchange, and obtained means of
subsistence in return, he can not only eat his fill and be properly
clothed, but also pride himself on his way home that he has been
recognized as a useful member of society, his labor recognized as
necessary labor. If on the other hand he returns home with his boots, as
no one wanted to relieve him of them, he has every reason to be
melancholy, as he not only remains without soup, but on top of this it
has more or less been explained to him, if only with a chilly silence:
Society has no need of you, my friend, your labor was just not
necessary, you are a superfluous person and can happily go and hang
yourself. A pair of exchangeable boots, or more generally, a commodity
with exchange-value, is thus all that is needed each time for our
shoemaker to be a member of society. But the baker, the weaver and the
farmer—everyone—also find themselves in the same position as our
shoemaker.^(XCII) The society that sometimes recognizes the shoemaker,
and sometimes rejects him with coldness and disdain, is no more than the
sum of all these individual commodity producers who work for reciprocal
exchange. The sum of social labor and social product that comes into
being in this way is therefore not at all the same as the sum of all the
labor and products of individual members, as was earlier the case in the
communistic, communal economy. For now certain individuals can work
diligently, yet their product, if it finds no one to take it in
exchange, is something to be thrown away and does not count at all. Only
exchange determines what were necessary labors and necessary products,
those that count socially. It is the same as if everyone initially
worked blindly at home, in any way they chose, then brought their
finished products to a place where they were inspected and received a
stamp: these labors were socially necessary and are accepted in
exchange, but those ones were not necessary and so are completely
worthless. The stamp says: these ones have value, those are worthless
and remain private pleasures—or sufferings—of the people concerned.

If we summarize the various aspects, it turns out that, by the mere fact
of commodity exchange, without any other ingredient or regulation, three
important relationships are determined:

1) The _share_ of each member of society in social _labor_. This share,
in kind and measure, is no longer allocated to him in advance by the
community, but only post festum, depending on whether the finished
product is accepted or not. Previously, each individual pair of boots
that our shoemaker produced was immediately and in advance social labor,
even when still on the last. Now his boots are initially private labor,
and no one else’s concern. Only subsequently are they viewed on the
market, and only to the extent that they are taken in exchange is the
labor spent by the shoemaker acknowledged as social labor. Otherwise
they remain his private labor and are valueless.

2) The _share_ of each member in social _wealth_. Previously, the
shoemaker received his share of the community’s finished products by way
of a distribution. This share was assessed, firstly according to the
general prosperity of the community, its level of wealth at this
particular time, and secondly according to the needs of the members. A
numerous family necessarily received more than a less numerous one. With
the partitioning of conquered lands among the Germanic tribes, who
arrived in Europe in the era of the great migrations and settled on the
ruins of the Roman Empire, family size also played a role. The Russian
commune, which still carried out redistributions of its common property
here and there in the 1880s, took into consideration the number of
“mouths” in each household. Under the general rule of exchange, however,
any relationship between the need of a member of society and his share
in wealth disappears, as does any relationship between this share and
the size of the society’s total wealth. Now, only the product that each
member offers on the commodity market decides his share in the social
wealth, and only in so far as it is accepted in exchange as socially
necessary.

3) Finally, the _social division of labor_ is itself regulated by
exchange. Previously, the community decided that it needed so and so
many farm workers, so and so many shoemakers, bakers, locksmiths and
blacksmiths, etc. The correct proportion between the different trades
was the responsibility of the community and its chosen officials, as it
also was to make sure that all branches of labor needed were practised.
They were certainly familiar with the famous case in which the
representatives of a village community asked that a locksmith condemned
to death should be reprieved and a blacksmith hanged instead, as there
were two blacksmiths in the village. This is a striking example of
public concern for the proper division of labor in a community. (We saw,
moreover, how in the Middle Ages,¹⁹⁴ Charlemagne expressly prescribed
the kinds of artisans for his estates, and their numbers. We also saw
how in medieval towns the guild regulations made sure that particular
trades were practiced in the right proportions, and artisans whom it
lacked were invited in from elsewhere.) With free and unrestricted
exchange, this matter is settled by exchange itself. Now no one tells
our shoemaker to work. If he wants, he can produce soap bubbles or paper
dragons. He can also, if he likes, abandon shoemaking for weaving,
spinning, or goldsmith’s work. No one tells him that society needs him
in general, and needs him as a cobbler in particular. Naturally, society
does have a general need for shoemaking. But no one now decides how many
shoemakers will meet this need. No one tells this particular shoemaker
whether he is necessary or not, whether it is not rather a weaver or a
smith who is needed. But what he is not told, he learns once more simply
and solely on the commodity market. If his shoes are accepted in
exchange, he knows that society needs him as a shoemaker. And
conversely. He can produce the best commodity, but if other shoemakers
have sufficiently met the demand, his commodity is superfluous. If this
happens repeatedly, he has to abandon his trade. The redundant shoemaker
is expelled from society in the same mechanical way as superfluous
material is expelled from the animal body. Since his work is not
accepted as social labor, he is en route to extinction. The same
compulsion to produce exchangeable products for others as one’s own
condition of existence will eventually lead our expelled shoemaker into
another trade, where there is a stronger and insufficiently met demand,
for example weaving or haulage, and in this way the shortage of workers
here is filled. But not only is a correct proportion maintained in this
way between different trades, entire trades are abolished and new ones
created. If a certain social need ceases or is met by other products
than previously, this is not decided by the members, as in earlier
communist communities, and workers accordingly withdrawn from one trade
and moved into another. It happens simply by the unexchangeability of
the obsolete product. In the seventeenth century, wig making was still
an essential trade in every town. But after fashions changed, and people
stopped wearing wigs, this trade died a natural death, simply by the
unsalability of wigs. With the development of modern urban water supply,
and pipes taking water mechanically to each dwelling, the profession of
water-carrier—_Wasserer_ as it was known in Vienna—generally
disappeared.

We can now take an opposite case. Let us assume that our shoemaker, made
to feel socially unnecessary in no uncertain terms by the systematic
spurning of his commodity, imagines that he is despite this an
indispensable member of humanity and still wants to live. In order to
live, he must, as we know and he knows, produce commodities. And he now
invents a new product, let us say a beard-cover or a wonderful boot-wax.
Does this mean he has created a new socially necessary branch of labor,
or will he remain unrecognized, like so many great inventors of genius?
Again, no one tells him, and he learns this only on the commodity
market. If his new product is accepted for long enough in exchange, then
this new branch of production has been recognized as socially necessary,
and the social division of labor has experienced a new
expansion.^(XCIII)

You see how in our community, which, following the collapse of the
communistic regime and common property, the disappearance of any kind of
authority in economic life, any organization and planning in labor, any
kind of connection among the individual members, initially seemed quite
hopeless in the wake of this catastrophe, we gradually see the rise
again of a certain connection, a certain order, and how this happens in
a completely mechanical way. Without any understanding among the
individual members, without the intervention of any higher power, the
individual fragments form up into a whole, as best they can. Exchange
itself now regulates the whole economy mechanically, just like a kind of
pump mechanism: it creates a link between the individual producers, it
forces them to work, it governs their division of labor, determines
their wealth and its distribution. Exchange governs society. It is of
course a somewhat strange order that has now arisen before our eyes.
Society now looks completely different from how it did previously under
the regime of the communist community. At that time it was a compact
whole, a kind of big family, whose members had all grown up together and
stuck closely together, a firm organism, even perhaps an ossified one,
rather immovable and rigid. Now we have an extremely loose structure, in
which the individual members keep falling away and then reassembling. We
have seen, in fact, how no one tells our shoemaker _that_ he should
work, _what_ he should work at, or _how much_ he should work. On the
other hand, no one asks him whether he needs sustenance, what he needs,
or how much he needs. No one bothers about him, he does not exist for
society. He only informs society of his existence by the fact that he
appears on the commodity market with a product of his labor. If his
commodity is accepted, then so too is his existence. His labor is
acknowledged as socially necessary, and himself thereby acknowledged as
its representative, only in so far as his boots are taken in exchange.
He obtains means of subsistence from the social wealth only in so far as
his boots are accepted as a commodity. He becomes a member of the
society only in so far as he produces exchangeable products,
commodities, and only so long as he has these and can dispose of them.
Each exchangeable pair of boots makes him a member of society, and each
unsalable pair excludes him once again from society. Thus the shoemaker
has no connection with society as a human being, only his boots allow
him to adhere to society, and they do so only in so far as they have
exchange value, are saleable as a commodity. This is therefore not a
permanent membership, but one that keeps on being dissolved and renewed.
But as well as our shoemaker, all other commodity producers are in the
same situation. And there is no one in this society but commodity
producers, for it is only in exchange that one receives the means to
live; in order to receive these, each person must therefore appear with
commodities. Commodity production is the condition of life, and a state
of society thereby comes into being in which people all lead their
particular existence as completely separate individuals, who do not
exist for each other, but only through their commodities attain a
constantly fluctuating membership of the whole, or are again excluded
from membership. This is an extremely loose and mobile society, caught
up in the ceaseless whirl of its individual members.

We see that the abolition of a planned economy and the introduction of
exchange brought about a complete transformation in people’s social
relations, turning society around from top to bottom.

_2_

There are great difficulties, however, with exchange being the only
economic tie between the members of society, since exchange does not run
as smoothly as we have just assumed. Let us look at the matter more
closely.

So long as we only considered exchange between our two individual
producers, the shoemaker and the baker, things were quite simple. The
shoemaker cannot live from boots alone, and needs bread; the baker
cannot live from bread alone, just like the Bible says, though what he
needs in this case is not the word of God, but rather boots. Since there
is complete reciprocity here, exchange happens easily: the bread moves
from the hands of the baker, who doesn’t need it, into those of the
shoemaker; the boots move from the shoemaker’s workshop into the bakery.
Both have their needs satisfied, and both private labors have been
confirmed as socially necessary. But let us assume that this happens not
just between the shoemaker and the baker, but between all members of
society, i.e. between all commodity producers at once. And we have the
right to assume this, indeed we are compelled to make this assumption.
For all members of society have to live, they must satisfy their various
needs. The production of a society, as we already said, cannot stop for
a moment, since consumption does not stop for a moment. And we must now
add that since production is now split into individual independent
private labors, none of which is alone sufficient to satisfy a person,
exchange too cannot stop for a moment—unless consumption does as well.
Everyone thus continues exchanging, with all their products. How does
this come about? Let us return to our example. The shoemaker not only
needs the product of the baker, he would like a certain quantity of
every other commodity as well. As well as bread, he needs meat from the
butcher, a coat from the tailor, the material for his shirt from the
weaver, a top hat from the hatter, etc. All these commodities he can
only obtain by way of exchange, but all that he can offer in return is
boots. For the shoemaker, accordingly, all products that he needs for
his life initially have the form of boots. If he needs bread, he first
makes a pair of boots; if he needs a shirt, he makes boots; if he needs
a hat or a cigar, he makes boots. In his special labor, the whole social
wealth accessible to him has the form of boots. It is only by exchange
on the commodity market that his work can be transformed from the
confined form of boots into the diverse form of means of subsistence.
But in order for this transformation to actually take place, for all
this diligent work of the shoemaker, which promised him every kind of
life’s enjoyments, not to be stuck in the form of boots, one important
condition is needed, which we already know: it is necessary for all the
other producers, the product of whose labor our shoemaker needs, also to
need his boots and be ready to take them in exchange. The shoemaker then
only obtained all these other commodities if his product, boots, was a
commodity desired by all other producers. And at any particular time he
only obtained the quantity of all these other commodities that he could
exchange by way of his labor, if his boots were a commodity that
everyone wanted at any time, i.e. a commodity desired without limit.
Already in the case of the shoemaker, it was obviously quite a
presumption, and unfounded optimism, to believe that his special
commodity was so absolutely and unrestrictedly something indispensable
for the human race. But the matter gets much worse when not just the
shoemaker, but all other particular producers, find themselves in the
same position: the baker, the locksmith, the weaver, the butcher, the
hatter, the farmer, etc. Each of them desires and uses the most varied
products, but can only offer one single product in exchange. Each then
could only fully satisfy his needs if his special commodity were
constantly desired by everyone in society and taken in exchange. A brief
reflection will tell you that this is pure impossibility. It is
impossible for everyone to want all products equally at all times. It is
impossible for everyone at all times, without limit, to be a taker of
boots, bread, clothes, locks, yarn, shirts, hats and beard-covers. But
if this is not the case, then these products cannot all be exchanged at
any time against all others. And if exchange is not possible as a
constant all-round relationship, this means that the satisfaction of all
needs in society is impossible, consequently that all-round labor in
society is impossible, the very existence of society is impossible. And
we are again in a fix, and cannot solve the task we have set ourselves,
i.e. to explain how, from the divided and fragmented private producers,
who are not bound together by any social plan of labor, any
organization, any tie, a social collaboration and an economy can none
the less come into being. Exchange has indeed shown itself to be a means
able to regulate all this, even if in strange ways. But for this to
happen, exchange itself has to happen, it must function as a regular
mechanism. We find already in exchange itself, however, at the very
first step, such difficulties that we can not see at all how it is to
develop into an all-round and permanent business.

Yet the means for overcoming this difficulty and facilitating social
exchange have been found. True, it was no Columbus who discovered this,
social experience and habit unnoticeably found the means in exchange
itself; “life itself,” as people say, solved the problem. As indeed,
social life, along with all its difficulties, always does create the
means for their solution.¹⁹⁵ It is clearly impossible for all
commodities to be wanted by everyone all the time, i.e. to an unlimited
extent. But at any time, and in any society, there is _one_ commodity
that is important, necessary and useful to everyone as a foundation of
their existence, and is therefore wanted at any time. Boots could hardly
be this commodity, people are not that vain. But cattle, for example,
could be such a product. It is impossible to get by just with boots, nor
even with clothes, hats or corn. But cattle as a foundation of economic
life do secure a society’s existence: they supply meat, milk, hides,
plowing service, etc. Among many nomadic peoples, indeed, their whole
wealth consists of herds of cattle. Still today, or at least until
recently, there were African tribes that lived almost exclusively from
cattle. Let us assume, then, that in our community cattle are a
much-desired item of wealth, not the only one, but one preferred over
many other products that are produced in society. The cattle-raiser here
spends his private labor on the production of cattle, just as the
shoemaker does on boots, the weaver on linen, etc. On our assumption,
however, the product of the cattle-raiser enjoys a general unlimited
popularity above all others, as it appears the most indispensable and
important. Cattle are a welcome enrichment for anyone. Since we still
assume that in our society nothing can be obtained by anyone except by
way of exchange, it is clear that the much-desired cattle can also only
be obtained from the cattle-raiser by exchange for another product of
labor. But since, as presupposed, everyone would like to have cattle,
this means that anyone would be happy at any time to part with his
products against cattle. For cattle, conversely, it follows that at any
time one can have any kind of product. Anyone who has cattle has only to
choose, since everything is available for him. And it is precisely for
this reason, conversely, that everyone is happier to exchange the
particular product of his labor against cattle than anything else; if he
has cattle, then he has everything, since everything is obtainable at
any time in exchange for cattle. If after a while this has become
generally clear, and become a custom, cattle then gradually become the
universal commodity, i.e. the single commodity that is universally
desired and exchangeable without limit. And as such a universal
commodity, cattle mediate exchange between all other special
commodities. The shoemaker is unwilling to directly accept bread from
the baker in exchange for his boots, but he will accept cattle, as with
cattle he can then buy bread and all possible things, whenever he wants.
The baker, for his part, can pay for his boots in cattle, as he has
received cattle in return for his own product, bread, as he also has
from the locksmith, the stock-raiser and the butcher. Each of these
accepts cattle from others for their own product, and pays again with
the same cattle if he wants to have the products of others. The cattle
thus pass from one hand to another, mediating every exchange and serving
as the mental tie between the individual commodity producers. (And the
more, and more frequently, cattle pass from one person to another as the
mediator of business exchange, the more their universal unlimited
desirability is reinforced, the more they become the only commodity
desired and exchangeable at any time, the universal commodity.)

We have already seen how each product of labor, in a society of
fragmented private producers without a communal plan of work, is
initially private labor. Whether this labor was socially necessary, i.e.
whether its produce has a value and secures the producer a share in the
products of the whole, whether it was not rather wasted labor, all this
is shown simply and solely by the fact that this product is accepted in
exchange. Now, however, all products are exchanged only against cattle.
Now, therefore, a product is socially necessary only in so far as it can
be exchanged against cattle. Its exchangeability against cattle, its
equivalence in value with cattle, is what now gives each private product
the hallmark of socially necessary labor. We have further seen that it
is only through commodity exchange that the individualized, isolated
private person is confirmed as a member of society. We must now say more
precisely that this is through exchange against cattle. Cattle are now
the valid embodiment of social labor, and accordingly the only social
tie between people.

You will certainly begin to feel at this point that we have rather got
carried away. Everything was fairly straightforward and comprehensible
up till now. But to conclude with cattle being the universal commodity,
cattle as the embodiment of social labor, even cattle as the only social
tie between people—isn’t this a crazy fantasy, even an insult to the
human race? And yet, if you think about it, there is no need to feel
insulted. For no matter how superior you might feel to these poor
cattle, it is clear at all events that they are much closer to
humans—rather similar in a way, at least much more similar—than, let us
say, a lump of earth picked up from the ground or a pebble or a piece of
iron. You must admit that cattle are certainly more worthy of
representing the living social tie between people than is a dead piece
of metal. And yet humanity has precisely given preference here to metal.
For the important role of cattle in exchange that we described above is
in fact played by nothing other than _money_. If you cannot imagine
money in any other way than in the form of coined gold or silver pieces,
or even in paper banknotes, and you find this metal or paper money to be
completely self-evident as the universal mediator in dealings between
people, as a social power, but find my depiction of cattle playing this
role absurd, this only shows how full your head is with the ideas of the
present-day capitalist world.^(XCIV) A picture of social relations that
is actually fairly reasonable strikes you as hare-brained, while you see
as self-evident something that really is completely crazy. In actual
fact, money in the form of cattle has exactly the same function as
metallic money, and it is nothing more than convenience that has led us
to make money out of metal. Cattle, of course, cannot be so easily
exchanged, or their value so precisely measured, as can equal-sized
metal discs, not to mention that storage of cattle-money requires far
too big a purse, something like a stable. But before humanity hit on the
idea of making money from metal, money had already long been the
essential mediator of exchange. For money, the universal commodity, is
precisely the indispensable means without which no universal exchange
can get off the ground, without which the existing unplanned social
economy of individual producers cannot exist.

We need only look now at the multifarious role of cattle in exchange.
What made cattle into money in the society we were examining? The fact
that they were a product of labor that was desired by everyone and at
all times. But why were cattle desired in this way? We said that it was
because they were an extremely useful product that could secure human
existence as a many-sided means of subsistence. That was originally
correct. But subsequently, the more that cattle were used as mediator in
universal exchange, the more the immediate use of cattle as means of
subsistence fell into the background. Anyone who receives cattle in
exchange for their product will now make sure not to butcher them and
eat them, nor to yoke them to the plough; cattle are more valuable to
him now as a means for buying any other commodity he might want at any
time. The receiver of cattle will therefore not now consume them as
means of subsistence, but rather store them as means of exchange for
future transactions. You will also note that the immediate use of
cattle, in the context of the highly developed division of labor that we
presuppose in this society, is also not easily feasible. What is the
shoemaker, for example, to do with these cattle? Or the locksmith, the
weaver and the hatter, who likewise do not have any land-holding? The
immediate use of cattle as means of subsistence is therefore
increasingly ignored, and the reason why cattle are then desired by
everyone at all times is no longer because they can be milked,
butchered, or yoked to the plough, but rather because they offer the
possibility at any time of exchange for any commodity you like. It
increasingly becomes the mission of cattle, their specific use, to
facilitate exchange, i.e. to serve for the transformation at any time of
private products into social ones, of private labors into social labors.
Since in this way the private use of cattle, that of serving as means of
subsistence, is increasingly ignored and they are instead devoted
exclusively to their function of continuous mediation between the
individual members of society, they gradually cease to be a private
product like any other, and become from the start, by nature—right from
the stable, as it were—a social product, and the labor of the
cattle-raiser is now distinct from all other labor in society in being
the only directly social labor. Cattle now are no longer raised just for
their use as means of subsistence, but directly with the object of
functioning as a social product, as the universal commodity. Of course,
to some extent cattle are still butchered or yoked to the plough. But
this so-to-speak private use and private character increasingly vanishes
in the face of their public character as money. And as such, they now
play a prominent and many-sided role in the life of society.

1) They definitively become the universal and publicly recognized _means
of exchange_. No one any longer exchanges boots for bread, or shirts for
horseshoes. Anyone who tried this would be met with a shrug of the
shoulders. It is only for cattle that anything can be bought. But in
this way, the previous two-way exchange breaks down into two separate
processes: selling and buying. Previously, when the locksmith and the
baker exchanged their products with one another, each simultaneously
with a handshake sold his own commodity and bought that of the other.
Buying and selling were a single business. Now, if the shoemaker sells
his boots, all he obtains and accepts in return are cattle. He first of
all sells his own product. Then, when he wants to buy something, _what_
he buys, and indeed whether he buys at all, is entirely up to him. It is
enough that the shoemaker has got rid of his product, and transformed
his labor from the form of boots into the form of cattle. The
cattle-form, however, is as we have seen the official social form of
labor, and the shoemaker can store labor in this form as long as he
wants, as he knows that he has the opportunity at any time of exchanging
the product of his labor again from the cattle-form into any other he
wants—i.e. of making a purchase.

2) In the same way, however, cattle are now the means for storing and
accumulating wealth, they become a _treasury_. As long as the shoemaker
exchanged his product directly for means of subsistence, he also worked
only as much as he needed to in order to meet his daily needs. What use
would it have been to him to build up stocks of boots, or even large
stocks of bread, meat, shirts, hats, etc.? Objects of daily use are
generally damaged by prolonged storage, or even made unusable. Now,
however, the shoemaker can store the cattle he obtains for the products
of his labor as a resource for the future. Now, accordingly, a sense of
thrift is aroused in our tradesman, he seeks to sell as much as
possible, but makes sure not to spend again all the cattle he has
received; on the contrary, he seeks to accumulate them, since cattle are
now good for anything at any time, so he saves and stores them for the
future, leaving the fruits of his labor to his children as an
inheritance.

3) Cattle become at the same time also the _measure_ of all _values_ and
labors. If the shoemaker wants to know what his pair of shoes will bring
him in exchange, what his product is worth, he says to himself, for
example: I get half a cow for each pair, my pair of boots is worth half
a cow.

4) Finally, in this way cattle become the _concept of wealth_. Now
people do not say, this or that person is rich because he has a great
deal of corn, flocks, clothes, jewelery or servants, but rather: he has
a good deal of cattle. People say, hats off to that man, he’s “worth”
ten thousand oxen. Or they say, poor fellow, he doesn’t have any cattle!

As you see, with cattle having become the universal means of exchange,
society can only think in the cattle-form. People always talk about
cattle, they even dream about them. A literal worship and admiration of
cattle develops. A girl is most easily married if her attraction is
increased by a dowry of large herds of cattle, even if her wooer is not
a mere swineherd, but a professor, an intellectual or a poet. Cattle are
the very concept of good fortune. Poems are written about cattle and
their miraculous power, crimes and murders are committed for the sake of
cattle. And people repeat, shaking their heads, that “cattle rule the
world.” If you are not familiar with this proverb, you can translate it
into Latin; the old Roman word _pecunia_, meaning money, stems from
_pecus_, meaning cattle.^(XCV)

_3_

Our earlier investigation of how relations in the communistic community
would be reshaped after a sudden collapse of common property and
commonly planned labor, seemed to you no more than purely theoretical
rumination, wandering around in the clouds. In actual fact, this was
nothing other than an abbreviated and simplified depiction of the
historical rise of the commodity economy, its basic features strictly
corresponding to historical truth.

Yet a few corrections now need to be made to this depiction.

1) The process that we described as a catastrophe that happened
suddenly, destroying the communist society overnight and transforming it
into a society of private producers, in reality happened over millennia.
The idea of a transformation of this kind as a sudden and violent
catastrophe is certainly not pure fantasy. This idea does correspond to
reality, everywhere that primitive communist tribes come into contact
with other peoples already at a high capitalist stage of development. We
see cases like this with most discoveries and conquests of so-called
savage and semi-civilized lands by Europeans: the discovery of America
by the Spanish, the conquest of India by the English and of the East
Indies by the Dutch,¹⁹⁶ and the same with the seizures of the English,
Dutch and Germans in Africa. In most of these cases, the sudden arrival
of Europeans in these lands was accompanied by a catastrophe in the
lives of the primitive peoples who inhabited them. What we have assumed
as a process of twenty-four hours, often needs no more than a few
decades. The conquest of territory by a European state, or the mere
settlement of a few European trading colonies in these countries, very
soon results in a violent abolition of common property in land, the
break-up and fragmentation of landownership into private property, the
confiscation of herds of cattle, the reversal of all traditional social
relations—with the difference that the general result here is not, as we
assumed, the transformation of the communistic community into a society
of free private producers with commodity exchange. For the dissolved
common property does not become the private property of local people,
but rather the stolen goods of the European encroachers, and the
indigenous people themselves, robbed of their old forms and means of
existence, are made either into wage-slaves, or slaves pure and simple,
of European merchants, if they are not just exterminated, as happens
when neither of these two options is feasible. For primitive peoples in
colonized territories, therefore, the transition from primitive
communist conditions to modern capitalist ones always does take place as
a sudden catastrophe, an unforeseeable misfortune with the most
frightful sufferings {as it is presently true of the Germans with
Negroes of South West Africa}.¹⁹⁷ With the peoples of Europe, on the
other hand, it was not a catastrophe but rather a slow, gradual and
unnoticeable process, lasting for several hundred years. The Greeks and
Romans still appear in history with common property. The old Germans,
who spread from north to south soon after the birth of Christ,
destroying the Roman Empire and settling in Europe, still brought with
them the communistic primitive community, and maintained this for a good
while. The developed commodity economy of the European peoples, as we
described it, only came into being at the end of the Middle Ages, in the
fifteen and sixteenth centuries.

2) The second correction that has to be made to our depiction is a
consequence of the first. We assumed that all possible branches of labor
were already specialized and separate in the womb of the communist
community, i.e. that the division of labor in society had reached a very
high stage of development, so that with the occurrence of the
catastrophe that abolished common property and introduced private
production and exchange, the division of labor was already in place as
the basis for such exchange. This assumption is historically incorrect.
In the conditions of primitive society, so long as common property
persists, the division of labor is very little developed, still
embryonic. We have seen this in the example of the Indian village
community. Only a dozen or so individuals had separated out from the
mass of inhabitants to concentrate on special trades, no more than six
of these being actual artisans: the smith, the carpenter, the potter,
the barber, the washerman and the silversmith. Most handicraft work,
such as spinning, weaving, making clothes, baking, butchery,
sausage-making, etc., was all carried out by each family as a side
occupation along with their main agricultural work, as is still the case
even today in many Russian villages, in so far as the population have
not already been drawn into exchange and trade. The division of labor,
i.e. the separation of individual branches of labor as exclusive special
professions, can only properly develop if private property and exchange
are already in place. Only private property and exchange make possible
the emergence of particular special trades. For only when a producer has
the prospect of regularly exchanging his products against others does it
make sense for him to devote himself to specialized production. And it
is only money that gives each producer the possibility of storing and
accumulating the fruits of his efforts, and accordingly also the impetus
to regularly expand production for the market. On the other hand,
however, this producing for the market and accumulation of money only
has a purpose for the producer if his product and the receipts from it
are his private property. In the primitive communist community, however,
private property is precisely ruled out, and history shows us that
private property only arose as a result of exchange and the
specialization of labor. It turns out, therefore, that the emergence of
specialist professions, i.e. a highly developed division of labor, is
possible only with private property and developed exchange. It is
conversely clear, however, that exchange itself is possible only if the
division of labor is already present; for what purpose would there be in
exchange among producers who all produce one and the same thing? Only if
X for example only produces boots, whereas Y only bakes bread, is there
a sense and purpose in the two exchanging their products. We thus come
up against a strange contradiction: exchange is only possible with
private property and a developed division of labor, but this division of
labor can only come about as a result of exchange and on the basis of
private property, while private property for its part only arises
through exchange. This is even a double contradiction, if you examine it
closely: the division of labor must exist prior to exchange, even though
exchange must at the same time exist prior to the division of labor;
moreover, private property is the precondition for the division of labor
and exchange, but the only way it can develop is from the division of
labor and exchange. How is this tangle possible? We are clearly going
round in a circle, and even the first step away from the primitive
communist community seems an impossibility. Human society was apparently
caught in a contradiction here, whose resolution depended on the further
advance of development. But this inescapability is only apparent. A
contradiction may well be something inextricable for individuals in
everyday life, but in the life of society as a whole, you find
contradictions of this kind everywhere you look. What today appears as
the cause of a particular phenomenon is tomorrow its effect, and vice
versa, without this continuous change in conditions of social life ever
ceasing. On the contrary. The individual person cannot take a step
further when he faces a contradiction in his private life. He will even
accept in matters of everyday life that contradiction is something
impossible—so that an accused person who gets tangled up in
contradictions when he appears in court is thereby already found guilty
of untruth, and in certain circumstances contradictions can lead him
into prison or even to the gallows. But human society as a whole
develops continuously in contradictions, and rather than succumbing to
these, it only starts to move when it meets contradictions.
Contradiction in the life of society, in other words, is always resolved
by development, in new advances of culture. The great philosopher
[G.W.F.] Hegel said: “Contradiction is the very moving principle of the
world.”¹⁹⁸ And this movement in the thick of contradictions is precisely
the actual mode of development of human society. In the particular case
we are concerned with here, i.e. the transition from communist society
to private property with the division of labor and exchange, the
contradiction that we found is also resolved in a particular
development, a long historical process. But this process was essentially
just as we originally depicted it, apart from the corrections we have
just made.

Exchange initially begins already in primitive conditions with common
property, and indeed, as we have assumed, in the form of barter, i.e.
product for product. We already find barter at very early stages of
human culture. Since exchange as we have depicted it, however, assumes
the private property of both parties involved, and this is unknown
within the primitive community, this early barter does not occur within
the community or tribe but rather outside, not between the members of
one and the same tribe, one and the same community, but rather between
different tribes and communities when they come into contact with one
another. And here it is not an individual member of one tribe who trades
with someone from another tribe, but rather tribes and communities as a
whole that enter into barter, represented always by their chiefs. The
widespread idea held by scholars of political economy of a primitive
hunter and fisherman who exchange their respective fish and game with
one another in the first dawn of human culture in the primeval forests
of America, is a double historical delusion. Not only were there in
primitive times, as we saw, no isolated individuals living and working
for themselves, but barter between individuals emerged only thousands of
years later. Initially, history knows only tribes and peoples bartering
with one another. As [Joseph François] Lafitau wrote in his book on the
American savages,

Savage peoples constantly pursue exchange. Their trade has in common
with the trade of antiquity that it represents an immediate exchange of
products against products. Each of these peoples possesses something
that the others do not, and trade conveys all these things from one
people to the other. This includes corn, pottery, hides, tobacco,
covers, canoes, cattle, household equipment, amulets, cotton—in a word,
everything used for the maintenance of human life … Their trade is
conducted by the chief of the tribe, who represents the whole
people.^(XCVI)

Moreover, if we began our earlier depiction of exchange with a
particular case—exchange between shoemaker and baker—and treated this as
something accidental, this again corresponds strictly to historical
truth. In the beginning, exchange between particular savage tribes and
peoples were purely accidental and haphazard; it depended on chance
encounters and contacts. This is why we see regular barter emerge most
early among nomadic peoples, since it is these, by their frequent change
of place, who came most frequently into contact with other
peoples.^(XCVII) As long as exchange remains a matter of chance, it is
only the surplus products, what remains after meeting a tribe’s or
community’s own needs, that are offered in exchange for something else.
Over time, however, the more frequently such chance exchange is
repeated, the more it becomes a habit, then a rule, and gradually people
start to produce directly for exchange. Tribes and peoples thus
increasingly specialize in one or more particular branches of
production, with the object of exchange. A division of labor develops
between tribes and communities. In this connection, trade remains for a
very long while pure barter, i.e. direct exchange of product for
product. In many regions of the United States, barter was still
widespread in the late eighteenth century. In Maryland, the legislative
assembly laid down the proportions in which tobacco, oil, pork and bread
were to be exchanged for one another. In Corrientes [Argentina], as late
as 1815, peddler boys ran through the streets with the cry: “Salt for
candles, tobacco for bread!” In Russian villages until the 1890s, and in
some parts still today, traveling peddlers known as _prasols_ conducted
simple barter with peasants. All kinds of knickknacks, such as needles,
thimbles, belts, buttons, pipes, soap, etc. were exchanged for bristles,
quilts, hare pelts and the like. Potters, plumbers, etc. traveled
through Russia with their carts, exchanging their products for corn,
linen, hemp, etc.^(XCVIII) With the frequency and regularity of exchange
transactions, however, it was not long before, in each district and
tribe, one commodity separated out that was easiest to produce, and so
could most frequently be given in exchange, or alternatively one that
was most lacking and so generally desired. Such a role was played for
example by salt and dates in the Sahara desert, sugar in the English
West Indies, tobacco in Virginia and Maryland, so-called brick tea (a
hard mixture of tea leaves and fat in the form of a brick) in Siberia,
ivory among the black Africans, cocoa beans in ancient Mexico. In this
way, the climatic and soil conditions in various regions already led to
the separating out of a “universal commodity” that was suited to serve
as a basis for all trade and a mediator of all exchange transactions.
The same occurred with subsequent development from the particular
occupation of each tribe. Among hunting peoples, game was naturally the
“universal commodity” that they offered for all possible products. In
the trade of the Hudson Bay Company, it was beaver fat that played this
role. Among fishing tribes, fish are the natural mediator of all
exchange. According to the account of a French traveler, on the Shetland
Islands change was given in fish even on the purchase of a theatre
ticket.^(XCIX) The necessity of such a generally desired commodity as
universal mediator of exchange often made itself very perceptible. The
celebrated African traveler Samuel [White] Baker, for example, described
his exchange with tribes in central Africa:

The difficulties of pro curing provisions are most serious: the only
method of purchasing flour is as follows. The natives will not sell it
for anything but flesh; to purchase an ox, I require molotes (hoes): to
obtain molotes I must sell my clothes and shoes to the traders’ men. The
ox is then driven to a distant village, and is there slaughtered, and
the flesh being divided into about a hundred small portions, my men sit
upon the ground with three large baskets, into which are emptied minute
baskets of flour as the natives produce them, one in exchange for each
parcel of meat.^(C)

With the transition to stock raising, cattle become the universal
commodity in exchange and the universal measure of value. This was the
case among the ancient Greeks, as Homer describes it. In describing and
valuing the armor of each hero, for example, he says that the armor of
Glaucus was worth a hundred head of cattle and that of Diomedes nine.¹⁹⁹
As well as cattle, however, other products also served as money among
the Greeks of this time. Homer again says that during the siege of Troy,
wine from Lemnos²⁰⁰ was paid sometimes in hides, sometimes in oxen,
sometimes in copper or iron. Among the early Romans, as we said, the
concept of “money” was identical with that of cattle; among the ancient
Germans, too, cattle were the universal commodity. It was with the
transition to agriculture that metals, iron and copper, acquired a
surpassing importance in economic life, partly as material for producing
weapons, but still more so for agricultural implements. Metal became the
universal commodity as it was produced and used in greater quantities,
expelling cattle from this role. Initially it was the universal
commodity precisely because it was universally useful and desired for
its natural use—as material for all kinds of tools. At this stage, it
was also used in trade as raw material, in bars and only by weight.
Among the Greeks it was iron that was in general use, among the Romans
it was copper, among the Chinese a mixture of copper and lead. Only much
later did the so-called precious metals, silver and gold, come into use,
and also into trade. But for a very long time these were still used in
trade in their raw state, uncoined and by weight.^(CI) Here,
accordingly, we can still see the origin of the universal commodity, the
money commodity, from a simple product with a particular use. The simple
piece of silver that is given one day in exchange for flour might still
be used directly the next day to decorate a knight’s shield. The
exclusive use of precious metal as money, i.e. coined money, was known
neither to the ancient Hindus nor to the Egyptians, nor again to the
Chinese. The ancient Jews likewise used metal pieces only by weight.
Abraham, for example, according to the Bible, when he bought a burial
plot for Sarah in Hebron,²⁰¹ paid 400 shekels in weighed-out trading
silver.²⁰² It is generally assumed that coinage only appeared in the
tenth or even eighth century BC, being first introduced by the Greeks.
The Romans learned from them, manufacturing their first silver and gold
coins in the third century BC.^(CII) With the coining of money from gold
and silver, the long, millennial history of the development of exchange
reached its fullest, most complete and definitive form.

As we have said, money, i.e. the universal commodity, was already
developed before metals began to be used for monetary purposes. And even
in the form of cattle, for example, money has precisely the same
functions in exchange as gold coins do today: as mediator of
transactions, as measure of value, as store of value and as embodiment
of wealth. In the form of metallic money, however, the specific
characteristic of money is expressed also in its outward appearance. We
saw how exchange begins with the simple barter of any two products of
labor. It comes into being because one producer—one community or
tribe—cannot do without products of the other’s labor. They assist each
other with the creations of their respective labor by exchanging these.
As such exchanges become frequent and regular, _one_ product emerges as
especially preferred, because universally desired, and this becomes the
mediator of all exchange transactions, the universal commodity. Any
product of labor has the intrinsic ability to become money: boots or
hats, linen or wool, cattle or corn, and we also see that the most
varied commodities have at times played this role. _Which_ commodity is
chosen simply depends on the particular needs or particular occupations
of the people in question.

Cattle are initially preferred in this way as a useful product and means
of subsistence. With the passage of time, however, cattle are desired
and accepted as money. Cattle then make it possible for anyone to
accumulate the fruits of his labor in a form that is exchangeable at any
time for any other product of society’s labor. Cattle, we said, as
distinct from all other private products, are the only directly social
product, the only one that is unrestrictedly exchangeable at any time.
But in cattle, the dual nature of the money commodity finds strong
expression: a glance at cattle shows how, despite being the universal
commodity and a social product, they are at the same time a simple means
of subsistence that can be butchered and eaten, an ordinary product of
human labor, the labor of herders. In the gold coin, however, any memory
of the origin of money out of a simple product has already quite
disappeared. The coined piece of gold is inherently unsuitable for
anything else, it has no other use but to serve as means of exchange, as
universal commodity. It is only still value in so far as it is, like any
other commodity, the product of human labor, the labor of the gold-miner
and goldsmith, but it has lost any private use as means of subsistence,
it is precisely nothing but a piece of human labor without any useful
and consumable form for private life, it no longer has any use as
private means of subsistence, as food, clothing, ornament or anything
else, its only purpose being its purely social use, to serve as mediator
in the exchange of other commodities. And it is precisely for this
reason that it appears in this meaningless and purposeless object: in
the gold coin, the purely social character of money, the universal
commodity, finds its purest and most mature expression.

The consequences of the definitive development of money in the metal
form are: sharp increase in trade, and decline of all social relations
that were preciously geared not to trade but to self-sufficiency.^(CIII)
The ancient communistic community was shattered by trade, as this
accelerated the disparity of wealth among its members, the collapse of
common property, and finally the breakdown of the community
itself.^(CIV)

The free small peasant economy, which initially produced everything for
itself and only sold its surplus, to put money under the mattress, was
gradually forced, particularly by the introduction of monetary taxation,
to sell its entire product, in order to buy not only food, clothing and
household articles, but even grain for sowing. We have seen an example
of such a transformation of the peasant economy, from one producing for
its own needs to one producing for the market and being ruined in the
process, with the last few decades in Russia. In ancient slavery, trade
brought about a profound change. So long as slaves were used only for
the domestic economy, for agricultural or artisanal tasks for the needs
of the master and his family, slavery still had a mild and traditional
character. Inhuman treatment of slaves began only when the Greeks, and
later the Romans, developed the taste for money and started producing
for trade, leading eventually to mass revolts by the slaves,²⁰³ which
although completely unsuccessful, were heralds and clear signs that
slavery had had its day and become unsustainable.^(CV) Precisely the
same situation was presented by the _corvée_ in the Middle Ages.
Initially this was a relationship of protection, with the peasantry
owing the protecting lord a definite moderate sum, either in kind or in
labor services, towards the lord’s own consumption. Later, when the
nobles learned the conveniences of money, these services and dues were
steadily increased for the purpose of trade, the _corvée_ relationship
became one of serfdom, and peasants were driven to the utmost limits. In
the end, the same spread of trade and the dominance of money led to dues
in kind being commuted from serfdom into monetary payments. But this
meant that the bell had tolled for the entire outmoded _corvée_
relationship.^(CVI)

Finally, trade in the Middle Ages brought power and wealth for the free
towns, but in this way also led to the break-up and decline of the old
guild handicrafts. Very early on, the appearance of metallic money made
world trade possible. Already in antiquity, certain peoples like the
Phoenicians devoted themselves to the role of merchants between peoples,
attracting large sums of money in this way and accumulating wealth in
the money form. In the Middle Ages, this role fell to the free towns,
initially the Italian ones. After the discovery of America and of the
sea route to the East Indies, at the end of the fifteenth century, world
trade experienced a sudden great expansion: the new lands offered not
only new products for trade, but also new gold mines, i.e. the money
material.^(CVII) Following the enormous import of gold from America in
the sixteenth century, the North German towns—above all the Hanseatic
League²⁰⁴—acquired immense riches, and in their wake so did Holland and
England. As a result, in the European towns and to a large extent also
the countryside, commodity trade, i.e. production for exchange, became
the prevailing form of economic life. Exchange thus has its quiet and
unremarked beginnings in grey prehistory on the frontiers of savage
communist tribes, grows and develops alongside all successive planned
economic organizations, such as free simple peasant economy, Oriental
despotism, antique slavery, the medieval _corvée_ and the urban guild
regime, consuming these one after the other and helping to bring about
their collapse and finally the dominance of the completely anarchic,
unplanned economy of isolated private producers as the sole and
universally prevailing economic form.^(CVIII)

_4_^(CIX)

Once commodity economy had become the prevailing form of production in
Europe by the eighteenth century, at least in the towns, scholars began
to study the question as to what was the foundation of this economy,
i.e. of universal exchange. All exchange is mediated by money, and the
value of every commodity in exchange has its monetary expression. What
then does this monetary expression mean, and what is the basis of the
value that each commodity has in trade? These were the first questions
that political economy investigated. In the second half of the
eighteenth and the early nineteenth century, the Englishmen Adam Smith
and David Ricardo made the great discovery that the value of each
commodity is nothing other than the human labor it contains, so that
with the exchange of commodities equal quantities of different kinds of
labor are exchanged for one another. Money is simply the mediator here,
and simply expresses in the price the corresponding amount of labor
contained in each commodity. It does indeed appear rather remarkable to
speak of this as a great discovery, since one might believe that nothing
was more clear and self-evident than that the exchange of commodities
depends on the labor they contain. It is just that the expression of the
commodity value in gold, which had become the general and exclusive
custom, concealed this natural state of affairs. At the time when the
shoemaker and the baker exchanged their respective products, as I said,
it was still obvious and visible that exchange came into being because,
despite their different uses, each of these took the same amount of
labor as the other, and each was therefore worth the same as the other
in so far as they both took the same amount of time. But if I say that a
pair of shoes costs ten marks, this expression is at first quite
puzzling when examined more closely. For what does a pair of shoes have
in common with ten marks, in what way are they equal, so that they can
be exchanged for one another? How can such different things be compared
with one another at all? And how can such a useful product as shoes be
exchanged for such a useless and meaningless object as stamped gold or
silver discs? Finally, how does it come about that precisely these
useless metal discs possess the magic power of obtaining anything in the
world by way of exchange? _All_ these questions, however, the great
founders of political economy, Smith and Ricardo, did not manage to
answer. For the discovery that what is contained in the exchange-value
of every commodity, even money, is simply human labor, and that the
value of a commodity is therefore that much greater, the more labor its
production requires, and vice versa, is only a half-truth. The other
half of the truth consists in the explanation of how and why it is that
human labor then assumes the strange form of exchange-value, and the
puzzling form of money at that. The English founders of political
economy did not even raise this question, since they considered it an
innate property of human labor, given in the nature of things, that it
created commodities for exchange and money. In other words, they assumed
it was just as natural as that people have to eat and drink, that hairs
grow on the head and that the face has a nose, that they have to produce
with their hands commodities for trade. They believed this so firmly
that Adam Smith, for example, raised the question in all seriousness
whether animals did not already conduct trade, and he only denied this
because at that time no such examples had yet been found in the animal
world. He says:²⁰⁵

This naïve conception, however, simply means that the great creators of
political economy lived in the rock-solid conviction that the present
capitalist social order, in which everything is a commodity and produced
only for trade, is the only possible and eternal social order, which
will endure as long as there are people on this earth. Only Karl Marx,
who as a socialist did not take the capitalist order to be the eternal
and only possible social form, but rather a passing historical one, made
comparisons between present relations and earlier ones at other times.
He showed in this way that people had lived for thousands of years
without knowing much about money and exchange. Only to the extent that
any common planned labor came to an end in society, and society
dissolved into a loose anarchic heap of completely free and independent
producers with private property, did exchange become the only means of
uniting these fragmented individuals and their labors into an integrated
social economy. In place of a common economic plan that precedes
production, money now becomes the only direct social means of
connection, which it does because it represents the only thing in common
between the many different private labors as itself a piece of human
labor without any particular use, i.e. precisely because it is a
completely meaningless product, unsuited for any kind of use in human
private life. This meaningless invention is thus a necessity without
which no exchange would be possible, i.e. the entire history of culture
since the dissolution of primitive communism. The bourgeois political
economists of course viewed money also as extremely important and
indispensable, but only from the standpoint of the purely external
convenience of monetary exchange. This can actually be said of money
only in the same sense that one can say that humanity has for example
invented religion for the sake of convenience. Money and religion are
certainly two powerful cultural products, but they have their roots in
quite particular and transient conditions, and, just as they arose, so
they will become superfluous in due course. The immense annual expenses
on gold production, just as the expenses on religion, not to mention
those on prisons, the military or public welfare, which are a heavy
burden on today’s social economy, but are necessary costs given the
existence of this economic form, will disappear with the abolition of
the commodity economy.

The commodity economy, as we have got to know its inner mechanism,
appears before us as a wonderfully harmonious economic order, based on
the highest principles of morality. Firstly, complete individual freedom
prevails. Each person works as he likes, on what he likes and as much as
he likes; each is his own master and need only be governed by his own
preference. Secondly, they all exchange their commodities, i.e. the
products of their labor, for the products of other people’s labor; labor
is exchanged against labor, and moreover, on average in equal
quantities. So there is also complete equality and reciprocity of
interests. Thirdly, in commodity economy commodity is exchanged for
commodity, one product of labor for another. Anyone therefore who does
not have a product of his labor to offer, anyone who does not work, will
also not obtain anything to eat. Here too we have the highest justice.
In fact, the philosophers and politicians of the eighteenth century, who
fought for the complete triumph of freedom of trade and the abolition of
the last vestiges of the old relations of domination—the guild regime
and feudal serfdom^(CX)—the men of the Great French Revolution, promised
humanity a paradise on earth, in which freedom, equality and fraternity
would rule.

A number of leading socialists in the first half of the nineteenth
century were still of the same opinion. When scientific political
economy was created and Smith and Ricardo made the great discovery that
all commodity values were based on human labor, some friends of the
working class hit on the idea right away that if commodity exchange were
conducted correctly, there would necessarily be complete equality and
justice in society. If labor was always exchanged for labor in the same
quantities, it would be impossible for inequality of wealth to develop,
at most just the well-deserved inequality between hard workers and
idlers, and the whole social wealth would belong to those who work, i.e.
the working class. But if despite this we see great differences in
people’s conditions in present society, if we see wealth alongside
poverty and what is more, wealth in the hands of non-workers and poverty
for those who create all values by their labor, this must obviously
arise from something wrong in the process of exchange, owing to the
intervention of money as mediator in the exchange of the products of
labor.^(CXI) Money conceals the real origin of all wealth in labor,
provokes constant fluctuations of price and thus gives the possibility
of arbitrary prices, swindling, and the accumulation of wealth at the
cost of others. So, away with money! This socialism aiming at the
abolition of money originated in England, represented there as early as
the 1820s and 30s by such talented writers as [William] Thompson, [John
Francis] Bray and others. The same kind of socialism was then
rediscovered by [Johann Karl] Rodbertus, in a Prussia of conservative
Pomeranian Junkers²⁰⁶ and brilliant writers on political economy; and
finally by Proudhon in France in 1849. Practical attempts in this
direction were also undertaken. Under the influence of the
above-mentioned Bray, so-called “bazaars” for “equitable labor exchange”
were established in many English towns, to which goods were brought to
be exchanged without the intervention of money, strictly in accordance
with the labor-time they contained. Proudhon also proposed the
foundation of a so-called “people’s bank.” But these attempts rapidly
went bankrupt, along with the theory behind them. Commodity exchange
without money is in fact inconceivable, and the price fluctuations that
these people wanted to abolish are in fact the only means for indicating
to commodity producers whether they are making too little of a
particular commodity or too much, whether they are spending more or less
labor on its production than it requires, whether they are producing the
right commodities or not. If this sole means of communication between
the isolated commodity producers in the anarchic economy is abolished,
they are completely lost, being not only struck dumb, but blind into the
bargain. Production necessarily comes to a standstill, and the
capitalist tower of Babel shatters into ruins. The socialist plans for
making capitalist commodity production into socialist simply by the
abolition of money were thus pure utopia.

How do things really stand then in commodity production, as far as
freedom, equality and fraternity are concerned? How can inequality of
wealth arise in the context of general commodity production, where it is
only for a product of labor that anyone can get anything, and where
equal values can only be exchanged for equal values? Yet present
capitalist society is precisely characterized, as everyone knows, by a
glaring inequality in people’s material condition, by tremendous
accumulation of wealth in a few hands on the one side, and growing
poverty for the mass of people on the other. The subsequent question
that logically arises for us from all this is: _How is capitalism
possible in a commodity economy, given that commodities are exchanged
according to their value?_


IV. WAGE-LABOR

All commodities exchange against one another according to their value,
i.e. according to the socially necessary labor they contain. The fact
that money plays the role of mediator does not in any way change this
basis of exchange: money itself is simply the bare expression of social
labor, and the amount of value contained in each commodity is expressed
in the amount of money for which the commodity is sold. On the basis of
this law of value, complete equality prevails between commodities on the
market. And there would also be complete equality among the sellers of
commodities, if there were not, among the millions of different kinds of
goods coming onto the market for exchange, one particular commodity of a
quite special character—labor-power. This commodity is brought to market
by those who possess no means of production of their own with which to
produce other commodities. In a society based exclusively on commodity
exchange, nothing is obtained, as we know, except by way of exchange. We
have indeed seen how the commodity that each person brings to market is
this person’s unique claim and title to a share in the mass of social
products, and at the same time the measure of this share. Each person
obtains, in whatever commodities he chooses, exactly the same amount of
the mass of labor performed in society as he himself supplies in
socially necessary labor in the form of any kind of commodity. To be
able to live, therefore, each person must supply and sell commodities.
Commodity production and sale has become the condition for human
existence. Anyone who does not bring a commodity to market does not
receive any means of subsistence. But the production of any kind of
commodity requires means of labor, i.e. tools and the like, as well as
raw and ancillary materials, not to mention a place of work, equipped
with the necessary conditions of labor such as lighting, etc., and
finally a certain quantum of means of subsistence, to keep life going
until the process of production has been completed and the commodity is
sold. Only a few insignificant commodities can be produced without an
outlay on means of production: for example, mushrooms and berries that
grow in the forest, or shellfish collected on the shore by inhabitants
of the coast. But even here, certain means of production are always
necessary, such as baskets and the like, as well as means of subsistence
that make life possible during this labor. Most kinds of commodity,
however, in any society with developed commodity production, require a
quite significant outlay on means of production, sometimes a tremendous
one. Anyone without such means of production, who is thus not in a
position to produce commodities, has nothing for it but to bring himself
to market as a commodity, i.e. to bring his own labor-power.

Like any other commodity, the commodity labor-power also has its
definite value. The value of any commodity, as we know, is determined by
the amount of labor required for its production. In order to produce the
commodity labor-power, a particular amount of labor is likewise
necessary, i.e. the labor that produces the requisites of life for the
worker, food and clothing, etc. Whatever labor therefore is required in
order to keep a person capable of labor, to maintain his labor-power, is
also what his labor-power is worth. The value of the commodity
labor-power, therefore, is represented by the amount of labor that is
needed to produce the worker’s means of subsistence. Moreover, as with
every other commodity, the value of labor-power is measured on the
market in terms of price, i.e. in money. The monetary expression, i.e.
the price of the commodity labor-power, is called the wage. With every
other commodity, the price rises when demand grows more quickly than
supply, and conversely falls when the supply of the commodity is greater
than demand. The same also holds for the commodity labor-power: with
rising demand for workers, wages show a general tendency to rise, and if
the demand falls or the labor-market is overfilled with fresh commodity,
wages show a tendency to fall. Finally, as with every other commodity,
the value of labor-power, and along with it ultimately its price as
well, is higher if a greater amount of labor is required for its
production: in this case, if the worker’s means of subsistence require
more labor for their production. And conversely, every saving on the
labor required to produce the worker’s means of subsistence leads to a
reduction in the value of labor-power, and thus also in its price, i.e.
in wages. As David Ricardo wrote in 1817:

Diminish the cost of production of hats, and their price will ultimately
fall to their new natural price, although the demand should be doubled,
trebled, or quadrupled. Diminish the cost of subsistence of men, by
diminishing the natural price of the food and clothing, by which life is
sustained, and wages will ultimately fall, notwithstanding that the
demand for laborers may very greatly increase.²⁰⁷

The only way, therefore, in which the commodity labor-power is initially
distinguished from other commodities on the market is that it is
inseparable from its seller, the worker, so that it cannot tolerate any
long wait for buyers, otherwise it will disappear along with its bearer,
the worker, for lack of means of subsistence, whereas most other
commodities can tolerate a more or less long waiting-time quite well.
The particularity of the commodity labor-power is thus not yet expressed
on the market, where it is only exchange-value that plays a role. It
lies elsewhere—in the use-value of this commodity. Every commodity is
bought on account of the utility that its consumption can bring. Boots
are bought in order to serve as clothing for the feet; a cup is bought
so that tea can be drunk from it. What use then can labor-power serve
when purchased? Obviously, that of laboring. But this scarcely says
anything yet. People at every time could and had to work, ever since the
human race existed, and yet whole millennia passed in which labor-power
was completely unknown as a purchasable commodity. On the other hand, if
we imagine that a person, with his full labor-power, was only in a
position to produce the means of subsistence that he himself needed,
then the purchase of such labor-power, i.e. of labor-power as a
commodity, would be quite senseless. For if someone buys and pays for
labor-power, puts it to work with his own means of production, and only
obtains at the end of the day the maintenance of the bearer of his
purchased commodity, the worker, this means that the worker by selling
his labor-power only obtains someone else’s means of production in order
to work with these for himself. From the standpoint of commodity
exchange this would be a senseless deal, just as if someone were to buy
boots simply to return them to the shoemaker as a present. If this were
the only use of human labor-power, it would have no utility for the
purchaser and accordingly could not appear on the market as a commodity.
For only products with a definite utility can figure as commodities. If
labor-power appears as a commodity, therefore, it is not enough that the
person concerned can work, if he is given means of production, but
rather that he can work more than is needed for the production of his
own means of subsistence. He must be able to work not only to support
himself, but also work for the buyer of his labor-power. The commodity
labor-power, therefore, in its use, i.e. in labor, must not simply be
able to replace its own price, i.e. the wage, but on top of this also
supply surplus labor for the purchaser. And indeed, the commodity
labor-power does have this convenient property. But what does this mean?
Is it a kind of natural property of man, or of the worker, that he can
perform surplus labor? At the time when it took people a year to make an
axe out of stone, or hours rubbing two sticks of wood together to make a
fire, when it took several months to make a single bow, even the
cleverest and most unscrupulous entrepreneur would have been unable to
press any surplus labor out of anyone. A certain level of productivity
of human labor is therefore required in order for any surplus-labor at
all to be provided. In other words, human tools, skills and knowledge,
human domination over natural forces, must already have reached a
certain level, not simply to be able to produce means of subsistence for
the worker himself, but on top of this also to produce for others. This
perfection of tools and knowledge, however, this degree of mastery of
nature, was only acquired by human society through long millennia of
painful experience. The distance from the first crude stone instruments
and the discovery of fire through to today’s steam and electrical
machinery, represents humanity’s whole course of social development, a
development that was possible only within society, by people’s social
coexistence and collaboration. The productivity of labor, therefore,
that endows the labor-power of the present-day wage-laborer with the
convenient property of performing surplus labor, is not a physiological
particularity of the human being, something given by nature, but rather
a _social phenomenon_, the fruit of a long developmental history. The
surplus labor of the commodity labor-power is simply another expression
for the productivity of social labor, which manages to maintain several
people from the labor of one.

The productivity of labor, however, particularly where it is assisted
even at a primitive cultural level by fortunate natural conditions, does
not always and everywhere lead to the sale of labor-power and its
capitalist exploitation. Let us transport ourselves for a moment to
those favored tropical regions of Central and South America that were
Spanish colonies from the discovery of the New World until the early
nineteenth century, and where bananas are the main food of the native
population. “I doubt whether there is another plant on the globe which
on so small a space of ground can produce so considerable a mass of
nutritive substance,” wrote Alexander von Humboldt:

According to this last principle, and the fact is very curious, we find
that in a very fertile country a demi hectare … cultivated with bananas
of the large species (_platano arton_), is capable of maintaining fifty
individuals; when the same in Europe would only yield annually,
supposing the eight-grain, 576 kilograms of flour, a quantity not equal
to the subsistence of two individuals.²⁰⁸

Besides, bananas require for their production only the slightest human
effort, needing only one or two light rakings of the earth around their
roots. “At the foot of the Cordillera, in the humid valleys of the
intendancies of Vera Cruz, Valladolid, and Guadalajara, a man who merely
employs two days in the week in a work by no means laborious may procure
subsistence for a whole family.”²⁰⁹

It is clear that the productivity of labor here would certainly permit
exploitation, and a scholar with a true capitalist soul, such as
[Thomas] Malthus, could exclaim in tears at the description of this
earthly paradise: “What immense powers for production are here
described! What resources for unbounded wealth …!”^(CXII) In other
words, how splendidly gold could be beaten out of the work of the
banana-eaters by zealous entrepreneurs, if these lazy-bones could only
be harnessed to labor. But what do we actually see? The inhabitants of
these favored regions did not think of accumulating money, but simply
examined the banana trees, tasted their respective fruit, and spent a
lot of free time lying in the sun and enjoying life. Humboldt says very
pertinently of them:

We hear it frequently repeated in the Spanish colonies, that the
inhabitants of the warm region (_tierra caliente_) will never awake from
the state of apathy in which for centuries they have been plunged, until
a royal _cedula_²¹⁰ shall order the destruction of the banana
plantations (_plantanares_).²¹¹

What from the capitalist standpoint is described as “apathy” is
precisely the mental state of all peoples still living in relations of
primitive communism, in which the purpose of human labor is simply to
satisfy people’s natural needs, and not the accumulation of wealth. But
so long as these conditions prevail, then no matter how productive labor
is, there can be no question of the exploitation of one person by
another, the application of human labor-power for the production of
surplus labor.

The modern entrepreneur, however, was not the first to discover this
convenient property of human labor-power. We already see the
exploitation of surplus labor by non-workers in ancient times. Slavery
in antiquity, as well as the _corvée_ relationship and serfdom in the
Middle Ages, were both based on a level of productivity already
attained, i.e. the capacity of human labor to maintain more than one
person. Both are also simply different forms in which one class of
society made use of this productivity in order to have itself maintained
by another class. In this sense, the antique slave and the medieval serf
are direct forerunners of today’s wage-laborer. But neither in antiquity
nor the Middle Ages did labor-power become a commodity, despite its
productivity and despite its exploitation. What is particular in the
present-day relationship between wage-laborer and entrepreneur, what
distinguishes it from both slavery and serfdom, is above all the
personal freedom of the laborer. The sale of commodities is the
voluntary and private business of each person, based on complete
individual freedom. An unfree person cannot sell his labor-power. A
further condition for this, however, is that the worker possesses no
means of production. If he did, he would produce commodities himself and
not part with his labor-power as a commodity. The separation of
labor-power from the means of production, accordingly, is another factor
along with personal freedom that makes labor-power today a commodity. In
the slave economy, labor-power is not separated from the means of
production; on the contrary, it is itself a means of production and
belongs together with tools, raw materials, etc. to the master as his
private property. The slave is simply part of the indistinguishable mass
of the slaveholder’s means of production. In _corvée_ labor, labor-power
is legally tied directly to the means of production, to the soil, it is
itself simply an accessory to the means of production. _Corvée_ services
and dues are not in fact the responsibility of individuals but of the
plot of land; if the land is transferred to other hands, by inheritance
or likewise, the dues go along with it. Today the worker is personally
free, he is neither anyone’s property nor is he tied to the means of
production. On the contrary, the means of production belong to one
person, labor-power to another, and the two owners face each other as
independent and free, as buyer and seller—the capitalist as buyer of
labor-power, the worker as its seller. Finally, however, neither
personal freedom nor the separation of labor-power from the means of
production always lead to wage-labor, to the sale of labor-power, even
at a high level of labor productivity. We saw an example of this kind in
ancient Rome, after the great mass of free small peasants were driven
from their lands by the formation of large noble estates with a slave
economy. They remained personally free, but no longer had any land, any
means of production, so that they moved massively from the countryside
to Rome as free proletarians. Here, however, they could not sell their
labor-power, as there were no buyers to be had; the rich landowners and
capitalists did not need to buy free labor-power, being maintained by
the work of slaves. Slave labor at that time was completely sufficient
to satisfy all the landowners’ needs, as they had everything possible
made by slaves. But labor-power could not be used for more than their
own living and luxury, the very purpose of slave production being the
owner’s consumption rather than the sale of commodities. In this way,
the Roman proletarians were excluded from all sources of wealth deriving
from their own labor, and there was nothing left for them but to live
from beggary—beggary from the state, from periodic distributions of
means of subsistence. Instead of wage-labor, accordingly, what arose in
ancient Rome was the mass feeding of property-less free people at the
cost of the state, which led the French economist [Jean Charles Léonard
de Sismondi] to say that in ancient Rome the proletariat lived at the
expense of society, whereas today society lives at the expense of the
proletariat.²¹² But if today it is possible for proletarians to work for
both their own consumption and that of others, if the sale of their
labor-power is possible, this is because today free labor is the _sole_
and exclusive form of production, and because as commodity production it
is precisely not geared to direct consumption, but rather to the
creation of products for sale. The slaveholder bought slaves for his own
comfort and luxury, the feudal lord extracted services and dues from the
_corvée_ peasants for the same purpose: to live literally like a lord,
along with his clan. The modern entrepreneur does not get workers to
produce objects of food, clothing and luxury for his own consumption,
but rather commodities for sale, in order to obtain money. And it is
precisely this that makes him a capitalist, just as it makes the workers
into wage-laborers.

We see, then, how the simple fact of the sale of labor-power as a
commodity implies a whole series of particular social and historical
relations. The mere appearance of labor-power as a commodity on the
market indicates: 1) the personal freedom of the workers; 2) their
separation from the means of production along with the accumulation of
means of production in the hands of non-workers; 3) a high level of
productivity of labor, thus the possibility of performing surplus labor;
4) the general prevalence of commodity economy, i.e. the creation of
surplus labor in the commodity form as the purpose of the purchase of
labor-power.

Externally, from the standpoint of the market, the sale and purchase of
the commodity labor-power is a completely ordinary business, one of
thousands that take place every moment, like the purchase of boots or
onions. The value of the commodity and its alterations, its fluctuating
price, the equality and independence of buyer and seller on the market,
the voluntary character of the deal—all this is exactly as with any
other transaction. But owing to the particular use-value of this
commodity, the particular conditions that create it as a use-value, this
everyday market transaction becomes a new and quite particular social
relation. Let us examine more closely what this market transaction leads
to.

_2_

The entrepreneur buys labor-power and like any purchaser pays its value,
i.e. its production costs, by paying the worker as his wage a price that
covers the worker’s maintenance. But this purchased labor-power is
capable, with the average means of production used in society, to
produce more than simply its own maintenance costs. This is already, as
we know, a precondition of the whole business, which would otherwise be
senseless; it is precisely here that the use-value of the commodity
labor-power lies. Since the value of maintaining labor-power is
determined, as with any other commodity, by the amount of labor required
for its production, we can assume that the food, clothing, etc. that are
needed for the daily maintenance of the worker in a condition capable of
labor require, let us say for example, six hours’ labor. The price of
the commodity labor-power, i.e. its wage, must then normally come to six
hours’ labor in money. But the worker spends not just six hours working
for his entrepreneur but longer, let us say for example eleven hours. In
these eleven hours, the worker firstly spends six hours reimbursing the
wage he receives, and on top of this provides five hours of labor for
nothing, which the entrepreneur gets for free. The working day of each
worker thus necessarily and normally consists of two parts: one paid, in
which the worker simply reimburses the value of his maintenance, in
which he works as it were for himself, and an unpaid part, in which he
performs free or surplus labor for the capitalist.

The situation was similar in earlier forms of social exploitation. In
the days of bondage, the labor of the serf for himself and his labor for
his master were even distinct in time and space. The peasant knew
exactly when and for how long he worked for himself, and when and for
how long he worked for the maintenance of his noble lord, whether
temporal or spiritual. He worked first for a few days on his own plot,
then for a few days on that of the lord, or else he worked in the
morning on his own plot and in the afternoon on that of the lord, or he
worked continuously for some weeks on the one and then for some weeks on
the other. In one particular village, for example, belonging to the
Maurusmünster Abbey in Alsace,²¹³ _corvée_ labor in the mid-twelfth
century was laid down as follows: from mid April to mid May, each
peasant household to provide three full days’ labor per week, from May
to Midsummer’s day one afternoon per week, from Midsummer’s day to
haymaking two days per week, then three afternoons per week until
harvest, and from Martinmas²¹⁴ to Christmas three full days per week. In
the later Middle Ages, to be sure, with advancing enserfment, work for
the lords increased steadily, so that almost every day in the week and
every week in the year was taken up by _corvée_, and the peasants had
scarcely any time left to cultivate their own fields. But in that era
they knew quite precisely that they were working not for themselves but
for someone else. Even the dumbest peasant could not possibly be
mistaken on this score.

With modern wage-labor, matters are quite different. The worker does not
produce in one part of his working day, as it were, objects that he
needs himself: his food, clothing, etc., then in another part of the day
other things for the entrepreneur. On the contrary, the worker in the
factory or workshop spends the whole day producing one and the same
object, which generally means an object that he needs only in very small
amounts, if at all, for his own private consumption: for example, steel
pens, or rubber bands, or silk cloth, or iron tubes. In the
indistinguishable heap of steel pens or rubber bands or cloth that he
has created in the course of the day, each piece looks just like any
other, to a hair, there is not the slightest difference according to
whether one part of this quantity is paid labor and the other part
unpaid, whether one part is for the worker and the other for the
entrepreneur. On the contrary, the product that the worker produces has
no utility at all for him, and not a tiny bit of it belongs to him;
everything that the worker produces belongs to the entrepreneur. Here we
see a major outward difference between wage-labor and serfdom. The
_corvée_ peasant, in normal conditions, necessarily had to have some
time on which to work on his own land, and the product of his labor
there belonged to him. With the modern wage-laborer, his whole product
belongs to the entrepreneur, and so it looks as if his work in the
factory has nothing at all to do with his maintenance. He has received
his wage and can do with it what he will. In return for the wage, he has
to work at what the entrepreneur tells him, and everything he produces
belongs to the entrepreneur. But the difference that is invisible to the
worker is clear enough in the entrepreneur’s accounts, when he
calculates his receipts from the production of his labor. For the
capitalist, this is the difference between the sum of money he receives
from the sale of the product, and his outlays both on means of
production and on his workers’ wages. What remains for him as profit is
precisely the value created by unpaid labor, i.e. the surplus value that
the workers have created. Each worker then produces, first of all his
own wage, and then a surplus value that the capitalist gets for free. If
he has woven eleven meters of silk cloth in eleven hours, then six
meters of this may contain the value of his wage, and five meters are
surplus value for the entrepreneur.

But the distinction between wage-labor and slave or _corvée_ labor has
still more important consequences. Both the slave and the _corvée_
peasant performed their labor principally for their own private need and
for the master’s consumption. They produced for their master objects of
food and clothing, furniture, luxury goods, etc. This was at all events
the norm, before slavery and serfdom degenerated under the influence of
trade, and were approaching their end. The ability of a person to
consume, however, i.e. luxury in private life, has definite limits in
each era. The antique slaveholder or the medieval noble could not
consume more than full barns, full stables, rich clothes, richly
appointed rooms, a sumptuous life for themselves and their household.
Objects like these, which they needed for everyday life, could not even
be stored in large quantities, as they would perish: grain easily
succumbs to rot or is eaten by rats and mice; stocks of hay and straw
readily catch fire, clothing is damaged, dairy products, fruit and
vegetables are very hard to preserve. Even with a sumptuous lifestyle,
therefore, consumption in both slave and _corvée_ economy had its
natural limits, and this also set limits to the normal exploitation of
the slaves and peasants. It is different with the modern entrepreneur,
who buys labor-power in order to produce commodities. What the worker
produces in the factory or workshop is generally quite useless for
himself, and equally useless for the entrepreneur. The latter does not
put the labor-power he purchases to work at producing food and clothing,
but has it produce commodities that he himself does not need. He only
has silk or metal tubes or coffins produced so as to get rid of them by
sale as quickly as possible. He has them produced in order to obtain
money by their sale. And he receives back his outlays, as well as the
surplus labor that his workers supply him with for free, in the money
form. It is to this end, to turn the workers’ unpaid labor into money,
that he conducts his whole business and buys labor-power. But money, as
we know, is the means for unlimited accumulation of wealth. In the money
form, wealth does not lose value by lengthy storage. On the contrary, as
we shall go on to see, wealth in the money form even seems to grow as a
result of storage. And in the money form, wealth know no limits at all,
it can grow endlessly. The hunger of the modern capitalist for surplus
labor accordingly knows no limits. The more unpaid labor can be pressed
out of the workers, the better. To extract surplus value, and extract it
without limit, is the particular purpose and task of the purchase of
labor-power.

The natural drive of the capitalist to expand the surplus value
extracted from the workers takes two simple paths, which present
themselves automatically, as it were, when we consider the composition
of the working day. We saw how the working day of every wage-laborer
normally consists of two parts: a part in which the worker receives back
his own wage, and a further part in which he supplies unpaid labor,
surplus value. In order to expand this second part as much as possible,
the entrepreneur can proceed along two routes: either extend the whole
working day, or shorten the first, paid part of the working day, i.e.
reduce the wage of the worker. In actual fact the capitalist uses both
methods at the same time, which gives the system of wage-labor a
constant dual tendency: to the extension of working time, and to the
reduction of wages.

If the capitalist buys the commodity labor-power, he does so as with any
other commodity, in order to derive utility from it. Every commodity
buyer seeks to get as much use as possible from his commodities. If we
buy boots, for example, we want to wear them for as long as possible.
The buyer of the commodity enjoys the full use and utility of the
commodity. The capitalist, accordingly, who has bought the commodity
labor-power, has the full right, from the standpoint of commodity
purchase, to demand that the purchased commodity serve him for as long
as possible and as much as possible. If he has paid for a week’s
labor-power, then the use of it belongs to him for a week, and in his
capacity as purchaser he has the right to have the worker labor up to
twenty-four hours for each of the seven days. The worker, on the other
hand, as seller of the commodity, has a completely opposed position.
While the capitalist does indeed have the use of his labor-power, this
meets its limits in the physical and mental capacity of the worker. A
horse cannot work for more than eight hours, day in, day out, without
being ruined. A human being, likewise, in order to restore the energy
spent in labor, needs a certain time for eating, clothing, rest, etc. If
he does not have this, then his labor-power is not simply used, but
destroyed. The worker is weakened by excessive labor and his life cut
short. If each week the capitalist shortens the life of the worker by
two weeks, by limitless consumption of his labor-power, this is the same
as if he were appropriating three weeks for the wage of one. From the
same standpoint of commodity exchange, this means that the capitalist is
robbing the worker. In relation to the working day, capitalist and
worker represent two diametrically opposed positions on the commodity
market, and the actual length of the working day is decided only by
struggle between the capitalist class and the working class, as a
_question of power_.^(CXIII) Inherently, therefore, the working day has
no definite limits; in different times and places we find working days
of eight, ten, twelve, fourteen, sixteen and eighteen hours. And as a
whole, the struggle over the length of the working day lasts for
centuries. We can distinguish two major phases in this struggle. The
first begins in the late Middle Ages, in the fourteenth century, when
capitalism took its first hesitant steps and began to shatter the firm
protective armor of the guild regime. The normal customary working time,
in the golden age of handicrafts, amounted perhaps to ten hours, with
meal times, sleep, recreation, rest on Sundays and feast days being
comfortably observed in all particulars. This was sufficient for
traditional handicraft with its slow methods of work, but it was not
sufficient for the early manufacturing enterprises. The first thing that
the capitalists required from governments, accordingly, was the
extension of working time. Between the fourteenth and the late
seventeenth centuries, we see in England, France and Germany specific
laws covering the _minimum working day_, i.e. bans on workers and
journeymen working less than a definite working time, which was
generally twelve hours per day. The great cry from the Middle Ages down
to the eighteenth century is the struggle against workers’ idleness. But
once the power of the old guild handicrafts was broken, and a massive
proletariat lacking any means of labor and forced to sell its
labor-power appeared, while on the other hand large factories with
feverish mass production arose, the page turned in the eighteenth
century. A sudden consumption of workers of every age and both sexes
began, with entire populations of workers being mown down in a few years
as if by plague. A British MP declared in Parliament in 1863: “The
cotton trade has existed for ninety years … It has existed for three
generations of the English race, and I believe I may safely say that
during that period it has destroyed nine generations of factory
operatives.”²¹⁵ And a bourgeois English writer, John Wade, wrote in his
book on the _History of the Middle and Working Classes_, “The cupidity
of mill-owners whose cruelties in the pursuit of gain have hardly been
exceeded by those perpetrated by the Spaniards in the conquest of
America in the pursuit of gold.”²¹⁶ In the 1860s in England, in certain
branches of industry such as stocking making, children of nine or ten
years old were occupied from two, three or four o’clock in the morning
until ten, eleven or twelve at night. In Germany, the conditions that
prevailed until recently, in mirror manufacture and in baking, for
example, are sufficiently well known. It was modern capitalist industry
that first succeeded in making the formerly quite unknown discovery of
nightwork. In all earlier social conditions, night was seen as a time
determined by nature itself for human rest.^(CXIV) The capitalist
enterprise discovered that surplus value extracted from the worker at
night was in no way different from that extracted by day, and introduced
day and night shifts. Sundays, which in the Middle Ages were most
strictly observed by the handicraft guilds, were sacrificed to the
capitalists’ hunger for surplus value, and equated with other working
days. On top of this were dozens of little inventions to extend working
time: taking meals on the job without a pause, cleaning machines after
the regular working day ends, i.e. during the workers’ rest time, and so
on. This practice of the capitalists, which prevailed quite freely and
unimpeded in the early decades, soon made necessary a series of new laws
about the working day—this time not to forcibly extend working hours,
but rather to curtail them. And the first legal restrictions on the
maximum working day were not forced by the pressure of workers, but by
capitalist society’s own instinct for self-preservation. The first few
decades of unrestricted operation of large-scale industry produced such
a devastating effect on the health and living conditions of the mass of
working people, with tremendous mortality, disease, physical crippling,
mental desperation, epidemic disease and unfitness for military service,
that the very survival of society seemed deeply threatened.^(CXV) It was
clear that if the natural drive of capital for surplus value were not
reined in by the state, whole states would sooner or later be turned
into giant cemeteries, in which only the bones of workers would be
visible. But without workers there is no exploitation of workers. In its
own interest, accordingly, in order to secure the future of
exploitation, capital had to set some limits to present exploitation.
The strength of the people had to be protected to a certain extent, in
order to secure their future exploitation. A transition was necessary
from an unviable economy of robbery to rational exploitation. This gave
rise to the first laws on the maximum working day, along with bourgeois
social reform in general. We can see a counterpart of this in the
hunting laws. Just as game are protected by law for a definite time, so
that they can multiply rationally and regularly as an object for
hunting, in the same way social reform ensures the labor-power of the
proletariat a certain time of protection, so that it can serve
rationally for exploitation by capital. Or, as Marx put it, the
restriction of factory work was dictated by the same necessity that
forces the landowner to spread fertilizer over the fields. Factory
legislation was born in a hard struggle of decades against the
resistance of individual capitalists, initially for children and women,
and in particular industries step by step. France then followed, where
the February revolution of 1848, under the initial pressure of the
victorious Paris proletariat, proclaimed the twelve-hour working day,
this being also the first general law on the working time of all
workers, including adult men in all branches of industry. In the United
States, a general movement of workers for the eight-hour day began
immediately after the Civil War of 1861[–65], which abolished
slavery,²¹⁷ a movement that then spread to Europe. In Russia, the first
protective legislation for women and minors arose from the great factory
disturbances of 1882 in the Moscow industrial zone,²¹⁸ and a working day
of eleven and a half hours for adult men was the result of the first
general strike of 60,000 textile workers in St Petersburg in 1896–97.²¹⁹
Germany is now limping behind all other major modern states, with
protective legislation only for women and children.

So far we have spoken only of one particular aspect of wage-labor,
working time, and here we already see how the simple commodity
transaction of buying and selling labor-power has many particular
features. But it is necessary here to recall Marx’s words:

It must be acknowledged that our worker emerges from the process of
production looking different from when he entered it. In the market, as
owner of the commodity “labor-power,” he stood face to face with other
owners of commodities, one owner against another owner. The contract by
which he sold his labor-power to the capitalist proved in black and
white, so to speak, that he was free to dispose of himself. But when the
transaction was concluded, it was discovered that he was no “_free
agent_,” that the period of time for which he _is free_ to sell his
labor-power is the period of time for which he _is forced_ to sell it,
that in fact the vampire will not let go “while there remains a single
muscle, sinew or drop of blood to be exploited.”²²⁰ For “protection”
against the serpent of their agonies,²²¹ the workers have to put their
heads together and, _as a class_, compel the passing of a law, an
all-powerful _social barrier_ by which they can be prevented from
selling themselves and their families into slavery and death _by
voluntary contract with capital_.²²²

Labor protection legislation is in fact the first official
acknowledgement by present-day society that the formal equality and
freedom on which commodity production and exchange is based already
breaks down, collapses into inequality and unfreedom, as soon as
labor-power appears on the market as a commodity.

_3_

The capitalists’ second method for expanding surplus value is the
reduction of wages. Like the working day, wages also have no definite
limits. Above all, if we speak of the wages of labor, we need to
distinguish between the money that the worker receives from the
entrepreneur, and the quantity of means of subsistence that he obtains
for this. If all we know about a worker’s wage is that he is paid, for
example, two marks per day, we effectively know nothing. For when prices
are high, the same two marks will buy much less in terms of means of
subsistence than when prices are low. In one country, the same two-mark
coin means a different standard of living than it does in another, and
the same applies to almost every region within a country. The worker may
even receive more money as his wage than previously, and at the same
time live not better but just as badly, or even worse. The real, actual
wage, therefore, is the sum of means of subsistence that the worker
obtains, whereas the money wage is only the nominal wage. If the wage is
then simply the monetary expression of the value of labor-power, this
value is actually represented by the amount of labor that is spent on
the worker’s necessary means of subsistence. But what are these
“necessary means of subsistence”? Aside from individual differences
between one worker and another, which play no role, the different
standard of living of the working class in different countries and at
different times already shows that the concept “necessary means of
subsistence” is very variable and flexible. The better-off English
worker of today considers his daily intake of beefsteak as necessary for
life, while the Chinese coolie lives on a handful of rice. In connection
with the flexibility of the concept “necessary means of subsistence,” a
similar struggle develops over the level of wages as it does over the
length of the working day. The capitalist, as buyer of commodities,
explains his position as follows: “Is it not quite completely correct
that I must pay its proper value for the commodity labor-power, just
like any honest purchaser? But what is the value of labor-power? The
necessary means of subsistence? Well, I give my worker exactly as much
as is necessary for his life; but as to what is absolutely necessary to
keep someone alive, this is a matter for science first of all, i.e. for
physiology, and secondly a matter of general experience. And it goes
without saying that I give exactly this minimum; for if I were to give a
penny more, I would not be an honest purchaser, but rather a fool, a
philanthropist, making a gift from my own pocket to the person from whom
he has bought a commodity. I don’t give my shoemaker or cigarette seller
a penny extra, but try to buy their commodities as cheaply as possible.
In the same way, I try to buy labor-power as cheaply as possible, and we
are completely on the level if I give my worker the barest minimum that
he needs to maintain his life.” The capitalist here is completely within
his rights, from the standpoint of commodity production. But the worker
is no less within his rights when he responds to the commodity
purchaser: “Of course I cannot claim more than the actual value of my
commodity, labor-power. But what I demand is that you really do pay me
its full value. I don’t want anything more than the necessary means of
subsistence. But what means of subsistence are necessary? You say that
the answer to this is supplied by the science of physiology and by
experience, and that these show what is the minimum a person needs in
order to maintain life. What you refer to here, by the concept of
‘necessary means of subsistence’ is therefore the absolutely,
_physiologically_ necessary. But this is against the law of commodity
exchange. For you know as well as I do that what decides the value of
every commodity on the market is the labor _socially_ necessary for its
production. If your shoemaker offers you a pair of boots and asks 20
marks for them, as he has spent four days working on them, you will
reply: ‘I can get boots like this from the factory for only 12 marks, as
they can be made in a day with machinery. Given that it is now usual to
produce boots by machine, your four days’ work was not necessary, from
the social point of view, even if it was necessary for _you_, as you
don’t work with machines. But I can’t help that, and will pay you only
for the socially necessary labor, i.e. 12 marks.’ If this is how you
proceed when purchasing boots, you must then pay the socially necessary
costs of maintaining my labor-power when you buy this. Socially
necessary to my labor, however, is everything that in our country and in
the present age is seen as the customary maintenance of a man of my
class. In a word, what you have to pay me is not the physiologically
necessary minimum that barely keeps me alive, as you would give an
animal, but rather the socially customary minimum that ensures my
habitual standard of living. Only then will you have paid the value of
the commodity as an honest purchaser, otherwise you are buying it below
its value.”

We see here how the worker is just as much in the right as the
capitalist, simply from the commodity standpoint. But it is only over
time that the worker can get this standpoint accepted—as a social class,
i.e. as a whole, as organization. Only with the rise of trade unions and
a workers’ party does the worker begin to sell his labor-power at its
value, i.e. to insist on maintaining his life as a social and cultural
necessity. Before the appearance of trade unions in a country, however,
and before their acceptance in each particular branch of industry, what
was decisive in determining wages was the tendency of the capitalist to
reduce the means of subsistence to the physiological minimum, the animal
minimum, i.e. to regularly pay for labor-power below its value. The time
of unrestrained rule of capital, still not meeting any resistance on the
part of workers’ coalitions and organization, led to the same barbaric
degradation of the working class in relation to wages as it did in
relation to working time before the introduction of factory legislation.
This is a crusade by capital against any trace of luxury, comfort and
convenience in the life of the worker, as he was accustomed to in the
earlier period of handicrafts and peasant economy. It is an attempt to
reduce the worker’s consumption to the simple bare act of supplying the
body with a minimum of fodder, in the way that cattle are fed or
machinery is oiled. In this connection, the lowest and least needy
workers are presented to the spoiled worker as model and example. This
crusade against the human maintenance of the workers began in
England—along with capitalist industry. An English writer complained in
the eighteenth century: “Simply consider the shocking quantity of
superfluities that our manufacturing workers consume, for example
brandy, gin, tea, sugar, foreign fruit, strong beer, pressed linen,
snuff and smoking tobacco, etc.”²²³ At that time the French, Dutch and
German workers were offered as a model of frugality to the English
workers. An English manufacturer wrote: “Labor is a whole third more
reasonable in France than in England; for the French poor”—this is how
they referred to the workers—“work hard and are sparing on food and
clothing, their main consumption being bread, vegetables, roots and
dried fish, for they very seldom eat meat, and very little bread when
wheat is dear.”²²⁴ Around the beginning of the nineteenth century, an
American, Count [Benjamin Thompson] Rumford, produced a special
“cookbook for workers” with recipes for cheaper food. One recipe from
this famous book, for example, which was accepted with great enthusiasm
by the bourgeoisie of several countries, went: “Five pounds of barley,
five pounds of maize, 30 pfennigs worth of herrings, 10 pfennigs of
salt, 10 pfennigs of vinegar, 20 pfennigs of pepper and vegetables—total
2.08 marks, provides a soup for sixty-four people, and with the average
price of grain, the cost of food can be reduced to no more than 3
pfennig per head.”²²⁵ Of the workers in the mines of South America,
whose daily work, perhaps the heaviest in the world, consists in
carrying on their shoulders a weight of ore of between 180 and 200 lbs.
from a depth of 450 feet, Justus Liebig relates that they live only on
bread and beans.²²⁶ They would prefer just bread as their nourishment,
but their masters, having found that they cannot work so hard on bread,
treat them like horses and force them to eat beans, as beans contribute
more to the building of bones than does bread. In France, the first
hunger revolt of the workers took place already in 1831—that of the silk
weavers in Lyon. But capital celebrated its greatest orgies in the
reduction of wages under the Second Empire, in the 1860s, when machine
industry proper took hold in France. The entrepreneurs fled from the
towns to the countryside, where they could find cheaper hands. And they
found women there who would work for one sou a day, about four
pfennigs.²²⁷ But this wonderful state of affairs did not last long, for
such a wage could not sustain even an animal existence. In Germany,
capital first introduced similar conditions in the textile industry,
where wages in the 1840s were driven down even below the physiological
minimum, leading to the hunger revolts of weavers in Silesia and
Bohemia. Today the animal minimum subsistence remains the rule for wages
where trade unions do not have their effect on the standard of
living—for agricultural workers in Germany, in dressmaking, and in the
various branches of domestic industry.

_4_^(CXVI)

In ratcheting up the burden of labor and pressing down the living
standard of working people to as near as possible an animal level, if
not sometimes indeed below this, modern capitalist exploitation is
similar to that of the slave and _corvée_ economies at the time of their
worst degeneration, i.e. when each entered its respective phase of
decay. But what capitalist commodity production is unique in having
brought forth, quite unknown in all earlier epochs, is the partial
non-employment and consequent non-consumption of working people as a
constant phenomenon, i.e. the so-called reserve army of labor.
Capitalist production depends on the market and must follow its demand.
This however changes continuously and alternately generates so-called
good and bad years, seasons and months of business. Capital must
continuously adapt to the changing conjuncture, and accordingly employ
either more or fewer workers. It must, accordingly, in order to have to
hand at any time the labor-power needed for even the highest market
demand, constantly keep available in reserve, on top of the workers
actually employed, a considerable number of unemployed. These workers,
not being employed, receive no wage, their labor-power is not bought, it
simply remains in store; the non-consumption of a section of the working
class is thus an essential component of capitalist production’s law of
wages. How these unemployed live their life is no concern of capital,
yet capital rebuffs any attempt to abolish the reserve army as a danger
to its own vital interests. A striking example of this was offered by
the English cotton crisis of 1863. When the spinning and weaving mills
of England suddenly had to break off production for want of American raw
cotton, and close to a million of the working population were workless,
a number of these unemployed decided to emigrate to Australia in order
to escape the threat of starvation. They asked the English Parliament to
grant £2 million to facilitate the emigration of 50,000 unemployed
workers. The cotton manufacturers, however, raised a storm of
indignation against this suggestion from the workers. Industry could not
do without machines, and like machines, the workers had to remain
available. “The country” would suffer a loss of £4 million if the
starving unemployed suddenly disappeared. Parliament accordingly refused
the emigration fund, and the unemployed remained chained to the
breadline so as to form the necessary reserve for capital. A still more
dramatic example was offered by the French capitalists in 1871. After
the defeat of the [Paris] Commune, when the butchery of the Paris
workers, in both legal and extra-legal forms, was pursued to such an
enormous degree that tens of thousands of proletarians, including the
best and most capable, the elite of the working class, were murdered,²²⁸
the satisfied sense of revenge on the part of the entrepreneurs was
punctuated by an unease that a shortage of reserve “hands” might soon be
painfully felt; it was precisely at this time, after the end of the war,
that industry was experiencing a vigorous upswing. Several Paris
entrepreneurs accordingly applied to the courts to have the persecution
of Commune fighters moderated and thus save workers from military
butchers for the arm o f capital.

For capital, however, the reserve army has a dual function: first, to
supply labor-power for every sudden upswing in business, and second, to
exert a constant pressure on the active workforce by competition from
the unemployed, and so reduce their wages to a minimum.

Marx distinguished four different strata in the reserve army, with
differing functions for capital and its conditions of existence. The
topmost stratum is the periodically inactive industrial workers, who are
present in all trades, even the best-situated ones. Their members
constantly change, as every worker is unemployed at certain times and
active in others; their numbers also fluctuate sharply with the course
of business, becoming very high in times of crisis and low at the peak
of the cycle; but they never disappear, and generally increase with the
progress of industrial development. The second stratum are the unskilled
proletarians who flood into the towns from the country, who appear on
the labor market with the lowest demands, and as simple workers are not
tied to any definite branch of industry, but are ready for employment in
any branch as a reservoir. The third category is the lower order of
proletarians, who have no regular employment and are constantly looking
for one kind of casual labor or another. Here we find the longest
working time and the lowest wages, and for this reason this stratum is
quite as useful for capital, and as directly indispensable, as the
former categories. This stratum is constantly recruited from the surplus
numbers in industry and agriculture, but particularly from small-scale
artisans who go under and from dying trades. It forms the broad basis
for domestic industry, and acts as it were behind the scenes, behind the
official showground of industry. And here it not only has no tendency to
disappear, but actually grows both by the increasing effects of industry
in town and country, and by the greatest production of children.

Finally, the fourth stratum of the proletarian reserve army are the
direct paupers, the recognized poor, some of them capable of work, who
in times when industry and trade are good are to a certain extent taken
on, being then the first to be dismissed in times of crisis; others are
incapable of work: older workers whom industry can no longer use,
proletarian widows, orphans and pauper children, crippled and mutilated
victims of large-scale industry, mining, etc., and finally those
unaccustomed to work: vagabonds and the like. This stratum merges
directly with the lumpenproletariat:²²⁹ criminals and prostitutes.
Pauperism, Marx said, is the disability home for the working class and
the dead weight of its reserve army. Its existence follows just as
necessarily and unavoidably from the reserve army as the reserve army
does from the development of industry. Poverty and the lumpenproletariat
are part of the conditions of existence of capitalism and grow together
with it; the greater is social wealth, functioning capital, and the mass
of workers employed by it, the greater too is the available stratum of
unemployed, the reserve army; and the greater the reserve army in
relation to the mass of employed workers, the greater is the lowest
stratum of poverty, pauperism and crime. The number of unemployed and
unwaged thus grows unavoidably along with capital and wealth, and so
does the beggared stratum of the working class—official poverty. “_This
is the absolute general law of capitalist accumulation_,” wrote Marx.²³⁰

The formation of a constant and growing stratum of unemployed was, as we
said, unknown in all earlier forms of society. In the primitive
communist community, it goes without saying that everyone works to the
extent that is necessary to maintain their life, partly from immediate
need, and partly under the pressure of the moral and legal authority of
the tribe, the community. But _all_ members of society are also provided
with the available means to live. The standard of living of the
primitive communist group is certainly quite low and simple, the
conveniences of life are primitive. But to the extent that the means for
life do exist, they are present equally for all, and poverty in the
present-day sense, deprivation of the existing social resources, is at
this time quite unknown. The primitive tribe sometimes goes hungry—even
often, if it suffers from unfavorable natural conditions—but its lack is
then the lack of society as such, whereas lack on the part of some
members of society at the same time as a surplus is available for
others, is something unthinkable; to the extent that the society’s means
of subsistence are ensured on the whole, so is the existence of each
individual.

In Oriental and antique slavery we see the same thing. No matter how the
Egyptian state slave or the Greek private slave was exploited and
overworked, no matter how great the distance between his bare
maintenance and the excess of the master might have been, his
maintenance was at least ensured for him by the slave relationship.
Slaves were not allowed to die of hunger, any more than a horse or a cow
is today. It was the same with the _corvée_ relationship of the Middle
Ages: the chaining of the peasantry to the soil, and the solid
construction of the whole feudal system of dependence, in which everyone
had to be lord over others, or the servant of a lord, or both at
once—this system ascribed everyone a definite place. No matter how bad
the squeezing of the serfs might be, no lord had the right to drive them
from the soil, i.e. rob them of their means of subsistence; on the
contrary, the serf relationship obliged the lord in cases of distress,
such as fire, flood, hail, etc., to support the impoverished peasants.
It was only when the Middle Ages came to an end, with the collapse of
feudalism and the entry of modern capital, that expropriation of peasant
land got under way. In the Middle Ages, however, the existence of the
great mass of working people was fully secured. To some extent, already
at this time, a small contingent of paupers and beggars emerged as a
result of the countless wars or of individual loss. But it was a duty of
society to maintain these poor. Emperor Charlemagne already laid down
expressly in his capitularies, “As for the beggars who wander around the
countryside, we desire that each of our vassals should feed the poor,
whether on the estate enfeoffed²³¹ to him or within his house, and he
should not allow them to go and beg elsewhere.” Later, it was a special
vocation of monasteries to lodge the poor, and to provide them with work
if they were capable of this. In the Middle Ages, therefore, any needy
person was sure of reception in any house, the feeding of those without
means was seen as a simple duty, and was in no way linked with the
stigma of contempt faced by a beggar today.

Past history knows only one case where a large stratum of the population
was left unoccupied and workless. This is the already mentioned case of
the ancient Roman peasantry, who were driven off the land and
transformed into a proletariat, with no work to do. This
proletarianization of the peasantry was of course a logical and
necessary consequence of the development of great latifundia, along with
the spread of the slave economy. But it was in no way necessary for the
existence of the slave economy and large landed property. On the
contrary, the unemployed Roman proletariat was simply a misfortune, a
pure burden on society, and this society tried all available means to
control the proletariat and its poverty, by periodic distributions of
land, by distribution of foodstuffs, by organizing an immense food
import and by subsidizing the price of grain. In the end, this great
proletariat in ancient Rome was simply maintained by the state.

Capitalist commodity production, accordingly, is the first economic form
in the history of humanity in which the lack of occupation and resources
of a large and growing stratum of the population, and the direct and
hopeless poverty of another stratum, is not simply a result of this
economy but also a necessity for it, a condition of its existence.
Insecurity of existence for the entire working mass, and chronic lack,
in part direct poverty, of broad strata, are for the first time a normal
social phenomenon. And the scholars of the bourgeoisie, who cannot
imagine any other form of society than today’s, are so imbued with the
natural necessity of this stratum of unemployed and workless that they
explain it as a natural law intended by God. The Englishman Malthus, at
the beginning of the nineteenth century, constructed on this basis his
celebrated theory of overpopulation, according to which poverty develops
because humanity has the evil habit of multiplying children more quickly
than means of subsistence.

As we have seen, however, it is nothing else than the simple effect of
commodity production and exchange that led to these results. The law of
commodities, which rests formally on complete equality and freedom,
produces by iron necessity, without any intervention of statute or
force, a glaring social inequality such as was unknown in all earlier
conditions based on the direct rule of one person over another. For the
first time now, direct hunger becomes a scourge inflicted daily on the
life of the working masses. And this is also explained as a law of
nature. The Anglican parson [Joseph] Townsend wrote as far back as 1786:

It seems to be a law of Nature that the poor should be to a certain
degree improvident, that there may always be some to fulfill the most
servile, the most sordid, and the most ignoble offices in the community.
The stock of human happiness is thereby much increased, whilst the more
delicate are not only relieved from drudgery … but are left at liberty
without interruption to pursue those callings which are suited to their
various dispositions … [The Poor Law] tends to destroy the harmony and
beauty, the symmetry and order of that system which God and Nature have
established in the world.²³²

The “more delicate,” who live at the cost of others, had already seen
the finger of God and a law of nature in every social form that secured
them the joys of the exploiting life. Even the great minds of the past
did not escape this historical deception. Two thousand years before the
English parson, the great Greek thinker Aristotle wrote:

It is nature itself that has created slavery. Animals are divided into
males and females. The male is a more perfect animal, and rules; the
female is less perfect, and obeys. Similarly there are in the human race
individuals that stand as much below others as the body stands below the
soul or the animal below man; these are creatures that are fit only for
physical work and are unfit to produce anything more perfect. These
individuals are destined by nature for slavery, since there is nothing
better for them than to obey others … Does there exist so great a
difference between the slave and the animal? Their works are similar,
they are useful to us only by way of their body. We conclude from these
principles, therefore, that nature has created certain men for freedom
and others for slavery, and that it is accordingly useful and right that
there should be slaves.²³³

“Nature,” which is made responsible for every form of exploitation, must
at all events have acquired a rather jaded taste over time. For even if
it might still be worthwhile to demean a large mass of people with the
shame of slavery, in order to raise a free people of philosophers and
geniuses like Aristotle on their backs, the demeaning of millions of
proletarians today to support vulgar factory-owners and fat parsons is a
less attractive goal.

_5_

We have examined up till now what standard of living the capitalist
commodity economy provides for the working class and its various strata.
But we still know nothing precise as to the relationship between this
living standard of the workers and social wealth in general. The workers
may in one case, for example, have more means of subsistence, more
nourishing food and better clothing than before, but if the wealth of
the other classes has grown still more rapidly, then the _share_ of the
workers in the social product has grown smaller. The living standard of
the workers in itself, in absolute terms, may thus rise, while their
share relative to other classes falls. The living standard of each
individual and each class, however, can only be correctly judged if the
conditions of the particular time and the other strata of the same
society are taken into account. The prince of a primitive, half-savage
or barbaric African tribe has a lower standard of living, i.e. a simpler
dwelling, poorer clothing, cruder food, than an average factory worker
in Germany. But this prince lives in a “princely” fashion in comparison
with the means and demands of his tribe, whereas the factory worker in
Germany lives very poorly, compared with the luxury of the rich
bourgeoisie and the needs of the present day. In order therefore to
judge correctly the position of the workers in the present society, it
is necessary not only to examine absolute wages, but also relative
wages, i.e. the share that the worker’s wage makes up out of the total
product of his labor.²³⁴ We assumed in our earlier example that the
worker had to work the first six hours out of an eleven-hour working day
in order to cover his wage, i.e. his means of subsistence, and then
spend five hours creating surplus value for the capitalist for free. We
assumed in this example, therefore, that the production of means of
subsistence for the worker cost six hours’ labor. We also saw how the
capitalist seeks by all means to press down the living standard of the
worker, to expand to the maximum the unpaid labor, surplus value. But
let us assume that the worker’s living standard does not change, i.e.
that he is still in the position to obtain the same quantities of food,
clothing, linen, furniture, etc. We assume, therefore, that there is no
reduction in wages in absolute terms. If however the production of all
these means of subsistence becomes cheaper, as a result of advances in
production, and requires therefore less time, then the worker will spend
a shorter time covering his wage. Let us assume that the quantity of
food, clothing, furniture, etc. that the worker needs per day no longer
demands six hours’ labor but only five. Then the worker will not spend
six hours out of his eleven-hour day replacing his wage, but only five
hours, and he will have six hours remaining for unpaid labor, for the
creation of surplus value for the capitalist. The share of the worker in
his produce has been reduced by one-sixth, while the share of the
capitalist has grown by one-fifth. There has however been no reduction
in the absolute wage. It may even come about that the living standard of
the workers is increased, i.e. that absolute wages rise, let us say by
10 percent, and indeed not just in money terms, but also the actual
means of subsistence of the workers. But if the productivity of labor
has risen in the same time by some 15 percent, then the share of the
workers in the product, i.e. their relative wage, has actually fallen,
despite the rise in absolute wages. The share of the worker in the
product thus depends on the productivity of labor. The less labor it
takes to produce his means of subsistence, the smaller his relative
wage. If the shirts that he wears, his boots and his caps, are produced
with less labor than before, due to advances in manufacture, then he may
obtain with his wage the same quantity of shirts, boots and caps with
his wage, but at the same time he now receives a smaller share of the
social wealth, the total social product. The daily consumption of the
worker, however, is made up of the same quantities of all the different
products and raw materials. Not only do [advances in] shirt manufacture
cheapen the worker’s maintenance, but likewise in the cotton manufacture
that supplies material for his shirts, the machine industry that
supplies sewing machines, and the yarn industry that supplies yarn.
Similarly, the worker’s provisions are made cheaper not only by advances
in baking, but also by American agriculture that supplies grain on a
massive scale, by advances in railways and steam shipping that bring
this American grain to Europe, and so on. Every advance in industry,
every increase in the productivity of human labor, makes the maintenance
of the workers cost ever less labor. The worker need therefore spend an
ever smaller part of his working day on replacing his wage, and the part
in which he creates unpaid labor, surplus value for the capitalist,
becomes every greater.

But the constant and ceaseless progress of technology is a necessity for
capitalism, a condition of its very existence. Competition between
individual entrepreneurs forces each of them to produce their product as
cheaply as possible, i.e. with the greatest possible saving on human
labor. And if any one capitalist introduces a new and improved process
into his own factory, this competition forces all other entrepreneurs in
the same branch of production to improve their technology in the same
way, so as not to be driven from the field, i.e. the commodity market.
The visible outward form of this is the general introduction of machine
power in place of manual, and the ever more rapid introduction of new
and improved machines in place of old. Technical inventions in all areas
of production have become a daily occurrence. The technical
transformation of all industry, not only in production itself but also
in means of communication, is an incessant phenomenon, a vital law of
capitalist commodity production. And every advance in labor productivity
is expressed in a reduction in the amount of labor needed to maintain
the worker. In other words, capitalist production cannot take a single
step forward without reducing the share of the workers in the social
product. With each new technological invention, each improvement of
machinery, each new application of steam and electricity to production
and communications, the share of the worker in the product grows smaller
and the share of the capitalist larger. Relative wages steadily fall
lower and lower, without pause or interruption, while surplus value,
i.e. the unpaid wealth of the capitalists squeezed out of the worker,
grows just as steadily and constantly higher and higher.

We see here again a striking difference between capitalist commodity
production and all earlier forms of society. In the primitive communist
society, as we know, the product is distributed equally, directly after
production, to everyone who works, i.e. to all members of society, as
there is practically no one who does not work. Feudal relations are
governed not by equality but by the exploitation of workers by
non-workers. But it is not the share of the worker, i.e. the _corvée_
peasant, that is determined by the fruit of his labor, rather the share
of the exploiter, the feudal lord, that is fixed in terms of the
definite dues and fees that he receives from the peasant. What remains
over in working time and product is the share of the peasant, so that in
normal conditions, before the extreme degeneration of serfdom, he has to
a large extent the possibility of increasing his own share by exerting
more labor-power. Of course, this share of the peasant was steadily
reduced by the growing demands of the nobles and clergy for services and
fees, over the course of the Middle Ages. But it was always definite,
visible norms laid down by men, no matter how arbitrarily they were
established, that determined the respective shares of the product of the
_corvée_ peasant and his feudal leech. For this reason, the medieval
_corvée_ peasant or serf could perceive and feel exactly when greater
burdens were imposed on him and his own share was stinted. It was
possible therefore to struggle against the reduction of this share, and
such struggle broke out, when external conditions made this possible, as
an open struggle of the exploited peasant against the curtailing of his
share in the product of his labor. In certain conditions, this struggle
was actually successful: the freedom of the urban burghers precisely
arose by the way that the former bonded artisans gradually shook off the
various _corvées—Kurmeden, Besthaupt, Gewandrecht_,²³⁵ and the thousand
other ways of bleeding of the feudal age—one after another, until they
conquered the rest—political freedom²³⁶—by open struggle.

In the wage system there are no legal or customary determinations of the
share of the worker in his product, not even arbitrary and forcible
ones. This share is determined by the degree of productivity of labor at
the time, by the level of technology; it is not the caprice of the
exploiter but the progress of technology that steadily and relentlessly
reduces the share of the worker. It is then a completely invisible
power, a simple mechanical effect of competition and commodity
production, that seizes from the worker an ever greater portion of his
product and leaves him an ever smaller one, a power that has its effects
silently and unnoticeably behind the back of the workers, and against
which no struggle is therefore possible. The personal role of the
exploiter is still visible, whenever it is a question of the absolute
wage, i.e. the actual standard of living. A reduction in wages that
brings about a suppression of the actual living standard of the workers
is a visible attack by the capitalists on the workers, and it is
generally countered by immediate struggle when trade unions exist, in
favorable cases even successfully. The fall in relative wages, in
contrast to this, seemingly occurs without the least personal
participation of the capitalist, and within the wage system, i.e. on the
basis of commodity production, the workers have no possibility of
struggle and defence against it. Workers cannot struggle against
technical advances in production, against inventions, the introduction
of machinery, against steam and electricity, against improvements in
means of communication. The effect of all these advances on the relative
wage of the workers thus follows quite mechanically from commodity
production and the commodity character of labor-power. This is why even
the most powerful trade unions are quite impotent against this tendency
to a rapid fall in relative wages. The struggle against the fall in
relative wages accordingly means also a struggle against the commodity
character of labor-power, i.e. against capitalist production as a whole.
The struggle against a decline in relative wages is thus no longer a
struggle on the basis of the commodity economy, but rather a
revolutionary, subversive initiative against the existence of this
economy, it is the socialist movement of the proletariat.²³⁷

This explains the sympathies of the capitalist class for trade unions,
which they originally fought furiously against, once the socialist
struggle has begun—at least in so far as trade unions allow themselves
be opposed to socialism. In France, all struggles of the workers to
obtain the right of combination were in vain until the 1870s, and trade
unions pursued with draconian penalties. Soon after, however, once the
Commune uprising had put the whole bourgeoisie into a mad fear of the
red specter, a sudden sharp transformation in public opinion began. The
personal organ of President [Léon] Gambetta, _La République française_,
and the whole ruling party of “satisfied republicans,” began to praise
the trade-union movement, even to propagate it eagerly. In the early
nineteenth century, the restrained German workers were pointed out to
the English workers as a model, whereas today it is the English worker,
and not even the restrained ones but the “covetous” beefsteak-eating
trade unionist, who is recommended to the German worker as a model to
follow. So true is it that the bourgeoisie finds even the most bitter
struggle to increase the absolute wage of the workers a harmless
triviality compared with an attack on what is most sacred to it—the
mechanical law of capitalism to constantly suppress the relative wage.

_6_

Only if we bring together all the results of the wage relationship
presented above, can we understand the capitalist law of wages that
governs the material condition of life of the worker. What is most
important is to distinguish absolute from relative wages. The absolute
wage, for its part, appears in a double guise: first as a sum of money,
i.e. the nominal wage, and second as a sum of means of subsistence that
the worker can buy for this money, i.e. the real wage. The worker’s
monetary wage may remain constant or even rise, while his living
standard, i.e. the real wage, falls at the same time. The real wage has
the constant tendency to fall to the absolute minimum, the minimum of
physical existence, in other words there is a constant tendency on the
part of capital to pay for labor-power _below_ its value. Only workers’
organization provides a counterweight to this tendency of capital. The
main function of the trade unions is that, by increasing the needs of
the workers, by elevating their habits, they create in place of the
physical minimum existence a cultural social minimum, below which wages
cannot be reduced without immediately provoking a collective struggle in
defense.²³⁸ The great economic significance of Social Democracy, too, is
particularly that by stirring the broad masses of workers intellectually
and politically, it raises their cultural level and with it their
economic needs. When such things as subscribing to a newspaper or buying
pamphlets become part of a worker’s everyday habits, his economic
maintenance rises, and correspondingly so do wages. The effect of Social
Democracy in this respect is a double one, if the trade unions of the
country in question maintain an open alliance with Social Democracy,
since opposition to Social Democracy drives even bourgeois strata to
found competing unions, which in their turn carry the educational effect
of organization and the rise in cultural level to broader strata of the
proletariat. We see, therefore, how in Germany, besides the free trade
unions that are allied with Social Democracy, a number of Christian,
Catholic and secular trade-union associations are also active. The
situation is similar in France, where so-called yellow trade unions were
founded to combat the socialist unions, while in Russia the most violent
outbreaks of the present revolutionary mass strike²³⁹ began with the
“yellow” unions²⁴⁰ quiescent towards the government. In England,
however, where the trade unions keep their distance from socialism, the
bourgeoisie do not bother to spread the idea of combination in
proletarian milieus.

The trade union thus plays an indispensable organic role in the modern
wage system. It is only through the union that labor-power as a
commodity is placed in a position where it can be sold at its value. The
capitalist law of value, in relation to labor-power, is not abolished by
the trade unions, as [Ferdinand] Lassalle misguidedly assumed; on the
contrary, it is only by their action that it is realized.²⁴¹ The
systematic giveaway price at which the capitalist seeks to buy
labor-power is increasingly replaced by a more or less real price thanks
to union action.

This function of theirs, however, is performed by the trade unions in
the context of the pressure of the mechanical laws of capitalist
production, first of all the constant reserve army of inactive workers,
and second, the constant fluctuations of the trade cycle up and down.
Both laws impose limits to the effect of trade unions that cannot be
overcome. The constant change in the industrial trade cycle forces the
unions, with every decline, to defend existing achievements from new
attacks by capital, and with every upswing, once again to raise the
level of wages that had been reduced back up to the level corresponding
to the new situation. In this way, the unions are always placed on the
defensive. The industrial reserve army of unemployed, however, puts what
could be called spatial limits on the effect of the unions: only the
upper stratum of the most well-situated workers are accessible to their
organization and effects, those for whom unemployment is only periodic,
“abnormal” as Marx put it. The lowest stratum of unskilled rural
proletarians, on the other hand, constantly flooding into the town from
the countryside, as well as from the various semi-rural irregular trades
such as brickmaking and digging, are by the very spatial and temporal
conditions of their occupation, as well as by their social milieu, less
amenable to trade-union organization. Finally, the broad lower stratum
of the reserve army: the unemployed with irregular occupation, domestic
industry, as well as the sporadically employed poor, fall completely
outside all organization. In general, the greater the need and pressure
in a stratum of the proletariat, the less the possibility of trade-union
influence. Trade-union action, accordingly, is very weak in the depths
of the proletariat, while it is strong in the breadth—i.e. even if
unions cover only a part of the topmost stratum of the proletariat,
their influence extends to the whole stratum, as their achievements
benefit the whole mass of workers employed in the trades in question.
Trade-union action, in fact, leads to a stronger differentiation within
the proletariat as a whole, by raising out of misery the upper advance
detachment of industrial workers, those capable of organization,
bringing them together and consolidating them. The gulf between the
upper stratum of the working class and the lower strata thereby becomes
that much greater. In no country is it as great as in England, where the
additional cultural effect of Social Democracy on the lower strata,
those less capable of organization, is absent, in contrast to the
situation in Germany.

It is quite wrong in depicting capitalist wage relationships to focus
only on the wages actually paid to industrial workers in employment, a
habit of the bourgeoisie and its paid writers that has unfortunately
been generally adopted even by the workers themselves. The entire
reserve army of unemployed, from the occasionally unemployed skilled
workers down to the deepest poverty and official pauperism, is a
necessary factor in determining the wage relationships. The lowest
strata of the needy and excluded who are employed only to a small extent
or not at all, are not as it were a scum that does not form part of
“official society,” as the bourgeoisie very understandably present them,
but are connected with the topmost, best-situated stratum of industrial
workers by a whole series of intermediate steps. This inner connection
is shown numerically by the sudden growth in the lower strata of the
reserve army that occurs every time that business is bad, and the
corresponding contraction at the peak of the business cycle, as well as
by the relative decline in the number of those who resort to public
assistance with the development of the class struggle and the related
rise in self-consciousness of the mass of proletarians. And finally,
every industrial worker who is crippled at work or has the misfortune of
being sixty years old, has a fifty-fifty chance of falling into the
lower stratum of bitter poverty, the “beggary stratum” of the
proletariat. The living conditions of the lowest strata of the
proletariat thus follow the same laws of capitalist production, pulled
up and down, and the proletariat, along with the broad stratum of rural
workers, the army of unemployed, and all strata from the very top to the
very bottom, forms an organic whole, a social class, whose varying
graduations of need and oppression can only be correctly grasped by the
capitalist law of wages as a whole. Finally, however, no more than half
of the law of wages is grasped if just the movement in absolute wages is
taken into account. Only the law of automatic decline in relative wages
that follows from the increase in labor productivity displays the
capitalist law of wages in its full scope.

The observation that workers’ wages have the tendency on average to
stand at the minimum necessary means of subsistence, was made already in
the eighteenth century by the French and English founders of bourgeois
political economy. But they explained the mechanism by which this
minimum wage was governed in a peculiar manner, i.e. by fluctuations in
the supply of hands seeking work. If the workers obtain higher wages
than are absolutely necessary for life, these learned men declared, then
they marry more and bring more children into the world. In this way, the
labor market becomes so overfilled again that it far surpasses the
demands of capital. Capital then presses wages sharply down, taking
advantage of the great competition among workers. But if wages do not
suffice for the necessary maintenance of life, then workers die off on a
massive scale, and their ranks are thinned out until only so many remain
as capital has a need for, with the result that wages again rise. By
this pendulum between excessive proliferation and excessive mortality in
the working class, wages are always brought back again to the minimum
means of subsistence. This theory, which prevailed in political economy
until the 1860s, was taken over by Lassalle, who called it a “merciless
iron law”²⁴² …

The weaknesses of this theory are quite evident today, with the full
development of capitalist production. Large-scale industry, with its
feverish pace of business and competition, cannot wait to reduce wages
until workers first marry too often, then have too many children, then
until these children grow up and appear on the labor market, before it
finds the over-supply it desires. The movement of wages, corresponding
to the rhythm of industry, does not have the comfortable motion of a
pendulum whose swing takes a generation, i.e. twenty-five years; wages
are rather in a ceaseless vibrating motion, so that neither can the
procreation of the working class govern the level of wages, nor can
industry with its demand for the procreation of workers. Secondly, the
industrial labor market is generally determined in its extent not by the
natural procreation of the workers, but rather by the constant influx of
freshly proletarianized strata from the countryside, from handicrafts
and small-scale industry, as well as that of the workers’ own wives and
children. The over-supply of the labor market, in the form of the
reserve army, is a constant phenomenon of modern industry and a
condition of its existence. So it is not a change in the supply of
labor-power, not the movement of the working class that is decisive for
the level of wages, but rather change in the demand from capital, _its_
movement. A surplus of the commodity labor-power always exists in
reserve, and its payment is better or worse according to whether capital
moves to strongly absorb labor-power at the peak of the business cycle
or to expel it again on a massive scale in the commotion of economic
crisis.

The mechanism of the law of wages is thus quite different from how it
was assumed by bourgeois political economy, and also by Lassalle. The
result, however, i.e. the pattern of wage relations that actually arises
from this, is still worse than it was according to that old assumption.
The capitalist law of wages is certainly not an “iron” law, but it is
still more relentless and terrible, being an “elastic” law that seeks to
press the wages of employed workers down to the minimum in terms of
means of subsistence, by simultaneously keeping a whole large stratum of
unemployed squirming on a thin elastic tightrope between existence and
non-existence.

The positing of the “iron law of wages” with its provocative
revolutionary character was possible only at the beginnings of political
economy, in its youthful years. From the moment that Lassalle made this
law the axis of his political agitation in Germany, the lackeys of
bourgeois political economy hastened to conjure away the iron law of
wages, condemning it as a false and erroneous doctrine. A whole pack of
regular paid agents of the manufacturers, such as [Léon] Faucher,
[Hermann] Schulze von Delitzsch and Max Wirth, launched a crusade
against Lassalle and the iron law of wages, in which connection they
recklessly smeared their own predecessors: Adam Smith, Ricardo, and the
other great creators of bourgeois political economy. Once Marx had shown
the elastic character of the capitalist law of wages, under the effect
of the industrial reserve army, in 1867,²⁴³ bourgeois political economy
finally went silent. Today, the official professorial science of the
bourgeoisie has no law of wages at all, preferring to avoid this tricky
subject and simply advance incoherent babbling about the lamentable
character of unemployment and the usefulness of moderate and modest
trade unions.

We have the same comedy in relation to the other major question of
political economy, i.e. how is capitalist profit created, where does it
come from? Just as on the subject of the share of the worker in the
wealth of society, so on that of the capitalist, too, the first
scientific answer was given already by the founders of political economy
in the eighteenth century. This theory was given its clearest form by
David Ricardo, who clearly and logically explained the profit of the
capitalist as the unpaid labor of the proletariat.

_7_

In our consideration of the law of value, we started with the purchase
and sale of the commodity labor-power. This already requires, however, a
proletarian wage-worker without means of production, and a capitalist
who possesses these on a sufficient scale to found a modern enterprise.
How did these emerge on the commodity market? In our earlier
presentation, we had only commodity producers in view, i.e. people with
their own means of production, who themselves produce commodities for
sale. How could capital on the one hand, and a complete lack of means on
the other, arise on the basis of the exchange of equal commodity values?
We have now seen that the purchase of the commodity labor-power, even at
its full value, leads, when this commodity is put to use, to the
formation of unpaid labor or surplus value, i.e. of capital. The
formation of capital and inequality thus becomes clear, once we consider
wage-labor and its effects. But this means that capital and proletarians
must already be in existence! The question therefore is, how and from
what did the first proletarians and the first capitalists arises, how
was the first leap made from simple commodity production to capitalist
production? In other words, how did the transition take place from
small-scale medieval handicrafts to modern capitalism?

As to the rise of the first modern proletariat, the answer is given by
the history of the dissolution of feudalism. In order for a worker to
appear on the market, he had to have obtained personal freedom. The
first precondition for this was therefore emancipation from serfdom and
forced labor. But he also had to have lost all means of production. This
was brought about by the massive “enclosure,” through which the
landholding nobility formed their present estates at the dawn of the
modern age. Peasants by the thousands were driven from the land they had
possessed for centuries, and communal peasant lands taken over by the
lords. The English nobility, for example, did this when the expansion of
trade in the Middle Ages, and the blossoming of wool manufacture in
Flanders, made the raising of sheep for the wool industry a profitable
business. In order to transform fields into sheep-walks, the peasants
were simply driven off the land. These “enclosures” in England lasted
from the fifteenth century through to the nineteenth. In the years
1814–20, for example, on the estates of the Duchess of Sutherland, no
less than 15,000 inhabitants were evicted, their villages burned down
and their fields converted into meadows, on which 131,000 sheep were
kept instead of peasants.²⁴⁴ In Germany, a notion of how this violent
manufacture of “free” proletarians out of banished peasants was
accomplished by the Prussian nobility, is given by [Wilhelm] Wolff’s
pamphlet _Die schlesische Millliarde_ [The Silesian Billion].²⁴⁵ These
peasants, deprived of their existence, had nothing left but the freedom
either to starve or to sell themselves, free as they were, for a hunger
wage.²⁴⁶


VII. THE TENDENCIES OF THE CAPITALIST ECONOMY

_1_

We have seen how commodity production arose in the wake of the
step-by-step dissolution of all forms of society with a definite planned
organization of production—the primitive communist society, the slave
economy, the medieval _corvée_ economy. We have also seen how the
present-day capitalist economy emerged out of simple commodity economy,
urban artisanal production, quite mechanically at the end of the Middle
Ages, i.e. without human will and consciousness. We initially posed the
question: _how is the capitalist economy possible?_ This is indeed the
fundamental question of political economy as a science. And this science
supplies us with an adequate answer. It shows how the capitalist
economy, which in view of its total lack of planning, its lack of any
conscious organization, is at first sight something impossible, an
inextricable puzzle, can nevertheless exist and function at a whole.
This happens:

By commodity exchange and the money economy, whereby all individual
producers, and the most remote regions of the earth, are economically
linked together, and a division of labor accomplished that spans the
world;

By free competition, which ensures technological progress and at the
same time constantly transforms small producers into wage workers,
whereby capital is supplied with purchasable labor-power;

By the capitalist law of value, which on the one hand automatically
takes care that wage workers never rise up from the proletarian state
and escape labor under the command of capital, while on the other hand
making possible an ever greater accumulation of unpaid labor into
capital, and thereby ever greater concentration and extension of means
of production;

By the industrial reserve army, which provides capitalist production
with a capacity for extension and adaptation to the needs of society;

By equalization of the rate of profit, which governs the constant
movement of capital from one branch of production into another, and thus
regulates the balance of the division of labor; and finally

By price fluctuations and crises, which in part daily, and in part
periodically, lead to a balance between blind and chaotic production,
and the needs of society.

In this way, by the mechanical effect of the above economic laws, the
capitalist economy arose and exists entirely by itself, without any
conscious intervention of society. In other words, it becomes possible
in this way, despite the lack of any organized economic connection
between the individual producers, despite the completely planlessness in
people’s economic activity, for social production and its circuit with
consumption to proceed, for the great mass of society to be put to work,
the needs of society to be met one way or another, and economic
progress, the development of the productivity of human labor, to be
secured as the foundation of the progress of culture as a whole.

These however are the fundamental conditions for the existence of any
human society, and as long as an economic form that has developed
historically satisfies these conditions, it can claim to be a historical
necessity.

Social conditions, however, are not rigid and immovable forms. We have
seen how in the course of time they undergo many alterations, how they
are subject to constant change, in which the progress of human culture
beats a path for development. The long millennia of the primitive
communist economy, which led human society from its first origins in a
semi-animal existence to a high level of cultural development, with the
construction of language and religion, stock-raising and agriculture,
sedentary life and the formation of villages, is followed by the gradual
demolition of primitive communism and the construction of antique
slavery, which in turn brings with it major new advances in social life,
to end again with the decline of the antique world. On the ruins of the
antique world, the communist society of the Germanic peoples was the
point of departure for a new form—the _corvée_ economy, on which
medieval feudalism was based.

Once again, development follows its uninterrupted course. In the womb of
feudal society, germs of a completely new economic and social form arise
in the towns, with the formation of guild handicrafts, commodity
production and regular trade; it collapses and makes way for capitalist
production, which arises out of artisanal commodity production thanks to
world trade, the discovery of America and of the sea route to India.

The capitalist mode of production, for its part, is already right from
the start, viewed in the quite immense perspective of historical
progress, not something inalterable that exists forever; it is simply a
transitional phase, a rung on the colossal ladder of human cultural
development, in the same way as previous social forms. And indeed, the
development of capitalism itself, on closer inspection, leads on to its
own decline and beyond. If we have up to now investigated the
connections that make the capitalist economy _possible_, it is now time
to familiarize ourselves with those that make it _impossible_. For this,
we need to trace the specific internal laws of capitalist supremacy in
their further effect. It is these very laws that at a certain level of
development turn against all the fundamental conditions without which
human society cannot exist. What particularly distinguishes the
capitalist mode of production from all its predecessors is that it has
the inherent impetus to extend automatically across the whole of the
earth, and drive out all other earlier social orders.²⁴⁷ In the time of
primitive communism, the whole world accessible to historical research
was likewise covered with communist economies. But between individual
communist communities and tribes there were scarcely any connections, or
only weak ones between neighboring communities. Every such community or
tribe lived a life closed in on itself, and if for example we find such
striking facts as that the medieval Germanic communist community and the
ancient Peruvian community in South America were almost identical, the
“_mark_” in one being the “_marca_” in the other, this circumstance
remains for us an unexplained puzzle, if not mere chance. At the time of
the spread of ancient slavery, too, we find greater or lesser
_similarity_ in the organization and relations of individual slave
economies and states of antiquity, but no common economic life between
them. In the same way, the history of guild handicraft and its
emancipation was repeated in more or less the same way in most towns of
medieval Italy, Germany, France, Holland, England, etc., but for the
most part the history of each town was a separate one.

Capitalist production extends itself to all countries, not just giving
them a similar economic form, but linking them into a single great
capitalist world economy.

Within each European industrial country, capitalist production
ceaselessly drives out petty trade, handicraft and small peasant
production. At the same time it draws all backward European countries,
and all the lands of America, Asia, Africa and Australia, into the world
economy. This happens in two ways: by world trade and by colonial
conquests. Both began together with the discovery of America at the end
of the fifteenth century, extended further in the course of the
following centuries, and particularly in the nineteenth century
experienced the greatest upswing and spread ever more widely. World
trade and colonial conquest go hand in hand in the following way. First
of all they bring the capitalist industrial countries of Europe into
contact with forms of society of all kinds across the world that are
based on earlier cultural and economic stages: peasant, slave economy,
feudal _corvée_, but above all primitive communist. By drawing these
into trade, they are rapidly shaken and destroyed. By the foundation of
colonial trading companies abroad, or by direct conquest, the land, and
the most important foundation of production such as cattle where these
are present, come into the hands of European states or trading
companies. In this way, the indigenous social relations and mode of
economy of native peoples are everywhere destroyed, whole peoples partly
eradicated, partly proletarianized and placed under the command of
industrial and commercial capital as slaves or wage-laborers in one form
or another. The history of colonial wars lasting decades runs right
through the nineteenth century: uprisings against France, Italy, England
and Germany in Africa, against France, England, Holland and the United
States in Asia, against Spain and France in America—a long and stubborn
resistance by the old indigenous societies against their destruction and
proletarianization by modern capital, a struggle in which eventually
capital everywhere triumphs in the end.

First of all, this means a tremendous extension of the realm of capital,
the construction of a world market and world economy, in which all
inhabited lands of the earth are reciprocally producers and customers
for products, working integrally together and participating in one and
the same earth-spanning economy.

The other side, however, is the advancing immiseration of ever greater
circles of humanity around the globe, and the increasing uncertainty of
their existence. To the extent that in place of old communistic, peasant
or _corvée_ relations, with their limited productive powers and low
standard of living, but with firm and secure conditions of existence for
all, there appear capitalist colonial relations, proletarianization and
wage-slavery, all the peoples affected in America, Asia, Africa and
Australia come to experience bare misery, an unknown and unbearable
burden of labor, and finally complete insecurity of existence. After
fertile and rich Brazil had been transformed for the needs of European
and North American capitalism into a gigantic wasteland of monotonous
coffee plantations, and the indigenous people en masse into
proletarianized wage-slaves on these plantations, these wage-slaves were
suddenly exposed to a purely capitalist phenomenon: the so-called
“coffee crisis,”²⁴⁸ resulting in long-term unemployment and naked
hunger. The rich and immense subcontinent of India was subjected by
English colonial policy to the rule of capital after decades of
desperate resistance, and since this time famine and typhus have been
periodic guests in the Ganges region, to which millions have succumbed.
In central Africa, English and German colonial policy over the last
twenty years has transformed whole populations into wage-slaves and
starved others, their bones lying scattered everywhere. The desperate
revolts and famines in the Chinese empire^(CXVII) are the result of the
crushing of the old peasant and artisan economy of this country by the
entry of European capital. The arrival of European capitalism in North
America was accompanied first by the extermination of the indigenous
Amerindian population and the theft of their lands by English emigrants,
then by the establishment at the start of the nineteenth century of a
capitalist raw-materials production for English industry, and the
enslavement of four million black Africans who were sold to America by
European slave-traders, to be used as labor-power on the cotton, sugar
and tobacco plantations under the command of capital.

In this way, one continent after another comes inextricably under the
rule of capital, and on every continent one territory after another, one
race after another, with ever new and uncounted millions succumbing to
proletarianization, enslavement, insecurity of existence, in short,
immiseration.^(CXVIII) The establishment of the capitalist world economy
brings in its wake the spread of ever greater misery, an unbearable
burden of labor and a growing insecurity of existence across the whole
globe, corresponding to the accumulation of capital in a few hands. The
capitalist world economy increasingly means the yoking of all humanity
to heavy labor with countless deprivations and sufferings, with physical
and mental degeneration for the purpose of capital accumulation. We have
seen how capitalist production has the peculiarity that consumption,
which in every previous economic form is the purpose, is here only a
means, simply a way of serving the real purpose: the accumulation of
capitalist profit. The self-expansion of capital appears as alpha and
omega, as the intrinsic purpose and meaning of all production. The
craziness of this situation, however, only appears to the extent that
capitalist production develops into world production. Here, on the scale
of the world economy, the absurdity of the capitalist economy attains
its true expression in the picture of all humanity groaning with
frightful suffering under the yoke of a blind social power, capital,
that it has itself unconsciously created. The underlying purpose of
every social form of production, the maintenance of society by labor,
the satisfaction of its needs, is placed here completely on its head,
with production not being for the sake of people, but production for the
sake of profit becoming the law all over the earth, with the
under-consumption, constant insecurity of consumption, and sometimes
direct non-consumption of the immense majority of people becoming the
rule.

At the same time, the development of the world economy also leads to
other important phenomena, important even for capitalist production
itself. As we said, there are two stages in the intrusion of the rule of
European capital into non-European countries: first the entry of trade,
with the indigenous people being drawn into commodity exchange, and to
some degree also the transformation of the existing forms of production
of the indigenous peoples into commodity production; then the
expropriation of these peoples from their land, in one form or another,
i.e. from their means of production. These means of production are
transformed into capital in the hands of the Europeans, while the
indigenous peoples are transformed into proletarians. These two steps,
however, are sooner or later followed by a third: the founding of
capitalist production in the colonial country itself, either by emigrant
Europeans or by enriched indigenous individuals. The United States of
America, which was only populated by English and other European
emigrants once the native redskins had been exterminated in a long war,
first formed an agricultural hinterland of capitalist Europe, supplying
raw materials such as cotton and grain for English industry, and
customers for industrial products of every kind from Europe. In the
second half of the nineteenth century, however, the United States
developed its own industry, which not only displaced imports from
Europe, but soon presented a tough competition to European capitalism in
Europe itself, as well as on other continents. In India, English
capitalism has similarly been faced with dangerous competition from an
indigenous textile industry and others. Australia has embarked on the
same path of development from a colonial country into a country of
capitalist industry. In Japan, an indigenous industry developed already
with the first step—under the impulse of foreign trade—and preserved
Japan from partition as a European colony. In China the process of
fragmentation and plundering of the country by European capitalism has
been complicated by China’s effort, with the aid of Japan, to found its
own capitalist production as a defence against the European, though this
attempt also leads to increased and complicated sufferings for its
population. In this way, not only does the rule and command of capital
spread over the whole earth by the creation of a world market, but the
capitalist mode of production itself spreads steadily across the whole
earth. This however means that the need of production to expand comes
into an ever more unhappy relationship with its terrain of expansion,
its outlet opportunities. It is the innermost need of capitalist
production, as we have seen, the very law of its existence, that it
should have the possibility of not remaining stable but extending ever
more widely and ever more rapidly, i.e. producing ever greater masses of
commodities, in ever larger factories, and ever more rapidly, with ever
better technical means. This expansion possibility of capitalist
production knows no inherent limits, since there are no limits to
technological progress and hence to the productive powers of the earth.
But this need for expansion does come up against quite particular
limits, i.e. those of the interest of capitalist profit. Production and
its expansion only have a sense if they yield at least the “customary”
average profit. Whether this is the case depends on the market, i.e. on
the relationship between effective demand on the part of consumers, and
the amount of commodities produced along with their prices. The interest
of capitalist profit requires on the one hand an ever more rapid and
greater production, thereby creating of itself at each step market
limitations that stand in the way of the impetuous expansive pressure of
production. The result of this, as we have seen, is the unavoidability
of industrial and trade crises, which periodically balance the
relationship between the inherently unbounded, limitless capitalist
pressure of production and the barriers to capitalist consumption, and
make possible the continued existence of capitalism and its further
development.

Yet the more countries develop a capitalist industry of their own, the
greater is the need and possibility for expansion of production, while
the smaller in relation to this is the possibility of expansion due to
market barriers. If we compare the leaps by which English industry grew
in the 1860s and 70s, when England was still the leading capitalist
country on the world market, with its growth in the last two decades,
since Germany and the United States have significantly displaced England
on the world market, it is clear that growth has become much more slow
in relation to the previous period. But what was the particular fate of
English industry unavoidably faces German and North American industry
too, and eventually the industry of the whole world. Incessantly, with
each step of its own further development, capitalist production is
approaching the time when its expansion and development will be
increasingly slow and difficult.²⁴⁹ Of course, capitalist development
still has a good way to go, as the capitalist mode of production proper
still represents only a very small fraction of total production on
earth. Even in the oldest industrial countries of Europe, there are
still alongside large industrial firms very many small and backward
artisanal workshops, and above all, much the greater part of
agricultural production is not capitalist but still pursued along
peasant lines. There are also whole countries in Europe in which
large-scale industry is hardly developed, local production still bearing
a principally peasant and artisanal character. And finally, in the other
continents, with the exception of the northern part of America,
capitalist production sites are only small and scattered points, while
whole immense expanses of land have in part not even made the transition
to simple commodity production. Of course, the economic life of all
these strata of society and countries that do not produce
capitalistically, both in Europe and elsewhere, is dominated by
capitalism. The European peasant may still conduct the most primitive
economy on his holding, but he is dependent at every turn on the
big-capitalist economy, on the world market, with which he has been
brought into contact by trade and by the tax policy of the large
capitalist states. In the same way, the most primitive countries outside
of Europe have been brought by world trade and colonial policy under the
sway of European and North American capitalism. The capitalist mode of
production is still able to achieve powerful expansion by everywhere
suppressing all more backward forms of production. In generally, the
movement, as we have seen, is in this direction. But precisely through
this development capitalism becomes caught in a fundamental
contradiction. The more that capitalist production takes the place of
more backward forms, the more tightly the limits placed on the market by
the interest of profit constrict the need of already existing capitalist
firms to expand. The matter becomes clear if we imagine for a moment
that the development of capitalism has proceeded so far that on the
whole earth everything that people produce is produced capitalistically,
i.e. only by private capitalist entrepreneurs in large firms with modern
wage-workers. Then the impossibility of capitalism clearly appears.



SLAVERY


The tendency of the mark community¹ is to disintegrate and to make room
for new relations, though always according to milieu or to other
conditions and consequences.

The oldest form to establish itself after the mark, to a greater or
lesser extent in the ancient world, is slavery, the oldest form of class
domination and economic exploitation.

_Engels_ says in his _Anti-Dühring_ (this page–this page)² that after
the emergence of private property, the opportunity to employ foreign
labor arose. But war supplied them; prisoners of war who were, until
this period, slain, and even earlier, eaten, were now used as laborers.
(See _Anti-Dühring_, this page–this page.)³

This explanation cannot, strictly speaking, satisfy us.

We are far too inadequately informed about the facts of the slave
economy and its origins. Even until recently there have been
disagreements among the bourgeois researchers about the meaning and the
extent of slavery and the ways it emerged. We are more or less dependent
on hypotheses.

It is necessary that one trace out the manner in which slavery emerged
out of the mark and the gentile constitution.⁴ If we search for the
point after which we see the mark and the gens exhibiting the oldest
forms of exploitation and servitude, we will not immediately encounter
slavery, but other forms, which might lead to slavery.

Unlike Engels, we do not need to place exploitation after the emergence
of private property. The mark itself allows for exploitation and
servitude. The grafting of a foreign mark onto another allows for and
creates a relationship of exploitation and servitude _toward the
outside_. (In fact, the mark ensured communism internally, but not
externally.) An example of this is the _Inca Empire_. Moreover, the Inca
Empire teaches us something else: although the conquerors, the Incas,
themselves lived together in municipalities, we find in their case four
ruling lineages, whose representatives governed the four provinces into
which the country was divided. The Incas also had a standing army,
necessary for maintaining domination. Thus, there was already a certain
aristocracy within the mark. How did this develop?

The four lineages would have taken control of the conquest. These four
houses would have probably held an even greater position had the Spanish
conquest not put an end to this process.

Similar examples that correspond [to] [_MS. Illegible_] the mark, [of
which] there are many. E.g., the oldest historical reference from the
island of Crete is that it was conquered by the Dorians.⁵ The Dorians
were one of the main tribes of Greece. The conquest took place in
prehistoric times.⁶ We do not know who lived on Crete. The conquered
people on Crete must have handed over the yields from their crops,
excluding the necessary sustenance for themselves and their families, to
the conquerors. From these contributions from the subjugated people of
Crete, the costs of the common meals of the free people were determined.
This is due to the fact that the Dorians lived under communism. An
example that the mark was compatible with the exploitation of other
marks. The land continued to belong to the Cretan population; they only
had to be able to afford the tribute. (The Greek legend of the Minotaur⁷
that ate young boys and virgins can be explained by the fact that the
subjugated had to hand over their young boys and virgins to the
conquerors, similar to the Quechua tribes in the Inca Empire.)

Similar relationships existed elsewhere in Greece.

In Thessaly, the early inhabitants, who lived there before the Greeks,
were conquered by the Aeolians and forced to become tenant farmers. They
had a name that meant “poor people.” Originally, this was one of their
folk names. The [_MS. Illegible_] are from [_MS. Illegible_] wandered to
Asia Minor, conquered Bithynia⁸ and similarly subjugated the people
living there and forced them to pay tribute.

The most interesting and fruitful example is _Sparta_ itself. In Sparta,
we still find a strong tradition of gentile law. The Spartans used the
peasant population of the Helots as state slaves. They were handed over
by the state, that is, by the mark community, to individuals. The
individuals were not allowed, however, to kill or sell them to the
outside, because the slaves remained communal property. The Helots
constituted the landless [agricultural workers] among the Spartans and
had to relinquish a certain portion of their yields. Whatever they
obtained beyond this amount belonged to them. The land still belonged to
the Spartans. It was taken from [the Helots] by the Spartans, so that
they now worked on a foreign land that had previously belonged to them.
They also had military obligations.

The Spartans also married the Helots. The children of these marriages
were, if they were raised as Spartans, not only free, but also citizens.
For that reason, their education determined their fate. They were called
_mothaken_: half-breeds.

Aside from the Spartans and the Helots, there was another population,
that of the _Periokoi_, e.g. those that lived around the city (thus the
word [related] word “periphery”).⁹ The _Periokoi_ had no political
rights, but were personally free.

The Spartans continued to live in the gens. Marriage was forbidden
within the gens; the gentile law of inheritance was in effect, and thus
the wealth remained in the gens. Marriage within the gens was only
allowed to heiresses, in order that the wealth remain in the gens. From
the dues of the Helots, the Spartans ran a communist economic
organization. Bourgeois historians construe the communist meals in
Sparta as militaristic club feasts.


WHAT IS THE DIFFERENCE BETWEEN CRETE AND SPARTA?

In Crete, the land remained the property of the inhabitants, even after
the conquest by the Dorians, who only demanded tribute from the
subjugated.

In Sparta, the Spartans took the land from the Helots and the Helots
were forced to work this land for the Spartans. The Helots could
therefore subsist only if they fed both themselves and their masters.
They were dominated completely by the mark community of the Spartans and
were assigned to individuals, that is, treated like objects. They
therefore worked as labor power on foreign soil. They have no social
cohesion of their own anymore; they are integrated into the mark of the
Spartans. But they are not an active part of the mark of the Spartans,
only the labor power for their subjugators. They have no more land,
which was the basis of their social cohesion. They can only become
Spartans if they are children of Spartans and Helots, and if they are in
such a way raised as Spartans; apart from this, they can only become
fully entitled members of the Spartan mark through distinction in
military service. Thus they are already slaves; they live in a _class
state_.

If we compare the Peruvians, Crete, and Sparta, we would have to locate
the Peruvian and the Cretan forms as the older forms and the Spartan as
the newer one. In Peru and Crete, the subjugated are not yet slaves.
They are members of the mark as before. There is no class domination, no
class society in effect here. A class society is the grouping of classes
_within_ a given society. In Peru and Crete, it is a matter of the
exploitation of _one society by another society_.

However, the Helots form a _social bond_ with the Spartans. Therefore,
they live in a class society.

Slavery accelerates the dissolution of the communist association and
goes hand in hand with the rise of private property. This stands in
contrast to Engels, who saw slavery as arising only _after_ the
introduction of private property.

Slavery appeared naturally in several phases, depending on the level of
development of the specific society.

The first beginning of slavery is a kind of tenant relationship.
Communism is carried over, except that a certain tribiute has to be
paid. This has a corrosive effect on the conquered, as well as the
conquerors. In a later stage, the land is taken from the conquered, and
already slavery has arrived. But the conquered are still being exploited
communistically. Then the disintegration of communism. The rise of
private property. Thereby the slaves also become private property. While
before the slaves were not to be killed or sold, because they were
communal property, once private property arose, the individual could do
with the slave what he wanted.

The exploitation of one mark by another has a corrosive effect on the
exploited [and the exploiting] mark, something we see already with the
Incas. The disintegrative process is accelerated. First the conquest
occurs and then a reconfiguration of the organization takes place. In
order to fortify this, a specific class develops, the military, and thus
inequality in the mark. Domination from above evolves faster when
conquests and wars occur.


THE DEVELOPMENT OF SLAVERY AMONG THE GREEKS

At the moment the Greeks enter history, their situation is that of a
disintegrated gens. Though there are strong vestiges of the gentile law
remaining, nevertheless there already exists a _rural system of private
property_ and the free right to dispose of that land. The peasantry is
already in a state of deep indebtedness. Along with them, there is an
_aristocracy_. Its representatives can already be found in the gentile
constitution. The aristocrats are the descendants of the public
officeholders in the gentile constitution: chiefs of the mark, [chief]
herdsmen, etc. In the mark, they generally emerge from the undivided
mark and over time, they confiscate more and more from it. In this way,
they obtain greater assets and with the advent of hereditary power, they
develop more and more into a stratum that is supported by the peasantry.
In this way, a minor aristocracy develops, one that already possesses
privileges and goods. The earliest members of the mark are now the
indebted peasants, who have to pay fees to the aristocracy.

_These relationships were strongly influenced by the culture of the
Orient_, which was older and more prosperous. In order to be able to
understand all the events of the ancient world in Greece and Rome, the
influence of the Orient must, generally speaking, be taken into account,
such as in the Near East, Assyria, Babylonia, Egypt, and Phoenicia.
Historians and scholars of prehistory place great emphasis on the
influence of the Near East. In particular, the oriental technologies of
war were especially influential. The Greek war chariot originated in the
Near East.

_Exchange of goods with the Orient was critical_. Luxury items were
exchanged for the refinement of [the upper strata’s] way of life. The
reason for the exchange was in order to get their hands on these items.
In the old empires, there was already a strong differentiation among
classes and the upper strata lived quite luxuriously. Already in the
ninth and tenth centuries before Christ, there existed a strong
disintegration within the society.

Exchange with the Orient led to two things:

1. Provided an incentive to the [Greek] aristocracy to have _various
products manufactured_, which could be exchanged for luxury items from
the Orient. Among these items were oil, wine, and metals.

2. Spread, in association with exchange, the _money economy_ in place of
the earlier natural economy, since metal as a means of exchange comes
from the Orient.¹⁰ In a natural economy, all goods are produced only for
subsistence and in fact mainly by the people who themselves consume,
sell, or exchange them. The leader of the mark receives foodstuffs as
income. Yet, once the leaders become an aristocracy and the money
economy is in place, the fees had to be paid in money and in kind. This
creates a situation wherein the peasantry falls increasingly into debt
[to] the large landowners.

In Homer’s time, around the same time as the great migration of the
Germanic peoples,¹¹ raising livestock prevailed over agriculture, which
was [already] important in this period. At this time, _the aristocracy_
themselves took part in production, which ended after Homer. The
aristocracy provided the fighters; _it had trade with the Orient in its
hands_. This can also be deduced from the mark itself. The mark itself
engaged in trade, but with the outside, not within its own borders. The
mark as a _whole_ was engaged in trade. Since the mark as such could not
carry on trade, it came about that the natural or customary public
officials became, at the same time, the natural public organs of trade.
And it is from these public officials that the aristocracy was later
derived.

As seats for the reigning military aristocracy, there were castles that
served as permanent constructions of militarism. _Building the castles
was a form of compulsory labor for the surrounding peasantry_. The more
hereditary the mark’s earlier leadership positions became, the greater
the fees paid by the peasants. Instead of money, the only thing they
could afford was compulsory labor. It was _compulsory labor_ for them,
because the peasants no longer paid their fees to an _elected_
organization. An historically handed down inverted relationship from the
past.

The refinement of the lives of the aristocracy led to an increasing
division between them and the peasantry. It developed into, on the one
hand, the mass of peasants, who bore the brunt of the work, and on the
other hand, the small body of aristocratic families, who saw as their
only occupations the conduct of war and trade, with the latter helping
to enhance their way of life. _Eventually, the aristocracy ceased to
participate in the production process_. This increased their standard of
living even more. This increase resulted in an even greater trade, and
in order to support it, production had to be adapted for trade.

_Passive trade gave way to active trade_. That is, while the aristocracy
originally needed a surplus for trade, it later had goods manufactured
for the sole purpose of exchange: oil, wine, and metals. These items
were exchanged for fine linen, perfumes, purple robes, etc. With
increasing trade came a growing use of precious metals. Increasingly,
the peasants had to pay their fees in money; they fell more and more
into debt.

_This leads to the establishment of debt slavery_. Peasants who cannot
afford their fees are turned into slaves, who thus give over their life
and death to the aristocracy. All of their labor is now performed for
the aristocracy.

In conjunction with this, a new social form emerged, _the ancient city_.
This was the area in which the aristocrats lived. Within the city they
had their houses and outside of the city they kept their goods. Living
in the city meant that one was not a participant in the production
process, since the fields, the key source of production, lay further
out.

In order to be able to live in the city, it was necessary for the
aristocracy to have artisans living around them as well as city
merchants, who acted as brokers for them, and in addition there were a
whole series of personal servants. Here for the first time the
foundations of a true slavery begin to take shape, one that we also see
later in Greece.

Already during the time of Homer there were traces of slavery, though
only in aristocratic families and in small numbers. _In this first phase
of slavery, there was a preponderance of the female element_. Female
slaves were used as concubines, wet nurses, and maids in the house, who
worked next to the housewife and under her direction.

Then, adding to the decline of the peasant class, came _debt slavery_.

As early as the sixth century, these circumstances led to _revolutions_
in Greece.

The ruined peasant class rebelled and called for new _allocations of
land and soil_, a utopian demand to turn back the wheel of history.
Although this call during the Solonian Revolution¹² of 594 would die
away without being heard, the rebellion precipitated one thing: the
_abolition of debt slavery_. (See “[Karl] Ploetz”)¹³ (Solon was the
legislator, the Solonian Revolution is to be understood here as
upheaval.)

The remarkable course of Greek history can be explained by these
circumstances, where class domination took on the original form of
_domination by the city over the land_.

Slavery _and trade_ evolved at the same time as the aristocracy.

After slavery was initially adopted for personal service, the
aristocracy reached the point where, in order to keep up with the
increase in its living standards, it had to buy slaves in order to
create products for exchange. For the first time, in Greece, we see
workshops that are established specifically for slaves to produce goods
for exchange. The use of slaves in oil and wine plantations and the
massive use of slaves in mines. The slaves became direct competitors to
the proletarianized peasants, and they eventually could be used by the
aristocracy in their larger enterprises. In the mines, free labor was
displaced _completely_ by slave labor. Initially peasants doing
compulsory labor carried out craft production for the aristocracy. As
the needs of the aristocrats became more refined, however, the peasants
were no longer adequate. Specialists emerged who could do much more
refined work in their craft. In the end, the free artisans were largely
replaced by slaves.

Thus we see in Greece, namely in Attica, that wealthy Greeks established
_entire workshops_ in which slaves manufactured products for exchange.
Demosthenes, the father of the famous orator, had a workshop in which 30
slaves worked under supervision as sword-sharpeners and armorers.

As a result of the Solonian Revolution, not only was debt slavery
abolished, but military obligations also came to affect the peasantry.
They became, so to speak, full citizens. Under the circumstances,
however, this contributed to an even more rapid disintegration of the
peasantry. As a result of the development of trade, which in Greece was
comprised of sea trade, a merchant fleet and a navy emerged. Thus there
was a large military burden upon the entire people. The burden of the
navy was one of the greatest burdens on the peasantry.

After debt slavery had been abolished, _prisoners of war_ increasingly
became _material for slavery_. Later, in the seventh century, slaves
were increasingly _purchased_. The purchased slaves were the peoples who
lived around the perimeter of the Black Sea. Some of them also came from
less civilized regions in the West such as what is today Spain and the
Gaul of that time. The Greeks kept _colonies_ all around this region.
_Colonization_ was one of the causes of the disintegration of the
peasantry. Wherever a group of Greeks conquered a speck of land, usually
along the shoreline of the sea, they established themselves there with
their facilities and it became a Greek city. This was the case with
Chios, an island and a Greek colony, where there was a large slave
market.

The slave trading economy was especially large in centers where the
large mines and plantations were concentrated, such as Sicily and Attica
(Attica is Athens with a certain perimeter), in Corinth and elsewhere.

Thus, after the Solonian Revolution, there were slaves who _were
captured, purchased and who were born into the household_.


INDICATIONS ON THE SCOPE OF SLAVERY

The question of the size of the slave trade in Greece and in the ancient
world is generally a point of contention among scholars, economists, and
historians.

[Karl Johann] Rodbertus made himself well known for the portrayal of the
ancient Greek _oikos_ economy (_oikos_ is the house, the family,
together with the bondsmen, maidservants, and slaves).¹⁴ With this
description, he created the impression that the whole of economic life
in the ancient world rested upon slavery. This view was accepted by
Professor [Karl] Bücher,¹⁵ for whom the first phase of economic
development is the closed, household economy, based on slave labor.
According to Bücher, this domestic economy predominated up to the Middle
Ages.

_Recently, Professor Eduard Meyer has strongly contradicted this view_.
Two works by him can be recommended:

1. _Die wirtschaftliche Entwicklung des Altertums. Ein Vortrag_ [(The
Economic Development of the Ancient World. A Lecture) (Jena: G.
Fischer,] 1895).

2. _Die Sklaverei im Altertum_ [(Slavery in the Ancient World) (Dresden:
Zahn & Jaenisch,] 1898).

The first work was cited heavily by [Karl] Kautsky in _The Origin of
Christianity_.¹⁶

There are also numerous articles by Professor Eduard Meyer and his views
(under “Population in Ancient Times”) published in the _Handwörterbuch
der Staatswissenschaften_.¹⁷

Unfortunately, Professor Eduard Meyer advocates the opposite extreme. He
mainly demonstrates _that slavery played a rather marginal role in
antiquity_ and he bases his assessment on the fact that the number of
slaves was either the same or smaller than the number of free laborers
(with the exception of a few periods).

His rationale does not hold water. In contemporary society, capitalist
production is dominant. Within it are the industrial workers. The farm
laborers, the small craftsmen, the layers of educated professionals,
etc., do not belong to it. But they, the industrial workers, stamp the
conditions of their existence on the other classes. Contemporary society
is formed by them although they are in fact a minority in the
population.

It follows that the slaves may have been a minority of the population
and yet all of the economic life in antiquity could have rested on them.
It is not the numbers that are definitive, but the sum total of the
tendencies that result from them that is definitive.

([…]¹⁸ Eduard Bernstein came up with the idea, after the census of 1905,
that there were thus so and so many craftsmen, tradesmen, etc. But that
in no way disproves the fact that the proletariat is the foundation of
today’s society. It is not possible to arrive at that with numbers.)

The first detailed evidence concerning slave labor comes from the fifth
century, the time of Pericles, who lived between 444 and 429 [BC].¹⁹ He
was prominent in Attica and had a great influence. According to [Karl
Julius] Beloch’s²⁰ latest figures, in Attica, there were 130,000–150,000
freemen, 100,000 slaves at that time. The total population of Greece
amounted to 2,250,000. Among them, Beloch counted 850,000 slaves in the
same Periclean period.

Professor Meyer revised the numbers further. According to him, in the
year 431, in the time of Pericles, there were 170,000 freemen, 40,000
_metics_,²¹ descendants of mixed marriages of slaves and citizens, and
150,000 slaves. (Contemporary Greece has over two million inhabitants,
remaining more or less stable.)

Afterwards, the worsening of conditions in Greece, after the turning
point of Pericles’ time. 431–404 BC, the _Peloponnesian War_ between
Sparta and Athens. In this war, a sizable number of free peasants
perished because they formed the infantry. Later, slavery increased even
further. For Attica in the fourth century, 317–307, the following
statistics: 90,000 free citizens, 40,000 _metics_, and 400,000 slaves.

Professor Meyer does not dispute these numbers. They prove that after
the war the number of slaves exceeded that of the rest of the
population. He only claims that this was not the case before and, even
then, not in all of Greece, but in a few centers. Furthermore, Professor
Meyer speaks of industry and factories in Greece, a typically bourgeois
bias.

Thus, where slaves predominated, they were not only used in crafts,
mines, and on plantations, but also _very much in personal services_.
Slaves were seen as belonging to the estate of a free citizen. Certain
citizens owned 50, and others had 1,000. It became fashionable in the
fourth century [BC] for free citizens to set foot in the city only with
a drove of slaves in front and in back of them. When dandies appeared in
Athens, slaves carried chairs for the dandies, letting the master sit
down every few steps to shoo away the heat with fans (fanning cool air
towards him).

Through Aristotle (born 384 BC, died 322 BC), we have a strong
impression of the circumstances of this period. In his _Politics_, which
comprises 8 books, he writes:

It is a complete household only if it contains slaves and freemen.²²

From Book I of _Politics_:

The essence of the science of being a master has to do with using his
slaves correctly. He is the master, not because he is the owner of a
person, but because he avails himself of it. The slave comprises a part
of the wealth of the family.²³

From Book III of _Politics_:

Nature itself created slavery. Animals divide into male and female. The
male is the more perfect one, it dominates. The female is imperfect, it
obeys. Now, there are individuals in humankind who are just as
subordinate to others, like the body to the soul, like the animal to
man. These are those beings that are only good for manual labor, and are
not suited for anything more perfect than that. These individuals are
destined by nature to be slaves because there is nothing better for them
than to obey. Is there then, in fact, any real difference between slaves
and animals? Their services are similar to one another; they are only
useful to us through their bodies. From these principles we can conclude
that nature created some people for freedom and others for slavery, so
that it is beneficial and just that the slave obeys.²⁴

There is a complete split between mental and manual labor. According to
Aristotle, nature created slaves; and physical labor, the basis of
production, is according to him, the basis for bondage.

The free peasants were both members of society and citizens, and they
took part in many aspects of public affairs.

With time, it transpired that every _aristocrat_ lived in the city and
his _main concern_ became dealing with _affairs of state_, aside from
the concern with science, art, and military service. _The peasants were
proletarianized_, were unable to find work, since there were slaves
everywhere. They became superfluous, did not count.

As a foreigner, the slave had no opportunity at all to take part in
public life. He had no public obligations. Therefore, the master had the
complete right to dispose of him, since there were no citizenship
rights, no protection by the state.

Even if the slaves were the smaller group, they were nevertheless the
principal focus. They proletarianized the peasants. The separation of
intellectual life from the production process.

These are the fruits of slavery. This resulted in the disintegration of
Greek society as well as the Roman one.


CONCLUSIONS

In Greece, slavery led to the _separation of knowledge from the process
of production_. Before this, knowledge was not separate from productive
labor. _Knowledge was collective and concentrated in production.
Everyone_ worked, and everyone worked _together_. Knowledge remained
necessary. In order to cut a stone, in order to manufacture tools; for
that, scientific understanding was necessary. In order to undertake the
organization of the mark, quite a bit of knowledge was required.

The _next form_ is that knowledge rested with the _priests_. As in
India, they were not allowed to work in the fields. Because of this,
they acquired time for extensive mental labor. This was necessary, for
example, in the Orient, since organizing the construction of the large
waterworks came to be carried out not only by the mark, but also by many
others as well. The priests were in intimate contact with nature,
because they had to support the cult, which at that time was a nature
cult.

The _next form_ in which knowledge was disconnected from production was
_slavery_. And in fact, within slavery, total separation of manual and
mental labor likewise took place.

This benefited science and art. Free from being bound to production,
they could now float freely in the air, hurry ahead of time. Art
succeeded in blossoming in Greece to a point that has not been reached
in our time. Aristotle would not have been capable of becoming what he
was without slavery. Everything that exists today is bound up with the
ancient Greek world, with Aristotle. In this sense we could even say:
_without slavery, there would be no socialism_.

Knowledge was also beneficial to the production process.

The exclusion of slaves from mental life led of course to _the rulers
creating laws_ that benefited their own interests, yet these also had to
be honored by the slaves, although they did not take part in their
enactment. It is not much different today. There were laws and a
dominant class that did not take part in the production process. Those
who created all the assets had to submit to them.

In socialist society, knowledge will be the common property of everyone.
All working people will have knowledge.


THE HISTORY OF SLAVERY IN ROME

The history of Roman slavery is a later one than that of Greek slavery,
just as Roman history as a whole is a later history. Rome was first
founded in the eighth century BC.²⁵ In Greece, prehistory—that is, the
era of Homer—reaches back to the tenth or eleventh century BC, in which
slavery already existed, if only to a limited extent.²⁶ It was from
Greece that Rome borrowed slavery, so to speak; from there it came to
Rome in already finished form.

In general we distinguish _three periods of slavery in Rome_:

_The first_ goes back to the Punic Wars,²⁷ that is, to the third century
BC;

The _second_ dates from the Punic Wars down to the era of the Caesars,
that is, until shortly before and/or shortly after the birth of Christ
(the first century AD);

The _third_ dates from the first century AD, that is, from the time of
Christ’s birth, to the fall of the Roman Empire.

_The First Period_

In the _first period_ the type of economic life in Italy was _peasant
agriculture_. There was obviously a nobility already present, land
ownership on a large scale by the nobility, [that is] differentiation is
already present. The nobility and the peasantry we derive, as in Greece,
from the mark; the peasants were previously members of the mark
community; and the nobles were the ones who held public offices within
the mark.

The _mode of production_ on the estates owned by the nobility [at first]
was hardly distinguishable from the mode of production on the property
owned by the peasants; the difference was only in the size or scope of
the landholding. There were no larger bases than these for an economic
transformation.

Slavery in this first period has already been introduced, but still
[only] to a limited extent. On the landholdings of the nobility the
number of slaves was somewhat greater, and on peasant land, smaller.
Many of the poorer peasant farmers had no slaves at all. Here [in this
situation] slaves were still agricultural workers. Since peasant
agriculture was the type of production that only met basic needs, a kind
of patriarchal situation prevailed as a consequence for the slaves as
well. They worked for the farmer alongside his family, and in the case
of the nobles or the tenant farmers [they worked] alongside of other
farm laborers. (The nobles leased out a great deal of land to tenant
farmers, and that land was worked in the same way as the peasant
farmers’ own land.)

Thus the slaves were employed _as agricultural workers_ next to the free
peasants and together with the free peasants. For the most part they
were slaves who had been purchased. Most of them had been purchased for
a period of twenty years; if they got old and/or sick, they were mostly
sold at a low price. The land owned by a noble in the first period in
Rome was called _villa rustica_, which meant an estate or manor. It
consisted usually of a residence for the _villicus_,²⁸ the agricultural
director of the operation, an official of the estate or manor. He had a
dwelling place together with the slaves. Next to it were cowsheds,
granaries, and so on. For the nobility a special [_MS. Illegible_]²⁹ was
often built. All the slaves at such an establishment received their
means of livelihood periodically and in a designated quantity. Clothing
and shoes were usually purchased at a market. Every month they received
a certain amount of wheat (rye and oats were not yet known at that
time), and the recipients had to grind this themselves. In addition
[there was] salt, olives, salted fish, wine, and cooking oil. That is
how they lived in this first period. It was one and the same kind of
life for the slave, the peasant farmer, and with minor differences, for
the noble as well.

In addition to the _villicus_ there was a _villica_, a female economic
official, who prepared the food for the entire company, and they all had
their meals together. Occasionally slaves suspected of [attempting to
escape] or those who had committed serious offences were shackled and
left in underground dungeons as punishment, but in the first period that
was an exception and happened only in cases when the slave was guilty of
a wrong. The son of the family was often punished in the same way as the
slave. Both stood under the unlimited authority and domination of the
paterfamilias.³⁰ For larger work operations, which required a larger
accumulation of labor power in a short time, there were not enough
slaves, and free wage laborers had to be hired, who performed the work
together with the slaves, for example, during a harvest. Olive picking
and the gathering of grapes were usually likewise entrusted to free
employees, or free contractors together with slaves; that is, there were
people who undertook to carry out that kind of work, and they brought
their own slaves with them. For this they received compensation. In
general the feeding and treatment of slaves were good. On holidays they
were freed from labor obligations. And since they belonged to particular
families in Rome, they took part in religious rites, including those of
the family cult. (In Rome there were not only official gods of the Roman
state as a whole, but each family had its own household gods³¹).

_The Second Period_

_In the depths of Roman society radical changes began to take place
around the third century BC_. It began with Rome’s struggle to establish
an empire on a world scale. This struggle was initiated by an endless
series of wars. The Punic Wars marked the turning point. Hardly a year
went by without a war.

Finally came the Punic War with Carthage. This third Punic War, which
ended in victory [for Rome], lasted until 146 B.C.

At the same time the wars with Macedonia began. (Macedonia was then a
part of Greece, in the north.) There were three Macedonian wars:³²

The first, 215–205 BC

The second 200–197 BC

The third 171–168 BC

Then almost simultaneously there was a war with Antioch and Syria, in
Asia, to the southeast of Asia Minor, in the years 192–189 BC.³³

Then the Greek war with the Aetolian League,³⁴ in 146 BC, [which was]
thus simultaneous with the third Punic War.

Then the war in Spain, the subjugation of Spain, 143–133 BC.

Then came the war with Numidia, which is located in Africa, in 111–105
BC.³⁵ (see the atlas of [Friedrich Wilhelm] Putzger, 1909, this
pagea³⁶), an eastern part of the ancient world.

Then a war with the Cimbri and Teutones, in 113–101 BC.³⁷ (see Putzger’s
atlas, this page, on the northern part of the map).

A war with the kingdom of Pontus in Asia Minor, 69–64 BC.³⁸ (see
Putzger’s atlas, this page, in the eastern part [of the map]).

Then a war with the Celts, the Gallic war, in what is now France, 58–51
BC.³⁹

After that came the so-called Alexandrian wars in Egypt in 30 BC.⁴⁰

Those are the times encompassed by the second period of Roman slavery.

A knotty tangle of wars in ever-wider scope, a collision of Greco-Roman
culture with all the surrounding populations, which had remained on a
more backward level.

All these wars were victorious for Rome. They ended with the founding of
the Roman Empire, the transformation of all these lands into Roman
provinces, obligated to pay tribute, and with the introduction of Roman
law into those provinces.

_The peasant farmers_ were the great raw material used in these wars.
They were the _soldiers_. This brought with it the complete collapse of
peasant agriculture, and yet that had been the cornerstone of the entire
economic life of the country. Labor power was withdrawn from peasant
agriculture, and it was encumbered with an enormous tax burden. Since
the waging of war required monetary resources, which the Roman Empire
obtained through taxes, these too fell upon peasant agriculture.

These two operating factors brought to maturity the _first phase of the
second period, the ruin of peasant agriculture and the establishment of
large landed estates_. The latter came into existence as a result of the
fact that the large landed proprietors separated the peasant farmers
from their property when they [the peasants] could not pay their debts.

Since the free peasant farmers had their own land taken out from under
them, they could then serve as labor power for the large landed estates.
But the peasant farmer was under the constant threat that he would be
called up to fight in a war. It was awkward for the great proprietor to
hire him—even when he had the possibility of hiring such a free peasant
farmer. Even in intervals between wars the peasant farmer faced the
danger of being called up for military service.

On the one hand the peasant farmer lost his own land, and on the other
he was too unsuitable for the great proprietor as hired labor power.

Besides that, the number of free peasant farmers was reduced
significantly because of the wars, so that [for] the large landowner
there were no longer enough of them by any means.

The great proprietors thus had to bring in more slaves. And the wars
provided them in great quantities.

The incessant waging of war, without exception, led to the subjugation
of large new provinces. The conquered populations were transformed into
Roman subjects and had to pay tribute, partly in money and partly in
kind. The latter consisted above all of grain. They began to import
overseas grain. The granaries of Rome were Africa, Sicily, and Spain.

The Roman state used the grain above all to maintain the army; it was
exclusively with foreign grain that the Roman army was fed. The
plundering of foreign provinces brought ever more grain into the country
[that is into Italy], as the army needed it. The state purchased this
grain at ridiculously low prices. Soon the grain grown at home became
superfluous, and the Roman farmer found no outlet for his grain. He
became a proletarian. (The Latin word _proles_ means “offspring.”⁴¹)

What could the peasants do? They had lost their own household plots, and
the large landowners were employing slaves. The large landowners could
obtain everything they needed either by having slaves produce it or by
importing from the provinces.

The peasant farmers, being completely deprived of the means of
existence, streamed into Rome, and at that time Rome was indeed _the_
city, the center, and at the same time it was the political center. They
flooded into Rome to demand the means of subsistence from the state.
These peasant farmers were at the same time free citizens. (Rome was a
republic. It had made the same kind of revolution as in Greece). The
nobility made use of this proletariat in its own internal struggles. It
had political rights and influence on the state. This proletariat had to
be maintained, because otherwise it would become a constant danger to
Rome. It slept overnight in the streets of Rome, literally.

Grain was distributed to the proletarians in the market of Rome at state
expense, and this was precisely the same overseas grain.

Thus the importing of grain from the provinces had great significance.

On the basis of these [social and political] relations [Charles Léonard]
Sismondi made the classical commentary in his writings dealing with
social relations in Rome.

“_There was in Rome a proletariat as there is today. But whereas the
proletariat today supports society, the Roman proletariat lived at the
expense of society_.” That is the difference between the proletariat of
today and of that time.⁴²

Finally there comes an aspect in addition to the others [mentioned
above] that closed in on peasant agriculture in such a way as to
eliminate it —to wipe it off the face of the earth. That is the rapid
development of the money economy. As a result of Rome’s encounter with
the countries of the Orient, the money economy in Rome developed very
quickly. The Roman state promoted [the money economy] with all its might
and in the process implemented all the greater opportunities the state
had for various transactions, for example, the levying of taxes, using
not only its own people [for this purpose] but also farming out the
collection of taxes to rich people, who had to immediately pay the state
a lump sum. They were allowed to raise taxes even higher as long as they
also handed over the set sum to the state.

The money economy was at that time just as lucrative a source for rich
people as government bonds are today. In the second century [BC] there
already existed wealthy bankers who advanced funds to the state when it
was necessary and who [generally] looked after and took care of
money-related matters.

The ruining of peasant agriculture within a couple of centuries did not
of course pass by without struggle and resistance by the peasants. In
the second century BC there were _big revolutions by the peasants, a cry
for a new distribution of the lands_, and indeed of _state lands_. (In
the name of the state these lands were given the official names: “common
estates,” “undivided estates, or lands,” and “common lands.”)

_By what means was this demand defeated?_ Not merely by the buying up of
the household plots [of the peasants] by the nobles, but also as a
result of the fact that the nobles had taken control of the state lands.
The nobles began to transfer the state-owned domains to themselves at
ridiculously low prices, and that was not impossible for them, because
they were the rulers. These [state-owned] domains actually passed into
their hands, and thus enabled their large landed estates to grow even
larger.

Economic relations had advanced too far, and thus the demand of the
peasants was retrograde, would have meant a step backward. They had
exactly the same aspirations as present-day middle-class people.⁴³

There were _earth-shaking revolutions of the proletarianized peasantry
in_ _Rome over the question of these lands_. The most famous among these
is the _revolution of the Gracchi_ of 133–121 BC.⁴⁴ Tiberius and Gaius
Gracchus, two brothers from the highest-ranking noble families, placed
themselves at the forefront of this revolution. In this connection
Tiberius Gracchus gave a famous speech before the senate:

The wild animals of Italy have their places of refuge and their dens.
But those who have fought and died for Italy have nothing that they can
call their own except the air and the sunlight. Homeless, they must
wander around with their wives and children, and the owners of the
fields lie when they claim in front of their armies that they are
fighting for their ancestral graves and sacred places. For no one
anymore has a sacred place of their father’s or an ancestral grave; no
one from all the hosts of Rome’s wars has those things. But rather these
who are called the masters of the world fight for the wealth and
privileges of strangers, while they themselves possess not even a clump
of earth.⁴⁵

The two Gracchi sought to improve the situation with specific reforms.
They demanded that _the state lands be apportioned out to the peasants_,
a purely utopian measure.

_Tiberius Gracchus_ in 134 BC pushed through a _law_, which was intended
to take the state domains back from the nobles and which stipulated that
[the state domains] would be divided up into peasant household lots of
thirty acres each; it also stipulated that large payments should be
given to individual proletarianized peasants.

The result was that Tiberius along with 300 of his supporters were
murdered by the nobles and their hangers-on. His brother Gaius then
placed himself at the head of the movement and sought to carry the
reforms still further, because the measure taken by Tiberius could not
stop the colossal process of proletarianization. Even leased-out domains
were turned into peasant colonies. He then introduced the free
distribution of grain, so that the proletarians who were lying around
(homeless?) could be fed. Peasant colonies were also established in the
overseas provinces. The bankruptcy of the peasants can be seen in the
fact that things could not be turned back even in their own country,
where the peasants did not even have their own clump of earth.

[There followed] a powerful movement of resistance by the nobles; Gaius
had to flee, and his flight ended in his own suicide. Thereupon the
entire reform [movement] fell apart.

Professor Meyer states: This reform unfortunately led only to
revolutions in which both Gracchi died and the reform was defeated.

The agrarian revolutions only led to upheavals in the state and did not
bring about any changes.

There had been a struggle already for centuries to use laws to counter
the fact that _free workers were more and more being pushed out by
slaves_. A law of 367 BC that the owners of peasant households sought to
establish stated that _the same number of freemen should be employed as
the number of slaves_.

At the time of Caesar, in the first century BC, that is four centuries
after the above-mentioned law, a new law was introduced according to
which large landed proprietors were obligated to employ at least
_one-third freemen_. That of course had no prospect of being carried
out. Economic relations were more powerful than the law. The peasant was
still a citizen with rights and duties, but the slave was purely and
exclusively labor power.

That is how things went with laws in Rome, as with all laws that try to
go against the tide of economic development: they remain a dead letter.
Proof of that is that after four centuries this new law came.

In conclusion, we have the large number of proletarianized peasants in
the state without any employment. And they remained up until the last
period [of the Roman Empire.]

The next form to disappear was the small lease-holding. This was
decisive in the sense that economically the large landed estate was
still bound by the methods of peasant agriculture. Now we have
_large-scale cultivation of crops_, and indeed this was possible because
_employable labor power was present in large quantities_.

Since grain was imported from the provinces, _grain production [in
Italy] shrank_. The cultivation of grain was forced out mainly by [the
introduction of] _the raising of livestock (e.g., sheep and cattle)_,
and also by _the cultivation of vineyards and olive orchards_.

Things were _now produced for trade [purposes]_, no longer for one’s own
use, as was previously the case on the peasant household plot.

The raising of livestock yielded wool; it was produced in the largest
quantities possible, for trading purposes. Small plots of land, which
earlier were intended for the production of grain, were transformed into
large ranges for the raising of livestock. Vineyards and olive tree
orchards were cultivated on exactly the same large scale.

Latifundia took shape. The opposite side of the coin was the collapse of
peasant farming. It goes without saying that [the latifundia] were
worked by slaves. Large columns of slaves were formed, under overseers,
along with complete separation of their mode of life from that of their
masters. The master lived in Rome, but he also had a villa out on the
land.

On the rural estates [of the large landowners] the following items were
developed: the cultivation of large gardens, and zoos, flowers being
part of the luxurious lifestyle in Rome; the breeding of birds for
purposes of luxury (peacock tongues and nightingale tongues); also, the
cultivation of fruits in the most careful manner was pursued on a large
scale and for personal consumption needs.

Chiefly, however, there occurred a depopulation and desolation of the
entire land because of the widespread planting of vineyards and olive
orchards. There was also a very unsatisfactory development of craft
production, only for meeting immediate needs for tools and implements;
other than that, everything was imported from Asia Minor; even the best
tools and implements were brought from there.

Where earlier there had been 100–150 peasant farms, now there stood one
latifundium, worked by 50 slaves. The slaves were not married and were
not allowed to marry. The peasant farmers had either been sent off as
soldiers to every possible foreign land or they lived as jobless
proletarians in Rome.

Finally there remained the wealthy classes and the nobility. ([Theodor]
Mommsen and Meyer always speak about Roman capitalists; but by that they
understand simply wealthy people.)⁴⁶

In Rome, in a later period than in Greece, there was so to speak no
function for these classes. Greece had been subjugated politically by
Rome, but spiritually and intellectually Greece dominated until the
Middle Ages. Greek philosophy, art, and everything that could be
achieved on the basis of the slave economy of antiquity had already been
perfected by Greece. Rome merely had to borrow it, appropriate it, take
possession of it. From then on Rome lived, one could say, as a sponger
or freeloader.

For this reason the ruling classes in Rome separated themselves from
mental labor as well [as physical]. In this second period the slaves
represented not merely labor power on the landed estate, but they also
undertook all functions in the city; thus there were slaves who
performed mental labor. Slaves were bookkeepers, accountants, teachers,
artists, actors, dancers, musicians, and architects. There was no sphere
of public life that slaves did not engage in. That they could carry out
these mental and intellectual functions was due to the fact that in many
cases they were prisoners of war who came from culturally developed
lands and had previously been free citizens. There were, for example, a
great many Greeks formerly of noble descent who later served as slaves
in Rome. For work on the plantations [Rome] took from the backward
populations, but for work in the cities it took from the intellectually
developed populations.

Rome arrived at this conclusion: everything related to work is slave
work, both physical and mental. In Greece only physical labor had been
regarded as slave work.

The consequences of this development went so far that the following was
true: on the one hand, _the masses of peasants were superfluous for the
production process_, and on the other, _the ruling classes renounced all
forms of labor_.

Thus in Rome the entire society lived exclusively on the slaves and the
subjugated peoples.

Grain came from Sicily, and there the Carthaginians had already
transformed the occupation of grain growing into slave work; the Romans
carried this further, to the utmost extent.

Now of course the living conditions of the slaves had to undergo a
change. _They were now completely reduced to the status of naked labor
power_. In agriculture they were labor power that was applied for the
purposes of trade. In this entire institution, or configuration,
everything worked toward a single purpose: to extract the maximum
possible from the slaves. A distinction must be made between the slaves
in the mines and on the plantations and those in the city. Whereas in
the city they represented the only intellectual activity and culture, in
the outlying areas [_MS. Illegible_] on a regular basis they were
chained and driven to work with whips and locked up at night in
underground dungeons. They were branded on the forehead so that they
would be recognizable and identifiable as slaves. They were released
from detention only to be driven to work. They were not allowed to
marry.

In that period they drove out free labor entirely and produced only for
export. These relations inevitably led to _slave revolts_, particularly
because the slaves had previously been free.

In the second century BC Rome was shaken by powerful slave revolts.

In 184 BC there was a slave revolt in _Apulia_.⁴⁷ In the suppression of
this revolt 7,000 slaves were killed.

In 195 BC there was a large uprising in _Etruria_.⁴⁸ In this slave
revolt there were pitched battles with the Roman armies.

In 197 BC [there was a slave revolt] in _Latium_, where Rome is also
located.

Later there began the most threatening of all: the _Sicilian_ slave
revolts.⁴⁹

In 143–141 BC, another powerful uprising, in which 7,000 armed slaves
took part. Here too there were pitched battles. After the rebellion was
put down 20,000 slaves were crucified.

In 130 BC again there were a series of slave revolts in Italy in the
course of which 4,600 slaves were executed. In 113 BC occurred the
_second Sicilian slave revolt_, which lasted for two years.⁵⁰

In 73 BC, _the third Sicilian slave revolt_, led by the famous
_Spartacus_.⁵¹

Then in _Greece, in Attica_, the slaves revolted. Here they were so
rebellious that they could be driven to work only with the use of
weapons.

_Third Period_

In the _first century AD_ the third period in the history of Roman
slavery begins. We need only draw the consequences from the development
that has gone before in order to have a the necessary picture before us.

The slaves consisted of prisoners of war. But as a result of all the
wars an empire had been founded on a world scale. Now a limit was placed
on the wars. When this limit was reached the importing of prisoners of
war from other countries dried up.

At the same time the peasant farmers, who had been the economic basis
for Rome’s world domination and who had been necessary for Rome’s wars,
had been annihilated or ruined. We have seen the collapse of peasant
agriculture. The peasantry was transformed from a social stratum that
sat on its own plot of land and had an interest in [the functionings of]
the state, transformed into a mass that served only as cannon fodder for
the interests of the nobility. For war it is not only necessary to have
a certain number of soldiers with weapons but also the wars must serve
their interests to some degree. The ruined peasant farmer lost his
strength both morally and physically. With the downfall of the peasantry
the level and quality of nutrition declined. In the second century [AD]
meat and milk disappeared from the diet of the peasant farmers. As a
result fewer and fewer of them were capable of bearing arms.

_The rise of mercenary armies_. Foreign, barbarian, mainly German people
were recruited. And thus we see hired Germans being led against Roman
citizens in time of [civil] war.

A combination of different lands and peoples came together in the Roman
army. Only the officers were Romans. There were bound to be dire
consequences from the fact that only foreign people who had come
together accidentally were waging war. In the end they acquired great
power and it was they who finally placed one or another Caesar [i.e.,
emperor] on the throne. They put one on the throne because he impressed
them with his ability to sweat prodigiously. That is a fine illustration
of the sanctity of the office of emperor. Those were the ultimate
consequences of having foreign mercenary armies.

What results followed from all this for the economy of the latifundia
and the slaves themselves?

Above all there was this: _a major change was introduced into slavery
itself_. The mistreatment of slaves that had occurred in the second
period was now impossible. Since slaves were no longer to be had freshly
from each war, they had to be taken care of, treated differently. In the
first century AD and thereafter a much milder form of slavery began. It
is constantly maintained that Christianity brought this about. But it is
exclusively the consequence of the fact that this labor power now had to
be valued more highly, because there was no longer any surplus of it to
be had.

Now slaves had to be permitted to marry so that they could reproduce.
This fact alone meant a better living situation for the slaves. Also a
slave had to be treated differently when he himself had a family, when
he had children; he had to be paid as much as was necessary for him to
maintain his children.

The more the proletariat gathered in Rome in large numbers, the more
soldiers had to be richly rewarded for their services, and the more the
proletariat had to be pacified with gifts—all the more had to be
squeezed out of the foreigners in the subjugated provinces. That led to
the decline of the subjugated populations, so that grain imports
suffered.

Thus, _Rome had to return to the cultivation of grain_. The livestock
pastures were turned back into grain fields.

The latifundia were operated with slave labor. However, grain growing
was not possible with slave labor [in the form it had] up until then.
First of all, the number of slaves was too small, and second, they had
already been drilled and trained for work in the vineyards and olive
orchards, but grain growing meant a return to a higher form of intensive
agriculture.

And thus there came _a return to small peasant farming_.

The latifundia were broken up into individual parcels that were given
partly to slaves with families and partly to free peasant farmers in
return for certain payments or taxes, mainly payments in kind; because
it was no longer possible to use money to pay farmers. For this purpose
they leased land to those who had been hired as a protection against
wars,⁵² and so forth. Thus there was a return to a kind of _corvée_
labor.⁵³

In Rome this was called [land worked] by the _colonus_.⁵⁴ (From this we
can derive the first beginnings of the corvée economy of the Middle
Ages.)

There was one more necessity that forced the return to the colonus. The
nourishment of the slaves was too inadequate. In the interests of the
economy itself it had to be recognized that the slave took increasingly
less interest in the work. Here again this is a very instructive
example: It is a mistake to suppose that one needs only to have power
and assert one’s [military] might in order to exploit labor without
there being any enticement for the exploited.

In Rome the result was a complete ruination of labor power.

E.g., slaves [working] in the mines [_MS. Illegible—several lines_]

The power of the exploited to do mental labor was also broken by
exploitation.

Here the production process necessarily had to break down, because labor
power was ruined by exploitation.

Such primitive labor by the slaves could never be carried out without
tools. The relations were such that the slaves had a terrible hatred for
the tools of their labor. They destroyed them along with the materials
to be worked on. Such hatred between the living form of labor and the
dead means of production had been created that a constant war between
them prevailed.

The slaves gradually developed into the most expensive and least
convenient force of production and for that reason there came to be
fewer and fewer of them.

So then, to summarize:

The economy of slavery reached rock bottom of its own accord.

In the main, that is how the cycle of the historical development of
slavery in the Roman Empire closed upon itself.

In general there was a return to the relations of old. This shows that
it was not only the Germans who brought about the destruction [of the
Roman Empire]. Rome was already ripe prey for foreign conquest after
such consequences had been arrived at as a result of its own
development.


WHAT ADVANCES ON THE WHOLE DID SLAVERY BRING ABOUT?

_Greco-Roman culture_ is _something whole_ even if we distinguish among
particular configurations.

(1) _Slavery carried through [conclusively] the division separating
mental and physical labor_. This has remained true to the present day,
and is a fundamental fact, or reality, for the entire forward
development of class society. Without it the mental-spiritual
development [that we have] today would not have been possible.

In Greece this fundamental fact, or reality, was established as the
distinction between freemen and slaves, and then took on various forms.
But with the Roman Empire [this distinction] was transmitted to
posterity.

_Christianity emerged in the Roman Empire_ (here Rome being taken not as
the state). It would not have arisen without Greek philosophy, which is
one of the main roots of Christianity. And Greek philosophy rested
upon—slave labor. But since Christianity is, so to speak, the legacy of
the Roman Empire, it has come to dominate the entire modern era: Without
Christianity, which was engendered by slavery, there could be no thought
of the Middle Ages or capitalism, nor of the disposition of class forces
in the modern world, and without the latter, socialism is inconceivable.
The socialist revolution will be the first to eliminate this remnant of
the legacy from Rome. (Christianity is one more proof, so to speak, that
Rome based itself on Greece.)

_The state as the coercive power in class society_ arose in Greece on
the basis of slavery, and in Rome we see its continuation, carried to
the utmost extreme. The state apparatus in Rome was much more extensive
and more fully developed [than in Greece].

One proof of this is the _founding of the Roman world empire_.

In Greece, the leading states were Sparta and Athens, but they were
cities, covering only a small area of the country.

In Rome, however, [we see] the gathering together of many lands, which
as provinces of Rome came under the same binding laws as the Romans did.
This was the first time that such a monstrously huge empire was brought
together and ruled from a single center in a uniform manner. It was
bound to fall apart because of economic reasons, not because of defects
in its political institutions.

Such uniform political organization is a mighty step forward. Here too
the Roman Empire had much more powerful consequences than Greece.⁵⁵

Why could the slaves not produce a higher culture, using the concept of
culture in the broadest sense, as a whole, since they did constitute
labor power?

Since the slaves were already destroying the crudest tools and
implements, how could one give them better ones? In the end, the only
means of production being used were utterly crude ones.

_Slave labor itself was a fetter on technical progress_.

The inner tendency of slavery is to develop into the self-destruction of
labor power. This is also true today. The most drastic expression of
this is the constant struggle to shorten the working day. But other
circumstances also bring with them the fact that the condition of
capitalist society itself ordains that this will happen.

Otherwise a deadly stagnation would set in that would destroy society.

In the southern states in North America, as a result of the introduction
of cotton, sugar, and rice plantations, exploitation on a purely
capitalist basis was driven so far and to such an extent that the slaves
on average were worked to death in seven years. That is proof that
capitalism too has the tendency to destroy labor power.

Since this tendency toward the destruction of labor power existed under
slavery, it is therefore a given that economic development could advance
no further.

_The slave revolts were the first immense, world-historical class
struggles against the exploiters_. Not the free peasants, not the
proletarians in Rome.

The slave revolts (including 70,000 slaves in Sicily) were completely
without results. They were smashed by Rome [even though it was] ailing
and rotten. The slaves wanted to return to their homelands; they wanted
to break loose and get away from society entirely. They were only partly
successful, to the extent that they escaped, some to their homelands,
some joining robber bands or becoming pirates.

The slave revolts remained without consequence, because any further
development of them was not based on any trend of economic development.
The development of the economy at that point had ended in a blind alley.

The decline of the Roman Empire meant in the most precise sense that it
was compelled to return to previously existing forms. Therefore, the
uprisings of the slaves had been futile.

The economic form exhausted itself, it did not allow for a higher form
of economic development.

One ought not to forget the great steps forward brought about by Rome,
despite its fall.

The entire mental-spiritual [aspect] of life was concentrated in Rome,
as was the material [culture].

The gods of all the subjugated peoples⁵⁶ were dragged to Rome, so that a
concentration of all the religious cults and observances were to be
found there as well.

The Roman Empire fell back into barbarism, in the literal sense.

Only around the tenth century AD did commerce in Italy begin to rise
again.

In the Middle Ages, as soon as dividing lines of class emerged in the
new German society, they arose on the basis of those in Rome, [and as a
result] when this new society began to flourish, it was receptive to and
capable of responding to a higher form of mental-spiritual development,
and thus people [readily] took to Greek culture [in] the Renaissance
era, [and in] the time of the Humanists.

_Nothing was lost from [the heritage of] mental-spiritual culture
because of Rome_.

_Christianity tore the Germans out of barbarism_. Despite the fact that
the Germans broke the Roman Empire to bits—on the spiritual-intellectual
level they adopted Christianity. And this Christianity was the product
of the Roman Empire; it had prepared the ground politically for a world
revolution.

_In Greece, craft production experienced a refinement_, which would not
have been possible without slavery. In Rome, by way of contrast, it was
forced backward by the pressures of world trade, reverting to a kind of
lower form. Only the crudest articles for their own use were produced by
the slaves or peasant farmers; all finer products were imported from the
subjugated lands. In this respect Roman slavery brought no progress.

One forward step was the development of horticulture. Even today we
still base ourselves on it. Even today the purpose of horticulture is,
as it was in Rome, to provide a finer way of life for the rulers.

_The raising of livestock_ began to take on wider scope. But the crudest
elements among the slaves were assigned to it. They were also the first
to start slave revolts, because they were left entirely to themselves.
Livestock raising became very widespread, but was managed very crudely,
mainly aiming at quantity.

Because of livestock raising, _agriculture_ declined; that was a _step
backward_. In Rome the economy of slavery began to have a distinctly
reactionary effect.

Poultry farming, in contrast, represented a step forward.

The management of the large estates was exemplary. On the manorial
estates of Charlemagne [modelled on those of Rome] we find products that
show specifically what progress Rome had achieved in agriculture even
with its economy of slavery.

Thus Rome had a progressive as well as reactionary impact.

_In the Orient_, there was also slavery, but there it remained more or
less in the beginning stages. And to the extent that it flourished, it
was soon destroyed by wars of conquest. Slavery became highly developed
for the first time in Greece and Rome.


REFERENCES ON SLAVERY

Dietzgen:

_Wesen der menschlichen Kopfarbeit_⁵⁷

Vorländer:

_Geschichte der Philosophie_.⁵⁸

Engels:

_Eugen Dührings Umwälzung der Wissenschaft_.⁵⁹

Eduard Meyer:

_Die wirtschaftliche Entwicklung des Altertums. Ein Vortrag_, 1895.

Eduard Meyer:

_Die Sklaverei im Altertum_, 1898.

Eduard Meyer:

Several articles in _Handwörterbuch der Staatswissenschaften_ on
“Bevölkerung im Altertum.”⁶⁰

Kautsky:

_Vorläufer des neueren Sozialismus_.⁶¹ Erster Band: Plato.

Kautsky:

_Ursprung des Christentums_⁶² (see note at bottom of page).⁶³

Engels:

_Feuerbach und der Ausgang der klassischen Philosophie_.⁶⁴

Beloch:

_Griechische Geschichte_.⁶⁵

Prof. Bücher:

_Entstehung der Volkswirtschaf_.⁶⁶

Mommsen:

_Römische Geschichte_ (The fundamental work on the subject).⁶⁷

Prof. Max

In the _Handwörterbuch der Staatswissenschaften_, see the article on

Weber:

“Agrarian Relations.”⁶⁸

Paul Ernst:

Article on “Griechische Geschichte” or “Griechische Sklaverei” in der
_Neue Zeit_, 11. Jahrgang, 2. Band (appeared in 1894 or 1893).⁶⁹

Children’s supplement to _Gleichheit_ Nr. 13, 14, 15, Jahrgang 1908/09:
“Aus der römischen Geschicht.”⁷⁰

Children’s supplement to _Gleichheit_: (?? Number): “Der Sklavenaufstand
in Sizilien.”⁷¹



NOTES ABOUT THE ECONOMIC FORM OF ANTIQUITY/SLAVERY¹


Eighty sheep one herdsman, for 50 horses, 2 persons.²

The price of slaves.

One can get some idea of the price of slaves in the Roman Empire from
the fact that from 357 to 209 [BC] (148 years) the amount one had to pay
to buy one’s freedom was 4,000 pounds of gold.


PRICES

Cato (234–149 [BC]) said that he never paid more than [the equivalent
of] 1,179 marks and that every slave under 20 years [of age] who cost
more than 1,754 he regarded as a luxury item. Incidentally, prices
reached such a low level that the slaves from among the spoils of war
taken by Lucullus in Pontus (74–69 [BC])³ were sold for [the equivalent
of] 3.14 marks.


TECHNICAL ADVANCES IN ROME

They came mostly from the provinces: a better threshing tool (the
_tribulum_) came from Africa.

From Gaul [came] a better way of grafting grapevines and a better way of
mowing hay, as well as a new form of ploughshare with wheels. Also in
Gaul, grain was harvested by a kind of machine pulled by draft animals
and steered by a person, twice as fast as in Italy.

Pliny said that one could do worse than to turn over the cultivation of
the fields to slaves from prison, because their work would at least be
profitable, as was everything undertaken by desperadoes.


(1) SLAVERY IN ROME (CRAFT PRODUCTION)

In Greece, the craftworks industry.

In Rome, large landholdings [predominated]. The free peasants were
subject to military service, [but] _slaves had no military obligations_.
(Hand in hand with that, agriculture was driven out by the raising of
livestock {with corn (being imported) from Sicily, etc.}).⁴

The slave uprisings of the second and first centuries [BC].

The Gracchi,⁵ second century (133–121 [BC]).

Rule by “kings,” according to legend (753–570 [BC]).⁶

The “Republic” (570 on).⁷

(1) The period up to the Punic wars, third century [BC].⁸

(2) The period up to the time of the Caesars, second and first centuries
[BC].⁹

(3) The imperial period (from 31 BC on).¹⁰

Predominance of small and medium-sized land ownership and of peasant
farming even on large landed estates (tenant farming).

Slavery on a small scale, slaves as family members engaged in
agriculture.

_I. Periods_

Throughout the sixth and fifth centuries [BC], the struggle of the
plebeians with the patricians.

(1) The plebeians were drafted into military service in the second half
of the sixth century [BC] (the Servian legislation¹¹). (Protected
relatives [_Schutzverwandte_] performed no military service).

(2) The struggle was carried further for political rights (the
consulate, the tribunate), participation [by plebeians] in the Senate,
and [the issue of the] _Ager publicas_.¹²

494 [BC], procession to the sacred mountain.¹³ The struggle against debt
slavery and for the distribution of the _Ager publicus_. A concession:
tribunes of the people (distribution of grain from state reserves
occurred as early as the beginning of the fifth century [BC]).

486 [BC] First proposal of an “agrarian law” (land distribution).
Struggles without results.

455 [BC] Distribution of building sites to plebeians.

450 [BC] Laws of the Twelve Tablets¹⁴ (easing of debtor’s law, on the
Solonian model).

366 [BC] The winning of a consulate for the plebeians. Alleviation of
the conditions of debtors. No one could own more than 500 morgen¹⁵ of
community land.

Toward the end of the fourth century [BC] the plebeians win political
equality. [Ever] since then, the conflict between rich and poor.

326 [BC] Abolition of debt slavery. Land distribution.

Slavery in the first period. _Familia rustica_¹⁶—agricultural slaves are
under one manager [_Oekonomen_]; [there are] also slaves who direct the
whole work operation. Slaves were bought at the age of plus or minus
twenty and when they became old or sick were sold.

The _villa rustica_¹⁷ [included] stables for livestock, a granary, and a
dwelling house for the _villicus_ and the slaves.

Often a special country house was built for the lords.

All slaves periodically received the means of subsistence in fixed
amounts.

Clothing and shoes were bought at the market. Each month a certain
amount of wheat [was distributed to the slaves]. (Rye and oats were not
yet known¹⁸—and the same with rice until the fifteenth century and corn
[maize] until the seventeenth.) They all had to grind the wheat
themselves, [and they also received] salt, olives, salted fish, wine,
and oil.

The _villica_ cooked for everyone, and mealtimes were held in common.

Slaves who had tried to escape or were being punished were sent to work
in chains (but in earlier times, the sons of the family were treated the
same way) and locked up in an underground dungeon at night.

For the harvesting work free contract laborers were also brought in—for
the [reaping of the] sixth to the ninth sheaf.¹⁹

Harvesting of olives and grapes was usually contracted out to free
entrepreneurs who supplied their own slaves.

The slaves were well fed, and on holidays were freed from work duties.
But slaves were treated exactly like cattle.

“A watchdog should not get friendly with his fellow slaves.” “A slave
should either be working or eating.” “So many slaves, so many enemies.”

Peasant agriculture differed from that of the nobility only in its
scope. The farming operation was the same, only with fewer or no slaves.

II—The coming of large-scale plantation agriculture (with wheat
cultivation)

Large-scale influx of slaves ([from] wars: the Punic wars with Carthage,
the Macedonian wars (the first being 215–205 [BC], the second, 200–197,
the third, 171–169), wars with Greece, Spain, Numidia, the Cimbrii and
Teutones, the Mithridatic war with the kingdom of Pontus in 68–64 [BC]
for Asia Minor, wars with the Germans and Celts, the Gallic wars of
59–51, and with Egypt, the Alexandrian war of 30 [BC]).

According to the records of _Livy_ (59–17 BC), the number of _prisoners
of war_ who were made slaves in the year 210 [BC] was 10,000; in the
year 208, it was 4,000; in 202, 1,200; in 200, 35,000; in 197, 5,000; in
190, 1,400; and in the year 167, 150,000! Later it was even more.

(1) The tenant farming system was driven out [of existence], the peasant
farmers being swallowed up by _military service_. From the time of
Marius on (+/–110 BC) even the poorer _proletarians_ served in the army.

(2) As early as 367 BC the _proletariat_ tried to make it obligatory by
law that landowners had to employ freemen in agriculture in numbers
corresponding to the number of slaves.

Capitalistic large landed property swallowed up the _domain lands_ (mark
community) and the peasant farms.

(3) (Tax) _indebtedness_ of the peasant farms. Usurers and proletarians.

(4) Lowering of the price of grain in Italy because of the import of
overseas grain. The grain trade run by the state.

In all of Italy the peasant farms driven out by large landed property,
agriculture driven out by the raising of livestock, and free workers
replaced by _slaves_.

_Every kind of work_ became slave labor. Educated slaves. Slaves as
stewards, educators, physicians, artists. Along with slave labor there
were _luxury slaves_. The _slave trade_, the hunting down of slaves in
all Mediterranean lands and the Near East.

The _treatment_ [of slaves] in the second period [became] worse and
worse: in _agriculture_ [there was the use of] branding, leg irons,
whips, nightly confinement in dungeons. Urban luxury slaves had it
better.

_Number_ [of slaves]: In the first century BC (the high point) there
were ca. 1.5 million slaves in Italy (and 3 million freemen); in Sicily,
400,000 slaves (and ca. 400,000 freemen). According to [Edward] Gibbon,
under Claudius (41–54 AD) the number of slaves and of freemen was the
same. According to [William] Blair,²⁰ on the other hand, there were 7
million freemen and 20.8 million slaves in Rome [i.e., in the Roman
empire].

(Second Period) State-run grain trade, massive import of overseas grain
by the state, partly as tribute, partly at very low prices, from the
provinces (Africa, Sicily, Spain). Grain from Sardinia, Africa, Egypt,
Spain, Gaul, Boetia, and even, at the last, from Britain ([see the]
Putzger [atlas, page] 9). The grain was used for the maintenance of the
army and the civil service. From the time of the second Macedonian war
(200–197 [BC]) the feeding of the army was permanently based on overseas
grain. In addition, [there was] the government’s price policy. Purchase
of grain from other lands at cheap price and its sale in …

Finally the government left it up to [tax farmers] … [to collect] the
very large grain tribute at very low pr[ices], and they could [then]
sell it in Rome at giveaway prices.

In addition, transport to Rome from Sicily and Sardinia was cheaper than
from Etruria and northern Italy.

Finally, all the subjugated provinces were forbidden to export grain to
anywhere else but Italy, which also forced prices down.

Consequently: 1) The ruin of peasant farming; 2) With large landholdings
[predominating] a transition [was made] to latifundia with slaves [as
the workforce]. Grain production was reduced to the amount needed for
the workers’ own use, and in its place [came] _pastureland_ [for
livestock] and _olive plantations and vineyards_.

Likewise, [state] _domain lands_ were converted by the nobility and the
rich into latifundia.

The _money economy_ develops strongly. As early as the second century BC
there were already numerous bankers.

The state encouraged this because it leased out all its revenue and
other major operations (the building of temples, aqueducts, military
roads) to private entrepreneurs.

_Craft production_ was developed only to provide tools and meet simple
needs. Otherwise products were imported: linen from Egypt, royal purple
from Miletus²¹ and Tyre (Phoenicia and Palestine).²²

Slaves were employed in all fields: commerce, banking, bookkeeping, as
customs officials, architects, actors, musicians, and in mining. Their
situation was _better_ than on the plantations.

The general _buying up of peasant farms_ and their conversion into
plantations. Where 100–150 peasant families had formerly lived there now
stood one latifundium worked by 50 slaves, most of whom were unmarried.

_A decline_ in the second century [BC]: There were not enough men
capable of bearing arms.²³ Meat and milk disappeared from the diets of
the people.

_Slave uprisings:_

In 185 [BC] in Apulia, 7,000 slaves were killed (in a bacchanalia [of
repression])²⁴

In 199 [BC], in Etruria, a battle of armies²⁵

In 198 [BC], [a slave revolt] in Latium.²⁶

_Slave hunting_, in Asia Minor, mainly by pirates from Crete and Sicily
(along the southern coast of Asia Minor). At the slave market in
_Delos_, the number of slaves sold daily was often 10,000.²⁷

(1) 135–132 [BC], the first slave war in Sicily, with 70,000 armed
slaves; 20,000 were crucified.²⁸

In 130 [BC] in _Italy_ 4,800 slaves were executed.

(2) 103–99 [BC], the second slave war in Sicily, lasting two years.²⁹

In 73 [BC], Spartacus in lower Italy.³⁰

In Delos, in Attica, and in ???³¹ the slaves had to be held down by
armed force.

The proletariat and the Gracchi.

Tiberius Gracchus [becomes] tribune in 134 BC.

Agrarian law: State domains taken back from the nobles and divided into
peasant plots up to 30 morgens in size with a moderate tax. Tiberius is
killed with 300 of his supporters. But the law goes into effect.

Gaius Gracchus introduces the distribution of grain [to the proletariat
in Rome] and takes leased state domains as the basis for founding
peasant colonies, [which is] also done overseas (in Carthage).

Revolt of the nobility, revolution, Gaius is murdered while fleeing.

The whole reform [movement] is shattered.

The end: The third agrarian law, according to which _all community land
taken into private possession_ is transformed _into the tax-free private
property of those making use of it up to that point_.

Third Period: Decline of the Latifundia Economy

(1) Exhaustion of the process of importing slaves, transition to the
breeding of slaves, conservation of slaves [becomes] necessary, killing
of slaves is forbidden.³²

(2) Lack of profitability because of the bad [i.e., unproductive] work
of slaves, transition to the leasing out of parcels of land to tenant
farmers [becomes] necessary.

(3) End of grain imports, return to grain cultivation [in Italy becomes]
necessary.

Result: Transition to a kind of serfdom and at the same time back to
free tenant farming (transition from a _system of military draft_ to a
_mercenary army_ from the time of Augustus—31 BC to 14 BC).

The _colonatum_.³³

Economic progress [because] of slavery: _the large-scale enterprise_

(1) A) In Greece, separation of crafts.

B) In Rome, large-scale cultivation of crops.

(2) _Division of labor_. Formation of the intelligentsia, the state,
etc.

Economic _plan_ under slavery.



THE MIDDLE AGES. FEUDALISM. DEVELOPMENT OF CITIES


For the Middle Ages the point of departure is the communal society of
the mark.¹

Greek [civilization]² also began with the mark and ended with slavery.
Then the barbarian Germans flooded over the Roman Empire, and from there
a new point of departure began.

The decisive difference is that in antiquity [economic] development ran
head-on into a blind alley, whereas the Middle Ages became the basis and
point of departure for capitalist development, and thereby also became
the point of departure for higher forms of development.

Now what we must keep our eyes on is the disintegration of the mark as
the starting point for further development in the Middle Ages.

Briefly summarized, this is what led to that disintegration:

(1) _The right to bequeath and inherit landed property_,³ out of which
[there arose] inequality; either the property was bequeathed to one
person, and thus others became dependent on that person; or the property
was divided up among all heirs, and thus was fragmented.

The _ability to dispose of inherited property resulted in donations,
sales, and purchases_. From this there arose the possibility of many
properties being gathered into a few hands or of property being lost
entirely. Donations [of land] to the Church; individual members of the
mark made such donations, as did widows without children, and so forth;
many also bequeathed [land] to their own descendants. Then, also, it was
mainly the princes who bequeathed to the Church (they had gained their
wealth through military campaigns and conquests) partly out of piety,
partly for purposes of mutual support. The princes gave their support to
the Church, and vice versa. It is characteristic that in almost every
description of the lives of saints or holy persons (particularly in
relation to the early Middle Ages) it is regarded as one of the greatest
merits that the king or some other holy person decided to make
such-and-such a very large donation to the church. For example, at the
time of Charlemagne, the Abbey of St. Germain de Prés already owned 25
pieces of property, and indeed they covered 22,000 hectares of
agricultural land [crop land], 427 hectares of vineyards, 503 hectares
of meadowland, 92 hectares of grazing land, and 13,352 hectares of
forest. The abbey of Denizel in western France counted [in its
possession] 15,000 parcels of land. Those were the smallholdings of
individual peasants. The cloister of

Lorch near Worms had 2,000 such holdings; St. Gallen had 4,000;
Gandersheim, 11,000; Tegernsee, 11,866; and Fulda had 15,000.

Further factors that led to inequality of land ownership included:

_The relationship between protégé and patron_. That meant: to give
oneself _in commendation_. What this consisted of was that one placed
oneself under the protection either of a larger landowner of the secular
variety or, still better, under the protection of the Church. As a
result in many cases it developed that the Church was already a member
of the mark community as a result of donations [of land] and because of
these, in the mark conflicts broke out. So that the peasant farmers
could obtain friends rather than enemies, they placed themselves under
the protection of the Church. This also happened out of religious
devotion, piety. It was actually heaven under whose protection one stood
and the lords of the Church were merely the representatives of that.

One other thing came up, which made the protectorate of the Church more
desirable than a secular protectorate. The Lord Protectors of the Church
were never as strict as the secular ones, because they never arrived at
such a great concentration of property. The possessions of the Church
were completely scattered about, and therefore things did not reach the
point of such a system of punishments as arose under the secular “Lord
Protectors.” Additionally, the spiritual [i.e., ecclesiastical] lords
were exempted from military service.

In addition to that there was another thing: the secular lords more and
more acquired public power and authority over those under their
protection. The power over life and death was separated very early from
the public authority [structure in general] … This had to be borrowed as
an extra from the public authority and power of the emperor. It was
forbidden for spiritual leaders to make use of the _Blutbann_.⁴ They had
to … [submit to] the public authority of the emperor. Thus the Church to
a certain extent was also under the power of the secular lords and
rulers.

We must take some additional aspects into account, as a result of which
the large landholding first took shape. To this category there belongs:

_Formal separation from the mark_. As long as rule over the land was
still in the hands of the mark, that was the underlying factor in all
the economic measures taken by the mark community.

Up to a certain point in time that could have been useful to the rising
lords, as long as it gave them the opportunity to enrich the undivided
mark and to force the peasant farmers to acquiesce.

Now there came _departures from the mark community_.

There was a name for one such type of departure: _emunitas_.⁵

Anyone had the right to that who owned at least three _Hufen_.⁶ One such
domain could _fence in, or enclose, its land_; that meant: here was
private property, and this had to do in particular with fencing off and
enclosing the undivided mark, particularly the woodlands. This
enclosure, or fencing off, of the woodlands was called _Einforstung_.
The largest of all [privately owned] forests in Germany appeared in the
twelfth and thirteenth centuries. That was one of the causes of the
peasant war.⁷ But emunitation had already begun at the time of
Charlemagne. (He lived from 742 to 814, and came to the throne in 765.)

This emunitation provided the rulers with _complete domination of the
mode of production_. In addition to that was _freedom from taxation_,
because taxes for the mark were eliminated. In the seventh century AD
the officials of the mark no longer had access to the manorial estates.
That was even true when a mark constituted a manorial estate in its own
right. Because no stranger had access to the mark without permission. In
the mark that was called _the peace of the mark_. With this something
was separated from the entire sphere of jurisdiction of the mark. Thus
in place of the jurisdiction of the mark came the jurisdiction of the
lords of the manors.

There was the same immediate result, even if this happened somewhat
later, from the exemption for spiritual lords from military service.
This is also an aspect of the reason why people preferred to place
themselves under the protection of spiritual lords.

Also contributing to the breakdown of community ownership of landed
property was the _Blutbann_, which indeed belonged solely to the
princely power. Before the Carolingians the power of the princes was so
extensive that they freely made use of the power over life and death
through the _Gauverfassung_.⁸ A _Gau_ encompassed several so-called
hundredths and therefore also encompassed several marks and mark
communities. The _Gau_ had natural borders. At the summit of the _Gau_
was the _Count of the Gau, who was installed by the princes_, and he had
the power over life and death, or at least he was the chief judge of the
_Gau_ assembly or the court of the _Gau_, to which the members of the
various marks belonged.

Even before Charlemagne these counts of the _Gau_ sought to make
themselves independent and to make their territories independent of the
princely power so as to take it into their own hands. Charlemagne strove
to introduce a strongly centralized power and authority and put a very
tight rein on the counts of the _Gau_. (His inclination was to establish
an empire on a world scale, following the example of the Roman Empire.
But Charlemagne’s empire fell apart, it was divided up among his sons,
and its downfall proceeded ever further, so that the political attempt
that he made proved to be purely ephemeral.)

The power of the count of the _Gau_ came to represent the highest level
of jurisdiction, [including possessing] the power to impose the
_Blutbann_.

After the formation of the lords of the manors [as a class] they too
sought to take the jurisdiction over life and death into their hands,
and for this they had to present their request to the princes. This was
achieved in particular by the ecclesiastical lords. In the tenth century
most of the ecclesiastical landowners gained the power to impose the
_Blutbann_.

There was one other aspect as a result of which landed property took
shape among the Germans quite early.

_In conquering the Roman Empire, the Germans encountered large
landholdings as a finished product of Roman times, particularly in
Gaul_. Frequently they did not divide these up and turn them over to the
mark communities, but kept them as they were. The princes distributed
them to their friends and retainers.

There was another reason for the rise of landed property, namely that
_during the conquests, entire mark communities were resettled onto
fresh, new lands_, through colonization; from the outset, they were
subordinate to and obliged to pay tribute to the lords.

In the year 846, the relationship between protector and protected became
a binding obligation. There was a law that no small landowner could any
longer exist without a lord protector recognized by the public
authorities. That happened in order to ensure public order and the
keeping of the peace. Since, at a later time, the individual mark
communities had become too weak to maintain public order in times of
constant warfare and to impose justice with a firm hand, they needed to
have a lord protector. The same thing occurred in England as well, in
the lands where German tribes had settled.

Thus there very soon arose two categories of the population:

(1) The _owners_ of large _landed estates_.

(2) The great mass of the so-called _Hintersassen_⁹ —the smallholders,
small farmers, who possessed only parcels of land for which they were
obliged to pay a tax or fee and who were subject to the public
authority.

On this basis by the time of Charlemagne the population was divided into
_fully free persons_ and _unfree persons_. The condition of being fully
free with land owned independently then became identical with the
concept of nobility. (The lords of large landholdings called themselves
_Adlige_ or _Edlige_ [nobles] as distinct from the unfree. At the time
of Charlemagne the terms fully free, noble, and knights were used.)

Charlemagne specified that _military service on horseback_ would be
allowed for persons who owned at least 3, 4, or 5 _Hufen_ of land.
Whoever had less land than that had to work together and equip one
[horseman] for all such persons combined.

And so, with regard to large landed estates, the Germans found models
among the Romans.

They also found Roman models for dependent peasants—that is, the
_colonatum_.¹⁰ And it actually did serve as a model for that purpose.


METHODS OF MANAGEMENT

Now, on the large landed estates there were two types or methods of
management.

(1) The estates [_Landereien_]¹¹ were managed from the manor house by an
overseer, or as he was called earlier, a _villicus_ (a term from Rome).
Here the _Roman villa_ [estate] served directly as the model for
management. The largest part [of the land], however, was cultivated, not
directly from the manor house, but by serfs, dependent persons, or free
peasants serving on leased land or as tenants on land farmed in return
for fixed payments. For the most part, the dependent persons, or
bondsmen¹² were initially taken over from the Roman Empire. The same
also applies to other conquered populations, the Wends¹³ and Slavs in
Bavaria, in Carinthia, and so forth. They came directly into dependent
status, bound to the land, under Germanic owners of large landed
properties.

And then they [also] evolved from the former free mark communities that
had placed themselves under protection [of a feudal lord], and out of
mark communities that had been placed in the status of _coloni_ from the
outset.

For the management and direction of the large estates, the time of
Charlemagne, with his constitution of _villas_ on the Roman model, was
particularly epoch-making. At the central point of such a _villa_ stood
the lord’s manor house, [which was] in effect a royal palace, or king’s
court, and the operation of the farm was directed from there. One part
of the lands was farmed by dependent people, bound to the estate, and
they did this work on their own account. They were called
_Ministerialen_.¹⁴ Among them were laborers, craftsmen, women employed
in the workhouses, foresters, waiters [i.e., household servants], and so
forth. Each branch or subdivision of economic activity was led by a
particular official representing the lord of the manor, who stood at the
head of that subdivision. Thus within the manor itself there were the
following: upper-level officials, and lower officials subordinate to
them, and—to say it again—each stood at the head of a single branch or
subdivision of economic activity, and they all lived on the manorial
estate, around or in the vicinity of the residence of the lord of the
manor, inside the boundaries of the manor. Again, at the top, standing
over them all, was a magistrate [or governor] of the estate, appointed
by the king. He had full power of supervision over the craftsmen, the
highest leadership authority over all the affairs of the estate, and in
particular, judicial authority as well. Thus, the judicial authority is
here [combined] together with the economic management of the manor.
Later [this top official] was given such titles as _Schultheiss_
[village mayor], _Ammann_ or _Amtmann_ [magistrate; bailiff], and
_Burgvogt_ [steward of a castle].

If the manorial estate was fortified, and at the same time served as a
temporary residence for the king, it was called a castle, and such an
official was then called the count of the castle. For the most part,
however, the lands [of the estate] were turned over to bondsmen and to
free peasant farmers in return for specified tax or rent payments and
other obligations. These peasants also settled around the lord’s manor,
and all of this, taken together, constituted a _villa_.

Most of the _villas_ of Charlemagne were located on state land, and the
origin of that was—the undivided mark.¹⁵ Other landowners, including
monasteries, seminaries, and so forth, also managed their estates
according to this model.

_At that time the estates that were managed on their own account
directly from the manor house were called manor lands_
[Salländereien].¹⁶ _Great liberties were theirs to enjoy. For example,
they were often free from having to pay a tithe to the Church. However,
for the care of the poor and_ [_MS. Missing word_] _they did have to pay
a tithe, and that was called the manorial lord’s tithe_.

(Indeed, it is well known that the income of the Church was apportioned
as follows: one-third for charity, one-third for the maintenance of the
Church, and one-third for the personal upkeep of the clergy. Naturally,
after a while all three parts went to the clergy. Originally all
[church] properties were for the care of the poor, but later that
disappeared, and they became the private property of the clergy.)

The great mass of the peasants had to pay all three parts.

Where the lands were cultivated by peasant smallholders, _the mark_ was
typically [responsible] for management.

Where the peasants constituted dependent colonies, one part [of the
land] was left undivided, while on the other part lots were drawn for
individual parcels.

Thus, on one part, the mark community was the model for economic
management; on the other, the Roman villa was the model.

The only difference was that the peasants were headed not by a overseer
elected by the mark [community], but by an official the village mayor.
Such villages were called mayoral villages, of which there were many in
Silesia and Brandenburg.

_A picture of such a fully developed estate_, and to be sure it was an
ecclesiastical one, [is provided by] _the Maurusmünster Abbey in
Alsace_.¹⁷

Two original documents have been found in the archives [from that time].
They are financial records, belonging to the lord of the manor,
recording what income the estate had and what it owed.

The documents were from the year: 1) 1120 2) 1144.

An immense territory belonged to this property, including a large number
of villages. In addition the abbey owned a lot of properties in the
Saargau [the Saar region], and besides that it collected tithes from the
villagers as a representative of the ecclesiastical authority.

All the income of the property belonged to the abbey. In fact the
various sources of revenue belonged collectively to the abbot.

He was obliged to provide lodging for the bishop of Metz and to the
German emperor when they traveled, as well as similar services as their
vassal.

The economic activity [of the estate] was directed by the abbot with the
help of the following primary officials:

The overseer held a court of justice three times a year in the name of
the abbot, at which all the subjects of the estate had to present
themselves. Accordingly the overseer received one-third of all court
penalties and specified goods in kind: one wild boar, 2 loaves of bread,
6 loaves of sugar, one measure of oats and 4 measures of wine. At
Whitsuntide [he received] 6 yearling sheep and 4 loaves of bread, as
well as oats and wine.¹⁸

The person in charge of the economic work was called a director. He
directed all the work on the subordinate properties, which managed
themselves. Every year on St. John’s Day¹⁹ it was his job to renew the
contracts, or agreements, with those who were obligated to give service.
He also set the day when the mowing of hay would begin, as well as
deciding what the price of wine would be at the time specified for the
subjects of the abbot to sell their wine. He [also] collected the taxes
that were owed to the estate by the tenant farmers.

At the head of each village was a steward, who represented the lord of
the estate. He had one _Hufe_ of land for himself, but he was obligated
to provide the abbot, when the latter came to the village to hold court,
with bread, meat, 4 measures of wine, and so forth.

Six foresters were in charge of the forestry, each of whom had two
_Hufen_ of land and had the right to make use of the forest in several
ways, but in return they had to provide the abbot annually with 1
suckling pig, 4 measures of wine, 8 loaves of bread, oats, and an axe.
To the overseer: 6 measures of wine, 6 hens, and 6 loaves of bread.
These primary officials had additional helpers under them with similar
obligations.

The peasant population consisted of free peasants, peasants obligated to
make regular payments, and bondsmen who belonged to the estate.

The first made a certain payment yearly for their parcels of land. Their
number was small. On the abbey’s entire property by 1144—in the second
original document—there were only 80 free peasants, obligated to make
regular payments, on such a gigantic estate.

The great mass [of peasants] consisted of dependent persons, bound to
the land [_Hörigen_], who were obliged to make various payments to the
abbot, and in addition they were obligated to give him three workdays
per week. Each peasant household had to provide one man for the mowing
of the hay, and all able-bodied men had to take part in the mowing. Each
mower received one loaf of bread, and on one day would receive meat and
beer in addition, and on another day would receive bread and wine. Each
dependent person who possessed one _Hufe_ of land had to work the lord’s
land for four days just as diligently as when he was working on his own
property. He had to work the land for three days in the autumn and one
day in the spring. Each agricultural worker during this labor received 3
loaves of bread and in the autumn received in addition some beer and in
the spring some wine. Each peasant household had to provide one reaper.
He received something to eat and to drink twice daily, and had the right
to a loaf of bread in addition.

Besides that, they had to pay taxes to the abbot.

The dependent persons were obligated to perform personal services if
they owned no land; they were called serving people, or porters. They
received clothing, food, etc., from the estate. These serving people had
to bind up the harvested grain, carry the sheaves into the barns, and
thresh them. They brought the harvested grapes to the wine presses and
pressed the grapes; they also split wood, heated the stoves and ovens,
and helped with the baking of the bread and the brewing of the beer;
they kept watch over the house and made everything ready when the abbot
went on a journey.

They also had to clean the prison and empty the sewers and so forth.

Let us observe more closely the situation of the various categories on
such a manorial estate [_Fronhof_].

(1) _The category of dependent persons who were not free_.

(2) _The category of personally free dependent persons_.

Those who were not free fell again into two separate categories:

(1) The lower serving people, especially field workers.

(2) Artisans, artists, actual servants in the manor house—engaged in
personal service—and the actual officials.

The unfree thus were bound to the lord’s estate and for the most part
were propertyless.

Those in the second category mostly had possession of _Hufen_ and were
bound to the land.

The people in the first category were entirely subordinate to the lord
and were not allowed to bear arms.

The dependent persons, or bondsmen who were personally free were the
ones called up for military service.

Those in the first category, the unfree ones, were also not competent to
claim any legal rights. Only their lord could demand revenge, or
compensation, in their behalf.

The personally free had the right to demand blood vengeance
[_Blutrache_].

(Those who owned no land and soil had no rights at all.)

Marriage between those in the first category and those in the second was
at first prohibited on the pain of death. Later, when the practice had
become so common and widespread that no one could forbid it any longer,
the principle held throughout the Middle Ages that children “followed
the angry hand.” That meant that children who were descended from the
unfree therefore always became unfree dependent persons themselves.

Thus eventually all were transformed into a mass of dependent peasants
bound to the land. The personally free dependent persons more and more
disappeared.

The personally free dependent persons stood between the fully free and
the unfree, the fully free being the lords constituting the nobility.
Marriage between the personally free and the fully free was not
forbidden, but it would have been marriage between persons not of equal
birth, and the children did not have the right of inheritance. An oath
sworn by a dependent person, even one who was personally free, had only
half the standing of an oath sworn by a fully free person.

The dependent persons were under the legal jurisdiction of their lord.

Following the model of Charlemagne’s estate, every manorial estate owned
by a lord, both secular and ecclesiastical, had a household of the lord
of the manor house [_Hofstaat_] with its household retinue
[_Hofgeleite_], and so there was a definite number of persons who always
constituted the lord’s retinue of household servants and household
officials. The latter were called _Ministerien_. Those who served in the
manor house were called _Ministerialen_.

In addition the following belonged to every manorial estate: the
seneschal, who oversaw the kitchen staff; the chamberlain, who oversaw
the stores of uniforms and the treasure vaults; the cup bearers; and the
marshal, who oversaw the stables.

Those were the uppermost officials of the manorial estate.

In addition there belonged [to the estate] household servants of the
lower rank; the master of the hunt, the forest master, the cook, the
waiting staff, the steward, the overseers, and the craftsmen.

They all belonged to the estate and were under the legal jurisdiction of
the lord of the manor. Thus what was later called service to the state
was at that time service to the manorial lord.

The public officials were nothing but officials in service to the feudal
lords until the late Middle Ages, and that was also true for those doing
military service.

All of these _Ministerialen_,²⁰ from the topmost to those at the bottom,
were under strict discipline and were even subject to corporal
punishment. A special cane²¹ [for beating errant servants] played a role
right up until the seventeenth and eighteenth centuries, and in the
nineteenth century we still find boxing of the ears.

Some of the officials of the estate were granted lands on lease by the
lords. These were the so-called benefices, which the officials at first
received as a lifetime benefit and in return for which they were obliged
to make certain fixed payments or services. Later these leased lands
became hereditary [property of the officials]. From these servants of
the manorial estate there developed a feudal nobility, which later
became the high nobility.

Thus the nobility had two sources, from below and from above; those from
below originated from the old families, which had been members of the
mark community; the upper nobility stemmed from those who belonged to
the manorial estate.

The latter formation, which evolved from the manorial lord’s household
and from among the household servants in the lord’s retinue, shows that
large landed property had already entered the phase in which it
_separated itself economically from its own labor_.

It is characteristic that in the eleventh century the Norwegian King
Sigurd²² managed and worked his lands himself and oversaw his own
people.

However, the higher the manorial estates rose and the more they imposed
themselves on the mass of the peasants as estates on which compulsory
labor was required, the more the lords gave up the habit of doing their
own labor. Their chief occupations became: military service, riding,
hunting and other sports of the nobility, and drinking. (See Lassalle:
Bastiat-Schulze.)²³

At first there was only the seneschal, the marshal, the cook, and the
baker; or seneschal, marshal, cupbearer, and majordomo (who was in
charge of the household economy).

As early as the eighth century the latter had the chairmanship during
judicial procedures at the manorial estate.

Later, each of these officials had an entire staff of lesser officials
subordinate to him.

The craftsmen employed in the lord’s household acquired an official for
themselves, and standing at a higher point above them was an official of
the manorial household [_Hofbeamter_], who prescribed the work they were
to do and directed them.

Later, in addition, the scribe, or official secretary: the
_Kanzelarius_. From which the [present-day public office of] chancellor
is descended.

Later [there was also] a special patrimonial official [_Hofrichter_] or
count palatine [_Pfalzgraf_].

Out of the counts palatine and so forth there developed the petty
princes [rulers of small principalities], and Germany’s numerous
fatherlands [i.e., small separate states].

In many cases manorial estates became the large free cities, or imperial
cities, of the Holy Roman Empire: Aachen, Mainz, Speyer, Regensburg,
Worms, Ulm.²⁴

Every larger manorial estate was managed according to the model of
Charlemagne, with the only difference that …

In the ninth and tenth centuries supreme juridical power—above all the
power over life and death—was transferred to the lords of the feudal
estates. In particular, most of the bishoprics and a great many of the
abbeys had the power of the Counts of geographic regions [_Gaugrafs_]
transferred to them.²⁵

The upper echelons in each state originated from among the vassals of
earlier times who had made themselves completely independent.

On the one hand, the free service people elevated themselves _more and
more to the rank of noble_. The earlier benefices,²⁶ granted for a
lifetime, became hereditary landed property, independent of the lord’s
estate. Out of this the higher nobility took shape.

In the lower stratum the different categories disappeared into _one
large mass of peasants in a position of complete economic dependence on
the noble lord_.

Together with that the economic relationship naturally changes; taxes
and other obligatory payments grow more and more.

And then we arrive at serfdom in its finished form.

Just as Charlemagne formerly provided the model for the manorial
estates, so too in later centuries the ecclesiastical manors became the
classic examples of the landholdings of the feudal lords.

The historical records from the Maurusmünster Abbey date from the
twelfth century. But we have other examples as well.

And so, [here are] two examples from _earlier times_. [One is] From
_France_, from the _second half of the eighth century_; according to
other accounts, [it is] from the ninth century: [it is called] the
benefices book-and-polyptych of the Abbot Eminont. [It is] from the
Abbey of St. Germain de Prés.²⁷

The second document is _the Polyptych of St. Emilius_²⁸ from the end of
the ninth century from the hereditary archbishopric of Reims.

The land area of these two ecclesiastical estates was divided into two
parts. One part was land belonging to the [ecclesiastical] lord and
remaining at the personal disposal of the property owner, that is, the
abbot. The other part was for the hereditary use of the smallholder
peasants living in the area, both free and unfree.

Hence two methods of management. This was the consequence of very
far-reaching historical factors.

On pieces of land that had been given away [as benefices], both free and
unfree persons make their appearance in the oldest documents. The
benefices book of Eminont at St. Germain mentions _entire settlements
with only free peasants_. But they already have obligations to the
lords. Annually each one had to work on the land of the manorial lord at
two specified times of the year to the same extent as the unfree had to,
and indeed they had to provide the equivalent of one grown man with a
plough and two oxen.

The elder in such a village is free from all obligatory payments; he has
his own piece of land. like the others, and probably had official
functions to perform in exchange for that, and probably we have here the
elected village chief [_Vorsteher_] of a free community. Thus [we are
talking about] communities that had placed themselves under protection
[of a lord]. They are still personally free and their village chief is
not yet an official of the manorial estate.

Individual peasants also have large pieces of land in their possession.
From that it is necessary to conclude that they made the same obligatory
payments in agricultural products (this is sufficient to make the
supposition that this had been a mark community). Its inhabitants had to
make no other payments to the lords aside from these [specified]
services. They also did not have the freedom to live where they wished.
That was in exchange for protection by the lords.

Thus [we are talking about] _half_ the [peasant] farms, but still only
as an exception.

_The tax payments show how things were proceeding for people who had no
plots of their own land at all_.

It was the right of each free person to provide proof with the help of
an oath [backed up] with seven [other] free persons that because of
poverty …²⁹ one was allowed to relinquish one’s claim to the land and
was obligated from then on to do three days of compulsory labor during
the harvest and to make other payments. In this way he [the free
peasant] became a dependent person, or bondsman, belonging to the
estate.

These free dependent persons [belonging to the estate] were still called
_coloni_ in the historical documents. A distinction was made
between … [(1)] _coloni_ and (2) those who had placed themselves under a
lord’s protection of their own free will.

Both documents also mention unfree smallholders. Again, these fell into
two categories. First were those who owned no land, [they were called]
fellows and maids [i.e., farm laborers and farm girls], who did personal
service at the [manor] house or who paid a yearly tax in kind or paid
money. They received a house to live in from the lord’s estate. In
return they had to make certain payments to the lord’s estate in the
form of eggs and hens. Second were the fellows and maids who did
agricultural labor in the fields. They possessed a house and a small
plot of land, a portion of a field, if also [they were regarded] as
free. They had to make the following payments: first, a contribution of
3 cooking chickens and 15 eggs annually, second, to put in 1 day’s work
per year in agricultural labor with a plough and two oxen. Those who did
not have their own livestock were free from [the obligation] of
performing agricultural labor with plough and oxen. [Maksim] Kovalevsky
concludes from this that labor with plough and oxen was in return for
the fact that the peasants could pasture their livestock on the fields
belonging to the lord of the manor, on the lands lying fallow.

The field under cultivation had to be sown and harvested by the unfree
peasants. They also had to do about 4 days labor per year at haymaking.

[There was] one category of obligatory payments for both free and unfree
smallholder peasants: to provide 1 wagonload of wood from fallen trees
annually; this was compensation for their use of the forest, [which had
belonged] formerly to the undivided mark community. Posts for fences and
wickerwork or reeds for roofs, as well as salt, had to be paid in return
for the right to make use of the lord’s property, the streams, lakes,
and so forth.

All the needs of the lords’ manorial estates were covered by the
peasants’ obligatory payments. They were not exacted by force, but for
any use [of the lord’s estate] the peasants had to make payments.

The later displacement is merely [the result of] this fact: Previously,
when the mark community existed, the land and soil belonged to the
peasants. Therefore they worked for themselves and the results [of their
labor] belonged to them. The displacement consisted fundamentally in the
fact that the owners of the ground and soil had changed; as a result of
the dissolution of the mark, large tracts of land and finally all the
land came under [the ownership of] the large landed proprietors. The
peasants still lived by their own labor. But the lords of the manorial
estates were maintained by the peasants, and the reason was that the
ground and soil, which had previously belonged to them, had been lost to
the peasants.

_In these old documents the historical sources of the later [feudal]
relations_ can be seen everywhere. But later, for example, at the
Maurusmünster Abbey, relations have changed so that the law stipulates
that the person to whom the land belongs [can] demand all possible taxes
and obligatory payments from the small peasants. A relationship of lord
to subject had developed in which the fact of rule by the lord comes
first and the economic relations are merely the consequence of that.

The course of development proceeds from this starting point with the
result, on the one hand, that whereas in the [early] Middle Ages there
were various categories of the small peasantry, with the passage of time
there was only _one large mass of unfree persons_.

In the beginning there were also large differences of nationality, but
later on, all of that was mixed together into a uniform, homogeneous
mass of unfree peasants, obligated to provide unpaid labor services to
the lord of the manor [_fronpflichtige_]. The taxes and other payments
kept growing more and more, to the outermost limit. In general, whatever
could be gotten out of them was extracted from the peasants.

In the end, after the taxes and other payments had completely ripened,
we arrive at the following categories:

_Payments in kind_. There were actually no items that were not demanded
by the lords from the peasants. All types of livestock, poultry, milk,
honey and beeswax, and fish. The [category of] honey and beeswax in
particular [was] a characteristic form of taxation under the feudal
relationship in which compulsory labor was required [_das
Fronverhältnis_]. The church needed beeswax for candles, and honey for
food. Then there were flax and hemp, as payments that had to be provided
mainly by women. The peasants even had to provide leeches, and in
addition, grain, wood, wine, [and,] all items required for the [lord’s]
household and kitchen, underwear in finished condition, handkerchiefs,
linen cloths, other finished linen items, furs, towels, leather, and
readymade gloves.

_Obligatory payments on palace day at the estate of the Abbot of Corvey
in Westphalia_.³⁰

On palace day payments [in kind] were accepted from the peasants, court
was held, and all the vassals of the abbot, who indeed were often
landowners as well, had to make their appearance and take seats at the
abbot’s table.

On one such palace day on the estate of the Abbot of Corvey in 1187 the
following were received: 6 fat hogs, 1 suckling pig, a large number of
hens, geese, eggs, and fish, 30 cheeses, among which it was specified
that there must be 2 quite large cheeses made from sheep’s milk, as
large as a woman’s rear end or so large that if one placed one’s thumb
in the middle one’s hand could reach the outer edge, a large quantity of
fruits of every kind, salt, pepper, 1 pitcher [each] of mustard, honey,
and beer, 33 kettles that could be used for cooking, 100 dishes or
bowls, 10 pots, 2 casks for wine and 2 for other purposes, 2 large cans,
1 mortar made of wood, a large quantity of oats, and so forth.

At a palace day of the Archbishop of Cologne (in about the twelfth
century) the following contributions were made: 24 large and 8
middle-sized hogs and especially for the major feast days another 12
middle-sized hogs, 24 hens, 230 eggs, 24 cheeses, 650 dishes and bowls,
among which there also had to be [serving] plates, and so on.

The natural economy did not continue up until the end of the Middle
Ages; there was a change to _payments in money, rental or tax payments
made in money_. It was no longer necessary just to satisfy personal
needs but also to make _money_. And that is when the real abuse and
mistreatment began, just as it had under slavery. With the change from
payments in kind to money payments the required contributions spiraled
upward to a colossal extent.

_Various forms of tax or rental payments [Zinses]_

(1) A ground tax for the use of the land.

(2) A head tax, a personal tax that was also called a body tax.

(3) A household tax [_Rauchzins_] for the use of the [lord’s] manor
house and household; _Rauch_ is just another name for the manor house.

(4) Money for watchmen, for the maintenance of public order.

(5) A milk tax and a grass fee for the [use of the] pastures for
livestock.

(6) Spinning products money; the linens and other cloths had been
changed into money.

(7) [Also there was] egg money, broom money, a hen tax, a tax on cotton
thread or yarn, a wax fee, a tax on bees, and an oats tax, as well as
marketing money, in return for the right of the peasants to take their
goods to market; a water tax for the use of water [on the lord’s land],
and a tax for the windmills; earlier there were water mills, and then
windmills developed, and the tax for the mills was transferred to the
windmills, which has been maintained down to the present time. (One may
read about this in the book Die _schlesische Milliarde_ [The Silesian
Billion] by [Wilhelm] Wolff. Wolff himself had been a serf subject to
compulsory labor, and his father had to pay a large sum so that he could
be allowed to learn [in school]. _The Silesian Billion_ first appeared
in the _Neue Rheinische Zeitung_.³¹ It was still a burning question at
that time.)

The livestock tax represented the compulsory labor service by oxen which
the poor peasants previously had to provide. [There were also] _taxes
for practicing a craft, taxes for allowing one’s children to learn any
profession; [also] departure money had to be paid for moving to another
village or to another district_.

Then there was _a third category_; it had three names [in German]:
_Kurmade, Bestraub, Gewandrecht_.³²

The _right of inheritance by the lords_; at first this had to do with
the inheritance of a peasant or a peasant’s wife. When a peasant died,
the lord took the best from the peasant’s herd or the best thing from
his closet. Usually it was the best horse, the best ox, right on down to
the best rooster. One document states the following: “No livestock
should remain there, and no good clothing, and then the best featherbed,
and if cushions or pillows are lacking, one takes the door to the house,
because it is also has four corners.” A truly medieval touch, this
combines naivety with gross bestiality.

_Fourth category: the right of the lord and his guests to be boarded and
fed while traveling_. This has the following meaning: if the lord wishes
to stay overnight, the master of the house must provide a bed for him,
with sufficient pillows and cushions on it, and so forth. It was
specified exactly what the bed had to be like. Even the _poorest_
peasants had to do this, and it was prescribed how _they_ had to make
the bed. It was also prescribed what the lord had to be given to eat.
The peasants at whose house the lord slept also had to take pains to
ensure a good rest for the lord. They had to keep the frogs [in the
vicinity] quiet, so that the lord could sleep peacefully. That was
stipulated in a document of an old [_MS. Missing word_] near Trier.
Indeed, this was one of the complaints of the French peasants at the
time of the great revolution [of 1789]. They had to spend entire nights
wading in the ponds and beating sticks so that the frogs would remain
silent.

_The category of weddings_. For dependent persons belonging to the lord
of an estate, a wedding permission was necessary from the overseer, and
in addition a tax had to be paid, the so-called wedding money. It had
various names, and as one approaches the vicinity of Germany some of the
names are rather drastic: the petticoat tax, the bed tax, the nightgown
shilling, and so forth.

Then there was the feudal right to the first night. A document about
that belonging to a convent at Zurich, which was the estate of an
ecclesiastical lord, dating from 1543, which means after the
Reformation, states the following: “And so when the wedding is over, the
groom must allow the steward of the estate to lie with his wife on the
first night [thus the lord had transferred his right to the steward, one
of his officials—R.L.]—or he must buy her out of this obligation with
such-and-such an amount of money.” The possibility of buying one’s way
out of this “pleasantry” was indeed a step forward.

_Protection money paid by the poorest peasants_, those who had no home
or land of their own and who paid a tax only as people in a changed
status as weavers (?), as people on their own, and so forth. These were
the so-called enclosed ones, the poorest of the poor. The protection
money had to be paid by them so that the lord, if a violation was
committed, would have to come to their defense.

_Protection money for prostitutes_, for courtesans. These prostitutes
lived in what were called women’s houses in the Middle Ages and were
subject to the jurisdiction of the manorial estate. Prostitution was
regarded as one of the crafts [of the manor], a horizontal trade.
Prostitutes were therefore called women of the estate [_höfische
Frauen_], which meant that they were under the legal jurisdiction of the
manor, women subject to the manorial ordinances, and they were classed
as “dependent persons.” (The term _höfisch_ [of the manorial lord] was
used in opposition to the term _“bäuerlich”_ [of the peasants].) In the
imperial cities and in other cities in Germany they [the prostitutes]
were under the protection of the hereditary imperial marshal, Herr von
Pappenheim.³³ This office was hereditary in the Pappenheim family. Until
the year 1640 protection money had to be paid to them. Only then was it
abolished.

The consumer use of prostitutes was very extensive in the Middle Ages.
During a council [of the Church] in Basel in 1451, 700–1,500 prostitutes
gathered there. At that time they were under the supervision of the
[_MS. Missing word_] of Saxony. It was the same at public political
events. When an Imperial Diet was held in Frankfurt in 1394, 300
prostitutes came there. In the capital city of each [German] state a
_Landeshofmarschall_ was in charge of the public houses. He was the
marshal of the court in that state, also called lord chamberlain. It was
also the same in Vienna. The court in Vienna obtained its revenue from
all possible sources and did not disdain payments from the prostitutes.
Only in 1558 did the emperor Ferdinand I abolish this in Vienna.

_Hunting rights_ applied only to the lords. Hunting was forbidden to the
peasants, who were defenceless against damage done by wild animals, and
they were also obligated to provide compulsory labor service as beaters
[for the hunters].

[This is] one of the most important categories: _payments in labor,
compulsory labor services_. And indeed there were [such categories as]
compulsory labor for a day, for a week, in the fields, at the lord’s
manor, and that included chopping wood and carrying water for the
kitchen, for the cooks, and so forth, as well as cultivating the land,
and [in general] everything that needed to be done.

Service as messengers on foot and on horseback.

In the state of Delbrück,³⁴ for example, there were special bearers of
venison, fish, and crayfish.

Labor service with teams of horses, when the lords went to church or
made other trips. There were special wine journeys [by the lords] for
tasting the new, young wine. Compulsory service on boats or ships
[_Schiffdienste_], rowing, and so forth.

Compulsory building services [_Baufronden_]: building the manor houses,
building kitchens, and so forth.

Compulsory hunting and fishing labor services [_Jagd- und
Fischerfronden_].

[And to repeat:] compulsory service as beaters [in hunting]
[_Treiberdienste_].

Compulsory dancing [_Frontänze_], for the entertainment of the lords.

In the [regions of] Gera, Schwarzburg-Rudolstadt,³⁵ and the Palatinate,
and so forth, for example, there were special Whitsuntide³⁶ dances.

Then there was another important category:

_Legal costs_ for violations of the law. Fines often had to be paid in
kind. If there were squabbles between women they had to pay with eggs
and cheese. There was a regulation stating: “Where two women were having
a scrap, pulling out each other’s hair, or hitting each other, each one
must pay our gracious lord one basketful [_Malter_]³⁷ of cheese or
eggs.”

_The transformation of compulsory payments and contributions into money_
began as early as the _twelfth century_.

Lassalle in his book _Capital and Labor_ (this page–this page)³⁸
describes the medieval economy. Lassalle derives the status of
dependency [bondspeople belonging to a lord’s estate] from serfdom; but
[actually] it’s the other way around; first there was dependency, and
then serfdom.

Slavery and the feudal economy were both at first for the purpose of
covering one’s own needs. But in both of them the money economy arose
[and became increasingly important]. Because of that the [previously
existing] form of society began to fall apart—the form in which work was
done only to satisfy one’s own needs—and the new [form of society]
emerged, which produced for trade. Under slavery this led to [economic]
collapse, the decline and fall [of the system].

In the feudal economy the result would have probably been the same as
under slavery if a _new starting point_ had not arisen. _And indeed
[that starting point was] in the cities_. The beginning of the city is
the village and the manorial estate [_Fronhof_].³⁹

The decline of productivity became evident [which meant] the economic
disintegration of the economy. The peasants more and more had to neglect
the cultivation of their own land. The decline of the land became ever
greater, and the physical incapacitation of the peasants grew ever
greater. This reached its sharpest point in France; the French
Revolution did away with this. In France this was expressed much more
thoroughly than in Germany. Because in Gaul, which means in France, the
Germans had taken over large landed property in finished form from the
Roman Empire. But in today’s Germany that was not so; in general it
remained a backward country, that is, up until the present. In France
[there was] unproductive agriculture, population increase became minimal
(that is even so today and it dates from that time), and there was a
high mortality rate, including among children. The peasants in France,
according to descriptions by writers at that time, were scarcely human
any longer; they could barely speak a few words, dressed in rags and
working their land by primitive methods; they were like wild animals. In
France [there was] the great revolution; in Germany, the peasant war.
These ended, however, in complete fiascos. They had a reactionary
program, wanted to divide up the land. This was stated by Lassalle.⁴⁰

A new path was opened that, as we can see in retrospect, brought freedom
to the peasants and unfolded entirely new prospects of development for
the future.

[This was] another aspect of development in the Middle Ages:


THE DEVELOPMENT OF THE CITIES

To begin with, [there was] an epoch of retrogression.

The development of cities is a later phenomenon. Between the Roman city
and the medieval one lies an interval of several centuries.

The opinions of scholars on this matter are quite divergent.

An earlier, older trend among scholars traces the origins of the
medieval city directly from the Roman city.

Only in the second half of the nineteenth century did there occur the
unearthing of the old original records, etc. As long as these were not
known, it was natural to think that the medieval city was derived from
the Roman city.

The medieval cities in many cases began to flourish at the same
locations where earlier there had been Roman cities. Cologne, Basel,
Aachen, and a large number of others had been Roman cities. Therefore,
without looking into it further, people assumed that the medieval French
and Italian cities were a direct continuation of the Roman cities.

Two French researchers, [François] Guizot, a reactionary but a serious
historian, and [Augustine] Thierry are both adherents of this theory.
Also subscribing to it are the following German scholars: [Friedrich
Carl von] Savigny (a knowledgeable authority on law and the history of
law), [Karl Friedrich] Eichhorn, [Ernest Theodor] Gaupp, and [Heinrich]
Leo. The following works by these authors come into consideration with
regard to this question:

Guizot, _Geschichte der Zivilisation in Frankreich_ [History of
Civilization in France], first published in 1830–32.⁴¹

Thierry, _Betrachtungen über die Geschichte Frankreichs_ [Reflections on
the History of France]. 1840.⁴²

Thierry, _Geschichte des 3. Standes im Mittelalter_ [History of the
Third Estate in the Middle Ages].⁴³

Savigny, _Geschichte des römischen Rechts_ [History of Roman Law].⁴⁴

Eichhorn, _Über den Ursprung der Städteverfassung in Deutschland_ [On
the Origin of the Constitution of the Cities in Germany].⁴⁵

Gaupp, _Über deutsche Städtegründung_ [On the Founding of the German
Cities]. 1824.⁴⁶

Leo, _Entwicklung der Verfassung der lombardischen Städte_ [Development
of the Constitution of the Lombard Cities].⁴⁷

[There are] researchers who derive the medieval cities from the craft
guilds [_Zunft_ was the earlier German word for a “guild”; later the
term _Gilde_ was used]. ???????⁴⁸ [I refer you to] The following
scholars; they are definitive authorities in the field of city
structure.⁴⁹

[Wilhelm Eduard] Wilda, _Über das Gildenwesen im Mittelalter_ [On the
Guild System in the Middle Ages], 1831.⁵⁰

Karl Dietrich Hüllmann, _Städtewesen im Mittelalter_ [City Structure in
the Middle Ages], 1827.⁵¹

A different tendency: this one derives the development of cities from
the constituents of the mark community. This theory is represented by
Professor L[udwig] von Maurer.⁵²

Then [there appeared] yet another tendency: This tendency traced the
development of cities from the manorial constitution [_Hofverfassung_],
from manorial lands on which peasant farmers performed compulsory labor
service. This tendency was represented by Professor [Wilhelm] Arnold, a
legal scholar who taught at Basel in the 1860s.⁵³

From this material we are likely to conclude that these theories
collectively are not entirely wrong, but they are also not entirely
correct. They all contain a kernel of truth.

Cologne, Strasbourg, and Aachen [Aix-la-Chapelle] had undoubtedly been
Roman cities. However, while this theory was flourishing, there were two
circumstances that had not yet been clarified, and they are decisive in
this case.

The Roman city was fundamentally different from the medieval one. It had
been an extraordinarily strictly organized body, or corporation, which
was run by state officials from Rome, with a certain amount of
participation by the ruling classes of the city, but without any
participation by the masses.

In this regard the medieval city represents something fundamentally
different from the Roman one.

In the medieval city nothing has remained of Roman municipal law; none
of it had been utilized. That is the legal side, [having to do with] the
organization of the city.

But there was something that belonged to the essential nature of the
city, both under Rome and in the Middle Ages, distinguishing it from the
villages, an external characteristic, the walls that surrounded the
city. That was the first true sign of a city.

It is a fact that when the Germans conquered the Roman Empire, they
destroyed all the conquered cities, and in particular they tore down the
walls. After the conquest by the Germans, several centuries went by in
Rome [i.e., in the Roman Empire] during which absolutely no walling of
the cities took place, and a retrogression in agricultural relations
occurred.

As soon as the Germans had conquered the Roman Empire they settled down
in their old mark communities. [This is] a sign that a people does not
by any means leave the external product that it has conquered as it was,
but [such change] occurs only when that fits in with their social
relations. To the Germans the city was an alien product. They had no use
for it.

One Roman author wrote: “The Germans are people who love unlimited
freedom. They cannot bear to have walls around them and therefore they
tear them down.” That was not, however, the real reason for the tearing
down of the walls. The fact that the Germans had no need for walls or
for the city as a whole was decisive for them.

It was only at the time of Charlemagne, in approximately the eighth
century, that the building of walls around cities was begun again. This
is not yet the city in final form. However it was, so to speak, the
formation of the cells from which the city would develop.

The building of walls around all such manors became necessary in
particular because of the Viking raids in the ninth century.

Most of the former Roman cities did later become medieval French and
German cities. But why?

In the formation of the later city it was not only the king’s palaces or
castles but also the seats of the bishops that became the central point
of the city’s development. According to canon law only the seat of the
bishop [i.e., the diocesan town] could be surrounded with walls. The
churches and the valuables possessed by the churches were to be
protected; that was stipulated under canon law; and therefore the
building of the walls took place. Those Roman cities in which the
palaces of kings as well as the seats of bishops had been introduced by
the Germans became the largest imperial cities.⁵⁴ In contrast to those,
the locations that did not have walls built around them were transformed
by the Germans into rural communities. Many [so-called] Roman cities are
Roman cities that once again became cities after a long time as
villages.

The first beginnings of the walling-in of cities occurred as early as in
the sixth century, and in particular under Charlemagne [in the eighth
century].

What was it that was walled in?

The lord’s manor together with everything that belonged to it. Buildings
and lands that belonged directly to the manor.

It constituted a village if it was not walled in, and a city if it was.
That is the earliest distinction.

Frankfurt was walled in, in the ninth century, Zurich in the tenth, Ulm
in the eleventh, and Aachen in the twelfth.

It was not merely the villas [manors] of the kings and bishops, but also
those of the secular and spiritual princes of the realm who had their
manorial estates walled in, the manors becoming cities. Thus, for
example, Heidelberg, where the counts who had palaces on the Rhine⁵⁵
lived. They turned it into a city in the twelfth century. Apparently
most of the cities of Brandenburg have the same origin.

Even the small landowners had their fortified manors, and from that
there developed a city, for example, Brakel.

In the same way, non-secular institutions, monasteries, abbeys, and
seminaries, often developed into cities when they were walled in.
Münster, for example. The same was true of Bremen, which was given as a
gift by Charlemagne when it was only a village to the bishopric of
Bremen. Hamburg likewise was a village belonging to the parish of St.
Peter, and the streets in Hamburg still show where the formerly
dependent persons were located; for example, Bakers Street and Cutlers
Alley.

Likewise, Hildesheim and Bamberg were all formerly villages and manorial
estates of the clergy.

[Among the cities] arising from walled-in monasteries [are] Eichstadt,
Buxtehude, St. Gallen, Fulda, and Schaffhausen.

_Only those could undertake to establish a city, that is, to wall in
their manorial estates, who had public power and the authority to levy
troops_.

But only the free lords of manors had this power. For example, in the
ninth century the diocesan towns collectively already had the same power
and authority as the counts of geographical regions. Thus they had the
possibility of developing into cities.

[This was] the first beginning after a long period of purely
agricultural work being done … on the manorial estates.

That was a confirmation of Arnold’s theory.

But who was to be found inhabiting the manorial possessions? Who was
numbered among the population of the walled-in city?

First of all the rulers: the ministerial officials, the vassals, then
the dependents belonging to the manor, as well as those doing personal
service such as the craftsmen. In particular, however, in most such
cities destined for significant development, there also were present
several communities of old-time free residents. They had placed
themselves under the protection of the regional counts, that is, under
the protection of the public authority. At the same time, however, they
had avoided becoming personally dependent. In many regions of Germany
entire communities as free members of the mark avoided becoming
dependents, but they had to place themselves to a certain extent under
the protection of the great lords [of the region], and from this there
arose the small country squires in cases where a lesser nobility did not
exist.

In cases where they found themselves in the walled-in center of a
manorial possession, they preserved their personal freedom and had to
recognize only the public authority. From these arose a class of
patricians as soon as the development of the city began.

In this respect there is truth in both Arnold’s view and in Maurer’s,
but not in that of either of them alone.

With the further development of these manorial possessions which were
becoming cities the existence of the free mark community within it
played a role of prime importance.

(1) The manorial estate as a center of economic, social, and political
life; a free community of persons who had been free since olden times,
who had preserved their personal freedom and who constituted a decisive
element of the city population in subsequent times.

To begin with, after being walled in, the city still remains a village.
The primary [economic] activity in the city was crop cultivation inside
the walls. This work was done by part of those who belonged to the
manorial estates, that is, by the dependent serfs, and in part it was
done by the free members of the old mark communities, on their own
account. Thus, for example, in Munich there were city dwellers who still
engaged in agriculture in the sixteenth century. The raising of crops
and livestock, then, was pursued at first within the city walls. And
only bit by bit, as development continued, were the raising of crops and
livestock banned within the city walls and removed step by step to the
area outside the city walls. This also shows that the Roman tradition
was taken up again, only much later.

The gradual rise of _trade_ brought about changes here. Trade began to
flourish only around the ninth and tenth centuries. The natural economy
did advance during those centuries—and that was why trade eventually
arose, though belatedly.

A social differentiation had to occur first: a breaking away from doing
one’s own labor and the elaboration of a mode of life on a higher level.

Now it was natural that old Roman relationships should be taken up
again. Where old trade routes existed they were put to use again. Since
the Roman cities, such as Cologne and others, already had roads formerly
used for trade, they were put to use again. Trade tended to flow to the
cities because the people who had settled there were the ones who had
needs and requirements on a higher level.

The items of trade were luxury goods. They came mainly from the Orient
and from the south, and for Germany that meant in particular from Italy.
Foreign traders came with their goods into the country [of Germany],
where the rulers then acquired the goods.

Given the insecurity and uncertainty on the main trade roads at that
time and the difficulties of transportation, trade was not brisk. The
traders brought large quantities of goods and sought to defend
themselves along the way, making use wherever possible of the protection
provided by the rulers to whom the land they were passing through
belonged. In the manorial estates they had to receive permission from
the lords to have land allocated for them to settle on. Thus they soon
had the protective hand of the rulers over themselves. And the trader
had a judge⁵⁶ in the event that he was robbed while inside the city.

In short, a certain legal foundation connected the relations that arose
at that time. The trader had no rights at all unless he became a settler
[on the manor].

Thus, in the walled-in manorial estates entire settlements of foreign
merchants arose. For example, in Mainz in the year 886 merchants from
Frisia inhabited the best part of the city. In Lübeck as early as the
thirteenth century many visitors from foreign cities had settled, and
among those who appeared at the market were Normans, Russians, Swedes,
and Ruthenians. In Magdeburg as early as the tenth century there was a
separate church for the foreign merchants, which was called the Market
Church.

In Regensburg the merchants built a special separate new city, which was
called the merchant city. It had a street called Welschstrasse.⁵⁷ And
one part of the city was called Little Rome, which was the section where
the merchants from Rome lived. There was also a Jewish quarter.

In Worms and Speyer there were many merchants from Friesland, who came
to the city bringing their wine, salt, pitch, etc.

Where did the land come from that was used for the settlements of these
merchants?

Above all the common lands were taken for this purpose, lands from the
undivided mark community.

The first step then was the gradual dividing up of the commons into
allotments [_Aufteilungen_] for foreign merchants. From that it soon
followed that the raising of livestock had to be conducted outside the
city, and later on, the raising of crops also had to be done outside the
city, because it was not possible at that time to raise crops without
also raising livestock.

The raising of crops was done in part by dependent people [serfs] and in
part by the free peasant farmers. The dependent persons of course
engaged in agriculture for the benefit of the lords.

The main emphasis was placed on direct contribution from the small
farmers of the villages.

But what happened with the free peasant farmers who engaged in
agriculture on their own account? The land and the soil remained theirs,
but they could no longer support themselves on it. Trade was the only
thing that remained for them. These patricians were the first to become
home grown merchants. They were also competent, qualified, and capable
for that purpose. A tradesman must first of all be a free person, and
among the entire population, the old free ones [_Altfreie_]⁵⁸ were the
only free persons. Second, a certain economic foundation was necessary
for trade. And again, the old free ones had this. They still had a
certain modest prosperity left over from earlier times; some of them
even possessed a few dependent persons and possessed some feudal lands
on a small scale. They also had avoided the paying of taxes. In
addition, they preserved all the qualities that at that time were
necessary to constitute a merchant. The dependent persons [serfs] by
then had become too crude. For these free persons a perceptible
enrichment resulted from this transformation [their engagement in
trade]. Trade generally was on the upswing at that time. Thus a rapid
upward movement for these patricians also occurred. Who were the main
customers of this [rising] trade?

First there was the abbot with his entire large household. It added to
_his_ lustre if his vassals lived in a more refined way than the rest of
the population. In his entourage especially noteworthy were the higher
officials and the personal attendants. These began as dependent persons
of the court, but they belonged to the personal retinue of the lord, the
ruler. They were very often also provided with certain benefits by their
lords. They sought to make themselves more or less free, and when they
reached the heights they themselves became lords of the manor
[_Fronherren_], and thus they obtained a certain amount of personal
freedom.

They had a similarity most of all with the old free ones. Even now these
could be observed living amidst the population of manorial
dependents—living as nobles and persons of noble lineage
[_Geschlechter_].⁵⁹

In addition there were certain liegemen or vassals of the lord of the
manor, who likewise occupied a position between the rulers and the
masses of dependent people. These vassals owed military service to the
manorial lords.

Thus, two social estates, so to speak the upper ten thousand, took shape
during the first development of the cities. On the one hand, as vassals
or ministerial officials, they constituted the knighthood; on the other
hand, there were the old free families who made up the greater part of
the merchants.

This coming together of two elements, both of which traced their line
back to the mark community, the knights from the manorial estates and
the old free ones from the mark—the presence of these two social estates
was decisive for the development of the cities in the first epoch.

In the twelfth and thirteenth centuries occurred the first revolutions
aimed at liberation from the rule of the landlords. First the merchants
and second the vassals played a role in these.

Historical and political circumstances additionally contributed to the
revitalization and upturn of trade. In particular there was the period
of the Crusades. The first Crusade took place in 1096–99, and the last
one in 1270. The Crusades brought people into contact with the Orient.
They engaged in plunder there; and this happened with the express
permission of the Pope [who stated] that the liberators of the Christian
faith were allowed to plunder all unbelievers. Actually they behaved
like robber bands, with the result that the population fled at word of
their approach.

In this connection travel in ships also became important, because the
Crusades needed communication services across the water. After the Third
Crusade, Venice and Genoa had entire fleets such as the Mediterranean
had never seen before. Related to this was the first court of maritime
law, established in Barcelona.

Three classes took part in the Crusades, including craftsmen, among
others. They learned many skills from the Greeks and Arabs—in Damascus,
for example, fine metalworking and weaving; and in Greece, silk
weaving—and they transplanted these to Italy. From the city of Tyre in
Palestine they brought glass-making to Venice.

Cane sugar was brought from Tripoli to Sicily then. At the same time
there was increased trade in spices, such as pepper, cinnamon, etc.,
which played a big role in the Middle Ages, and an extensive spice trade
resulted.

In the cities trade was carried on by both domestic and foreign
merchants. For us special note must be taken with regard to the
domestic, or home grown, merchants. First there were the old free
people, who to begin with engaged in trade along with agriculture and
then exclusively in trade as agriculture was driven from the city. They
carried out their public obligations as they had before in the mark
community by serving in the assembly and as chairpersons of the
assembly.

We actually see, in addition, a transformation of this rural mark into
an urban mark. That is the central point of Maurer’s theory.

To begin with, the urban mark was a mark community inside city walls. It
carried out its public duties through elected representatives, but now
these are city councils. But this relationship could not last forever;
it did not have a stable equilibrium. After all, it was located inside a
walled-in manorial estate. The lords of the manors had already acquired
all public power and authority for themselves including the power over
life and death. Rising above these urban marks with their city councils
was the manorial estate, representing public power and authority, and it
also rose above the free persons from times of old. Thus there arose a
natural conflict between the urban marks with their city councils on the
one hand, and the power and authority of the lords of the manor, on the
other, particularly in all of the cities that were later called
bishopric cities, or bishop’s cities.

To begin with, there was a tendency for the following to occur:
everywhere the lords of the manors grouped themselves together in order
to subject these old free people and turn them into dependent persons on
their estates or manors, and indeed since they wanted to deal with the
city council as a public body directly subordinate to themselves they
tried at first to put one of their vassals in charge of the city council
as its chairperson. In many cases the lords of the manors succeeded. In
many, however, they did not—that is, in cities that were later to be
called free cities of the Holy Roman Empire. That was prevented by the
merchants as a group which already had some economic power to back
itself up.

In all places where they managed to form a social estate consisting of
the merchants with increasing wealth, matters developed into large
conflicts within the city walls and led to the first urban revolutions.
(The twelfth and thirteenth centuries are the period when the free
knights and persons of noble lineage dominated). That was the first
rebellion against feudalism.

[Here we see] the center of the first conflict, so to speak.

The persons of noble lineage actually had the material force to bring
the laws over to their side. The battles were fought simply with fists
and other means of violence, and these battles took the form of street
fighting.

The chief _dramatis personae_ in these conflicts were, on the one hand,
feudalism represented by the lords of the manors and, on the other, the
merchants. On the one hand, some of the latter had already become nobles
of some kind, and on the other, [many] merchants were at the same time
knights, or people of noble lineage.

The merchants brought the craftsmen out to fight on their side, as well
as those vassals or liegemen in service to the feudal lord who aspired
to become free from the manorial system. In all the bishop’s cities,
where the people of noble lineage and merchant families opposed the lord
of the manor, we see the knights taking their side and fighting along
with them. They were of the upper classes, but the great mass [of the
fighters] consisted of craftsmen.

The craftsmen to begin with were dependent persons. This is shown to be
so by Charlemagne’s _Capitularies_. Then there were those who belonged
to the mark community, and in the mark they were personally free, and
there they worked for the mark community as a whole, but on the manorial
estates they worked for the lords of the manors. From this it came about
that the craftsmen were able to do better and more refined work as a
result of their subjection to the lords. It was a step forward in craft
production that the craftsmen worked for the rulers.

On the lands outside the city each man made his own tools as much as
possible. As a result there were _fewer_ craftsmen in the rural mark. On
the manorial estate, from the outset, a differentiation of craft
production advanced further. Goldsmiths and others who did fine, highly
skilled work with metal were found only on the manorial estates, not in
the rural mark. On the manorial estate there were several people engaged
in each craft. Because a large number of people were now in the
entourage of the manorial lords, the entire retinue of the lord of the
manor also had to live in a more refined way than the rest. The mark
community, however, found itself under maximum limitation when it came
to the allotment of craftsmen, because the mark community had to support
the craftsmen itself.

On the manorial estate, however, the economic possibility of maintaining
a larger number of craftsmen existed thanks to the labor of others. The
_possibility_ of having several craftsmen resulted from the lord of the
manor’s having the manorial ordinances [_das Hofrechts_] at his
_disposal_.

In addition to that there were ever increasing needs. Thus craft
production became differentiated and refined.

In what way, however, did this refinement take place?

Through example and emulation … through the working together of a number
of craftsmen. An official of the manor stood over them, prescribing
their work for them. Thus there developed a division of labor, and from
that there came refinement and improvement.

Out in the countryside, in the rural mark community, there were fewer
and fewer craftsmen, and for centuries they had worked in the same old
way, using the same old methods. In Greece slavery had provided the
possibility of bringing together the labor power of many foreigners and
of their being led and managed in a uniform fashion, resulting in a
division of labor and a refinement and improvement in the work.

Now we see the same thing again, on the basis of the manorial estate.

The relationship of domination thus brought about a certain amount of
economic progress even if for the craftsmen it was a reduction in
status, a social degradation.

The more feudalism developed, the more the number of craftsmen
increased. For example, in Hamburg there were entire streets inhabited
by certain types of craftsmen. The craftsmen were placed entirely under
the legal power of the lord of the manor and were supported by the
manor; it was from there that they received their work assignments, and
that was the authority they worked for.

In this way [there occurred] a greater and greater gathering together of
skilled workers on the manorial estate.

Thus more products accumulated gradually, both with the growing
productivity and the coming together of labor power from various
places—more products than the manorial estate itself could consume. The
economic possibility arose for still others to work in the city. In the
case of a serf, a dependent person who worked only for his lord, there
was the additional possibility that with his lord’s permission he might
begin working for others as well. The lord of the manor granted the
permission, but the craftsman had to pay some compensation for it. By
this means the craftsmen gained the possibility of supporting
themselves. For that reason the rulers quite readily granted this
permission.

It was the free persons from olden times in the city who purchased what
the craftsmen produced. Both pomp and pageantry, were part of feudalism.
And the wealthier the serfs became, the swankier, the more luxuriantly
they could live. And yet these serfs remained serfs with unpaid labor
services to the lord [_fronpflichtige Knechte_].

Thus the _craftsmen_ were at first [to be found] on the manorial estates
of the feudal rulers. The craftsmen at first were supported as dependent
persons together with all the other dependent persons on the feudal
manor. The craftsmen worked exclusively to meet the needs of the
manorial lords. They were organized in the sense that all the craftsmen
of a certain trade were under one official. A single such branch of
craft production was called an _Amt_ at first and later an _Innung_.⁶⁰
At the top of such an _Innung was_ a _master craftsman_. The master
craftsmen thus had earlier been dependent persons on the feudal manor.
The artisans who worked under the master craftsman were called _Diener_
[servants]. That is the first point of departure for the further
development of craft production in the Middle Ages: a certain gathering
together of craftsmen …

What is most decisive is that they are organized into guilds, whose
leaders are called master craftsmen and whose workers are called
servants. Only when craft production was freed entirely from the power
of manorial law did the craftsman gain the right to become a master
craftsman. Earlier only an official of the manor could do that. Thus it
was only in the city that the craftsman could become a master craftsman.

The point of departure for this development was that a larger and larger
gathering-together of craftsmen took place, which led to a certain
liberation of labor time from the immediate needs of the manor. The
craftsmen came to be in a situation in which their labor time was no
longer overwhelmingly taken up by the needs of the manor. On the other
hand they had already become specialized. They themselves had the need
to work for others. The people who purchased their products in the
cities were the persons who had been free in older times, that is, the
people of noble lineage, the merchants, and the freed vassals and
ministerial officials of the manor, who formed a class in between the
lords of the manors and the dependent persons [bondsmen and serfs]. The
lords allowed the craftsmen to work for others, [first,] because thereby
the craftsmen became able to support themselves, and second, because
they had to make a certain payment for this permission to work for
others, and this payment was _in money_, which came in very handy for
the lords, as the money economy was on the rise; thirdly, the craftsmen
still had to provide a certain number of products regularly for the use
of the rulers.

As soon as the craftsmen became more and more freed from the feudal
manor, they acquired the urge more and more to free themselves entirely
from the power and authority of manorial ordinances. First of all they
purchased their freedom from manorial ordinances. That was advantageous
for the lords of the manor. Second, they were helped by an unbroken
series of revolutions in the streets of the cities, in which one
manorial law after another was abolished.

The money economy was developing more and more, and the lords of the
manors had a good source of money right there in the craftsmen. Material
interests and psychology went hand in hand in this case.

The craftsmen had to pay a certain sum to buy their freedom, but they
also had to provide a certain quantity of products.

For example, as early as the thirteenth century in Halberstadt the
shoemakers had to provide the bishop with shoes and boots both winter
and summer, and the bakers had to provide the officials with bread, and
so forth.

The craftsmen’s purchase of their freedom was a first step, which at the
same time became an economic basis for further development. The
craftsmen, step by step, began to free themselves from the manorial
estate. This struggle for liberation filled the entire twelfth and
thirteenth centuries.

The rights of personal freedom and freedom of marriage were introduced
in Worms in 1114 and 1180. (Sometimes the introduction of such a law had
to occur four different times, because the rulers, again and again,
rendered the right that was granted illusory.)

Personal freedom was achieved with difficulty in Freiburg in 1120, in
Bern 1218, in Vienna 1238, in Eisenach 1283, in Wesel 1277, and in
Brakel 1322 (that was a small city, and therefore the craftsmen won
freedom there only later). In Vienna the right to marry freely was won
in 1221, in Winterthur in 1264, and in Bregenz in 1409. Where the right
to marry freely was not granted entirely, a prohibition against unequal
marriages remained in force.

The abolition of forced marriages (the lord of the manor had been able
to force dependent people to marry) was abolished in Munich in 1294, in
Hagenau 1257, in Vienna 1221, in Freiburg 1120, and in Nuremberg 1257.

Abolition of _das Besthaupt, die Kurmede_ (?????)⁶¹ (those were rights
of inheritance for the lords)—they were abolished in Speyer in 1117 and
1182, in Worms 1180, in Augsburg 1276, in Ulm 1290, in Frankfurt 1291,
and in Münster 1309.

Personal freedom of movement was fought for and won in Freiburg in 1120,
in Kolmar 1293, in Winterthur 1297, in Basel 1542 (century-long
struggles took place here against the bishop), and in Bregenz in 1409.
These numbers [i.e., dates] apply only to the craftsmen. The vassals did
not need to fight for these rights because they were not _personally_
subordinate to the manorial estate.

Not all such rights, taken together, were won at the same time. The
south German cities at this time come to our notice because of the
battles going on there. They happened there because south Germany was a
cultural ground of long standing from Roman times, a linkage point of
the cities [with Italy], and an area where Christianity had been
propagated most widely.

Each city had to fight these battles for itself alone. At the same time,
however, we see a current of motion flowing from one city to others.
However, there were very large intervals in the process. The movement
began in the twelfth and thirteenth centuries. The result everywhere was
freedom from dependency on the feudal manor and the manorial ordinances.

Each craft, each guild came forward in its own behalf.

Just as the capitalists today crowd and shove the workers together into
one factory and thereby give them the possibility of organizing and
agitating, in the same way the lord of the manor gave the craftsmen the
possibility of fighting through the existing craft organization.

Manorial ordinance was an organizing power oriented toward higher needs
and therefore raised production to a higher level. One may simply
compare the mark community to the manors of Charlemagne to see the
progress of the manorial estates as against that of the mark community.

The craftsmen had arrived at a higher level of technology and technique
as a result of manorial ordinance. But social relations had changed and
grew up over the head of manorial ordinance. Craft production was the
first branch of production that outgrew manorial ordinance; manorial
ordinance ceased to be a progressive factor of production; it became a
fetter on production. And also for craft production.

Now the other two classes: the merchants [_die
Geschlechter-Kaufleute_]⁶² and the vassals, who also fought against
manorial estates. They preserved all the benefits that they had from the
old mark community and the new economic ones they had as merchants. They
are the ones who established the city councils, while the lords of the
manors wanted to subject the city councils to themselves. From that
arose a conflict. It broke out in confrontations in which on the one
side stood the merchants originally from the mark community and on the
other stood the feudal economic system [_Fronwirtschaft_]. The merchants
and the vassals persisted and engaged in intrigue, but the craftsmen
served as cannon fodder. Thus, again, on the one side we have the feudal
economic system and on the other the merchants and vassals in the
foreground and behind them the artisans and craftsmen, who were not
fighting for the rights of the city councils but for their own demands.
All of them taken together constituted the population of the cities.

The merchant families wanted the city council to be elected by the urban
population, with the manorial estate being totally excluded, because it
wanted to control the leadership of the city council. The merchant
families wanted to give shape to the city council on their own.
Meanwhile the craftsmen were fighting for their personal freedom. What
fused them all together was the common enemy. The merchants fought to
defend the freedoms of the craftsmen at the same time in order to win
the latter over to their side. The craftsmen could expect that the city
council of the merchants would confirm and validate their personal
freedoms.

(This disposition of fighting forces is reminiscent of the great French
Revolution. The following is characteristic: in the great French
Revolution we see the entire Third Estate uniting against the old feudal
powers. At the summit stands the bourgeoisie, and behind them the
peasants, craftsmen, etc. After the victory this camp of allied forces
falls apart along the natural default lines of class interest. The
workers could not yet gather up the fruits of the victory.)

Now comes the contradiction between the patricians and the craftsmen.
That is the signature of the struggles of the fourteenth and fifteenth
centuries.

The chief objective of the uprisings …

In addition, the freeing of the craftsmen from legal obligations to the
manorial ordinances.

The merchants promised and delivered to the craftsmen the right to
freely practice their trades, in return for their help against the
common enemy [the feudal lords].

In the first [period of this historical] epoch the free rights of the
independent city population and the liberation of the craftsmen from the
manorial ordinances were won by force.

And so, after that, we see the rights of a free city and the personal
freedom of the population living in that city. But at the same time
there were big differences in the political situation. The city council
was elected by merchant families, and they are the ones who passed the
laws and held legal jurisdiction. The craftsmen, who had previously been
subordinate to the law and the courts of the lord’s feudal manor, were
now under the jurisdiction of the free city’s court and legal system. In
this law court, however, as in the city council, only the merchant
families had the leading role and functioned as the rulers.

Thus the merchant families gained political domination in the cities;
the craftsmen [gained] only personal freedom without any part in
political rule.

From this there arose new conflicts between the craftsmen and the
merchants over political rights.

It turned out that the city now represented the only center within the
entire feudal society in which one could win civic freedom from manorial
ordinance. Previously the only person who was free was the one who had
landed property and was not obliged to make any compulsory payments.

Now something occurred that had world-historical significance; a new
type of personal freedom emerged: the craftsmen were now personally free
citizens on the basis of the craft they pursued.

Thus the city became a point of attraction for dependent persons from
the surrounding area, because one could gain personal freedom there. The
city was glad to offer refuge to those fleeing from feudal rule, because
all of these new arrivals were born enemies of the feudal legal system,
the common enemy of all.

The free city council of the merchants offered protection to such
newcomers within the city walls. There soon arose a law stating that a
dependent person who had run away [from the manorial estate to which he
belonged] and who had lived inside the city walls for a year and a day
could no longer be forced by the feudal lords to go back. If a feudal
lord discovered a runaway dependent person after a few months in the
city, the city had to let the dependent person be taken away. However,
if a feudal lord⁶³ discovered him after a year and a day, he [the lord]
did not get him back. A saying developed out of all that: City air makes
you free.

The city laws of Basel state: “If the lord finds him during the course
of the first year, he must be allowed to go follow [i.e., go back to the
lord]. But if this does not happen within the year, the manorial
ordinance is no longer in effect.”

City law in Saxony also states: “Whichever man has settled within the
city precincts for a year and a day without a claim by anyone [being
made against him] that person may fully keep his freedom, together with
his immediate family (next of kin).”

Besides that, the dependent persons in the city had the prospect of
acquiring property through free labor, either by practicing a craft or
working for the merchants.

Thus the cities became colossal points of attraction for those living in
the surrounding areas. A very strong influx began. Many times the walls
had to be rebuilt so that they extended farther out.

Growth of the city, and together with it also the growth of crafts,
trade, and so forth, and the expansion of political rights.

The gaining of freedom from feudal manorial law was thus decisive for
the dependent persons.

Now began the struggle of the craftsmen against the merchants. Most of
the dependent persons from the surrounding areas naturally took up a
craft, not going to work for the merchants. Thus the craftsmen increased
their numbers, becoming the great mass of the city population. Because
everywhere where the city became victorious matters ended with the
expulsion from the city of the manorial estate.

Crop cultivation and livestock raising were driven out of the city;
craft production and trade remained. As a result there was a wider
differentiation.

The vassals, who in the earliest epoch had fought on the side of the
merchants, were now to a certain extent placed in an awkward position.
Economically their status was on the wane. After all, they did represent
the agricultural economy.

Among the persons of noble lineage there was also more and more a
transition to full merchant status or else a move backward from the city
to the villages.

At this point after the crafts had defeated the merchant families … [the
process] came to completion. The merchant families removed themselves
from the city.⁶⁴ And toward the end of this epoch, in the fourteenth and
fifteenth centuries, we see the craftsmen as the dominant mass in the
city. That is the completion of the process of development of the
cities, which at the start had been under manorial ordinance.

The organizations of the craftsmen in their struggle for political
rights were called _Innungen_. They changed their name to _Zünfte_
[guilds] as soon as they had freed themselves from manorial ordinance.

Thus, in the second epoch we see the following: the guilds struggle with
the merchants over [control of] the city council. The guilds would be
the organizations that would take the city council into their hands. In
the twelfth and thirteenth centuries the merchants owned the city
councils; in the fourteenth and fifteenth centuries, the guilds owned
them. These are two clearly distinct periods of history. But
historically these two periods were interwoven. A few examples of this
[follow].

_Strassburg_. The struggle with the bishop over the rights of the city
begins there in the tenth century. The struggle breaks out as early as
906. Strassburg was a former Roman city, where the traditions of trade
and commerce quickly began to bloom again. This struggle lasted from 906
to about 1100. And once again, at the beginning of the thirteenth
century, the struggle began anew because the bishop constantly made
encroachments, over and over again. Only in the years 1214–19 did a new,
free city come into existence in Strassburg, and indeed it was the
result of an understanding reached between the burghers and the bishop.
Thus it was a compromise. As early as 1261 the struggle began again
because the new bishop refused to recognize the concessions made by the
old bishop. Nevertheless the city forged ahead, electing _Meister_’s
[city officials] and raising taxes, and so the bishop left the city
along with the other clergy and placed the city under a ban. The
struggle continued until a new agreement in 1263. In that year the city
won the right to freely elect the city council, and the rights of the
bishop sank to the merely symbolic function of taking oaths. The freely
elected city councils swore an oath [of allegiance] to the bishop.

In _Worms_ the bishop originally chaired the city council as the lord of
the domain. The city council was constituted from four free mark
villages. However, the city councils soon sank to the level, just as in
other cities, of being mere couriers [_Boten_], that is, servants of the
bishop. Then the city’s fight against the bishop began.

Now a third power stepped in, the emperor. He took the side of the city,
because at that time the imperial power was fighting against the papacy.
In return the cities provided him with taxes in money form. The
emperor’s troops were recruited from among the masses of the city
population; they were no longer feudal [troops]. That was decisive.

This process took particularly sharp form in France. In Germany the
emperors sometimes interceded on behalf of the bishops and sometimes on
behalf of the cities. They played a very ambiguous role. They sought to
squeeze what they could out of the cities, but they sympathized more
with the enemies of the cities.

Thus Emperor Friedrich I intervened in Worms. According to him, the city
council in 1156 ought to consist of 28 burghers who were merchants and
12 knights or ministerial officials of the bishop’s. But the bishop did
not accept this, and the struggle continued. At the beginning of the
thirteenth century the bishop tried to reduce the size of the city
council from 40 to 12 members, in order to reduce its importance. The
burghers did not accept this, and the emperor supported them. In 1220 a
new city council of 40 members was once again elected.

In the same year the bishops in all of Germany had their rights
confirmed by the emperor. And at the Diet of Worms in 1231⁶⁵ —that was
[the term used for a] gathering of all secular and ecclesiastical
princes in the Middle Ages—and also at the Diet of Ravenna in 1232,⁶⁶
they even voted for the abrogation of all city councils that had been
elected without their approval. And so all the concessions were taken
back.

The burghers and the city council of Worms energetically registered
their protest. At that point Emperor Heinrich VII once again changed his
attitude and in 1232 allowed the “dear” burghers of Worms, and
especially their city council, to again have their rights, which had
been taken away from them. With that, in 1233, things reached the point
where there was fierce fighting in the city. Since Bishop Heinrich⁶⁷ did
not want to accept this [decision of the emperor], a compromise was
reached again, and the emperor confirmed this one as well. The agreement
was as follows: the bishop recognized the city council, but the latter
was organized in the following way: the bishop named 9 burghers as
council members for life and replenished their number each time one of
them died [_MS. Missing words_] The bishop was supposed to have the
chairmanship, but when taxes were to be raised or [important]
consultations or discussions to be held, 16 burghers and 4 priests were
to be added to the council.

This agreement, however, was not actually put into practice. As early as
1235 this arrangement was cancelled by Emperor Friedrich II. Since the
burghers did not want to drive the bishop out [of the city], as the
emperor wanted, the emperor set up a new city council consisting of 4
knights and 7 burghers and installed one of his own ministerial
officials over them. The burghers fought against this arbitrary action,
and in 1236 the emperor once again confirmed their old freedoms and a
city council of 40 members.

1238 [_MS. Illegible words_] the history of all this back and forth [is]
in Maurer’s book _Geschichte der Stadtverfassung_ (History of the City
Constitution). Probably there are two or three volumes. [According to]
him the conflict was extraordinarily dispersed [over time]. In 1238 full
authority was also assigned to the bishop by the emperor … The struggle
was dragged out for so long that in the struggle between [_MS. Missing
words_]

Several examples from the winning of freedom by the cities.

The second period.

Guilds with old burghers [_Altbürger_].⁶⁸

Strassburg. [I refer you to the] Two volumes of the history of the city
constitution by Maurer.

Beginning of the fourteenth century. The cause of a conflict between
craftsmen and merchants in 1308 [was] a mayor from the Zorne clan.⁶⁹
This time the merchant families won, and many of the craftsmen were
killed, others fled and were then banned and declared outlaws. Many
merchants behaved with arrogance, which led to a new uprising. The
merchants let the craftsmen know and feel [in no uncertain terms] that
they held the power in their hands.

That lasted however only as long as the merchants remained united.

Conflicts among the people of noble lineage.

Romeo and Juliet.⁷⁰

Even today [of course] there are conflicts within the ruling classes.

The struggle had to do with maintaining the economic base, which was
common to all, on which they all depended for their livelihood, and
which stood in contradiction to the mass of the people.

In the ranks of the merchant families there were always two families or
clans who stood out above all the others in the course of the struggle
[as in Strassburg].

In 1332 these two clans engaged in a fight in a garden. One side had
strengthened itself by newcomers from the countryside, while the other
side allied itself with the craftsmen. That brought about the collapse
of the [previously existing] constitution, and the craftsmen were
victorious.

_The first phase_, in which _public taxes_ were introduced. In the
manorial estate the public upkeep was provided for by the dependent
persons.

City taxes. When the burghers [had achieved] a certain level of
organization.

What kind of taxes were being paid?

[There was] the land tax [_Grundzins_],⁷¹ the land still belonging to
the lords.

The merchant families in the cities at first introduced _indirect_ taxes
in the twelfth and thirteenth centuries as a measure toward bleeding the
craftsmen and as an obligatory contribution toward military defence of
the city.

See Lassalle: [his book on] indirect taxes.⁷²

Indirect taxes rose at that time as prosperity grew. They were imposed
arbitrarily to the point of impoverishment.

Then [there were] commissions for control [to check up and monitor
taxes] and the guilds were also brought in to take part in that.

The wool weavers wanted to break the power of the rich people’s
organization. The wool weavers stood at the forefront of the struggle of
the craftsmen in Cologne.

In other cities [there was] the merchant’s guild.

Compromises always brought about a retrogression, and that led as a
result to a new and more violent revolution.

Wherever the guilds had been victorious, everyone had to belong to a
guild.

The guild as ruler [_Herrenzunft_]. The guilds had their own specific
governing bodies, and elected masters [heads of the guilds].

They also had to provide the militia for the city.

Whoever [did not] belong to a guild could have no political rights.

They [the guilds] lived entirely for politics, as did the craftsmen.

In other cities the rulers were all thrown together into one guild, for
example, the shoemakers’ guild, and so forth.

Also in Speyer …

In Augsburg the struggle began in 1303.

The starting point was a dispute over the spending of public resources
after taxes had been introduced.

The craftsmen were armed. They had taken up arms as guilds and had even
been obliged to do that by the council of merchant families, because,
after all, they had to take part in the struggle against the manorial
estate.

Later the weapons were turned precisely against the merchant families,
for whose rights they [the guilds] had fought in the first place.

[Here are] three more examples of the struggle of the guilds against the
merchant families.

In particular the history [of this struggle] in Basel is typical because
it was stretched out for such a long time, with many vicissitudes and
changes of fortune …

Regensburg …

The cities at that time had about 10,000 inhabitants, going up into the
hundreds of thousands.⁷³

In Germany in particular matters often were blunted by compromise, but
not in France and Italy.

Earlier theories derived the guild from Rome. In particular Gaupp on the
founding of German cities.⁷⁴

In the last phases of the Roman Empire there did outwardly exist craft
guilds, but those were bodies organized for service to the state, and
one could neither leave them or marry outside of them.

All traces of those old Roman guilds disappeared.

We derive the medieval guilds from the manorial constitution.

The craftsmen [on the manors] had been supervised by ministerial
officials of the manorial estate. The latter appear subsequently as
masters and the ordinary craftsmen as servants. They had to make
payments in kind. They continued even after the craftsmen had freed
themselves from the manorial estate.

In Regensburg the obligation to pay a land tax to the feudal lord
[_Zinspflichtung_] was not abolished until 1486.

In the manorial estate the craftsman had stood under the legal
jurisdiction of the estate. Later they were under the legal jurisdiction
of the city.

In Germany the freeing of the craft organizations [_Innungen_]⁷⁵ was
completed at the earliest time in Magdeburg and Cologne. In Magdeburg as
early as 1147.

In 1202 the archbishop [of Magdeburg] granted permission for a
sign-makers’ guild [_Schilderinnung_] and at about the same time for a
tailors’ guild [_Schneiderzunft_], and so on. Thus [we see that] each
guild had to win its freedom for itself alone.

In Cologne the guilds, which were called _Ämter_, rather than
_Innungen_, at that time, freed themselves as early as the twelfth
century.

In Basel it was only in the middle of the thirteenth century, the
furriers being the earliest.

What attitude did the imperial power in Germany take toward this
movement? Here too it was ambivalent, and actually opposed to the
upward-striving guilds. The emperors repeatedly banned the organizations
of the craftsmen, as Heinrich VII did in Worms in 1237. In Goslar they
were forbidden by the emperor in 1219, in Esslingen in 1275, in
Frankfurt in 1366, in Freiburg in 1454 (already the fifteenth century),
[and] in Ulm in 1312; in Würzburg they were forbidden by the bishop in
1279, [and] in Erfurt in 1264; in Regensburg they were forbidden by the
dukes of Bavaria in 1384, and in Vienna by Rudolph von Habsburg in 1278.
These prohibitions characterized the trend of imperial policy in the
first stage. It was a direct statement of position against the
upward-striving craftsmen. The prohibitions continued for centuries, but
they remained entirely unsuccessful.

The earliest guilds in the cities generally were those of the merchants,
and also of the garment workers, the tailors, and the cloth workers.

The merchants needed a guild to protect themselves. They were able to
constitute the first guilds because they were personally free. They had
formerly been the so-called patricians.

The forming of guilds in the textile industry occurred so early because
for the most part it satisfied a great need. They were the wealthiest
and therefore the earliest to free themselves from the manorial estate.


THE NATURE OF THE GUILD SYSTEM

What distinguishes the guild from the craft organization on a manorial
estate is this: _the guild itself elects its own master_. In addition,
all craftsmen can now become free masters themselves and may employ
apprentices and journeymen themselves.

The guild organization is an organization of _free masters_.

Each guild has an executive committee, which it elects freely. This is a
leftover from an earlier time; it stems from the fact that the craft
organization was still entirely under the legal jurisdiction of the
feudal estate, and it had a master who supervised the workers.

Then came a time of transition. The craft organizations freed
themselves, but certain obligatory payments still remained, and they
were paid by part of the group of masters in the name of the guilds.
These masters …

Thus the executive committee, in the beginning, was still named by the
[lord of] the manor.

The development proceeded to the point where this executive committee
was also freely elected, and it looked out for the interests of the free
guild.

The guild leaders were originally elected for one or several years, but
later for life. It was even permissible for people who were not guild
masters to be elected to the executive committee.

The investiture, or act of installing a guild master in his office,
usually took place in a festive manner, with great ceremony and
celebration. He concerned himself with the business of the guild and
with the provision of food and drink to traveling craftsmen [i.e.,
journeymen]. When important matters came up, they had to be decided by
the guild as a whole. These guild assemblies had such names as Morning
Speech, and so forth.

Guild assemblies [occurred] from one to three times a year. They made
accountings, accepted delivery of goods, and enacted craft regulations.
The building in which guild assemblies were held was called the
guildhall. In Berlin it was called the Convent [place for convening],
and the term _Stube_ was sometimes used for it also. In the case of
wealthy guilds the guildhalls were veritable palaces. At times of
conflict the guildhalls were places where armed men gathered. They were
often fortified as well, so that they could withstand a real siege. But
at the same time they were drinking houses and houses for social
activities: baptisms, funeral services, and so on.

Only members of the guild, along with their wives, had access [to the
guildhall].

The main powers held by the guild assemblies were the following: legal
jurisdiction over all business or trade affairs, and all disputes among
guild members. However, the power of life and death belonged only to the
city council.

In addition the guilds had vice squads. They had jurisdiction over such
things as indulgence in luxuries, fraud, adultery, and prodigality.

In Strassburg there was in each guild a secret group of censors, who
were called reprimanders [_Rüger_], appointed to ensure good morals.

Finally, as the fundamental basis for a free guild, there was the
guild’s power to enforce compulsory membership in the guild
[_Zunftzwang_]; that is, the exclusive right to conduct the business of
the craft inside the city, and the compulsory obligation for every
person pursuing that craft to belong to that guild. In every city there
were craftsmen who earned their livelihoods outside of the guild. The
guilds had the right to prosecute such persons.

The guilds were ecclesiastical associations. Each had its own special
saints, [religious] banners, and many had their own special chapels. In
addition, emblems and coats of arms. Guild members were mutually
obligated to help and protect one another, obligated to provide last
honors to one another, that is, to take part in funerals and burials,
and so forth.

Lastly, they also formed military detachments. Each craftsman had to do
real military service with his guild, as well as guard duty in the city.

When there were uprisings and similar events in the city; all those
belonging to the guilds had to arm themselves and gather immediately as
soon as the alarm bell had rung. In the event of war each guild had to
provide one or more men on horseback for the city. (The knights were
personally obligated to perform duty on horseback, but the craftsmen
only had to provide several horsemen.) On the other hand, the craftsmen
constituted the entire infantry. They were the first foot soldiers.

They were armed with halberds, battleaxes, pikes, crossbows, and
primitive guns [_Büchsen_]. They wore iron helmets, collars, suits of
armor, aprons, gloves, armor for the legs called greaves, and so forth.
The way in which they were to be armed was prescribed for them very
exactly.

In Frankfurt the arming of the craftsmen depended on their ability to
pay, and so in the case of the bakers it depended on the number of pigs
[they owned].

In the guild, apprentices were under strict subordination of the
journeymen under the master and the chief master of the guild.

In the guild there was strict subordination, which was later to be
particularly bitter for the apprentices; in the era when medievalism
flourished there was a strong basis for this. It was the reason for the
extraordinary efficacy of the city armies …

Nevertheless there were many regulations that [governed] existence in
the cities, particularly in other lands [other than Germany]

The decree of King Edward [III] in the years 1322–77 for the guilds of
London.

It was decreed that all crafts in the city of London should be regulated
by law and supervised … In each craft, according to need, 4 or 6 would
be sworn in and given authority by the mayor to carry out the
supervision well.

The guild made sure that the work of the craftsmen was carried on in an
orderly way, that it participated in the waging of war, and had
political rights.

After its victory the guild became the political organization of the
burghers.

In some cities where the fighting was especially sharp the merchant
families were driven out. In others, they withdrew of their own accord,
and in still others they blended in and merged with the guild regime.

Actual withdrawal of the merchant families from the city occurred after
the victory of the guilds in Speyer, Strassburg, Augsburg, Regensburg,
Osnabrück, Dortmund, and other cities.

They were actually driven out of the city in Bremen, Zürich, Basel,
Cologne, and Magdeburg.

In some cities full-fledged rule by the guilds was achieved.
Subsequently, for example, in Cologne, Speyer, Zürich, Schaffhausen,
Basel, Konstanz, Halle, and Magdeburg.

There were shared regiments in Frankfurt, Vienna, Augsburg, and other
cities.

People belonged to the guild who did not practice its trade at all. [For
example] belonging to the merchants’ guild in Basel were the renters,
officers, and jurors and the physicians belonged to the blacksmiths’
guild.

As Ludwig von Maurer states, as a result of the victory of the guilds
the mark community, or previously existing community [_Realgemeinde_],
became a community of individual persons [_Personalgemeinde_]. The
difference between the mark community and the community of individuals
is that in the latter there is no land involved, as there is in the mark
community; other means of production become decisive.

_The special economic conditions of the rule of the guilds in relation
to the mode of production_.

_Compulsory membership in the guild_. No one could practice a craft
outside of the guild. No one could bring their goods into the city
without the permission of the guild. No one in the city could offer
their goods for sale other than through the guild.

Along with that there was a direct prohibition against outsiders
offering their goods for sale in the city, with the exception of certain
annual markets or fairs, which were usually connected with one or
another church festival, held at specified locations and with specified
taxes or fees being paid to the city.

[There was] a regulation specifying the number of masters in each guild,
and [_MS. Missing words_] so that each could make a livelihood.

_A regulation specifying the number of journeymen and apprentices under
each master craftsman_.

This had the consequence that all journeymen and apprentices had
approximately the same amount of work, and it also meant that not too
many master craftsmen would emerge.

_A regulation about the division of labor among separate crafts_. That
meant that the field of operation for each guild was sharply delimited
from the neighboring guild, so that no disputes over the fields of
operation of the individual guilds would arise. This resulted in the
technical improvement and refinement of the craft.

The hat makers alone were divided into five separate guilds. The knife
makers could not make handles for the knives, and the handle makers
could not make blades. Candles from old wax were strictly distinguished
from candles made from new wax, and the makers belonged to two different
guilds. A sharp line was drawn between two types of carpenters, the
_Zimmerleute_ and the _Schreiner_.⁷⁶

Since such encroachments on these restrictions were to be found at every
turn, _guild trials_ were constantly taking place.

If there were not enough people in one craft, or too few master
craftsmen, people could be brought into the city from outside, but only
by permission of the city council with the consent of the leaders of the
guilds.

_Regulation of production within each craft_. The total number of orders
that a guild could obtain in the city had to be distributed equally
among the individual master craftsmen, so that all the masters could
live equally well. It was forbidden for any master craftsman to
undertake more than one job at any one time, so that his neighbor could
also earn a living. It was forbidden for craftsmen to take customers
away from each other or to undercut prices.

Then there were regulations on the _purchase of raw materials_, so that
no individual master could gain special advantage. For example in Lübeck
every cutler was obligated, when he wanted to purchase raw materials
outside the city, to inform the guild three days in advance …

The craft obtained its raw materials from the countryside. At first by
the city and later by the guilds _firm prices were set for all raw
materials and craft products_.

_Prescriptions concerning production technique or technology_.

_Prescriptions concerning the length of apprenticeship_.

Regulations concerning the period when journeymen could travel about
learning their craft.

Regulations governing _how masterworks were to be made_.⁷⁷ This was
necessary to obtain the right to be recognized as a master craftsman.

Regulations concerning the _production process_.

For example, for candle makers it was specified exactly how much fat was
to be used and how it was to be processed, and so forth.

In general the guild regulations had the purpose of both _assuring the
necessary actual amount of production_ for the customers in the city as
well as _assuring the existence of the craftsmen themselves_ and
preventing _people in need and people without work_ from coming into
existence in the city.

The guild was from the outset a _progressive phenomenon_. Production was
firmly organized and regulated through the guilds. New crafts were
created directly as the result of guild regulations. The division of
labor, with the crafts being separated into sharply delineated branches
of production, brought with it great technological advances. Because of
the regulations concerning the way production was carried out, the
technology of the craft was also advanced. This was based on the
experience of previous times and also on present-day experience.
Apprenticeship, the travels of journeymen, and the making of masterworks
were also means of advancing progress in the technology of the craft.

Furthermore: _at all times a specific total number of workers and labor
time was necessary in order to satisfy the needs of a specific
community_.

The satisfaction of these needs was guaranteed by the guild regulations.
The number of master craftsmen, journeymen, and apprentices was set in
advance. Labor time was regulated; one worked only to a certain extent,
so that exhaustion of one’s capacity for labor was avoided.

_In every society a certain total amount of time and labor are employed
to produce the means of production_. That was also regulated in a
planned way. One worked only after the extent of [the community’s] needs
was established, thus [work was done] in accordance with demand.

That has been the case up until now with all forms of economic
production. But now the way in which needs are to be satisfied becomes
completely different, of an entirely new kind.

The mark community regulated the satisfaction of needs by dividing up
the land [among the peasant farmers] and by calculating the yield from
the lands of the undivided mark, and this was done by the members of the
mark as a whole. The extent of the needs [of the community] was
ascertained in advance.

In the feudal economy there occurred the division of the means of
livelihood [and this was done] by the lord of the manor on the basis of
his rights as lord of the manor. The total amount of the needs [of the
feudal manor] was known in advance.

This was not true of the crafts, organized by the guilds. Here the total
amount of the needs did not determine production. Each person ordered
what he needed as a single individual from an individual master
craftsman. Whereas in all previous forms of economic production the
product was _divided up_, now for the first time products were
_purchased_. Craft production is the first _commodity production_.

It developed slowly and gradually within the feudal economy, grew
further in the struggles against the manorial law, and found its
finished form in the guild. Thus the struggles of the guilds against
manorial law was the struggle and the victory of an entirely new
economic epoch.

But now the satisfaction of needs could not be regulated, for the most
part, as it had been in earlier forms [of economic production]. The
meeting of needs is now connected to purchasing power. The mass of those
having purchasing power consisted, however, of the city dwellers who
belonged to the guilds, and their purchasing power was assured by the
regulation of production. The producers were at the same time, on the
reverse side of the coin, the consumers.

Up to this point the mode of production had been a regulated one. But
the regulation was limited only to a craft, to _one branch_ of
production. The production of raw materials, and agricultural
production, took place outside the city, and those were not regulated by
the guild system.

_This division between agriculture and craft production is an important
historical fact in which capitalism has its roots_. The city of the
Middle Ages has now become one more element causing a split in the
economic community as a whole. The city by itself is no longer an
economic unit in the true sense. Therefore it also does not represent a
mode of production that is regulated in a planned way. It encompasses
only one branch of planned production. An actual city economy never did
exist. (Professor [Karl] Bücher claims that it did exist. See his book
on the origins of the national economy.)⁷⁸

For development to go further, the guild was of great significance.
Modern machinery would not have been possible if the guild had not
brought craft production up to the highest conceivable level.
Development was achieved through the division of labor in the guild.
Among the important inventions of the era of craft production are the
compass, the pocket watch, the tower clock, gunpowder, the making of
paper, and the printing of books.⁷⁹

_The guilds made it possible for many craftsmen in a single branch of
production to unite in a single space and thus create the preconditions
for manufacture_. As time went by the number of journeymen became more
than was needed. They began to work on the side and settled in the
country, because there they were freed from guild restrictions.

Also the second precondition for manufacture, the capital in the hands
of craftsmen, originated in the cities through trade. Here the forces
were organized that made a mass market possible.

The outlying lands around a city could not serve as a [sufficient] area
for the sale of its products. The feudal economy dominated there, and it
continued to hold its own until the nineteenth century. The _development
of capital in the cities paved the way for the victory of the
bourgeoisie_, which succeeded in the eighteenth and nineteenth
centuries.

The consumers in the city were increased in number by the plentiful
inflow of peasants fleeing from the land.

Capitalism rested upon the machine and on wage labor. The latter is only
conceivable when the worker is personally free. This freedom was won in
the struggles of the guilds against manorial ordinances. The commodity
economy, the chief foundation for the capitalist mode of production,
originated in the city.

Thus all the preconditions for capitalism were prepared in the cities.

Eventually development had to break out of the form taken by the guilds
in order to make room for capitalist industry.

This new form had to be a world economy from the very outset.

_Historically the most important fact is that here for the first time
the division of agriculture and industry into two separate entities
appeared, and the connection between these two parts was provided by the
exchange of commodities_.

The machine brought many different tools together in a single organized
system. This still required a driving force that would exceed human
power. At first there were attempts to drive machines with human power.
But that did not provide any economic advantages. First, the strength of
the human body did not extend that far, and second, human strength did
not have the mechanical evenness and regularity that was necessary to
power a machine.

The machine would not have been possible if craft production had not
flourished through the activity of the guilds.

The compass.

Gunpowder.

The tower clock and the pocket watch, products that were purely the
result of labor by craftsmen, invented by craftsmen.

The making of paper, which began to flourish as early as the fourteenth
century.

The art of printing books.

The production of steel, the blending of cast iron with wrought iron.

Without all these inventions modern capitalist development would have
been impossible. It was only the work of craftsmen that made today’s
discoveries and inventions possible.

The preliminary stage for today’s mode of economic production is that a
large number of craft workers was brought together for the first time in
a single workplace.

_Manufacture:_

The workforce consisted of people from the countryside and journeymen
who could no longer become master craftsmen.

As a result, the first instances of manufacture were in the countryside.

The raw labor power that poured into the city from the countryside could
only be put to use later on.

Manufacture was organized by the merchants. It was because of
[increased] trade that the merchant class rose; _in the city_ trade
played the main role, along with the guilds.

A _mass market_ for goods was still necessary; otherwise manufacture
would have been superfluous.

It was not possible to have a market for goods in the outlying areas
around the cities.

Manufacture found its market in the city …

In the cities for the first time the conditions were created for _the
free disposal_ of labor power.

Today the entire economy is based on an ever-expanding production of
commodities.

The commodity economy, or the money economy, which is only its reverse
side, and therefore the driving out of the natural economy, or
subsistence economy—this commodity economy arose inside the city. Thus
all the foundations, taken together, for modern development arose inside
the city.

In the Middle Ages the cities were isolated, separate points … each city
lived its own life [separately], both economically and politically.

However, the waves [emanating from the city] rebounded against the
outlying countryside, and feudalism was [eventually] defeated
everywhere.

Internationally the development of cities proceeded in the same way, in
England, Italy, France, everywhere there were the same basic lines of
development, and therefore we take an example from France.

_Amiens_ in northern France. (In the Putzger [atlas] it is on this page,
and there it is called Samarobriva.) The present name comes from … these
were formed for defense against the Romans. Caesar defeated its army
with 10,000 men. He installed his garrison there.

The city was placed under the rule of Roman city officials, and at first
it got a magistrate with political power and legal jurisdiction, a
_curia_ with police and local authority, which also had legal
jurisdiction, but all this was chosen [all these officials and official
bodies] by the central Roman power and was dependent on that to the
greatest degree. That was the typical Roman city constitution.

In the fourth century Amiens became a city of respectable size, a
juncture point for trade, located on a major trade route.

A bishop was [there], who wanted to teach Christianity. He was killed
and in this way earned a place among the saints.

In 406 the city was destroyed by the Germans, Swabians, Vandals, and
Burgundii. In this military campaign by the Germans, Speyer, Strassburg,
and Worms were also destroyed, all of them Roman cities.

In 428 the Franks arrived, although at first they were driven back. In
436 they pressed their way in under [Clodion the Hairy]⁸⁰ and destroyed
all the cities on their way. The Roman municipal constitution was
completely altered at that point, and a Carolingian count was installed
as the highest authority. Next to him stood what was called the people’s
assembly of the fully free, the said assembly being convoked by the
count, who also chaired the assembly. It should be understood that the
people’s assembly was [actually] the mark community, and thus there was
a regression of the Roman city into a mark.

From the seventh century to the tenth all traces of a city constitution
disappeared in Amiens. The Frankish kings began to appoint bishops and
install them in the city. In 779 Charlemagne released the abbey of
Amiens from all taxes, with the right to trade freely. He also
introduced for the first time the institution of jurors; these were [the
equivalent of] judges elected by the people, who carried out judicial
functions under the chairmanship of the count.

In the ninth century [there were] unceasing raids by the Norsemen
[Vikings] and wars among the rising counts. All power and authority in
the city came into the hands of the counts, and in the tenth century the
city was made a feudal manor, with barbarian practices being followed,
that is, the predominance of natural economy. The city’s land belonged
at that time in part to the count and in part to the bishop. The castle
with the manor house belonged to a third lord, namely the king. Thus
three feudal lords were established in the city, and three forms of
manorial ordinance.

In the twelfth century a series of revolutions began in the cities of
northern France. In the period from 1100 to 1112 social explosions
ensued in all the cities of northern France, resulting in incendiarism
and looting; in one of the cities the bishop was even killed.

In 1113 Amiens followed with a revolution. Here what was called a
commune was established for the purposes of the revolution. That meant a
federation,⁸¹ an alliance [of city dwellers] joined in the common
struggle to win their freedom. The commune was formed in opposition to
the manorial ordinances; and the bishop, whose status as a ruler was
much lower, sided with the commune. At the same time it negotiated with
the king, Ludwig the Fat, who for a large sum of money took the side of
the commune and recognized it: with an elected council, its own legal
jurisdiction, and the abolition of the manorial ordinances and law of
the count. The count thereupon attacked the city with arms in hand, and
the fight lasted for three years. The fighting went on from street to
street and barricades were thrown up. The bishop withdrew from the city
at that time.

In the year 1115 at the request of the bishop, the king came with his
army to Amiens. He attacked the castle, but was wounded and driven off.
The count with his army was in the castle. Then began a siege to starve
out the castle, and the siege lasted two years. In 1117 the count and
the count palatine surrendered, and the castle was razed to the ground.

The count was deposed, and the countship as an official office was
transferred to another family. These people united themselves with the
burghers of the city in an agreement whereby the city annually elected a
council and a director, or steward (French, _Maire_).

Taxes to be paid to the count remained as a burden on the territory of
the city, and later on, the city had to buy out the title to this right
in a special procedure.

In 1190 the constitution of the commune [of Amiens] was confirmed and
expanded by King Philipp August.

On the whole, then, [this was] enormously early by comparison with the
German cities.

The history of this city is typical for France. But the overall course
of development, looking at it more broadly, is exactly the same as in
Germany. And indeed the history of this city is especially
characteristic because Amiens was a former Roman city.

In _Italy_ the city structure had a prominent development very early.

The Italian cities are especially interesting because the Renaissance
starts with them.

The center of the Renaissance in Italy was Florence. The chief supporter
of this movement was the Medici family. This family is a merchant clan
[by origin] [_Kaufmannsgeschlecht_].

The first to come to prominence is Ardingo de Medici. He was a guild
master in Florence, and [it was he mainly] who brought about the victory
of the guilds in Florence in the year 1291.

Then we meet a certain Averardo [de Medici]. In 1314 he is the
standard-bearer for the guilds.

In the same century, in an urban revolution in which the lower mass of
guild members gained the victory, Francesco de Medici was elected.

In 1360 Bartolomeo de Medici led an uprising to overthrow the lords of
high finance among the merchants.

In 1378 a certain Silvestro de Medici carried out a new uprising of the
same kind.

Giovanni de Medici became an ambassador, who was sent out by the city of
Florence to represent its interests. He was three times the chief elder
of the guilds [_Zunftältester_] and the standard-bearer of the guilds.
His son Cosimo de Medici the sponsor of the Renaissance, was leader of
the people’s party. Because of that he was banned from the city for ten
years. He was called back as early as one year later and dominated the
city because of his wealth. He was the true leader of the Renaissance.

Another one after him [Lorenzo de Medici]⁸² founded libraries and
erected public buildings [_Beute_] in the city. Michelangelo worked
under him.⁸³

The patrician merchant families and the bishop made a conspiracy against
him. His brother was murdered. The people rose up against that, and the
archbishop was hanged at his own window. At that point the pope sent an
army against Florence.

In the end his [Lorenzo de Medici’s] son became Pope as Leo X.

From the same family, came Catherine de Medici, a queen of France, and
then an illegitimate son of the Medici family became Pope.

This merchant family [_Geschlecht_], which is so completely connected
with the Renaissance, is [also] inseparably linked with the rise of the
cities.

The city of Florence was founded two centuries before the birth of
Christ. In 82 BC it was destroyed by a Roman military leader. Caesar
revived the city as a colony, that is, as a military colony. In the
fourth century [AD] Florence became the seat of a bishop. In the
eleventh century it really came up in the world as a result of
[increased] trade, and in the twelfth century the city fought its way
free of manorial ordinance and gained its own legal jurisdiction. Thus
it was far in advance, compared to the German cities, in the process of
liberation.

In 1185 the German Emperor Frederich I [Frederick Barbarossa] took away
this freedom, because at that time these cities had come under the rule
of the German Empire.⁸⁴

In 1197 Florence regained its own legal authority and joined with other
cities in an alliance against German rule.

In the twelfth and thirteenth centuries there was a great increase in
trade and commercial activity, primarily wool weaving and banking. From
1115 on, Florence had its own money, which was called the florin.

As early as 1193 the heads of seven guilds took the side of the
burgomaster [mayor of the city]. Now there began a prolonged struggle
with the merchant clans. In 1206 [there was] a revolution. The people
fought alongside of the burgomaster, who had [actually] originated from
among the merchant families; [he had become] a representative of the
people, the community. [There was a] collegium of the twelve chief
elders. The merchant families were driven out of the city, and then they
organized a conspiracy and went to war against Florence. In 1260 the
Florentines suffered a severe defeat in this war, and the merchant
families marched into the city again, whereupon the constitution of 1250
was abolished.

The craftsmen’s party was at that point supported by the Pope against
the merchant families, and in 1267, on a night in April, all the
merchant families were driven out of the city. But through the mediation
of a papal cardinal the merchant families were allowed to re-enter the
city in 1280. Thus the popes played a major role.

In 1282 [the constitution] was again abolished by the Pope, and power
passed directly to the more highly placed guilds, to the merchants and
wool weavers. The nobles and the aristocracy of money also maintained a
certain participation in the regime.

In 1293 [there was another] uprising, and the merchant families were
completely excluded from the city council and placed under strict legal
control. To hold the merchant families in check, a special
standard-bearer of justice was established in coordination with the city
council. But in 1316 [there was] another revolution, and the wealthy
merchants seized the power for themselves. And yet in 1328 the guilds
carried out a revolution and took the rule of the city back into their
own hands. In 1341 and 1343 there were new revolutions, in which the
lower guilds came to power. But the nobles and the aristocracy of
finance soon regained the upper hand. In 1378 there was an uprising,
which was called the revolution of the wool carders. But this revolution
failed. There were further struggles by the craftsmen in 1387, 1393,
1397, and 1400, but the merchant families managed to remain at the helm.
At the same time Florence attained an ever-higher stage of wealth and
power.

In 1405 the city of Florence purchased the city of Pisa for 200,000 gold
florins and subjugated it by force. That happened because of the harbor
and because Pisa was a competitor.

In 1491 the harbor of Livorno⁸⁵ was purchased [by the Florentines] from
the Genoese.

In the meantime the Medicis had arrived at the head of the people’s
party. They took part in all the revolutions. Under Cosimo de Medici the
famous age of the Renaissance, the age of the Medici, began. In 1494 the
Medici were driven out of the city, and a new republican constitution
was introduced, with the leading role played by the party of Savonarola,
against whom the Pope imposed a ban and who was killed in 1498. Again
there was further unrest until 1502, when a lifelong standard-bearer [of
the guilds] came to the top. But in 1512 he too was overthrown, and the
Medicis were called back. In 1527 an uprising of the republican party
under the merchant clan of the Strozzi⁸⁶ [took place] and the Medicis
were again driven out. In 1530⁸⁷ Florence was taken by the [Holy Roman]
Emperor Charles V.

Florence is typical of the development of the cities. We see that the
city did not go to rack and ruin because of the unrest, but rather it
bloomed and flourished. The fairy tale about the eternal peace that is
supposedly necessary for culture is not confirmed by the actual
development and rise of the modern bourgeoisie.

The most outstanding feature of the medieval _Italian cities_ [is] in
particular the overweening influence and later the rule of the
merchants.

That came about because the Italians were the intermediaries in trade
with other countries bordering on the Mediterranean. And indeed trade
developed [substantially] in the cities. The merchant families
experienced an upsurge [economically] and at the same time rose to
political power, and nowhere did the cities achieve such complete
independence as in Italy. The cities were independent republics. They
came into conflict with feudalism.

Indicative for the Italian cities was the struggle against the German
emperors.

In Germany itself the emperors attempted to support the cities here and
there, but in Italy the emperors turned directly against the cities and
waged an unceasing struggle against them.

Consequently, two large alliances were formed in Italy.

The Lombard League was politically the most important, because it was
the most extensive and was located in the north. The chief city for that
League was Milan.

Florence tended more to pursue commercial interests. Belonging to the
Lombard League, for example, in addition to Milan, were the following:
Pisa, Arenza, Como, Lugano, Novi, Parma, Bologna, Pavia, and Genoa.

The city of _Milan_. In the year 569 it was taken by the Langobardi.⁸⁸
They were Germans, and then came the Franks. Under them Milan was the
center of a count’s domain. In the eleventh century the counts were from
the house of Este. In 1056 a movement broke out in Milan that is known
to history as the Partarser (?).⁸⁹ It was named after the
rag-and-bonemen’s quarter of the city (a derisive term). [It was]
directed against the rule of the archbishop and indeed was favored by
the Pope. The papacy was striving for greater political power and sought
with strict discipline to make the bishops concentrate on spiritual
matters in order to leave the secular rule of the church in its own
hands [that is, in the hands of the papacy]. Therefore it supported the
cities in their struggle against the bishops.

Pope Gregory VII opposed certain marriages. He …

The conflict with Frederick Barbarossa. Milan was besieged many times
[during this conflict] … but in spite of it all the development of the
city did not come to an end.

… Two clans came to the forefront: Della Torre and Visconti. They
established a veritable dynasty, as the Medici had done in Florence …

The conclusion was that in the sixteenth century Milan was subjugated by
Charles V of Spain in the War of the Spanish Succession. It then passed
to Austria.

The rise of the merchants led to a great flourishing of spiritual life.
This in turn led to the Renaissance. It came about because there had
been stagnation in all spiritual life here for centuries, since
antiquity. Whoever observes the reality of the Renaissance with a
critical eye will soon see proof in it that our present-day culture is
not a continuation from the ancient world, but that after undergoing a
real retrograde movement, lasting roughly from the eighth to the tenth
centuries, all science ended up at that time in the hands of the Church
and the monks. Science was restricted almost entirely to theology.

The spiritual life of the times was concentrated there [in the Church],
but in part some traditions from the ancient world were handed down
through the various doctrines and tendencies in the Christian religion,
but they had almost completely lost their original form.

The language of the Christian Church was Latin. Through knowledge of
this language [_MS. Missing words_]

Theology was the positive science of that time. It was a consistently
thought-out structure.

Contained in it, in part, were traditions handed down from Greek
culture, but entirely remolded and adapted to the doctrines of the
Christian Church.

In the philosophy and science of antiquity everything rested on research
and investigation, while afterward faith was the only thing that
remained, because all of science was subordinated to firmly fixed
schematic doctrines [by the Church]. The more absurd something was, the
more one was supposed to believe in it, the more it proved that we were
not created to inquire into things.

All arts became, as it were, slaves of the church: painting was holy
pictures; architecture was building churches.

This stagnation of culture was conditioned by the regression to the
older economic forms of the mark constitution with the collapse of
slavery. [There was] a turn backward to methods in which science was
superfluous, primarily to agriculture, and thus, since life was devoted
entirely to the production process, that meant the natural economy.

Art and science develop when there is an inclination toward them.

The nobility in Germany in the Middle Ages lived mainly on the land.

A new form of production had to arise in order for art and science to
flourish again; [there had to be] new historical perspectives, new
classes and class struggles, and then the accumulation of wealth in the
cities. And it was possible for this wealth to be accumulated by the
people of noble lineage who were up and coming as merchant clans.

The culture of antiquity had its roots in the ancient city, which
represented the center of class rule. Also in the Middle Ages the city
had to re-emerge, deep-going class differences had to develop, new
social problems had to arise, and the wealth of the merchants had to be
present as a material basis before art and science could again come into
bloom. At that point the city signified, in different form, the same
thing it had signified in antiquity.

The Renaissance gave a new start to the pagan art of antiquity. People
began digging out the treasures of antiquity and reacquainted themselves
with them. There was a revival of pre-Christian science of the pagan
variety. The printing of books⁹⁰ was the precondition that made the
flourishing of humanism possible.

Great names are connected with this epoch. Names linked with the
Renaissance are the best known.

Chronologically:

  ----------- -----------
  Dante       1265–1321
  Petrarch    1304–1374
  Boccaccio   1313–1375
  ----------- -----------

They were the first who wrote in so-called “kitchen Latin,” that is,
Italian.

The first beginnings of the Italian Renaissance.

The whole trend toward the readoption of the languages and science of
antiquity was called humanism. Its expansion was helped along in
particular by the definite results achieved in the development of the
cities and the crafts in the Middle Ages: the printing of books was a
genuine product of the development of cities and the skilled crafts.

Humanism expanded from Italy first to France. Greek began to be taught
at the University of Paris for the first time in 1430. The universities
are also a purely urban phenomenon. However, they were entirely under
the spell of theology at first. All the chairs at the university were
occupied by churchmen, and Latin was the ruling language. But now there
was the beginning of an opposition at the universities.

The gymnastics of the spirit.

That was mocked by [Ulrich von] Hutten in his letters about the
obscurantists.⁹¹

Then [humanism spread to] Spain and England (Sir Thomas More, one of the
noblest representatives of humanism).

Then to Holland (Erasmus of Rotterdam, 1466–1536), and the humanist
movement came to Germany from Holland.

[Johann] Reuchlin, 1455–1522. He had a famous dispute with the
theological faculty of Cologne. It was then that [Ulrich von] Hutten (he
lived from 1465 to 1517) wrote his famous letters about the
obscurantists. Then came [Philip] Melanchthon (in German the name means
“black earth.”).⁹² He lived from 1497–1560, and then came Zwingli, from
1484 to 1533.⁹³

This last name, along with the name of Hutten, shows that in Germany
humanism was intertwined with the Reformation. ([See] Conrad Ferdinand
Meyer, _Huttens letzte Tage_ [Hutten’s Last Days].⁹⁴ Extraordinarily
easy to read and also giving a very accurate picture historically.)

Humanism was expressed in the readoption of the artistic explorations
made by the artists of antiquity, and then in the special flowering of
painting, sculpture, and architecture. And everywhere this was sponsored
by wealthy patrons. The rich made themselves the protectors of medieval
artists, kept them at their palaces, and allowed them to do their work
as artists as they saw fit. Thus, once again, this was an achievement
made by a court [_Hof_] but not only a manorial estate. The … of Goethe
is highly characteristic in that regard …

The dynasty of the Medici in Florence is especially famous in this
connection, because they spent large sums on the splendid buildings,
paintings, etc., in Florence. The great edifices were intended to win
the favor of the people. Job opportunities became available to the
people through these projects.

All the cities were united against external powers, but they fought
bitter struggles against each other, especially over the Mediterranean
and the Black Sea. That meant trade with the Orient.

After Constantinople fell to the Turks [in 1453] the powerful drive to
find a sea route to the East Indies had its origins especially in the
Italian cities.

_Two factors that promoted the development of the cities in the north_.

_The liberation of the Netherlands from Spain_ and the _Hanseatic
League_.

The Netherlands, its history and its population.

[The Netherlands, or Low Countries, were conquered] first by German
tribes … and Frisia in Roman times. They were subjugated by the Romans
until the beginning of the fifth century AD.

Then came the Franks. In the eighth century, after long resistance, they
were converted to Christianity and subjugated by the Carolingians.
Bishoprics and abbeys and the domains of counts were established.

After the collapse of Charlemagne’s empire, a decline in France,
Germany, and [the duchy of] Lorraine was named after Lothar.⁹⁵ In the
fourteenth century it came through marriage to the duchy of Burgundy
with the seat of the duchy in Brussels. In 1477 the Low Countries passed
through marriage to the house of Hapsburg and thus belonged to Austria.
After Emperor Charles V withdrew from power the Low Countries fell to
Philip II of Spain.

In the meantime there was a great flourishing of the cities in the Low
Countries in the twelfth and thirteenth centuries. The struggle of those
cities against the counts for city freedoms began, and in the thirteenth
and fourteenth centuries they had free city constitutions everywhere.

The time when the cities of the Netherlands reached their peak was a few
centuries later than that of the German cities, whose time of blossoming
was, in turn, later than that of the Italian cities.

_Antwerp_. Its trade flourished from the fourteenth to the sixteenth
centuries. A large foreign colony existed there, that is, foreign
merchants, and [there was] mutual trade with Germany. Antwerp conducted
a worldwide trade and possessed its own commercial fleet.

The trade link with the Orient as a result of the land route to the East
being replaced [by the sea route] …

There was also a shift of a major route for world trade to northern
Europe as a result of which the Baltic and the North Sea came to the
fore.

The previous culture.

As a result, first Holland and then England reached a high point.

_Amsterdam_ at the beginning of the thirteenth century was still a
fishing village and a feudal possession of the lord of Amstel (the river
there is called the Amstel.) The entire city is built on dams along this
river.

The lords of Amstel were vassals of the seminary at Utrecht. But as
early as the beginning of the fourteenth century the city got rid of
manorial ordinances and won its own constitution. In the fourteenth and
fifteenth centuries Amsterdam’s trade with the Baltic flourished. In the
sixteenth century Amsterdam was the number one city of the Netherlands,
as far as trade was concerned. But the actual flourishing of Amsterdam
dates from the downfall of Antwerp. The Dutch East India Company was
founded in 1602. In 1622 Amsterdam had a hundred thousand inhabitants.
That was its highest peak.

_Bruges_. It was walled in as early as the seventh century. In the ninth
century it received a castle and became a count’s city, and thus a
feudal possession. In the twelfth century Bruges was the largest trading
city in Flanders. The largest battles between guilds, those of the
weavers and the fullers, were played out here, with bloody street
battles. Later Bruges flourished to the greatest extent as part of the
Flemish textile industry, and the city had the wool trade with England
[entirely] in its hands.

In connection with all this a brilliant artist’s colony arose there in
the sixteenth century. Rubens, Rembrandt, and so forth, on the basis of
the development of the city.

_Brussels_. In the eleventh century it was a fortified town belonging to
the counts von Löwen (?).⁹⁶ It was at about the halfway point on the
trade road from Cologne to Bruges, and it became the center of a
flourishing textile industry. In the fourteenth century the fiercest
constitutional battles were fought out in Brussels.

_Ghent_. It was first a fortified castle of the counts of Flanders,
founded in 1180.⁹⁷

It rose to prominence from the thirteenth to the fifteenth centuries.
During this time the fiercest battles of the guilds against the merchant
families were fought out in Ghent. A merchant clan was at the head of
the struggle against the manorial ordinances of the counts, the
Artevelde family. In 1345 there was a conspiracy of the weavers against
the rule of the merchants and a violent uprising in which Artevelde, the
main leader, was murdered.⁹⁸ In the fourteenth and fifteenth centuries
there were as many as 40,000 linen weavers and wool weavers in the city.
This shows that matters had already gone beyond the handicraft form of
production here; this was already manufacture. The work methods were
still of the handicraft kind, but a huge number of craftsmen had been
brought together, and they were exploited by the merchants.

All these flourishing cities entered into a major historical conflict
after they came under the rule of the Spanish crown in 1455, a conflict
with the Catholic Church and Spanish despotism, which had risen to its
highest level of power in Spain. That was where the Inquisition reigned.

It waged the fiercest fight against the Renaissance.

And now the merchants in Holland made themselves the champions of free
trade and freedom of thought and belief.

Commerce needed free trade, and business freedom was needed for
industrial activity, but Spanish policy prevented all that.

At the same time humanism had come from Italy by way of France. In
Holland [there was] the earliest acceptance of Calvinism.

In reality underlying the struggle between Holland and Spain was an
economic and social conflict, _the conflict between the natural economy
of feudalism and a new development, manufacture_, which was on the rise.

[At the same time] the rising force of absolutism needed gold in order
to fight against feudalism, to maintain armies, and so forth.

The policy of the Dutch merchants in the colonies went in the direction
of importing raw materials from those foreign lands as well as labor
power—the slave trade.

When Holland came under Spanish rule these two [forms] came into
conflict.

All the flourishing Dutch cities, after Spanish rule was imposed on
them, engaged in constant conflict with the Catholic Church, which had
achieved its highest level of power in Spain. The Inquisition tried to
drown the upcoming new era in blood. Thus the Dutch cities became the
foremost champions of commercial freedom, freedom of thought, and
freedom of belief, and they won those freedoms in the struggle against
Spain. The rising force of humanism strengthened the struggle, but it
alone was not the determining factor. Rather it and these struggles were
products of the economic revolution that was beginning.

The Dutch were the first to establish modern colonies (Indies!).⁹⁹ While
the early colonial policy of _Spain_ knew only the quest for gold as its
sole aspiration, _Dutch colonial policy_ culminated in efforts to
promote the development of trade with the processing of raw materials
and the production of finished goods. Holland came under Spanish
domination, and the two [divergent] tendencies were bound to come into
conflict. Struggles erupted that lasted eighty years; the first period
was from 1565 to 1598 and the second from 1621 to 1648. The result of
the first phase was the secession of Netherlands from Spain and the
founding of a republic. Only after the second phase of struggle did the
defeated Spanish recognize the [Dutch] republic and its independence.

Then the House of Orange rose to power in the Netherlands holding the
office of _stadtholder_¹⁰⁰ as a hereditary right.

Schiller [in his _Revolt of the Netherlands_] gave a literary depiction
of this struggle. In addition, [see] Goethe’s drama _Egmont_.¹⁰¹

In the midst of this desperate eighty-year struggle, in the course of
which the cities were plundered many times by the Spanish, the
Netherlands reached its highest point, flourishing in all fields. [This
serves] again as proof of how very much the Middle Ages was developing
on ground that was truly volcanic.

At the same time the colonial conquests of the Dutch proceeded apace. It
[Holland] conquered the Sunda Islands[,]¹⁰² Ceylon, the Cape region
[around South Africa’s Cape of Good Hope], and Brazil.¹⁰³

Holland’s trading fleet numbered 35,000 ships, and the Bank of Amsterdam
had 300 million gold florins lying in its vaults.

The enormous costs of war with Spain, thanks to this flourishing [of
commerce], were easily borne, along with high taxes.

The Netherlands also became at that time a place of refuge for the
victims of feudalism: craftsmen and merchants, learned men from Spain,
from France, from Italy, all fled to the Netherlands. The Netherlands at
that time, thanks to its geographical location, was the only country in
Europe where the mode of life in the cities was entirely oriented toward
the interests of the burghers, while elsewhere the latter were defeated
by a rising absolutism.

In addition, modern philosophy also arose in Holland: Spinoza.

Both the later artistic Renaissance of Holland and the modern [_MS.
Missing words_] show the contrast between the Dutch Renaissance and the
Italian. The Italian: churchly in character; the Dutch [showed]:
burghers and the life of the burghers.

As a result of all this flourishing, which at the same time in economic
areas was passing over from the forms of craft production to those of
manufacture, trade had already become genuine world trade. In this way
Holland then came into conflict with England. The struggle between those
two is, so to speak, the boundary line between the true modern era and
the last phase of the Middle Ages.

Holland, with the flourishing of its Renaissance, with its victorious
struggle against Spain, and with its colonial policy, is the last
blossoming of medieval city development.

England already represents the beginning of the capitalist phase. Both
of them are linked by the textile industry.

[It was first in Holland] that textile manufacture arose.

England still played a passive role then, providing the raw materials.
That resulted in agriculture being pressed back by stock raising, and in
that connection a large number of peasant households were forced out of
existence. In their place came pastureland for sheep, driven by
capitalist impulses. From that came the modern proletariat and modern
capital in England, which opened a new period of economic production.

We must look at _the Hanse_ [_the Hanseatic League_] in order to make
clear the contradictory role of Germany [i.e., of the German cities].

_History of the Hanse_. The word _Hanse_ [_Hansa_] means “chief
alliance.” And the word _hänseln_ [to make a fool of; to hassle] is
derived from _Hanse_. That was the method of the Hanse.¹⁰⁴

The formal coming together of the Hanseatic League in 1354 followed in
the wake of the Cologne Confederation.¹⁰⁵ The origin of the Hanseatic
League in an earlier, looser form goes back to the beginning of the
thirteenth century. The beginnings consisted in separate groups of
cities with special relations among one another and with the outside
world. And the latter was the point from which the Hanse actually
emerged. It was necessary at that time to take special measures to
ensure the protection of trade caravans, expeditions, and the like, in
order to conduct an extensive trade with other areas and countries.
Given the situation at that time it was necessary for merchants in
foreign trading centers to establish their own settlements. Today it is
not necessary because freedom of commerce exists, but at that time it
did not.

At that time the protection of one’s rights was based on a person’s
being connected to manorial ordinances or, in a city, belonging to a
guild. The protection of one’s rights depended on belonging to a
particular social group, whereas today it depends on being a citizen of
a particular country.

The oldest German trade settlement abroad was that of the Cologne
merchants in _London_. It was called the _Steelyard_. It was started in
the thirteenth century, beginning on such a small scale that its actual
point of origin cannot be established exactly. It became the central
point for all trade with England. (See this pageb in the Putzger atlas.)

The second trading settlement of the Germans was at _Wisby on the island
of Gotland_.¹⁰⁶ (See this pageb in the Putzger atlas.)

The third settlement, which went out from there, was in Novgorod (court
of St. Peter). (See this pageb in the Putzger atlas.)

In connection with all this, _three alliances of cities_ were formed,
and they were called the “three thirds” of the later Hanseatic League.
Then there came a _“fourth third” of the Hanse_.

The first alliance was concluded between _Hamburg und Lübeck_ in 1241 to
ensure the security of the trade between the Baltic and the North Sea.
Grouping itself around these two main cities was: the _Wendish Third_.
It was founded in 1285. Here the leading city was Lübeck. It concluded
an alliance with the cities of Wismar and Rostock, and later Stralsund
and Greifswald also joined. A number of small cities in Pomerania and
the Mark [of Brandenburg] soon joined as well: Stargard, Stendhal,
Salzwedel, Brandenburg, Berlin, Frankfurt-on-the-Oder, and others.

On the other hand, _Hamburg_ made an alliance with a series of towns in
the Lower Rhineland; this part of the Hanse was called the _Lower
Rhineland-Prussian_ _Third_. Belonging to this part were the cities of:
Cologne, Dortmund, Soest, Münster, Herfurt, and Minden, as well as some
Netherlands cities such as Bruges, etc. At the other end some Baltic
cities also belonged, such as Torun, Kulm, Danzig, and others.

Wisby was the center of a third group, including cities of Estonia and
Livonia in the Baltic. This group was called _the Gotland Third_. Those
belonging here included Reval, Pernau, Dorpat, Riga …

They also had branches in the Russian cities of Novgorod, Pskov,
Polotsk, and Vitebsk.

The “fourth third” grouped itself around _Bremen_. This group of Hanse
cities was called _the Saxon Third_. Belonging to this were the cities
of Göttingen, Halle, Halberstadt, Hildesheim, Braunschweig [Brunswick],
Hannover, Lüneburg, and later also Magdeburg, which gained a leading
role.

Thus the separate groups had their origins, and in 1367 all of them
together signed a _joint constitution_ in Cologne. They formed what was
called the Cologne Confederation.

The aim of this formal agreement was to win commercial freedoms at home
and abroad, to secure the trade routes against attacks by robbers, and
so forth, settlement of all disputes among one another by a court of
arbitration, and joint regulation of commercial law. And such regulation
has also come into existence now, with the development of international
trade, and has become an established norm.

The safeguarding of maritime travel, the regulation of coins and
weights, the joint organization of commercial fleets and crews, and
indeed of navies as well, in order ultimately [to protect] the rights of
the Hanse with [_MS. Missing word(s)_]

There was also a registration list for purposes of war, which defined
the part each separate city would have in outfitting [the League for
war]. Keeping the peace in the cities was also a joint obligation. The
point of this regulation, as of the entire organization of the Hanse,
was directed internally against the guilds. The joint keeping of the
peace in the cities meant: keeping the guilds down.

The aim was to establish the dominance of the merchants in a way
analogous to the Italian cities.

The entire practical activity of the Hanse involved measures against the
guilds and against unrest stirred up by the guilds.

The Hanse had assemblies [_Bundestage_] to which each city sent a
representative.

By itself this assembly was rather a loose arrangement, but each of the
four “thirds” had its own assemblies. Also, the individual cities
remained independent in all their internal affairs. Only when common
interests involving trade came up was it necessary to directly force
some cities into obedience, using the method of harassment, which
ultimately meant laying siege and waging war.

Thus the Hanse, because of its fleet and the power that backed it up,
won great privileges in England.

Then it dealt with Denmark in particular. In 1362 Denmark had taken
Wisby on the island of Gotland, and with that began a bloody war with
Denmark. Under the leadership of the burgomaster of Lübeck, the
Hanseatic navy sailed against Copenhagen. It was taken and plundered by
the Hanseatic League. Then an armistice was concluded with Denmark. In
1367 in Cologne 77 cities declared war against Denmark. A powerful
Hanseatic navy occupied the Norwegian coast and again besieged
Copenhagen and the Danish islands. In 1370 a peace treaty was signed in
Stralsund with the Danish king. The Hanse had achieved complete victory
and assured itself exclusive trade rights in all of Denmark.

By 1397 it had the same rights in all the Scandinavian lands. That meant
that no merchant was allowed to go there if he was not a member of the
Hanseatic League. Fish from the North Sea and the Baltic constituted the
main item of trade. This favorable situation for the League in the North
Sea and the Baltic lasted for a century. Merchants of the Hanse in the
Nordic cities had …

_Danzig_ then replaced Wisby in the leading position in the Baltic, and
this had to do with the grain trade from the east, from Poland and
Russia. At the same time trade with Russia kept increasing, and here
timber and furs played the main role.

The Hanse also conducted extensive trade with England, with France, and
with Portugal. It had its [own] settlements everywhere. Also there was a
lively trade with Venice.

The main trading offices were Bruges, Bergen, and Novgorod, as well as
Schonen,¹⁰⁷ and indeed the last-named city served as a trans-shipping
location.

The chief objects of trade were [as follows]: from France, salt and
wine; from Flanders, textiles; from England, wool and other kinds of
cloth; from Sweden, wax, furs, and ore; from Russia, grain, furs, and
timber; and from Nordic waters, fish.

These, then, were no longer luxury items, but objects of daily use on a
mass scale, which went mainly to the cities. Here one senses already a
transition to a new era in which trade is no longer meant only for the
rulers.

_The high point of domination by the Hanse was in the fourteenth,
fifteenth, and sixteenth centuries_. At that time the Hanse represented
a power that was also highly respected politically. It waged war on its
own account and concluded treaties with foreigners. And it seemed that
the prospects for the Hanse’s further development were very great. But
it turned out otherwise. Signs of decline began to appear.

As early as the year 1423 the revolt of the Dutch cities is to be noted,
and they allied themselves with Denmark against the Hanse.

That came about because the Netherlands cities already aspired to become
an independent power [in their own right]. A new form of production had
already begun to develop in them. By contrast, the German cities pursued
trade interests exclusively on the basis of the old form of production.

In particular in the sixteenth century the sea route for trade with the
Orient shifted to the north.¹⁰⁸ And now the cities of the Netherlands
were geographically more favorably located for this new commercial sea
route than Germany. Thus we see that the flourishing of the Hanse
occurred between that of the Italian cities and that of the Netherlands
cities.

With the opening of the trade routes to the East Indies prospects for
trade expanded enormously. The cities of the Netherlands were the first
to pursue a colonial policy. The Hanse, on the other hand, stuck firmly
to the old trade routes and the old items of trade and did not want to
know anything about distant overseas trade. That is why the Hanse became
outdated, and for that reason cities gradually, one after another,
dropped out of the Hanse.

In the first half of the sixteenth century the Hanse, under the
leadership of the burgomaster of Lübeck, Jürgen Wollenweber,¹⁰⁹ became
involved in a new war with Denmark with the aim of excluding the cities
of the Netherlands from the right to trade [in the Baltic]. Thus the war
with Denmark was at the same time a war with the Netherlands cities. The
Hanse was defeated and its domination in Scandinavia was broken. It is
no accident that the first war [against Denmark] was won and the second
was lost. It was a sign, a symbol that [_MS. Missing words_]

In the sixteenth century England emancipated itself from the Hanse.
Because the latter had often forced the English kings to grant trade
advantages to the Hanseatic cities, so that England was condemned to an
entirely passive role in trade. [At the end of] the sixteenth century,
under Queen Elizabeth, England began to free itself from the Hanse. The
rights of the Hanse began to be restricted in England. Lübeck tried with
the help of the German Diet¹¹⁰ to forbid all entry to Germany for trade
from England. Queen Elizabeth replied by confiscating 60 Hanseatic
ships, shutting down the Steelyard, and abrogating all the privileges of
the Hanse in England.

As a result the interests of the city of Hamburg were harmed to such an
extent that Hamburg dropped out of the Hanseatic League and made a trade
treaty with England on its own account.

At approximately the same time, in 1553, the English discovered a sea
route to Russia by way of the White Sea, in the north, and they were
likewise emancipated from the Hanse in that way, since they could now
trade directly with Russia.

And in the fifteenth century the cities of the [Brandenburg] Mark
dropped out of the Hanse, and actually this came about under the
influence of the rising landlord class, the power of the Electors [of
the Holy Roman Empire].

Likewise in the fifteenth century Novgorod was destroyed by the rising
power of the tsarist regime, by Ivan the Terrible, and it was stripped
of its independence entirely. Thus the cities fell away one after the
other, so that at the beginning of the seventeenth century only 14
cities still remained in the Hanseatic League.

After the Peace of Westphalia, in 1648,¹¹¹ the Hanse fell into decline
completely.

Unfortunately there are not many studies of the Hanse. There are modern
ones, but none of them are as good as the old one by _Sartorius von
Waltershausen_, three volumes (cheap in used bookstores). The book
contains no critique; one must provide that oneself; but it does contain
the material.¹¹²

The Hanseatic League represented trading interests exclusively, and
consequently it rested on outdated forms and methods of trade. That was
expressed in the fact that the Hanse cities did not want to participate
in the founding of colonies, as England and the Netherlands did.

Here their _geographic position_ was decisive.

On the one hand the cities in Germany did not acquire sufficient power
so that on their own accord they could carry out centralization on a
large scale. The superiority of landed property in feudalism was too
great for that.

It was the small landowning princes that were the cause of Germany
remaining backward. They had the power to hold the cities down, but not
enough power to lay the groundwork for a new period.

On the one hand, it [the Hanse] was too conservative to help build the
new mode of production. On the other, it was already oriented against
the guilds, and would not allow them to gain as much strength as they
had in Italy, and so forth.

It was only a structure for exploiting trade at a certain historical
period. Novgorod is characteristic. It was destroyed by a single tsar
[Ivan the Terrible]. That was one of the phenomena that led to the
decline of the Hanse.

Why was Novgorod destroyed? In its internal life it had raised itself to
the level of a republic, just as cities elsewhere had done. But at the
same time, tsarist absolutism was on the march in Russia, and the
freedom of the city, which had only begun a weak, unsteady growth, was
bound to give way.

The Hanse represented a line of development that remained backward in
comparison to the forward-moving tendencies [of its time].

It shoved itself in between the Italian Renaissance cities and the
period of [rising] manufacture in Holland.

Even when particular phases of history occur in succession, there is a
single line of development [persisting] in the connection between them,
and the one [phase] would not be possible without the other.

From what has been said we may conclude that the following was
characteristic [of the Hanse]:

The Hanse was bound to go under. Trade outgrew the limits of the Hanse.
New discoveries had brought world trade into being; colonial policy was
now possible. The Hanse represented trading interests exclusively; it
did not take into account the drastic change in the form of production
and trade. Because of its geographical location it could not assume its
share [of the new possibilities]. The Netherlands and England were the
first countries to gain some benefits from this shift [in world trade].
Production had already grown beyond the limits of the small [trading]
centers of the cities. However, the Hanse arose basically as a
unification of a number of small trading-center cities. On the one hand,
the development of the cities in Germany had not succeeded in growing to
a high enough level so that the [Hanseatic] cities could establish a
firmly consolidated alliance. On the other hand, in Germany absolutism
did not become a powerful formation, as it did elsewhere, in order to
become the vehicle for a new age of production as opposed to feudalism.
It was particularism, [the existence of many] small states not strong
enough to form a greater whole, but strong enough to hold back the
development of the cities.

With the development of the cities, commodity production gradually rose
higher. It established itself first in the cities, while feudalism
reigned all around. Thus all around [the cities] there still remained a
form of organized economic production that was controlled by the feudal
lords.

Internally the Hanse was directed against the aspirations of the guilds.
It [the Hanse] was such a truly German product, a wavering,
contradictory structure between two epochs. To be sure, it was a
powerful tool for the development of trade, but from the outset it was
encumbered with a reactionary tendency. The Hanse was, just like Germany
as a whole at that time, inserted parenthetically between two epochs.
Novgorod, an important point of support for the trade of the Hanseatic
League, was destroyed by tsarism. That was no accidental event. Novgorod
represented city autonomy as against the rising aspirations of tsarist
absolutism; the upward striving freedom of the city necessarily had to
give way [in the face of tsarist absolutism], and that meant the
destruction of Novgorod. The development of cities in Russia was thereby
annihilated. In this downfall the even greater backwardness of Russia
played its role.

The Hanse was shoved in between the flourishing of the cities at the
time of the Renaissance in Italy and [the rise of] manufacture in
Holland, which again was just a prelude to the further development taken
over by England.

The value of the Hanse is that it promoted the powerful upward surge of
the Netherlands cities and of trade. Without the Hanse the further
development in England of manufacture that had its origins in Flanders
would not have been possible.

The study of economic history has shown us that, as far as we have come,
all economic forms have been _organized_ in one way or another, were
_planned_. Now in our studies we have come to the threshold of a society
that is not ruled by any organization.

To understand this, let us take an example.

We imagine a primitive-communist mark community. Only yesterday it was
living according to its planned and regulated relationships, but today
all of a sudden all organization has ended.

The foundation of every society is labor.

_Exchange_

In all previous societies production was organized in a planned way, and
the same was true of the distribution of products.

Where organization is lacking, exchange is necessary and serves as the
only connecting link of human society.

In an organized society it is not exchange that takes place, but rather
distribution. Each member from the outset contributes socially necessary
labor. Before products are made there is an order for them by the
society as a whole. Everyone receives what he or she needs, and what the
individual receives is the result of a division of the social wealth.
(In a society that is wealthier the individual receives more than one
would in a society that is poorer.) In an organized society the
contribution of the individual cannot serve as a measure of what he or
she will receive.

Where organization is lacking each works for himself. He engages in
private labor. Only when the finished product is exchanged for another
does the labor of the individual change into socially necessary labor.

For exchange a finished product is necessary, as well as a need for that
particular product. Products that are exchanged must contain the same
amount of labor. A product that is exchanged thereby becomes socially
necessary. It has value.

The number of products needed arises out of the experience of one
exchange after another. Only after an exchange does it become clear
whether a product is socially necessary. From one exchange to another,
demand may alter. Since it is possible only after exchange [_MS. Missing
words_] only after exchange is it regulated [_MS. Missing words_]¹¹³

As a result, at one moment there will be too many products and at
another moment too few.

Uncertainty of the position of the individual.

Exchange is regulated by the division of labor.

Exchange is a substitute for economic planning.

In a socialist society there will be no exchange, but only distribution
of the products.

_The formation of a money economy_

In the course of history a whole series of the most varied forms of
economic production have followed one after another, but they always had
a definite plan as a basis.

What we know about the capitalist economy is that it is unplanned. Thus
the question arises: how is the existence of such a society possible,
one that operates without any plan?

It is assumed that a communist society with a very highly developed
culture and wide-ranging division of labor would suddenly collapse for
any number of reasons if such an indescribable lack of regulation were
to occur.

Only one thing is constantly, irreversibly, and fixed firmly: _everyone
must work_. Without labor a human society is not conceivable.

The division of labor exists. With his or her labor each produces only
one kind of product. Where there is no work plan—and here that would be
the case—the only bond available would be _exchange_. Exchange takes
place only where the organization of labor does not exist. In a planned
economy mediation of products occurs not through exchange but through
_distribution_.

Example: a shoemaker now works as an individual without connection to
the society. He delivers his shoes to this person today and to that
person tomorrow. That is how he earns his livelihood. In a communist
society the shoemaker’s production would be based on the total need of
society. He would receive everything he needs from the society. That
would be governed by the average wealth of the society at any given
time.

Now [i.e., under capitalism], in contrast, the products exchanged on all
sides represent the sum total of the labor that is put into each
product. When two producers have a mutual exchange of products they are
still completely independent of one another and [usually] don’t even
know one another. It is irrelevant if one receives less than he gives.

In an organized society that need not be the case. A shoemaker produces
boots according to the orders placed by society. In return he receives
his means of livelihood, not as a reward for his labor, but as a _fully
entitled member of society_. That is governed more or less by the
average social wealth. The labor expended to produce his means of
livelihood is once again determined by the needs of the society as a
whole. In an organized society the contribution of one and the return
contribution of another are not measured against each other. A rich
harvest, which also provides the shoemaker with a richer quantity of
means for his livelihood, does not require more shoes. Here there is no
exact reciprocal relationship. Thus in this case exchange is not taking
place.

In a communist society each person receives what he or she needs as a
member of that society.

In a slave economy [he receives] because he must be maintained [i.e.,
kept alive to work].

In an unplanned economy each produces as much as is necessary in order
to exchange that for the means of livelihood. The volume of one’s
production determines the needs [that will be met].

In an organized society all labor would be, from the outset, _socially
necessary labor_.

In an unplanned economy every product, from the word go, from the first
foothold represents _private labor_. Labor is transformed into socially
necessary labor only _after exchange_.¹¹⁴ Something is first produced
and then is regulated by demand. No one can be sure immediately whether
he will receive the share of the social wealth due to him in return for
his labor.

_Exchange thus becomes the substitute for planned organization of
labor_. In an unplanned economy socially necessary labor, which must
exist always and at every time, is no longer the sum of the labor of
those who are working. Every instance of labor is first of all private
labor, and it becomes socially necessary labor only after exchange, but
that comes into the picture only after production has been completed.
Socially necessary labor is now the sum total of the products that have
been exchanged.

Only those products that are needed [i.e., that can be used] succeed in
being exchanged. The exchange value of a product is its capacity to be
used. Because only when it is used does a product become socially
necessary labor; only then does it have exchange value. Until then every
product is valueless private labor.

Exchange is thus the distinguishing characteristic of unplanned
production.

That is why in a socialist society no exchange will be able to exist.
Exchange is only possible if a society lacks organization.

For each individual labor is the precondition for his or her existence.
Without labor one cannot exist.

How much labor is necessary for the maintenance of the society, and what
kind of labor? That is [now] determined in the process of exchange. What
is produced in excess of that will remain on the market [unsold]. It
remains valueless private labor.

The experience gathered from previous instances of exchange serves as
the guiding measure for further production.

In the unplanned economy therefore that which is socially necessary is
always determined after the fact.

The means of regulation will now be a rough approximation constantly
either above or below the actual volume of existing needs.

The tendency of private labor to come close to this approximation is
bound to be more or less unsuccessful. Exchange is the only regulating
factor.

In an organized society the distribution of products is regulated in a
planned way. The amount of total needs is known in advance.

Now one’s share in the social wealth depends on exchange. Complete
uncertainty prevails.

Even the way in which the division of labor occurs is now regulated by
exchange. The number of workers in each branch of production is
regulated independently.

It is left up to each individual to bring new products to the market.
Exchange will show him whether a need had been served or not. In this
way exchange determines the appearance of new trades or professions.

To repeat: exchange presents itself as the regulating factor in an
economy where the planned organization of labor is lacking.

Each person can satisfy their own needs only by exchanging the product
of their labor. Thus people produce their vital needs themselves. But
their means of livelihood can be gained only through exchange, when
someone else has a need for their product. All individual members of
society find themselves in the same situation.

Since exchange is the only intermediary for the meeting of needs, all
the needs of an individual can only be met if all members of society
have the same need for the product of each individual [worker].

Example: the cobbler can meet all his own needs only if all those who
make products that he requires for the satisfaction of his manifold
needs continually have the same strong need for the product of his
labor, boots, for example.

Since this target will never be met, a difficulty arises which an
organized society does not know. There the need of the society as a
whole is a known factor. Now what exists are a large number of
individual, independent needs.

Such an unlimited need by all for all products has never existed. But as
a historic fact it has occurred that one particular product, for
example, cattle, was a universal need that was felt by everyone at all
times, was desired to the same strong degree. We would use one term here
for the purpose of our subsequent discussion: that is, a _concrete_ need
or product.

This concrete product will be taken by anyone at any time in exchange
for any other product.

The precondition is that in the society under consideration there is a
general consumer need for this product.

It is precisely through exchange that each one is in a position to gain
possession of this product. To begin with, he exchanges something for it
in order to consume this product.

Soon, however, he arrives at the conclusion that he can also use this
product to exchange for other things that he needs.

It now turns out that one such product has a dual function.

Example: the product of the cobbler’s labor, that is, boots, must now be
transformed into the concrete product. Then he can use this concrete
product to exchange it for products that he requires in order to satisfy
his needs.

Each person makes products with his own labor. It becomes socially
necessary labor only through exchange. The only form [this can take] is
when the product of his labor can be transformed into the concrete
product.

Now a product must exist that is known in advance to be a social need.
Only for such a product will private labor immediately become socially
necessary labor. Every [instance of] private labor now becomes socially
necessary labor if it is transformed into this concrete product of
exchange. This concrete product is now the only connecting element
within this loosely structured society. This concrete product is now the
commodity that will be accepted by anyone at any time. This concrete
product has now become _the means of exchange_.

The means of exchange is therefore a product that from the outset
embodies socially necessary labor, and it gives, to every individual who
possesses it, access to the social wealth.

This concrete product performs a dual function: as a means of
consumption and as a means of exchange. Thus a certain part of this
product might not be consumed. That part will be designated in advance
as a means of exchange.

For example, [at one time] cattle were a means of exchange. Thus when an
exchange took place one or some of the cattle would be marked
separately, stamped or branded to distinguish them from the cattle
designated for consumption. All the qualities that were valued and
required in the cattle designated for consumption were unnecessary and
superfluous in the cattle designated as a means of exchange. These
cattle now are only a means of exchange.

However, the type of exchange product (for example, cattle) is bound to
run into difficulties, such as how they are to be safeguarded,
circulated, etc., and these difficulties tend to hinder the cattle’s
usability as a means of exchange. Now only one more step is necessary
for this problematic means of exchange to be replaced by another that
will not be burdened by these difficulties, for example, metal.

This corresponds to what actually happened. The selection of this exact
new means of exchange is not mere speculation, however; it is
historically determined. The transition from cattle as means of exchange
to metal as means of exchange occurred simultaneously with the
transition from herding to agriculture.

Agriculture needed metal. Its usability increased with the development
of tools and weapons and the technology of their production. Metal
became a universally desired item of consumption.

This course of development was reflected in words. In Latin, money was
called _pecunia_, but this term was derived from _pecus_.¹¹⁵ It is
interesting furthermore that the first coins very often had the image of
an ox or a sheep—that is, the type of animal that had previously served
as the universal means of exchange.

Cattle and metal were not the only products that had significance as
means of exchange. For example, for the Arabs it was dates, and for many
primitive peoples of Africa it was cowrie shells.

These latter items also were included in the ranks of universally
desired means of consumption. They served as jewelry that had
significance as a means of distinguishing different tribes, ranks, and
classes of seniority.

There is nothing at all exceptional about this. In our society also,
despite an incomparably higher level of culture, symbols that are
worthless or of very little worth have great meaning as distinguishing
marks of a certain rank or standing for those wearing them or carrying
them.

But the significance of cattle and metal became predominant. Their range
of dominance was much wider than anything else. As we have already said,
cattle as a means of exchange were pushed out with the transition from
herding to agriculture. This process, in which the one superseded the
other, was not completed quickly, nor did it occur everywhere at the
same time; it happened gradually, at the same kind of pace that occurs
in any transition. For a long time they both served side-by-side as
means of exchange of equal worth.

In the poetry of Homer (eighth century BC) oxen and copper and iron were
all named side-by-side as means of exchange.

It was possible for metal to become the most significant of all other
[means of exchange] because it possessed physical qualities in a higher
degree than all others that made it especially appropriate for that
purpose.

One can remove all the consumer qualities from metal, and yet at any
time it can be turned back into its former condition as a means of
consumption. That is its greater advantage.

Metal became the means of exchange that dominated trade and exchange in
general.

Indeed the extent of trade and exchange is variable. It goes up and down
and cannot be determined in advance. Thus it lends itself also to a
great many different means of exchange that may be used in trade at any
particular time and that can never be set in advance.

Money is now the only product that represents socially necessary labor
from the very outset.

It can possess this characteristic only when all other labor represents
only private labor. Hidden behind that is an entire epoch in which the
organization of labor was totally lacking.

Money is necessary in an unplanned economy.

Money is only the expression of commodity production.

With that we have also answered the question of whether a socialist
society will need money. It does not need it.

_The development of money, briefly then, is as follows:_

Gold is to begin with a product of social labor that is universally
desired.

Money is at one moment a product of exchange and at another a product of
consumption.

Part of this product is designated only for consumption and another part
exclusively as a means of exchange.

This latter part was deliberately distinguished by stamping it.

Now money took on a form in which it could not be consumed. Now it is
only money. But it serves as a means by which every need without
exception can be satisfied.

Now the only thing that remains is to _investigate whether the premise
of a sudden collapse of a form of economy is justified_.

It is, because it is a historical fact.

A catastrophe cannot be measured during the time when it is happening.
The nature of a catastrophe consists above of all in the fact that in a
short span of time it brings with it in a forceful way entirely new
forms, a transformation that was prepared for a long time during
peaceful development. It is a further development, accelerated by
revolution, of a particular line of previous development.

Example: the French Revolution of 1793. [With that came] the
introduction of private property in Algeria, and all colonial policies
in general.

The premise is historically grounded.

However, it is not the only form that development must necessarily take.

Example: the development of Germany. One stage passes gradually over
into another, supported by revolutions, which do not however appear here
as catastrophes or have catastrophic effects.

_Further, is it possible for exchange to spring up suddenly?_

Exchange does not need to be invented suddenly at a critical moment.
Exchange exists at every time. Even peoples who are by no means
organized into firmly fixed associations know exchange.

Example: during excavations in northern France stone tools were found
made from a kind of stone that did not exist in that region.

We do not know of any epoch [in human development] without exchange; and
even less so now does any separate people live without exchange.

Exchange was the mechanism by which cultural advances spread far beyond
the region of their origin; at every time it contributed to the
advancement of culture.

Exchange was possible as soon as the productivity of labor had reached a
certain high level at which labor produced surpluses, quantities of
goods greater than absolutely necessary. As far as knowledge of the
history of culture has been able to conclude, this precondition [i.e.,
exchange] has been present everywhere.

Thus it is justified to introduce [the subject of exchange] into our
investigation [of the Middle Ages].

Exchange always begins where organized production reaches its limit in
time or space.

The economic foundation for exchange is the productivity of labor and
the surplus produced by it. The expansion of exchange occurs to the same
extent that it becomes habitual.

From the outset¹¹⁶ it [exchange] is limited to individual instances and
to certain objects that, because of favorable conditions, are more
abundantly available. That which succeeds in becoming the possession of
another tribe or people soon becomes a need there. Thus exchange becomes
a necessity, and production for this exchange becomes a rule.

This exchange also stimulates the production of other goods. It spreads
further. There are more and more objects that are produced in advance
for exchange, that is, as commodities.

To the extent that more products are brought within the sphere of the
exchange process, as exchange spreads wider, the greater the need grows
for a designated means for exchange.

An example of the difficulties for the exchange process when such a
universal means of exchange is lacking is as follows: [Jérome] Becker
found a Black African tribe at the headwaters of the Nile¹¹⁷ which would
exchange only meat for other products. In order to obtain flour, hammers
(or spades) were offered in exchange, along with cloth. For the hammers
an ox was offered in trade, which was then slaughtered and cut into
pieces. Only in exchange for these pieces of meat could the desired
flour then be obtained from the tribe in question.

For us, cattle are the most important of all the means of exchange
because it became the means of exchange for the peoples who were the
ancestors of our culture.

Metal money later took the place of cattle. From the outset it
represented socially necessary labor.

Gold is the highest form of money because consumption value is attached
to it only to a very small extent. It is precisely for that reason that
it represents socially necessary labor in its purest form. It possesses
hardly any everyday usefulness.

The outer aspect of the social development of money reaches its peak in
gold. Money did not develop originally in the Middle Ages, but had its
origins in the early ancient world, in the Orient.¹¹⁸

In the early Middle Ages, in contrast, the natural economy predominates.
Only with the development of commodity production does the money economy
reappear here. Thus, the development [of the money economy] had to
become so widespread it was necessary to represent social labor in a
form that had no consumption value. The development of money thus recurs
many times.

And each time the development of money is nothing more than a reflection
of the development of the relations of production within a specific
cultural area or region.

The capitalist form of economy endeavors to spread commodity production
over the entire globe. With that it also spreads the money economy to
the same extent. The world economy has turned money into world money.

Commodity production and the money economy form the basis on which the
capitalist economy is built.

With the elimination of this economic form these two fundamental pillars
[on which it rests] must also disappear.

They are the foundation and characteristic feature of this unplanned
mode of economic production, namely, the capitalist mode of production.

Capitalism develops within itself the preconditions for a new mode of
production, which through historical necessity must surely replace it.

That is the socialist economy, organized on a planned basis.

With that we end these investigations [into the Middle Ages], at the
point where Marx steps in with his investigation into and critique of
the capitalist mode of production.


REFERENCES

_Statistisches Jahrbuch für Deutschland_ [Statistical Yearbook for
Germany]¹¹⁹

Putzger:

_Geschichts-Atlas_. [Historical Atlas]¹²⁰

Perthes:

_Taschen-Atlas_. [Pocket Atlas]¹²¹

Plötz:

_Auszug aus der Geschichte_. [Excerpt from History]¹²²

Bücher:

_Entstehung der Volkswirtschaft_. [Origin of Economics]¹²³

Engels:

_Die Lage der arbeitenden Klassen in England_ [Condition of the Working
Class in England]

Engels:

_Die Entwicklung des Sozialismus von der Utopie zur Wissenschaft_.
[Socialism, Utopian and Scientific]¹²⁴

Lippert:

_Kulturgeschichte, I. Band_. [History of Culture, Vol. 1])¹²⁵

Ratzel:

_Völkerkunde_. [Ethnology]¹²⁶

Engels:

_Der Anteil der Arbeit an der Menschwerdung des Affen_[The Part Played
by Labor in the Transition from Ape to Man], _Neue Zeit_, Year 14, Vol.
2, this page.¹²⁷

Weitling:

_Garantien der Harmonie und Freiheit_. [Guarantees of Harmony and
Freedom]¹²⁸

Morgan:

_Die Urgesellschaft_. [Ancient Society]¹²⁹

Maurer:

_Einleitung zur Geschichte der Mark-, Hof-, Fron- und Dorfverfassung_.

[Introduction to the History of the Mark, Court, Village and Town
Constitution]

Caesar:

_Der gallische Krieg_. [The Gallic Wars]¹³⁰

Cunow:

_Die soziale Verfassung des Inkareiches_. [The Social Constitution of
the Inca Empire]¹³¹

Macaulay:

Warren Hastings.

Macaulay:

Lord Clive.¹³²

Haxthausen:

_Studien über die inneren Zustände usw. in Russland_. [Studies on
Internal Conditions, etc., of Russia]¹³³

Plekhanov:

Chernyshevsky.¹³⁴

Engels:

_Internationales aus dem Volksstaat. Soziales aus Russland_.
[International Material from _Der Volkstaat_. Social Material from
Russia]¹³⁵

Tschuproff:

_Die Feldgemeinschaft_. [The Rural Community]¹³⁶_Handwörterbuch der
Staatswissenschaften_. [Concise Dictionary of the Political Sciences],
article on the “Mir” (this is the Russian Mark)¹³⁷

Parvus:

_Das hungernde Russland_. [Starving Russia]¹³⁸

Engels:

_Anti-Dühring_.¹³⁹ Theory of Violence

Engels:

_Ursprung der Familie_. [Origin of the Family, Private Property, and the
State]¹⁴⁰

Kautsky:

_Ursprung des Christentums;_ die Sklavenwirtschaft. [Foundations of
Christianity; The Slave Economy]¹⁴¹

Eduard Meyer:

_Geschichte des Altertums_. [History of Antiquity]

Eduard Meyer:

_Sklaverei im Altertum_. [Slavery in Antiquity]

Eduard Meyer:

Entwicklung des Wirtschaftslebens im Altertum. [Development of Economic
Life in Antiquity]¹⁴²
_Handwörterbuch der Staatswissenschaften_ [The Concise Dictionary of
Political Sciences]: articles “Bevölkerung im Altertum,” [Population in
Antiquity] “Agrarverhältnisse im Altertum.” [Agrarian Relations in
Antiquity]¹⁴³

Beloch:

_Griechische Geschichte_. [Greek History]¹⁴⁴

Ernst:

_Neue Zeit_, 11. Jahrgang, 2. Band.¹⁴⁵

Kautsky:

_Vorläufer des Sozialismus; Plato und der griechische Staat_.
[Forerunners of Socialism: Plato and the Greek State]¹⁴⁶

Mommsen:

_Römische Geschichte_. [History of Rome]

Lassalle:

_Kapital und Arbeit_. [Capital and Labor] (Description of feudal
economy)

Lassalle:

_Indirekte Steuern_. [Indirect Taxes]

Willibald

_Der Roland von Berlin_. [Roland of Berlin]¹⁴⁷

Alexis:

Professor

_Das Aufkommen des Handwerks in den deutschen Städten_. [The Rise of

Arnold, Basel:

Craft Production in the German Cities]

Schiller:

_Der Abfall der Niederlande_. [Revolt of the Netherlands]

Goethe:

_Egmont_.

Sartorius von Waltershausen:

_Geschichte der Hansa_ [History of the Hanse]

Marx:

_Das Kapital_. [Capital]

_literature on Feudalism and on the Development of Cities:_¹⁴⁸

  ------------------- ---------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
  Ludwig von          _Einleitung zur Geschichte der Mark-, Hof-, Dorf- und Stadtverfassung_
  Maurer:¹⁴⁹          [Introduction to the History of the Mark, Court, Village and Town Constitution (Publisher Ignaz Brand, Vienna, cost 6.50 Marks)
  Ludwig von          _Geschichte der Städteverfassung_ (Many volumes) [History of the City
  Maurer:             Constitution]
  Engels:             _Die Lage der arbeitenden Klassen in England_. [The Condition of the Working Class in England]
  Engels:             _Bauernkrieg_. [The Peasant War in Germany]
  W. Wolff:           _Die schlesische Milliarde_. [The Silesian Billion]
  Willibald Alexis:   _Der Roland von Berlin_ (and other novels by him).
  Fr.v. Schiller:     _Abfall der Niederlandeo_ [Revolt of the Netherlands]
  Goethe:             _Egmont_.
  Guizot:             _Geschichte der Zivilisation in Frankreich_ [History of Civilization in France], first published in 1830–32.
  Thierry:            _Betrachtungen über die Geschichte Frankreichs_ [Observations on the History of France] 1840.
  Thierry:            _Geschichte des 3. Standes im Mittelalter_. [History of the Third Estate in the Middle Ages]
  Savigny:            _Geschichte des römischen Rechts_. [History of Roman Law]
  Lassalle:           _Kapital und Arbeit_. [Capital and Labor]
  Eichhorn:           _Über den Ursprung der Städteverfassung in Deutschland_. [On the Origin of the Constitution of the City in Germany]
  Lassalle:           _Indirekte Steuern_. [Indirect Taxes]
  Gaupp:              _Über deutsche Städtegründung_ [On the Founding of German Cities] 1824.
  Leo:                _Entwicklung der Verfassung der lombardischen Städte_. [Development of the Constitution of the Lombard Cities]
  Wilda:              _Über das Gildenwesen im Mittelalter_ [On the Guild System in the Middle Ages] 1831.
  Hüllmann:           _Städtewesen im Mittelalter_ [City Structure in the Middle Ages] 1827.
  Arnold [in]         _Das Aufkommen des Handwerks in den deutschen Städten_. [The Rise of
  Basel:              Craft Production in the German Cities]
  Putzger:            _Geschichts-Atlas_. [Historical Atlas]
  Perthes:            _Taschen-Atlas_. [Pocket Atlas]
  Bücher:             _Entstehung der Volkswirtschaft_. [Origin of Economics]
  ------------------- ---------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

_Literatur zur Hansa (Literature on the Hanseatic League):_

  --------------- ------------------------------------------------
  Sartorius von   _Geschichte der Hansa_. (History of the Hanse)
  Waltershausen   
  --------------- ------------------------------------------------



PRACTICAL ECONOMICS: VOLUME 2 OF MARX’S _CAPITAL_¹


Volume 2 is rather divergent in character from Volume 1. _Volume 2 has
more of a theoretical and scientific character_. It deals with problems
that do not lend themselves to immediate application for use in
practical life, for example, in agitational work. _On the other hand, it
is especially important for solving the problem of economic crises_.
Other than that, unfortunately, Volume 2 is [like] a quantity of capital
that has not yet been put to use, that has not shown a profit.

If we want to read the whole of _Capital—_this is what Comrade Luxemburg
recommends to us²—we can “with a clear conscience” skip over Volume 2,
to begin with, in order to [go ahead and] read Volume 3. Volume 3 deals
with problems that coincide more directly with the observations made by
an ordinary person in practical life.

_Volume 2 deals with the process of circulation of capital_. The
circulation of capital is the total process that capital as a whole goes
through. This encompasses the purchase of raw materials, and of means of
production, the actual production process itself, and the sale of the
goods produced. The circulation process is the entire circuit completed
by capital.

Volume 1 deals with the middle phase, which is the decisive one, the
most important, because it shows where surplus value comes from.

It is not only the individual phases that belong to the overall process
of circulation, but also certain periods of time that depend on the
conditions of commodity exchange on the market.

Depending on the branch of production in which a [particular quantity
of] capital is employed, and depending on the state or condition of the
market [in general], these time periods may be longer or shorter, [that
is,] the time periods that are used for the purchase of raw materials,
the production of the commodities, and then their sale.

_To begin with, [let us consider] the acquisition of the means of
production_. There are branches [of the economy] in which the raw
materials and tools are present right there on the spot. _In mining, for
example, the time [necessary] for the acquisition of raw materials drops
out of consideration entirely_.³ In other branches, where materials are
worked up, [the time necessary for] the acquisition of the materials has
to be added. Depending on whether these raw materials need to be brought
from far away or are produced nearby, the time necessary for getting
hold of them will be longer or shorter.

Depending on _where the markets for the sale of the commodities are
located_, the time necessary to reach the market will of course be
longer or shorter. In the food industry, for example, the realization of
the commodities [must] take place immediately after they are produced
and in a continuous, unbroken process. On the other hand, in the
clothing industry, which is put to work at particular times, production
is linked with longer time intervals, in [a situation in] which larger
quantities of goods are placed on the market at the appropriate
“season.” Here the realization of the commodities takes a longer time.

_Also in the phase of actual production we see greater differences,
depending on the state of the technology and the particular
characteristics of the production process_. To a certain extent it can
be said that the length of the production process is shortened by
advances in technology. For example, today in contrast to former times,
it is possible for products that have to be dried before they are
completely finished to be _dried by chemical processes_. Previously one
had to rely on natural drying.

_The means of transport and their development can enormously reduce the
time that capital needs to get hold of goods and get rid of them_.

The development of production _on the world market_ gives capital the
possibility of making it easier to obtain raw materials.

In addition there occurs the building up of the credit system, which
accelerates commodity production in general.

_The development of technology contributes to shortening the turnover
time for capital_. But there are quite large differences among the
various branches of production. An important consequence follows from
this for the production of surplus value:

The amount of surplus value that one quantity of capital obtains depends
on the size of the variable capital during a certain time span. One may
take three equal quantities of capital, with the same amount of variable
capital, and the same degree of intensity of exploitation. All three
will have a different turnover time. One quantity of capital will turn
over in all of three months (that is, after three months the capitalist
will have turned everything back into money); another capital will
require all year, and the third all of two years. Given that the law of
value remains in full force and that surplus value is fully calculated
and its derivation fully ascertained, it is only from the variable
capital, on the basis of different turnover times, that a great
disparity would necessarily arise in the surplus value of the individual
quantities of capital.

We come now to questions that Volume 1 of _Capital_ dealt with,
questions such as: _How is surplus value divided up among the individual
capitalists so that, on the one hand, the law of value is not violated_
(that is, the law according to which commodities are bought or sold in
accordance with the amount of labor that has gone into them), _and so
that, on the other hand, each individual quantity of capital earns an
equal profit?_

If no equalization [of profits] takes place, then the capitalists would
invest their capital in _those_ branches of industry that have the
shortest possible turnover time. That would have [the following] effect
on the production process: prices would be reduced and therefore so
would surplus value.

How far down would surplus value go? Down to the amount that is produced
in the next [longest] category [in terms of turnover time], that is, in
the category of capital that turns over in one year.

In the latter category, however, an outflow of capital has taken place,
back into the first category [where] the turnover time is only three
months. Thus there is reduced production, from which there follows a
rise in prices and because of that, a rise in the rate of surplus value.
As a result there is again an inflow of capital, because to capital it
is all the same whether it is employed in businesses that turn over four
times a year or in businesses that turn over only once a year, as long
as the latter yield the same amount of surplus value as those that turn
over four times a year.

_The difference in turnover times brings about a movement of capital
from one branch of production into others. The purpose of this process
of equalization is to arrive at [roughly] the same amount of surplus
value [for all capitalists]_. And this goes on in such a way that the
production that is put to work for society is always subject to
fluctuation. _But this coincides with the needs of society, with social
demand_. That is the other aspect which determines how far the
overfulfillment of production can go.

_The satisfaction of needs in the various spheres of society is
regulated by_ the movement of capital. On the other hand, by the same
token, this movement of capital represents a dividing-up of the total
capital among the various branches of production, a division that
corresponds to the needs of society.

Volume 2 of _Capital_ breaks down into two parts.⁴ It⁵ gives special
treatment to the conditions [necessary] for the realization of the
commodities produced by capital to be carried out smoothly.

It turns out that the content of this volume mainly provides material
for solving the question of crises, although Marx seldom mentions the
term “crisis” in this volume.⁶

As an introduction to Volume 2, then, [I will say] a few words about the
history of _crises_ and an overview of the crises that happened in the
nineteenth century.

_The economic crisis of 1815 in England provided the impetus for a
theory of economic crises to be developed_.

That crisis is not a characteristic crisis of modern society; it does
not belong among the crises that grew out of economic conditions. The
series of [periodical] economic crises in modern times therefore is
usually dated from 1825.

_The crisis of 1815 was the consequence of_ [_Napoleon’s_] _Continental
System, and thus it came about for political reasons_. The Continental
System was imposed in 1806 against England. It lasted until 1812–13. It
was supposed to destroy England. It forbade the import of English goods
into any country on the Continent of Europe. English subjects living in
countries that were part of the Continental System were declared to be
prisoners of war and their fortunes were confiscated.

Actually the result of this blockade was the following: it gave rise to
a huge smuggling industry. America brought in English goods under the
American flag. Also, industry in Europe developed as a result of the
absence of English competition. The spinning mills in Vogtland date from
this time.

_During the blockade England calculated that after the lifting of the
blockade a huge new market would open up_. For this reason it built up
large stocks of goods. _When the blockade was lifted, however, things
turned out differently_ from what England thought.

Demand was not as large as England had expected. This resulted in 1815
in the first crisis to occur in England, mainly in the cotton industry.

_This occurrence in and of itself provided the impetus for a major
disagreement and dispute between English and French economists_.

The theories of _Malthus, Say, and Sismondi_ now come under
consideration.

_The first person who looked into the question of economic crises from
the standpoint of the working class was Robert Owen_. In his writings of
1815, 1818, and 1823⁷ he sought to explain the crises by the
contradiction between rising productivity from the introduction of
machinery and the lowering of wages, which was also caused by the
introduction of machinery. This explanation is very interesting. Owen
derived it independently of Ricardian theory. _As a remedy for the
crises Owen called for employment of the workers by the state_.

That was the first democratic and socialist theory about economic
crises.

Malthus came out against that and Sismondi followed along with him.

_Malthus derived the source of crises primarily from the division of
income and the urge to economize on the part of the industrial
capitalists_. He saw as the reason for the crises the fact that, owing
to the capitalists’ drive to economize, consumption did not increase
satisfactorily, which produces nothing. _As a remedy Malthus called for
an increase in the large number of unproductive consumers (the nobility,
the court, etc.) and a higher level of expenditures for the military,
the navy, the bureaucracy, and so forth_.⁸

The theory of [Max] Schippel shows up as a minor reflection of this
theory [of Malthus].⁹

According to Malthus, improving the conditions of the workers is not a
remedy for the crises. Because, as Malthus explains, the workers consume
only as much as they earn in wages. Thus they can only replace capital
with capital.

_Sismondi_ takes the same point of departure as Malthus.¹⁰ However, he
also sees the remedy as being to increase the purchasing power of the
working masses. Thus he finds himself in a contradiction from which he
cannot extricate himself. This is shown by the fact that he himself
concedes: if one increases purchasing power and improves the condition
of the workers, that will have a blunting effect on the capitalists’
drive for accumulation. And then production will not be able to expand.
He seeks the middle ground in his truly petty bourgeois approach: _not
such a rapid accumulation of capital, but on the other hand an
improvement in the condition of the workers_.

_Say came out in opposition to all of these_. He attached himself
likewise to the theory of value of the classical political economists.
But he applied the theory in such a way that it was a slap in the face
to the Smith-Ricardo school. This is what Say said:

Exchange consists of exchange between economies of equal value. Money is
only an intermediary. How can one speak of the possibility of a crisis
when each commodity represents nothing other than a demand for other
commodities, but rather also [_MS. Missing words_]

_According to Say’s theory, a general condition of overproduction is
impossible; only a partial overproduction_.¹¹ If overproduction begins
[in one area], that is only proof that there is underproduction in other
branches [of the economy]; therefore the remedy for crises is an
increase of production in those branches of the economy where
underproduction exists.

The critique made by Say is based on a misjudgment about the actual
conditions, which made universal barter¹² impossible and made the
development of money necessary.

After Say came the agrarian reformers. They derived the causes of crises
from private ownership of the land.

Thus we see, on the one hand, the derivation of crises from the unequal
distribution of income.

The democratic trend sees, as the means for eliminating crises,
increasing the purchasing power of the masses.

The other trend hopes to eliminate crises by increasing capitalist
production.

_Then came Marx. He said that crises are a result of the unregulated
mode of production that is capitalism_.

Professor [Heinrich] Herkner at Zurich University has learned a lot from
Marx. In the fifth volume of the _Handwörterbuch der
Staatswissenschaften_ there is a treatment and discussion of crises by
him. But in this treatment he introduces other conceptions as well.¹³

In 1866 a special inquiry was authorized to investigate economic crises
in America. This investigation named 180 causes of crises.¹⁴ Numerous
individual factors were named that certainly were correct. But only when
the particularities are all brought together can we see where the
responsibility lies for crises: namely the entire unregulated system of
capitalist production.

[Mikhail Ivanovich] _Tugan-Baranovsky_, who had earlier been a Marxist
and is now a revisionist, once commented as follows on Marx’s theory of
crises:

The breeding grounds from which crises originate are in the so-called
heavy industries: the iron, coal, and machine industries. These
industries are the direct producers of means of production. According to
Tugan-Baranovsky, crises originate out of a disproportion, that is, the
lack of a proper ratio, or relationship, between the different branches
of industry in which the means of production are made and those in which
the means of consumption are produced.

As far as recent years are concerned, what Tugan-Baranovsky said is
right. But what does this deficient relationship signify? If Baranovsky
wants nothing more than to particularize it more exactly and establish
it more precisely, he is right. But that does not bring us one single
step further. However, if Baranovsky wants to say by this that on the
basis of present-day society a means exists for the establishing of a
correct relationship between these branches of industry, that is a
purely utopian bit of imagining.

Thus Baranovsky’s attempt is quite equivocal and unclear.

Despite its fuzziness this theory has been welcomed by the world of
learned German gentlemen. In particular Professor [Werner] Sombart dealt
with it in a lecture he gave in 1903 at the Thirtieth General Assembly
of the Association for Social Policy.¹⁵ In this lecture he accepted
Tugan-Baranovsky’s theory on behalf of German science. But he did try to
modify it. He said that crises actually arise from a deficient relation
between branches of production that produce inorganic materials, on the
one hand, and the branches that produce organic materials on the other.
By organic materials Professor Sombart apparently means food products,
and by inorganic he means coal, etc. This attempt of Sombart’s is not to
be taken seriously because it is no longer in the realm of political
economy.

_The Succession of Crises_

1. 1815 in England

2. 1825 in England

3. 1836–39 in England and the United States (some call this the Panic of
1837, but it actually lasted three years)

4. 1847

5. 1857

6. 1864–66

7. 1873

8. 1882

9. 1891–92

10. 1893 (this was especially an American crisis)

11. 1895

12. 1900/1901

13. 1907

Crises are a fundamental ailment of present-day society. And no cure for
them has been cultivated in present-day society.

The question, however, arises of _how_ one is to understand this theory
[of crisis]. One may draw different conclusions from it.

In our agitation [in the SPD] one argument is used very widely—that
crises arise as a result of insufficient purchasing power among the
workers, because of low wages.

It is not only that this argument does not belong to Marx’s theory,
which is that crises are the result of the present-day mode of
production; it is not only that but also the _way_ in which this theory
is presented.

Marx begins first of all with the fact that he envisions a society that
does not produce on a capitalist basis.

In earlier years one of the most important aspects of crises had to do
with the building of railroads.

Let us imagine therefore a society based on planning. It adopts an
undertaking similar in kind to the large-scale building of railroads.
(This is historically valid: for example, in Egypt the building of the
pyramids and canals, also in Peru the building of roads, and so forth.
It is not relevant whether the project is useful, but simply that it is
a large-scale project in which large numbers of people work together and
are concentrated in one place.)

Such an undertaking requires large quantities of labor power to be
brought together in one arena of labor, and the society does not have
the use of that labor for a longer stretch of time. During this whole
time, however, this many-headed workforce has to be maintained. This
implies that food, and other means of subsistence, as well as the means
of production and [appropriate] management have to be provided.

Such an undertaking, in a society based on planning, cannot come into
existence if society does not have excess labor power, labor power that
can satisfy needs above and beyond current, day-to-day needs. Therefore
in the past we see such large-scale undertakings only by way of
exception.

A primitive communist society can only put such an undertaking into
operation if it is actually in a position to assign a portion of its
workers [to this task] and to maintain them regardless of [the amount
required for] their daily consumption.

In cases where a class society already exists, no consideration will be
given to this. A large mass of workers will be gathered together and
thrown into a task even at the expense of a lowering of their living
standards, and they will be maintained by the labor of others, for
example, in Egypt.

In both cases, an approximate calculation of the labor power that
society can spare and the quantity of means of subsistence necessary to
maintain such masses of workers—such calculation would have to be done
in advance.

The result of this would be a reduced standard of living and [greater]
suffering for the masses of the population …

For the workforce assigned to such a large-scale project, there is an
unusually hard and heavy burden of labor. The result might perhaps be
that in the course of a year a product has come into existence that is
of absolutely no use to society, such as the pyramids.

After the completion of this project, the living labor power would be
sent back to its old work assignments, and so nothing like a [modern-day
economic] crisis would result from that sort of event.

When the undertaking had ended the earlier standard of living, with
living conditions at the same level as before, would be resumed.

Now let us imagine such an undertaking in a capitalist country, for
example, the building of railroads.

As soon as the decision is made to found a railroad company, the first
necessity is a relatively large quantity of money capital. In order for
this to be possible, it is necessary that the prospects exist for
capital to obtain a high profit [from investment] in railroad
construction.

Capital flows in from all possible spheres of production, and in
particular this is done on an international basis. The building of a
railroad has never been carried out exclusively, with the _national_
capital of _one country alone_.

The very fact that the resources for building a railroad in one country
flow in from another country shows that there is no precise [i.e.,
planned] coordination here. This fact completely excludes the general
assumption that can be made when we view any primitive society.¹⁶

As soon as capital flows in and concentrates at one particular point,
the immediate result is that a large quantity of labor power, plus means
of subsistence and means of production, follow along in the wake of that
capital.

When there is a demand for money it will be impossible to control all
the means that might be available for obtaining money.

As soon as a relatively large mass of workers finds in one location a
relatively large availability of employment then wages consequently go
way up, this labor power represents a large demand for means of
subsistence. The further consequence is a rise in prices in agriculture.
Agriculture [in one country] is not in a position to satisfy such a
growing demand.

Consequently, the strong demand results in intensified importing of food
from other countries. This massive influx of food and other means of
subsistence from other countries causes a substantial rise in prices in
those other countries, along with an increased desire to export [from
those countries].

This results in a boom even in countries that, to begin with, had
nothing to do with the railroad construction.

Now the project is carried out. The masses of employed workers
disappear. In the meantime a whole series of branches of production have
been established on the basis of the railroad construction and alongside
of it. They bring their supplies to market at a time when the demand has
already disappeared.

From this there arises a crisis. The large market has now been cut off.
Then comes a crisis in the countries that were providing goods for the
construction of railroads, and then a collapse on the money market and
in credit relations on an international basis.

That is approximately a schematic outline of the crises that occurred in
the first half of the nineteenth century, which were played out back and
forth between England and America.

In the old days people said that crises were the result of
overproduction. That is merely a description of the state of affairs.
The real answer is: since no one knows how much society needs, too much
is produced.

But the correct answer is this: Every relatively large undertaking in
society must inevitably bring a crisis in its wake. Because branches of
industry have been built up, which then become superfluous after the
project is over.

Why is production not expanded to an extent sufficient to meet the
demand—why doesn’t that take place? Because, after all, it is known that
the undertaking will come to an end some day.

Once production has been expanded it cannot just shrivel up
artificially. Or if it does, the result is a crisis.

If production is expanded [to a large extent], and then a transition is
made [back] to a smaller basis—that will mean a crisis in capitalist
society.

Such a state of affairs is inevitable nowadays.

The only means for raising profits is progress in technology, increasing
productivity. Raising the level of technology is linked with the
expansion of production facilities.

How do the capitalists operate in response to a campaign for wages to be
raised, and so forth? With an expansion of technology. And this [in
turn] finds expression in an expansion of production.

Again, capitalist production responds to the discovery of new markets
with expansion of production.

Its perennial method is the expansion of production.

From this it becomes clear that the actual feature of capitalism that
contributes toward crises is that the capitalist mode of production has
an inherent tendency toward the constant expansion of production.

What has now happened to the assumption that underconsumption by the
masses is to blame for crises, and that therefore the purchasing power
of the masses must be increased? What is incorrect about that?

Let us assume that the workers manage to keep their wages at a very high
level. The result would again be a large-scale expansion of production.
To satisfy the higher level of demand, supply would be raised to an even
higher level.

_The capitalist mode of production has the tendency to hastily pass
beyond every limit, because profit is the only thing it takes into
consideration_.

What about the assumption that if unproductive expenditures are
increased, crises can be avoided—what happens to that assumption? The
same thing would then occur as with the raising of wages. The supply
would then be increased much more than the higher level of demand by
unproductive consumers.

Russia shows that it is precisely very large orders by the state that
can immediately call forth a colossal expansion of production, which has
the tendency to go speeding past and beyond the increased demand.

The number one necessity for the worker is to make use of every boom in
order to get prepared and fitted out as well as possible for the next
crisis.

Here is another example of how capitalist society creates crises out of
everything and anything, whereas in some other society there would not
be the remotest chance that such things would cause a crisis.

What used to happen in any society based on natural economy in the past
when an especially rich harvest occurred? Consumption could be
increased, depending on the make-up of society. If it were communist, an
equal raising of the standard of living for all members would be the
consequence, and at the same time a building up of reserves, that is,
raising the capacity for maintaining the means of subsistence in the
future.

Or if it were a class society: taxes would reach an especially high
level [and there would also be] a certain, even if small, increase in
the standard of living of the peasants.

In 1906 and 1907 Brazil had a colossal coffee harvest.¹⁷ The effect was
that from month to month the alarming news spread, and panic occurred on
all the stock exchanges. Instead of prosperity being increased, the
cries of woe in Brazil rose higher because its capital was mainly
invested in coffee plantations and now there was a plunge in prices. In
order to try to prevent this, the capitalists forced the Brazilian
government, at its own expense, to buy up huge quantities of coffee, to
hold it in reserve, to withdraw it from the market in order to keep
prices at a high level. That was called an act of valorization. This
sounded quite outlandish, and was deliberately meant to [do so]. The
ordinary person would be unable to make any sense of it.

The state had to buy the coffee. It gave the capitalists a large
quantity of money in return for the coffee it was forced to buy up.
Naturally this was mainly in government bonds or securities. But
interest had to be paid on these securities. Where would the government
get the money for that? Naturally from taxes. A monstrous tax burden was
placed on the middle class and on the working classes, and the result
was a general depression in the country, a colossal wave of layoffs, the
firing of workers in Brazil, and businesses in Europe were [also] drawn
in [to the crisis] because they had made it possible for the Brazilian
government to obtain loans.

In general Brazil was shaken to the core, and that situation has
continued up to the present. Sooner or later the government will have to
sell the coffee. And then the sword of Damocles will fall, sooner or
later the crisis will occur. Or else: voices are already being raised
suggesting that the government dump the coffee in the ocean. That is the
same method that grain dealers used in the Middle Ages in order to prop
up grain prices. Bourgeois historians usually cite this as an example
showing how high we have risen above the ancient world and the Middle
Ages.

In capitalist production every unusual turn of events in
production—whether it be a bad harvest or a bountiful one, whether there
is railroad construction going on or stagnation and absence of any such
undertakings—all of it leads equally to a crisis.

Marx speaks out strongly against the concept that overproduction or
underproduction is to blame for crises. See Volume 2 of _Capital_, this
page [of the first German edition].¹⁸

The first effects of any crisis are always felt in the luxury industries
and by their workers.

Robertus derives the source of crises mainly from the underconsumption
of the masses. He proposed that profits be shared with the workers
engaged in production.

If the raising of wages was an effective means against crises, then no
crises would happen. Because the fact of the matter is that in every
boom wages go up, and every crisis is preceded by a boom.

The crisis of 1815 was characterized by the destruction of machinery and
great tumult.

The first periodic crisis was in 1825. It was preceded by a strong
economic upturn in England after the crisis of 1815. There was a big
upswing of business activity: the building of canals, the building of
roads, installing gasworks for the purpose of lighting (as early as 1814
gas was used for lighting in the streets in the cities of England), and
then the founding of banks and speculation in securities.

England’s relations with South America played a large role in all of
this. Many of the countries there had recently won their independence.
Argentina, Brazil, Central America, and so on had constituted themselves
as independent states. This was important in part because some of those
countries were major suppliers of gold and silver.

The new states began taking out large loans. The [corresponding
government bonds] were mainly bought up on the London Stock Exchange. In
1824–25 the governments of South and Central America paid out more than
20 million pounds sterling [in interest on loans]. In addition a large
number of shares were traded on the London Stock Exchange, in particular
those of mining companies. The stocks, or shares, of joint
English-Mexican companies for the exploitation of mines rose in price by
2,500 pounds sterling from December 1824 to January 1825. The shares of
another mining company went up 800 pounds. Everything was thrown into
speculation on these mining shares. This was facilitated by the fact
that payment of only 5 or 10 percent was sufficient to buy a share. Thus
even the poorer classes could participate in this giddy craze.

That was the first great speculative craze in paper securities on a
stock exchange.

The nominal capital of the stock exchange at that time supposedly
amounted to 372 million pounds sterling.

But companies only worth a total of 102 million were present on the
stock exchange. Everything else was pure speculation.

Together with this speculation, prices of goods rose to a very high
level. Cotton prices rose by 109 percent, prices of pig iron by 77
percent, and sugar by 99 percent … In connection with all this there was
a hasty rush to build new cotton mills in Lancashire, along with the
expansion of old mills using bank credit.

Also in South and Central America a large increase in demand for
commodities arose.

In 1821 England’s exports to those [countries was] … 2.942 million
pounds sterling; in 1825 it was 6.442 million …

The main export was cotton fabrics.

But these goods were purchased with English money, because that money
traveled from the London Stock Exchange to the Americas, and there it
was used to buy English goods.

The enlivening of the cotton industry and the raising of prices
attracted massive imports from the European countries to England. There
was a rapid outflow of gold.

Then suddenly there was a backlash. Prices fell very quickly in London,
and the South American countries provided the impetus for the crash by
the fact that they did not pay the hoped-for interest on their bonds.
They were entirely incapable of doing so.

At that point a panic broke out. The joint-stock companies and the
mining industry were not paying the expected dividends, and that spread
such a panic that the Bank of England itself in London had to post an
extraordinarily high bank rate and refuse to grant credit. That
intensified the general turmoil even further, and within six weeks 70
provincial banks crashed, and a whole mass of smaller entrepreneurs and
speculators went down with them.

The consequences of the crisis of 1825 are also characteristic. It led
to a general cleaning-out, or purge, of industry in the sense that an
entire large number of backward manufacturing techniques were abandoned.

Soon after 1825 [there occurred] the universal introduction of the
steam-powered loom, along with drastic changes in [the technology of]
the iron industry.

_After ten years came the crisis of 1836_. Extraordinarily good harvests
from 1832 to 1836, four years in a row, provided the impetus. Grain
imports to England dropped off, because England was able to get by with
its own grain. England ended up with 4 percent of its former exports.¹⁹
The cheapness of food lowered the price for labor.

Together with this there was an external phenomenon: a strong outflow of
English capital to North America. Investments of capital were traveling
on a massive scale to America, and consequently a demand for English
goods arose there, so that those in turn were paid for with English
gold.

In North America [there was] intensive economic activity involving means
of transport and [new] industrial enterprises. The shares, or stocks,
for these companies were for the most part sold in England.

New banks were founded, 61 of them with a capital totalling 52 million
dollars. At the same time as this animated activity involving industrial
enterprises there arose a large demand for government-owned land for
expanding agriculture, but even more than that for speculation based on
the rising prices of land.

All this gave rise to highly intensive demand in America for European
goods. England in particular exported to America [on an increasingly
large scale].

  ----------------------------- --------- --------
  _English Exports to:_         _1832_    _1836_
  America, the United States    5,468²⁰   2,486
  Northern European countries   9,897     10,000
  Southern European countries   5,867     9,001
  Asia                          4,235     6,751
  Central and South America     4,272     5,955
  ----------------------------- --------- --------

That is all in thousands of pounds sterling.

In 1833 and 1834 Spain and Portugal became heavily indebted by taking
out loans from England. As a result the prices on the stock exchanges
rose to an extraordinarily high level.

In 1836, 48 banks were founded in England. The nominal capital of the
banks founded between 1832 and 1836 in England amounted to 105.2 million
pounds sterling. Of that 69.6 million [was invested] in railroads; 23.8
million [went to] institutions connected with banking; 7.6 million to
insurance companies; 7.0 million to mining enterprises; 5.4 million [was
invested in] canal building, and so forth.

The impulse that set off the crisis came from the United States.
Speculation in land had gone so far in that country that the government
at that time had to impose some regulation. It was forbidden to purchase
land in any other way than by cash payment. Of course a panic broke out
on the stock exchanges in America as a result. The American banks
frantically sought to obtain gold from England, and consequently panic
broke out in England as well.

In 1837,²¹ there were 618 bank failures in the United States … In
England there were no bank failures, it’s true, but there were great
difficulties, and it was the cotton industry that suffered most from
this economic collapse, because it was the main industry exporting to
the United States. Great unemployment resulted, with downward pressure
on wages, and this crisis contributed very strongly to the activation of
the Chartist movement.

_Ten years later there followed a third crisis, the crisis of 1847_.

A very bad harvest was the initial impulse [for this crisis].

After the crisis of 1837 a depression lasted and reached its bottom in
1842; then the depression tapered off and an upturn began. In 1843 and
1844 there were two good harvests [which meant] cheap food and
[increased] demand for manufactured goods. In addition, 1842 saw the
opening of the Chinese market. This was connected with the opium war [of
1839–42]. The main [economic] result was that five Chinese ports were
declared open to free trade, without any customs duties having to be
paid; also the island of Hong Kong was surrendered to England.

In 1844–45 boom times prevailed in England. The cotton industry once
again took first place. Large numbers of new cotton mills were founded,
very high wages. In addition, there was massive railroad construction in
England.

[The following table shows the value of] the total number of licenses
for railroad construction granted by Parliament, up through December
1849 [with figures in millions of pounds].

  ------ -------------------- -------------------
         _Licenses granted_   _Railroads built_
  1843   81.9                 65.8
  1844   20.4                 6.7
  1845   60.5                 16.2
  1846   131.7                37.8
  1847   44.2                 40.7
  1848   15.3                 38.2
  1849   3.9                  29.6
  ------ -------------------- -------------------

This railroad construction created a huge demand for workers as well as
for goods. Prices for iron increased enormously. From 1844 on, there was
madder and madder speculation on railroad construction. In 1845 and 1846
two bad years occurred in agriculture. The potato crop failed. So did
the grain crop.

In Ireland universal famine broke out, so that Parliament had to send
relief [payments] to Ireland [of] 8 million [pounds sterling].

The rise in prices led to wild speculation by grain dealers. That is,
massive amounts of grain had to be imported from abroad, and prices rose
steeply.

In the United States the cotton crop failed. From 1844 to 1847, prices
rose by 65 percent.

In spite of this, the prices of cotton yarn and cotton goods did not go
up at all.

The consumption of cotton fabrics in England in 1845 fell by [a quantity
worth] 21 million pounds sterling, and in 1846, by 13 million pounds
sterling.

Cutbacks in the cotton industry were the necessary consequence. On top
of that came business failures on a large scale as a result of grain
speculation.

In April and May 1847, English grain traders had purchased enormous
quantities of grain in European countries at the very highest prices,
grain meant for England. It was delivered in July and August. But
meanwhile, in England a very good harvest had come in. Prices fell, and
the grain speculators saw themselves ruined. Their bankruptcies brought
bank failures in their wake, [including] many banks in Liverpool, and
after those a general panic broke out. Then the prices of railroad
stocks fell, very suddenly and steeply. A few figures will show this [as
follows]:

  ------------------------------------------------------------------------------------- ---------------------------------------------- ----------------------------------------------
                                                                                        _In December 1845_                             _In December 1849_
  Capital invested in railroad construction:                                            100 million pounds sterling                    230 million pounds sterling
  The stock exchange price that could actually be obtained for RR shares amounted to:   160 million pounds sterling                    110 million pounds sterling
  Profits and losses amounted to:                                                       Profits in 1845: 60 million pounds sterling.   Losses in 1849: 120 million pounds sterling.
  ------------------------------------------------------------------------------------- ---------------------------------------------- ----------------------------------------------

This meant ruin for the owners of stocks in railroad companies, followed
by a general collapse of prices.

The cotton industry suffered the most from this.

Among others, coal and other mining companies suffered in particular.

_The Crisis of 1857. The First Big Worldwide Crisis_.

In 1854 and 1855 [there was] the first big Australian crisis—a
consequence of the feverish gold rushes of 1850–51. [There was also]
colossal emigration from Europe to Australia, [along with a colossal]
demand for goods, and speculation in mining.

The factors that paved the way for the 1857 world crisis were the
following:

A large role [was played by] the abolition of the corn laws²² and of
other [protective] tariffs; in short, England’s transition to free
trade.

The assumption that the elimination of tariffs would slow down or
eliminate crises corresponded to the theories of Say.

The English advocates of free trade said that if the corn laws and other
tariffs were eliminated, crises would end. In 1844, England began to
eliminate the corn laws. England abolished almost all protective
tariffs. With that, economic activity in England was enlivened in every
area, all products became cheaper, and there was a colossal upturn in
production.

As a recoil there came the worldwide crisis of 1857. [Leading up to it
was] the discovery of gold in California and Australia. In 1850 the
annual average extraction of gold in the whole world was worth 150
million marks. In 1853, thanks to the new discoveries, it was 760
million marks.

For the entire world in 1909, the annual extraction of gold amounted to
[only] 420 million dollars.

The end of the Crimean War coincided with the crisis of 1857. The
holding back of Russian exports of hemp and flax products created the
possibility for the crisis to be prolonged.

The era of free trade, the building of railroads, and the profusion of
liberal reforms in Russia—all opened the way for the inflow of English
products into Russia.

After 1848, France and Germany became powerful participants in the
capitalist mode of production. Also contributing to that was: The
bourgeoisie [was] on the upswing, [and] the proletariat had been beaten
down.

There was a flow of European capital to the United States, which seemed
to be the safest place for investments.

According to an estimate by Professor [Albert] Schäffle, in the years
1849–54, a thousand million guilders, that is, one billion, were
invested in American securities. A guilder at that time was worth about
two marks, and so this was approximately two billion marks.

In 1857, England had possession of American securities worth 80 million
pounds sterling.

The Crimean War very much suited the United States. It interrupted
the … At the same time, in the late 1840s and early 1850s, there was
massive emigration to the United States from Germany and from Russian
Poland.

In the United States, in connection with grain exports, there began a
colossal speculation in government-owned lands. In 1852–53 in the United
States, public lands worth 1.7 million dollars were purchased as pieces
of land to be used for the cultivation of grain. Because America was now
exporting grain to Russia.

In the years 1852–54, the value of the public lands that were purchased
was 20.4 million dollars.

Along with that, [there was] an impressive amount of railroad
construction. In 1856, the rail network in the United States was
enlarged by 4,250 miles. A mile is approximately 1.6 kilometers.

The prices of goods rose rapidly, which attracted imports from Europe.
In 1857, the import of goods into the United States increased by 32
million dollars. At this same time there was a failure of the cotton
crop, and [therefore] very high cotton prices. In spite of that, the
cotton industry was greatly expanded. In addition, American banks and
import-export dealers engaged in colossal speculation on imports from
Europe.

In 1857, [there was] an exceptionally good grain harvest in Europe.

That caused a series of bankruptcies among grain-exporting businesses in
America. These bankruptcies brought bank failures in their wake. The
failure of one small bank gave the signal for a general panic among all
the banks in America.

In December 1857 in America, prices plunged universally by 20 to 30
percent.

The bankruptcy of America meant the immediate bankruptcy of England.

In October, there was a suspension of payments by one Liverpool bank.
Thereupon, universal panic [broke out] in England.

From there the crisis was transplanted to France. During the entire
nineteenth century [until then] the bank rate of the Bank of France had
stood at 4 or 5 percent, but in December 1857 it soared to 10 percent.

The higher a bank rate goes, the harder the bank has to work. An
increase in the bank rate is a storm signal.

Then Germany followed, Hamburg in particular.

The bankruptcy of several German commercial firms in England, which
engaged in business with Sweden and Denmark, had repercussions in
Hamburg. From Hamburg the crisis spread to the main centers of Prussia
and at the same time to Sweden and Denmark, as well as to South America.

The collapse in Sweden and Denmark had a recoil effect on Hamburg. And
Hamburg is the place in Germany where world trade had its earliest
foothold.

Almost all commercial activity in Hamburg came to a stop. Only through
some desperate salvation attempts, some very strained efforts by the
banks, was a little bit of help forthcoming [for the economy].

_The “Cotton Famine” of 1861_. This crisis only affected the cotton
industry; it was not a general crisis. And indeed it was mainly a local
crisis, an English crisis. [This is] an indication that not only
worldwide crises come along now.

[Let us take] _a closer look at this crisis, because it is very
important_. The cotton famine began with the breaking-off of the import
of raw cotton [from] the United States as a result of the Civil War.

In 1860, the cotton industry in England consumed 1,840 million tons of
cotton; in 1862, this consumption fell to 452 million tons.

There was a corresponding drop in overall exports from England to the
United States, also because of the Civil War.

In 1861, such exports were worth 23 million pounds sterling; in 1862, 11
million pounds sterling.

The cotton shortage meant tremendous enrichment for the industrialists.

According to a calculation that was made in England, the factory owners
and cotton traders earned over 19 million pounds sterling from the raw
cotton they had previously stored up. And from [the sale of] cotton
fabrics [they made] over 16 million pounds sterling. In total, they
gained more than 35, almost 36 million pounds sterling.

Certainly a painful blow was also struck internally, inside the cotton
industry: that is, the small manufacturers immediately went kaput.

  ------ ------------------------------------- ---------------------------------
         _Number of cotton mills in England_   _Number of spindles in England_
  1862   2,887                                 30,387
  1867   2,549                                 32,000
  ------ ------------------------------------- ---------------------------------

This means [that] a big concentration of production [took place].

_The only ones who suffered from the crisis were the workers_. For the
industrialists this crisis meant big business. The workers had to bear
all the costs of the crisis.

The county of Lancashire²³

Manchester

The workers of Lancashire stood at the highest point among workers
generally. They had the highest wages, and were the most intelligent and
best-organized workers. In the whole region, working conditions were
held to firmly established standards. Many workers were so well off that
they even had some savings and owned their own small houses.

The percentage of those on relief was lower than anywhere else in the
entire country. That is attributed not only to their prosperity but also
to the pride of the workers in Lancashire.

This was the flower of the English working class. But because of the
cotton famine it was denied the very means of existence for several
years and was ruined completely.

Joblessness grew so much in the fall of 1861 that charity, both public
and private, had to step in strongly and take a hand.

In January 1862 the spread of joblessness became [truly] menacing.
Cutbacks in production in the spring of 1862 were so large that by
April, out of the 47,504 workers who had earlier been employed in the
cotton industry in Manchester, only 23,722 remained fully employed, as
against 15,393 on half-time, and 8,369 completely unemployed. These
figures apply only to the city of Manchester.

In another center of the cotton industry, in Blackburn and its
surrounding areas, 8,459 were completely unemployed out of 40,000
workers, and most of the rest worked only two, three, or four days a
week. The workers had to sell their furniture, including their beds, and
the wives and children of these very proud working-class men had to go
begging from house to house.

All of this was described in workers’ letters published in the bourgeois
newspapers.

In May of 1862 the number of jobless workers in the county of Lancashire
had reached 58,000, but according to others, the number was as high as
100,000.

After the workers the small shopkeepers in the entire district were also
ruined, since they were linked with the workers for their existence. The
local relief effort was inadequate. A central relief committee was set
up in London under the chairmanship of the Lord Mayor.

At the same time there began a highly characteristic struggle by the
jobless workers with the local officials in charge of charity for the
poor. Relief was provided only if the recipient submitted to work out of
a workhouse. This meant the most demeaning and crudest kind of dirty
work: sweeping the streets and breaking rocks. It is very interesting
and instructive for us to follow the course of this struggle through the
length of the crisis. The Lancashire workers did not want to submit to
this condition. They explained that they did not want to be reduced to
performing this kind of work, for which they were not suited. The
greatest physical strength was required for such work, and that was not
the kind of work they did in a spinning mill.

The workers engaged in a bitter struggle with the local poor-relief
officials. The outcome was this: (1) Relief was paid in money, not in
goods. The workers said, “We are not beggars, asking for food.” They
wanted the right to dispose of their money as they saw fit. (2) Forced
labor from workhouses was abolished.

The workers were so stiff-necked and persistent about this that they
developed a magnificent plan of action. In one city after another they
held huge gatherings at which the question of jobless relief was
discussed. At these they always explained that they were not beggars,
that they had been removed from their jobs by the actions of others.
They wanted assistance for the unemployed to be organized on a public
basis, corresponding to their own sense of honor and self-worth. They
demanded that, instead of forced labor, workers’ schools should be
established so they could study during their time of unemployment. And
they won this demand. Schools and courses for the workers were set up.

They marched in the streets, and in a number of cities they began doing
some vandalizing. They won their demands all along the line.

Especially characteristic throughout this crisis was the behavior of the
free-trade advocates, those widely renowned gentlemen, Mr. [Richard]
Cobden and Mr. [John] Bright. As early as the 1840s they had been in the
forefront of agitation for free trade, and at that time had turned to
the workers [for support].

Now [let us look at] the behavior of these gentlemen in the big cotton
crisis [of the early 1860s]. Mr. Bright was concerned above all to
minimize the extent of the disaster. They lied [outright] about its
extent. The explanation for their taking this position was that the real
state of affairs dealt a stunning blow to the whole free-trade movement.
He [Bright] said that the impoverishment was much less than it would
have been if free trade had not existed. He defended the local
poor-relief officials with whom the workers were embroiled. While the
workers were demanding public assistance, Parliament and the central
authorities urged the workers to exert pressure on the local
authorities. Bright said that it would be wisest for the central
government to undertake the least possible interference in the sphere of
jurisdiction of the local authorities. He opposed all large-scale relief
action, because in his view that would only increase poverty.

The free-trade advocates actually represented the mill owners. Cobden
and Bright were mouthpieces for the cotton mill owners of Lancashire.

The only ones who spoke up for the workers in this crisis were members
of the landowning nobility, who had also pushed through the demands of
the movement for the ten-hour day. They did what they could for the
workers. This was an expression of the old battle between rent for land
and profit for capital.

The landowners, particularly in the House of Lords, that is, in their
own chamber of Parliament, defended quite warmly the demand of the
workers for the elimination of forced labor.

The workers’ struggle with the local poor-relief authorities continued.
In Blackburn a thousand unemployed workers refused to work at breaking
up rocks.

In July [1862], out of the 355,000 workers in the textile mills of the
county of Lancashire, 80,000 were completely unemployed, and the others
were employed only part of the time. Charity contributions however
flowed in abundantly from all directions.

The behavior of the workers, their stiff-necked, proud, and stubborn
struggle, and their rampaging, caused the government and society as a
whole such great anxiety that they took action at least to appease the
hunger of these people.

The entrepreneurs, the millionaires in Lancashire, for the most part
refused to give any relief payments. Even in the [main] conservative
newspaper, _The Times_, they were often stigmatized.

In Parliament, Cobden spoke out very sharply against the formal proposal
that relief in the counties of England be organized on a broader basis
so that one community could send aid to another, to wherever the need
was greatest.

In his speech he spoke as though the most unfortunate people in the
crisis were the mill owners. [He argued that] relief should not be
organized on a wider basis, because then the mill owners would have to
pay the most, and that should not happen, because then the mill owners
would not have enough money when the upturn came. Lord Palmerston, who
spoke against Cobden in parliament said: “In reality they want to shift
the entire burden from the wealthy to the poor.” Palmerston was the
leader of the land-owning nobility.

At that point the free traders and the mill owners were victorious. The
proposal was changed, despite the greatest protests of the House of
Lords that relief payments did no harm to the mill owners.

Meanwhile poverty and need were such that in Manchester the mortality
rate was 60–70 percent higher than in the rest of the country.

At the same time, however, _through their struggle_ the workers achieved
[victory] in the fall of 1862. By means of the most energetic struggle,
they won their demands _that relief was to be paid entirely in money and
not in kind. Forced labor was also replaced by instruction at schools_.

Special schools were established for the workers, where they learned
reading, writing, and arithmetic. Sewing schools were established for
women, and it was precisely this latter development that the factory
inspectors mentioned as being especially healthy for the living
conditions of the workers. Most of the wives and daughters of the
workers, in particular those who were still employed, had not actually
been able up until that time to take needle in hand [and learn how to
sew].

_December 1862 was the high point of the crisis_. In Lancashire and
Cheshire [counties] at that time 271,983 persons were receiving public
assistance. Out of those 271,983 relief recipients, only 12,500 were
working. All the others had been let go.

[Here are] _statistics for joblessness at the end of January 1863_. In
the cotton-industry districts the total number of those completely
unemployed was 247,230, of those who were employed part time the number
was 165,600, and those employed full time, 121,129.

After the mill owners had enriched themselves enormously by raising the
prices for raw cotton and cotton fabrics, they took the opportunity to
drive wages down in Lancashire by 10–20 percent, and in this way again
were able to put enormous profits in their pockets.

At the end of 1862 a remarkable movement for emigration began. This is
also of great interest in that it shows the proud spirit of the workers
at that time.

They made the simple decision to emigrate en masse. It happened that at
that time offers had come from Australia and in particular from New
Zealand to accept emigrating workers from England. Of course the best
conditions were promised. One province in New Zealand even offered
10,000 pounds sterling for emigrants from England, to cover the costs of
emigration by English workers.

Again large gatherings of workers began to be held, where they discussed
the question of emigration. It was from these meetings that the decision
was reached to emigrate en masse [first of all] and second to demand
that Parliament provide the means to cover the expenses of emigration.
They demanded this on the basis that it was rightfully due to them.
Since England was not able to employ them, England should provide the
means for them to go elsewhere to work. The large landowners also
supported this emancipatory movement, but the factory owners did not.
They were overcome by terrible fears, and at that time produced the
memorable document in which the workers were described as living
machines, [and they argued that these machines] should not be allowed to
go wandering off. You will find this document quoted in Volume 1 of
Marx’s _Capital_.²⁴

When the mill owners saw that in spite of everything the workers were
emigrating, they demanded that Parliament take out a public loan to
initiate a program of public works. Parliament gave in on this point
also.

On the front line of opposition to the movement for emigration and in
support of the demand for public works there once again appeared Mr.
Cobden. Under pressure from the mill owners the government provided
credit amounting to 1.2 million pounds sterling to provide work for the
unemployed.

These public works consisted included road building, canal building, the
building of aqueducts, and the laying out of parks, all of this being
mainly in the provinces. In this way the English provinces of that time
acquired the most beautiful parks. But these public works came into
existence at a time when the greatest need had already passed. In this
way England, at ridiculously low wages, had an entire range of public
labor performed. Nevertheless, this did contribute to the well-being of
the workers.

A laughable number of workers were employed on these public works—8,324.
Counting their families that meant 30–40,000 persons benefited somewhat
from that.

Toward 1864 the economic conjuncture gradually made an upward turn
again, and the workers again found employment.

The reserve stocks of raw cotton and woven goods had long since been
sold off, and cotton was being imported from India and Egypt. A few
statistics about that:

Value of imports to England:

In 1860, from India 15 million pounds sterling

from Egypt 10 million pounds sterling

In 1864, from India 52 million pounds sterling

from Egypt 20 million pounds sterling

There then began a boom for the cotton industry, and as early as in the
following year complaints could be heard from the mill owners of
Lancashire about the shortage of labor power.

That was how the crisis of 1861 was overcome.

Scarcely had the upturn begun, however, than _a new crisis, that of
1866_, made its appearance.

_A severe monetary crisis in England_. It was the consequence of the
powerful influx of imports from the Orient, the main element being
cotton. [There was] a colossal inflow from the East, from India. In
exchange for this inflow England was not immediately paid in cash, but
with an exchange of goods, and so forth. On the other hand, however,
England was paying in cash.

Currency based on the silver standard prevailed for the most part in
India and the East, and consequently there was a massive outflow of
silver from England to India and the East. Thus by 1864 there was a
colossal emptying out of the coffers of the Bank of England, which
caused great turmoil on the money market, so that the Bank of England
found it necessary to sharply raise the bank rate in order to attract
money to England.

This did not affect commerce and industry [at first]. In 1864 a major
upturn [in the economy] set in. Once again the founding of joint-stock
companies flourished.

From 1863 to 1865 the joint-stock companies founded in England had a
total nominal capital of 582 million pounds sterling. (Nominal capital
is what is printed on paper. On the money market this capital is worth
much more.)

The founding of these companies shows that even then speculative fever
existed in England.

A new impetus to England’s industry resulted with the end of the Civil
War in the United States in 1864. There was a new demand for English
goods and therefore a new upswing in English industry.

England’s exports to the United States rose as follows:

In the year 1864 exports were worth 16.7 million pounds sterling.

In 1866 they were worth 28.5 million pounds sterling.

The following table shows the prices of commodities during the boom and
during the bust:

  --------------- ---------------------------------------------------------------------------- ----------------------------------------------------------------------------
                  _Increase in prices as of January 1, 1866 (compared to the previous year)_   _Decrease in prices as of January 1, 1867 (compared to the previous year)_
  Coffee          +11%                                                                         –17%
  Sugar           +11%                                                                         –9%
  Tea             +31%                                                                         –23%
  Silk            +27%                                                                         –9%
  Flax and Hemp   + 6%                                                                         –17%
  Copper          +21%                                                                         –20%
  Cotton          +15%                                                                         –28%
  --------------- ---------------------------------------------------------------------------- ----------------------------------------------------------------------------

By 1866 all this led to a crisis in England, and the high point of the
crisis was 1867.

An outbreak of panic followed, as ever, from some particular event, and
indeed in this case it was a bankruptcy of Overend & Co.²⁵ The
consequence of this bankruptcy was a frightful panic. In two weeks the
reserves of the Bank of England were almost completely emptied.

Banks that functioned as joint-stock companies failed massively, as did
railroad companies.

(From now on the railroads played a huge role in crises generally.)

Those hit hardest by the crisis were the iron industry, the machine
industry, and shipbuilding.

(From now on, after the second half of the nineteenth century, so-called
heavy industry took the dominant position, which up until then had been
held by the cotton industry. That came about as a result of constantly
expanding progress and technology; more and more machines and means of
transport were being used.)

_In 1869 there was a severe money and credit crisis in the United
States_.

_A second world crisis in 1873_.

Germany played the leading role in this [crisis].

The years 1871–73 were an era of extraordinary upswing in industry
throughout Europe. This came after the end of the Franco-Prussian War
and the suppression of the Paris Commune. After its suppression a
feeling of calm and reassurance set in [for the bourgeoisie], and of
_joie de vivre_. Especially for Germany there came into consideration
the influx of war reparations, which France had to pay, [5] billion
[francs].²⁶ The elimination of the national debt, and as a result the
freeing up of a large amount of capital, now searching for investment
opportunities, and consequently the striving for the founding of new
companies, and in addition the establishment of freedom of trade,
standardization of bourgeois laws, and of the tariff structure, and so
forth. All of this was conclusively accomplished by the political
unification of 1870–71.

Along with this there was an upturn in Austria. The end of the War of
1866²⁷ and the beginning of the constitutional era in Austria in 1867
contributed to the fact that a great enlivenment [of economic activity]
began in Austria. Germany and Austria in those years constituted the
main arena for stock market speculation. There was the construction of
new railroads, feverish housing construction, in particular in Vienna,
and in connection with that [extensive] real estate speculation.

In Germany there was a fever for the founding of new companies:

According to the statistics of [Ernest] Engel,²⁸ in _Prussia_ alone:

From 1800 to June 30, 1870, 410 joint-stock companies were founded with
a total capital of 1,026,172,455 talers; [in contrast,] from July 1,
1871 to 1874, 857 joint-stock companies were newly founded, with a total
capital of 1,429,925,925 talers.

According to [Richard] Vanderborght,²⁹ in all of Germany:

  ------ ------------------------------------------------- ----------------------------------------
         _Number of newly founded joint-stock companies_   _Capital worth (in millions of marks)_
  1871   207                                               757
  1872   479                                               1478
  1873   242                                               544
  1874   90                                                106
  1875   55                                                46
  1876   42                                                18
  1877   44                                                43
  1878   42                                                13
  ------ ------------------------------------------------- ----------------------------------------

From here on the figures are in _five-year_ periods

  --------- ------------------------------------------------- ----------------------------------------
            _Number of newly founded joint-stock companies_   _Capital worth (in millions of marks)_
  1871–75   1073                                              2,931
  1876–80   270                                               223
  1881–85   620                                               595
  1886–90   1061                                              1,100
  1891–96   814                                               824.8
  --------- ------------------------------------------------- ----------------------------------------

The table above is based on data from the Imperial Statistical Office
for _1906_.³⁰

  -------- ----------------------- -------------------------
           _Amount (in start-up_   _Equity in Millions of_
           _companies)_            _Nominal Capital_
  [1906]   5050                    13,767.7
  1907     5147                    14,218.3
  1908     5184                    14,634.6
  -------- ----------------------- -------------------------

In England the capital worth of joint-stock companies amounted to 2
billion pounds sterling.

The building of railroads played a big role.

The following table shows the length (in kilometers) of standard-gauge
railroads in _Germany_.

  ------ ------------------------------
         _Total length in kilometers_
  1845   2,143
  1855   7,826
  1865   13,900
  1875   27,981
  1880   33,645
  1890   41,818
  1904   53,822
  ------ ------------------------------

In _Austria_, in the years 1867–73, among the newly licensed businesses
were 175 [regular] banks, 34 railroad enterprises, 645 industrial
companies, 104 banks [_Baubank_]³¹ concerned only with lending for
[home] building purposes, 39 insurance companies, and 8 shipping
companies, with a total amount of capital involved, all together, of 4
billion guilders.

Indicative of the craze for founding new companies and the speculative
fever in general is the fact that out of all this, only 682 companies
actually came into existence, with joint-stock share capital worth 2,577
billion guilders. A large number of these of course went bankrupt later
in the crash [of 1873].

The craze for the founding of new companies also spread to the _United
States_, where a new economic upturn had followed the end of the Civil
War. This was also expressed in the founding of new railroad companies,
in other words, the most modern means of transport. In the years
1870–73, in the United States, a network of new railroad lines of 23,406
miles was built. (An English mile is about 1.6 kilometers.)

A new era began in 1864 after the Civil War in the sense that the
expansion of indirect taxes was undertaken on a colossal scale, along
with [the imposition of] high protective tariffs. That led to the
amassment of substantial resources by the government and to colossal
undertakings [such as railroad building].

In England at the same time there was an unheard-of prosperity, which
was expressed especially in the upturn of the iron, steel, and coal
industries, which were necessary for the building of railroads in other
countries.

[The value of] exports from England to the US:

  ------ -----------------------------------------------------------------------------
  1870   28.3 million pounds sterling
  1872   40.7 million pounds sterling
  1873   14.6 million pounds sterling (showing the effects of the crisis [of 1873].)
  ------ -----------------------------------------------------------------------------

Total exports of iron, steel, and hard coal from England:

  ------ ------------------------- ------------------------------
  1868   Iron and steel together   17.6 million pounds sterling
  1868   Exports of hard coal      5.4 million pounds sterling
  1873   Iron and steel            37.7 million pounds sterling
  1873   Hard coal                 13.2 million pounds sterling
  ------ ------------------------- ------------------------------

Total exports from England of cotton, wool, and linen fabrics:

  ------ ----------------------------- -------- -----------------
                   _Cotton_            _Wool_   _Linen fabrics_
  1868     53 million pound sterling   19.6     7.1
  1873    81.5 million pound sterling  25.4     7.3
  ------ ----------------------------- -------- -----------------

Statistics on pig iron production in England:

  ------ ---------------------------------------------- -----------------------------
         _Production of pig iron in millions of tons_   _Median price for pig iron_
  1867   4.7                                            52 shillings, 6 pence
  1868   4.9                                            52 shillings, 9 pence
  1869   5.4                                            53 shillings, 3 pence
  1870   5.9                                            54 shillings, 4 pence
  1871   6.6                                            59 shillings
  1872   6.7                                            101 shillings, 10 pence
  1873   6.8                                            117 shillings, 3 pence
  ------ ---------------------------------------------- -----------------------------

(The price rose so high because the expansion of production could not
keep pace with the growing demand, caused by the increasing needs of
railroad construction.)

Speculation on foreign loans also developed on the London Stock
Exchange.

Again this gives us an overview of the international connections
[existing at that time] and the role of the state.

In the years 1870–75, foreign loans taken out in London amounted to a
value of 260 million pounds sterling. Oriental governments played the
main role in this. Since they needed money to finance their military
establishments, and the like, they promised to pay high interest rates,
but in the meantime it turned out that these governments did not yet
have a sufficiently solid foundation. Therefore [there was] only partial
repayment of the loans, and bankruptcy followed.

In the 1870s [_MS. Missing words_] Turkey, Egypt, Greece, Bolivia (South
America), Costa Rica, Ecuador, Honduras (Central and South American
states), Mexico, Paraguay, Uruguay, Peru, Venezuela, and Santo Domingo
[took out loans].

And the capitalists in London went along with that.

The following figures give us an overview of [capital] movements
[involving] government loans, and what a very lively effect they had
upon the playing that took place on the stock exchanges:

The total value of securities issued on American and European stock
exchanges:

  ------ ----------------------
  1870   4,560 million marks
  1871   12,560 million marks
  1872   10,110 million marks
  1873   8,722 million marks
  1874   3,368 million marks
  ------ ----------------------

The years 1871 and 1872 were the two high points in the issuing of
securities. These are not exact statistics, [merely] estimates, but the
estimates were made by recognized statisticians, so that they do have
great significance.³²

Then came the crash [of 1873], although the crashes in the United States
and in Europe occurred independently of one another. [In Europe] this
time the panic hit the Vienna stock exchange first, and spread out from
there. In the United States, the collapse began with a company that had
invested in the building of railroads. Then the crisis transmitted
itself further, of its own accord. In Europe the crash came to the
Vienna³³ stock exchange on the memorable day of May 3. By May 28 there
were already 100 bankruptcies in Vienna. And by then, shares [on the
stock exchange] in Vienna alone had lost 300 million guilders in value.
In June the panic was transplanted from Vienna to Berlin. The value of
securities suddenly fell by 30–50 percent. The American crash had a
reciprocal effect on Germany and Austria, naturally, and that
intensified the general collapse.

Then England followed [with] a severe commercial crisis. In the years
1873–75 and even beyond that, bankruptcies kept increasing more and
more. The crisis of 1873 was notable for its long-lasting effects. As
late as 1878, banks of the top rank continued to fail in England, as an
effect of the crisis [of 1873]. In 1878 in particular a very severe
crisis developed in England for the cotton industry, the iron industry,
and coal mining. The crisis reached its high point in England only in
1879. Then, until 1880, it spread little by little across Italy, Russia,
Holland, Belgium, South America, and Australia to all the major branches
of industry.

That is the picture of the crisis of 1873.

Not even a decade had gone by when a large-scale crisis broke out in
France. This was the _French crisis of 1882_. France had overcome the
crisis of 1873 earlier than all the other important countries. It had
not been disturbed very greatly by that crisis. After the
reestablishment of the bourgeois republic an economic upturn had begun
in France. The Paris Commune had been suppressed in 1871. The war [with
Prussia] had ended, and war reparations were paid. Then there began an
upturn. Here as everywhere, together with that upturn, there was a great
craze for founding new companies on the stock exchange. Joint-stock
companies, the founding of new banks, the most daredevil and foolhardy
ventures, [anything] in order to put new capital to use.

Central to all this was the founding of a company with the name Union
Générale. At the head of the founders of this company stood a certain
[Paul Eugene] Bontoux.³⁴ The crisis in France [of 1882] is often also
called the Bontoux crisis. Bontoux headed a group of capitalists. They
had declared that they wanted to bring Christian-Catholic capital
properly to the fore, in order to drive Jewish capital from the field,
Jewish capital being to blame for all troubles. By Jewish capital they
meant the Rothschild group.

The Bontoux group also found protection from various dukes and duchesses
in Austria from the royal house of the Hapsburgs. As an expression of
this movement there occurred in Vienna the founding of _the Vienna
Agricultural Bank_, which worked with Catholic capital and knew how to
obtain great privileges from the government for the Bontoux group. The
activity of the Union Générale was expressed in two ways. First, it
stepped up its activity on the stock exchange in order to drive the
value of its own capital upward, [that is,] to drive up the value of its
own shares on the stock exchange. They purchased their own shares in
order to create an [artificial] bull market. French legislation allowed
joint-stock companies to periodically purchase their own shares. Thus
they created an artificial demand for their own securities, and the
value of their shares was driven up. In this way they enticed money out
of various hiding places, particularly from among the petty bourgeoisie.

Now they had to employ this capital. A massive craze for founding new
companies began, with immediate undertakings. New enterprises were
founded on such a massive scale: gas works, coal mines, insurance
companies, railroads, and so on and so forth. It was characteristic that
the Union Générale also provided itself with a string of newspapers in
order to systematically influence public opinion.

In 1882 there followed the collapse of this entire operation. To begin
with, the crisis broke out in Lyon, then a sudden plunge in stock prices
on the stock exchanges both in Paris and in Vienna by way of the
agricultural bank, and on January 29, 1882, the bankruptcy of the entire
Union Générale occurred. Monsieur Bontoux was at first imprisoned,
because there was dreadful fury among the petty bourgeoisie over the
fact that Catholic capital had let them down. The authorities had to set
Bontoux free, however, because he had not in any way violated the laws
governing joint-stock companies.

Among the newly founded companies were total phantasms, figments of the
imagination, for example, coalmines that hardly existed in the real
world. Some name would be announced, but no one knew where in the world
this mine might be located.

This crisis had an echo in other countries, especially where there had
been speculative crazes on stock exchanges.

Scarcely had this crisis been overcome when again the build-up to a new
economic upturn began. In some countries the new upturn started as early
as 1879. In the United States at the beginning of the 1880s there was a
railroad fever once again. In the years 1880–82 the railroad network of
the United States was enlarged by an additional 28,240 miles.³⁵

As a result, there was increased exports from England to the United
States and in 1878 the value of such exports was 14.6 million pounds
sterling. In 1882 the value was 31.6 million pounds sterling. That
refers to total exports from England to the United States.

The following table shows the role of heavy industry [in these exports]

Exports from England to the United States:

  ---------------- ------ ------------------------------
  Iron and steel   1878   18.4 million pounds sterling
  Machines         1878   7.5 million pounds sterling
  ---------------- ------ ------------------------------

Exports from England, in general:

  ---------------- ------ ------------------------------
  Iron and steel   1882   31.6 million pounds sterling
  Machines         1882   11.9 million pounds sterling
  ---------------- ------ ------------------------------

Exports of England’s Textile Industry, in general (in millions of pounds
sterling):

  ------ ------------------ ------------------ -----------------
         _Cotton fabrics_   _Woolen fabrics_   _Linen fabrics_
  1878   52.9               16.7               5.5
  1882   62.9               18.8               6
  ------ ------------------ ------------------ -----------------

As a result of this situation, in 1884 there was again a severe crash in
the railroad industry in the United States. There naturally followed
from that a general collapse of prices in England of 15–20 percent.
Here, however, we must direct our attention to a particular phenomenon,
which had _general significance_. The general collapse of prices in
England is not merely a consequence transmitted from the crash in the
United States; rather, it was a sign of an overall drop in prices, first
of all a drop in the price of grain on the world market. This decline of
prices, especially of the price of grain, has brought an enormous
literature into existence, both in England and in other countries. In
this literature people take up this question: Where does the explanation
lie for why prices fell?

What phenomenon was it in Western Europe and especially in Germany,
dating from this time of the sharp plunge in grain prices, about which
people have spoken so much? [It was] _the so-called agrarian crisis_.
That refers to nothing other than the sharp drop in prices for
agricultural prices. What were the causes? The main cause was the import
of American grain. Why did that bring about a sharp fall in prices? It
was incomparably cheaper to grow grain in America. Not that the
fertility was so great. Not at all. Agriculture was not even half as
productive as in Germany. The intensity of agriculture [in Germany] was
the reason for that.

Another reason was the great extent of railroad construction. It was not
the result of economically necessary factors, but on the contrary there
was great activity in founding new companies for the benefit of rising
industrial capital, especially English capital. The result was the
building of railroads across the West [of the United States] on a
colossal scale. Along with that, the flood of emigration pushed
westwards. This led [eventually] to the flooding of American grain onto
the European market.

When a great hue and cry about a sharp drop of prices in England was
raised, the calculation was made that income from agriculture in England
in the 1880s had been reduced by 42.8 million pounds sterling.

_The Agrarian Crisis_

Comrade Luxemburg read aloud³⁶ from a book by Tugan-Baranovsky about
commercial crises in England,³⁷ quoting some statements made by a
commission that was assigned to investigate this phenomenon in England.
Tugan-Baranovsky ascribes these crises to intense competition, the
large-scale founding of new joint-stock companies, and the creation of
new means of transport.

_But the main cause of the crisis_ [of 1884] _had to do with
agriculture_.

Below are some _statistics for Prussia_. By the term world market the
entire world is meant here. But in the narrower sense it means the
English market.

The table shows average prices on the most important markets for
agriculture (Danzig, Königsberg, Mannheim). The prices are shown per ton
(1,000 kg.) and in marks. These statistics were assembled by Professor
[Heinrich] Dade and published by the Association for Social Policy.³⁸
This table covers _four eight-year periods_.

  ---------- ----------------- ----------------- ----------------- -----------------
             _1868/69–75/76_   _1876/77–83/84_   _1884/85–91/92_   _1892/93–99/00_
  Wheat      223 marks         207 marks         181 marks         155 marks
  Rye        173 marks         166 marks         156 marks         131 marks
  Barley     165 marks         158 marks         148 marks         138 marks
  Oats       160 marks         148 marks         142 marks         138 marks
  Potatoes   56 marks          59 marks          53 marks          49 marks
  Straw      46 marks          50 marks          48 marks          43 marks
  Hay        72 marks          65 marks          60 marks          59 marks
  ---------- ----------------- ----------------- ----------------- -----------------

This shows a steady fall in prices. After that [came] a rise in prices,
inflation.

_After 1886 a new industrial upturn begins_.

In this upturn _South America_ plays a big role, especially Argentina.

This [leads to] a peculiar crisis, mainly played out between England and
South America.

After 1886 England’s exports increased _in general_, above all iron,
machinery, and coal.

In 1886 England’s exports of iron were worth 21.8 million pounds
sterling, of machinery, 10.1 million pounds sterling, and of coal 9.8
million pounds sterling.

In January 1890, England’s exports of iron were worth 31.6 million
pounds sterling, of machinery, 16.4 million pounds sterling, and of
coal, 19 million pounds sterling.

[Now let us look at] the exports of the three most important textile
industries: cotton, wool, and linen fabrics. In 1886, England’s exports
of cotton fabrics had a value of 57.4 million pounds sterling, of wool
fabrics, 19.7 million pounds sterling, and of linen fabrics, 5.3 million
pounds sterling.

In 1890, England’s exports of cotton fabrics had risen to 62.1 million
pounds sterling, its exports of woolen fabrics was now worth 20.4
million pounds sterling, and its exports of linen fabrics, 5.7 million
pounds sterling.

The textile industry was making smaller and smaller leaps forward, as
the figures show. This applies in particular to the cotton industry,
because this is the industry that was most successful in finding its way
into other countries. The wool industry still maintains itself for the
most part. That is because, to this day, English sheep breeding plays a
foremost role on the world market, especially for the finer types of
wool.

Argentina plays a special role. At the end of the 1880s a mad craze for
founding new companies developed in Argentina. In the years 1887–89, 250
joint-stock companies were founded in Argentina with a nominal capital
of 764 million dollars. In addition to that there was also Argentina’s
government debt. In 1874 it amounted to 10 million pounds sterling, but
in 1890 [it had risen to] 59.1 million pounds sterling. We speak in
terms of pounds sterling because it was English capital that financed
Argentina’s national debt.

From government loans and the founding of new joint-stock companies the
main investments of capital in Argentina shifted to the building of
railroads. In 1883, the railroad network in Argentina amounted to 3,123
kilometers; in 1893, it was 13,691 kilometers. That was how much was
actually built at that time. But much more was licensed, and that also
became the object of speculation. In 1889 [new] railroad construction
was licensed for a total length of 12,000 kilometers. Of course these
licensed railroad lines were not built [because] the crash came the
following year.

Thus, in 1890 [there was] a tremendous crash, accompanied by a civil war
in Argentina.³⁹ Upheavals of this kind are very characteristic for the
situation in newly established countries. The crash in Argentina was
immediately echoed in England. The impetus for this came in November
1890 with the collapse of the largest English private bank: Baring & Co.
This collapse naturally brought a whole series of further business
failures in its wake.⁴⁰

After that the crisis spread outward from England, resulting in a crash
in Transvaal [South Africa], one in Mexico, and one in Uruguay.

In connection with all this there was a severe cotton crisis in England
in 1890, because the countries involved [in the crisis] did not yet have
their own cotton industries.⁴¹

Barely three years went by, and _in 1893 there was a huge crash in the
United States and in Australia_.

The immediate cause in both countries was a railroad-building frenzy.

In Australia, for example, it was again primarily English capital that
was at work. The investment of this capital was first of all in
government loans. English capital was tied up in Australian government
loans to the sum of 112 million pounds sterling. Of that, 81 million
pounds had been put into the building of railroads and streetcar lines.
The following statistics show how the railroad network in Australia took
shape.

In 1880, it was 4,900 miles long; and in 1895 it was 15,600 miles long.

Along with that there was a wild craze for investing in real estate and
housing construction in all these new countries. As early as 1891 the
collapse of the housing bubble began, and that was followed in 1895 by a
general collapse in Australia. Almost all the states of Australia
stopped making any further payments.

At the same time things were developing in the United States, although
along different lines. The main problem was overly rapid railroad
construction. In addition, _trusts_ were already playing a role, which
contributed to price increases, speculation, and so forth, in the most
varied spheres of the economy.

There were scandals involving trusts, especially the whisky trust, which
bought up the entire reserve supply of grain in order to drive prices up
extravagantly.⁴² There were also battles over currency in the United
States, because at that time the advocates of placing currency on a
silver standard [rather than the gold standard] came to the helm.

The approximate cause of the crash [of 1893] that took place generally
was the collapse of the “wheat ring” on the stock exchange.⁴³

A massive quantity of bankruptcies followed in the United States, and
commerce came to a complete standstill. In August 1893 there were 600
bank failures in the United States.

In 1890 there had been a total of 7,538 bankruptcies with liabilities
amounting to a total of 93 million dollars.

In 1893 there were 11,174 bankruptcies with liabilities totalling 324
million dollars.

Seventy-four railroad companies collapsed with 29,000 miles of railroad
still under construction.

Pig iron production declined in the United States as follows: in 1892 it
amounted in total to 9,157,000 tons, but in 1893 it was only 7.124
million tons.

In May 1893 shares in trusts lost 25–50 percent of their value in
general.

There now took place something that was very characteristic of the
crisis. There was a colossal amount of unemployment, and poverty was
rampant. Then the unemployed from different regions decided to submit a
so-called living petition to the American Congress, that is, to set out
on a journey together and march on foot to Washington. And that is what
they did. They demanded that Congress provide jobs through public works,
road building, and so forth. This march was led by a certain [Jacob]
Coxy, a farmer.⁴⁴ He was not lacking in all sorts of mystical
accessories; his movement took the name of something like Christian
Brothers (perhaps that was the name).

The first troops [of Coxey’s Army] set out on Easter Sunday in 1894.
Twenty marches met up [or were supposed to] and arrived in Washington on
May. When they arrived they demonstrated in Washington in front of
Congress.⁴⁵ This march caused a big sensation throughout Europe because
for the first time the bourgeoisie in Washington were stricken with
great fear. Also the unemployed had to make great sacrifices along the
way; it was a difficult journey. Naturally they did not have any results
[from their protests]. They had to wait until an economic upturn came
again. According to Rosa Luxemburg’s personal recollection, the
newspapers [in Europe] at that time estimated that there were half a
million people involved.⁴⁶

The [1893] crash in the United States and the one in Australia had a
combined effect and gave rise to a major depression for the world
economy as a whole.

_As early as 1895 there was another new crisis_. Again this was a crisis
that occurred mainly on the stock exchanges, resulting not from the
conditions of production, but from _speculation on South American gold
mines_. (The beginning of gold extraction [on a really large scale]
dates from the mid-1880s.)

A postlude [to all this] was the Boer war [in South Africa]⁴⁷ and the
taking of the gold mines by the British.

How intense the speculation was at that time is shown by the fact that
in the year [_MS. Missing words_] In the case of 25 mining companies
that paid dividends, the face value of their shares amounted to 6.55
million pounds sterling, but the market value was 38.52 million. If this
increase in value is calculated as a percentage—it is an increase of 588
percent. In the case of the 133 mining companies that did not pay
dividends, because they were not yet profitable, the face value of their
shares amounted to 27.73 million pounds sterling, but the market value
was 113.23 million. Calculated as a percentage, this was an increase of
409 percent.

The Land Speculation Company and others [like it] in Transvaal were
likewise able to increase the value of their shares by speculative
operations. The nominal value was 15.87 million pounds sterling, but the
value of those shares increased above the nominal value by a factor of
401 percent. Some shares on the stock exchange stood at a level 600
percent or even 900 percent above their nominal value.

_The collapse of prices on the stock exchanges_: On October 1, 1895, the
market value for the shares of 146 gold trusts was _5,095 million
marks_. On February 28, 1897, in contrast, their market value was only
_1,960 million marks_.

After the crisis of 1895, a general economic upturn began. A role in
this was played by the ending of the Sino-Japanese war, which expanded
the market and then [brought] European exports [to Asia], followed by
Siberian railroad building, which opened up Russia’s North and East,
[and led to] trade treaties with Russia.

After this economic upturn [after 1895] there followed the crisis of
1900–01. Then the crisis of 1907, and so forth. We have the most precise
data about these [most recent] crises from the trade unions. Up until
then, we never had such [exact] material.

With regard to the upturn that began after 1895, there is a good
pamphlet by Comrade Parvus [Alexander Helphand], published in Dresden in
either 1896 or 1897. Its title is something like _Aufschwung und
Gewerkschaften_ (Economic Upturn and the Trade Unions).⁴⁸

Statistics on the [number of] bankruptcies in Germany from 1896 through
1909 [are] in the pamphlet by [Max] Schippel, _Hochkonjunktur und
Wirtschaftskrise_ (Economic Boom and Economic Crisis).⁴⁹ There are also
good numbers in that pamphlet.⁵⁰

_Bankruptcy Statistics, 1898–1909:_

  ------ --------
  1898   7,364
  1899   7,220
  1900   8,547
  1901   10,566
  1902   9,801
  1903   9,609
  1904   9,499
  1905   9,329
  1906   9,388
  1907   9,886
  1908   11,581
  1909   10,998
  ------ --------

Nowadays the distinction between boom and bust is much less sharply
defined than before, because no uninterrupted boom can occur anymore,
and thus we no longer experience an actual boom in the earlier sense of
the term.⁵¹



HISTORY OF CRISES¹


History of Theories of Economic Crises

Impetus given by the crisis of 1815

(1) _Robert Owen_ in his writings of 1815, 1818, and 1823 [gave an]
explanation of crises [as coming] from the contradiction between
increased productivity because of machinery [on the one hand] and the
reduced wages and intensified exploitation of the workers because of
these same machines [on the other]. [His] demand: employment of the
jobless by the state, and a greater share of the product to go to the
workers.

(2) _Malthus_ and _Sismondi_ derive crises from the distribution of
income. Malthus (1820)²: thrift and the drive for capitalization [i.e.,
accumulation] must lead to crises, unless consumption is expanded by
_unproductive_ consumption ([on the part of] the nobility, the military,
government officials, etc.). [That is] according to Malthus. [But]
_according to Sismondi_, mass consumption through the improvement of the
workers’ conditions [can expand consumption]. The more evenly income is
distributed, according to Sismondi, the smaller the danger of crises.

(3) _Say_ polemicizes against Malthus and Sismondi, because [according
to Say’s theory,] a general condition of overproduction is impossible.
Overproduction in one sector only means underproduction in another.
Supply is demand, and vice versa.³ This theory was enormously successful
and had great influence, particularly on the liberal school of political
economy.

(4) _Marx_


SUNSPOTS

In 1886 in the United States an investigation undertaken into [economic]
crises came up with 180 causes! [See the article] by Herkner entitled
“Causes” in the _Handwörterbuch der Staatswissenschaften_.⁴

(5) Tugan-Baranovsky[.] Disproportion between production and consumption

(6) Sombart[.] Disproportion between lack of organization and
organization


CRISES

1815 England. [Aftermath of Napoleon’s] Continental System

1825 England. Exports to South America and Speculation

1836/37 England and the United States

1847

1857

1861

1866/7

1873

1882

1890/2

1893

1895

1900/1

1907/08


CRISES [DISCUSSED IN DETAIL]

_1815_

The Continental System. November 21, 1806 to 1812/1813. The entire coast
of the European Continent [was affected]. Unworkable because of
smuggling. Effects: rise of the cotton industry in _Saxony_. Here in the
eighteenth century there were 25,000–30,000 spinners working by hand.
Ruinous competition by imports from England forced a transition to
spinning machines. In 1800 there were already 2,000 spinning jennys⁵
(hand-operated) in Saxony, and more than 150 mechanics were making them.
Until 1798 these machines were used in small-scale production, in the
cottage industry. In 1798 in Chemnitz a businessman [_Verleger_] for the
first time brought many spinning machines together in one workroom. Now
there soon came onto the scene a spinning jenny driven by
_water_-powered machinery as in a water mill, and that wiped out
small-scale production. The first “spinning mills” were introduced in
Saxony in 1800. One started out with 620 spindles, the others with 432
each. This form of manufacture spread quickly then, and thanks to the
Continental System, by 1813 there were more than 256,000 spindles in
operation in the cotton industry. Around this time the (hand-operated)
jenny disappeared completely. In 1813, the last uprising by 1,100 hand
spinners in Vogtland [occurred].

Also, there was constricted purchasing power in the countries on the
Continent. In 1815 in England, a crash, factory disturbances,
destruction of machinery.

_1825_

After 1815, soon [there was economic] recovery and a sharp upturn. Canal
building, road construction, gas works for street lighting, banks,
speculation. Particularly [with regard to] _South America_. Independence
of the South and Central American countries (Argentina, Brazil, Mexico,
Colombia, Ecuador, Peru, Chile). Gold and silver mining in _Mexico_ and
_Peru_ (Potosi, now in Bolivia [formerly “Upper Peru”]). Beginning in
1824, the London Stock Exchange was flooded with South American
securities. In 1824–25 countries of South and Central America issued
government bonds in London worth more than 20 million pounds sterling
(at 7–8 percent [interest rates]). In addition, [there was] an enormous
quantity of shares, mainly in mining companies, part of which were
completely imaginary. The [price of the] shares of the English-Mexican
Company rose in the first month (December 1824 to January 1825) by 125
pounds sterling; those of the Real del Monte company, by 800 pounds
sterling; those of the United Mexican Company, by 120 pounds sterling,
and so forth. Everything was thrown into speculation on the stock
exchange. Only a partial payment (of 5–10 percent) was enough for the
purchase of shares, so that even poor people could participate.
“Princes, aristocrats, politicians, officials, lawyers, physicians,
clergy, philosophers, poets, maidens, wives, and widows—all threw
themselves upon the stock exchange, in order to invest part of their
fortune in enterprises of which nothing was known but the name” (the
_Annual Register_ of 1825⁶).

The nominal capital of companies that were founded or projected in
1824–25, according to some estimates, reached 372 million pounds
sterling. Of these, the companies that still remained, later on, had a
nominal capital of 102 million pounds sterling.

Prices went sky high (cotton prices rose by 109 percent; pig iron, 77
percent; sugar, 39 percent). In 1825 [the prices of] cotton fabric went
up by 23 percent. Rapid construction of new factories [took place] in
Lancashire, as well as the expansion of existing factories, using credit
from banks.

_Export_ of British goods to Central and South America in 1821 was
2,942,000 pounds sterling; in 1825, it was 6,426,000 pounds sterling.
The main product was cotton fabric. But part of this came back to Europe
or went on to North America. The high prices in England were a strong
attraction for _imports_. A rapid outflow of gold from England resulted.
A backlash followed. Prices fell suddenly in London. The South American
countries were not paying interest. The mining companies were paying no
dividends. The Bank of England raised its bank rate sharply and refused
to pay the best rate of exchange. A panic resulted. Within six weeks, 70
provincial banks collapsed, and a large number of small entrepreneurs
and speculators were ruined along with them. The crisis of 1825 led to
the universal introduction of the _steam-powered loom_ and to a major
technological upheaval in the _iron foundries_, along with major
advances in technology in general.

_1836_

In 1833–36, there were extraordinarily good harvests in England, and
grain imports declined almost completely. As a result, a new upturn. At
the same time strong exports of English capital to the _United States_:
railroads, canals, industrial enterprises, the shares being sold in
England for the most part. In 1835–36, new banks founded in the United
States had a [total] capital of 52 million dollars. At the same time,
the purchase of public lands in the West and speculation on those. In
1833, 4 million dollars were spent on public lands; in 1836, 24.8
million dollars.

All of this: a surplus of capital, a boom in trade and industry, [and]
rising prices for goods and land created strong demand for European
goods. In particular, English exports to the United States increased.

English exports [in general, are shown in the following table, the
numbers being in thousands of pounds sterling:]

  ----------------------------- -------- --------
  _English Exports to_          _1832_   _1836_
  United States                 5,468    12,486
  Northern European countries   10,000   9,897
  Southern European countries   5,867    9,001
  Asia                          4,235    6,751
  Central and South America     4,272    5,955
  ----------------------------- -------- --------

In addition it happened that in 1833 and 1834 Spain and Portugal took
out a large number of loans from England. Prices on the stock exchange
[in England] rose swiftly. Likewise the prices of goods. Speculation
began on _English_ securities: railroad shares and bank shares. In 1836,
48 banks were founded in England (with low share prices, of [only] 10 or
5 pounds sterling).

NB: The nominal capital of the joint-stock companies founded between
1834 and 1836 [in England] amounted to 115.2 million pounds sterling. Of
that, 69.6 million [was invested] in railroads; 23.8 million [went to]
institutions connected with banking; 7.6 million to insurance companies;
7.0 million to mining enterprises; 3.7 million [was invested in] canal
building, and so forth.

The high prices of goods in England quickly promoted _imports_ into
England.

In the United States a panic broke out: because of an 1836 restriction
on land speculation (cash only). The American banks frantically sought
to obtain gold from England, and consequently panic broke out in England
as well, because of the strong outflow of gold. In 1837 there were 618
bank failures in the United States. [The panic in the U.S. had a] recoil
effect on England: a run on the banks of south England. Bankruptcies of
export houses, with the cotton industry suffering the most. (_No_ bank
failures [in England].) Unemployment—the _Chartist_ movement.

_1847_

The immediate cause: a bad harvest.

The depression reached its bottom in 1842. In 1843 and 1844 there were
two good harvests, [which meant] cheap food and [increased] demand for
manufactured goods. Then the opium war [of 1839–42]. 1842 saw the
opening of the _Chinese market_ (five [Chinese] ports were declared open
to free trade, and the island of Hong Kong was surrendered to England).
In 1844–45 boom times prevailed [in England], particularly in the cotton
industry. A large number of [new] cotton mills were founded, with very
high wages. Then [came massive] _railroad construction_.

[The following table shows the value of the] licenses for railroad
construction granted by Parliament, and the value of those actually
built [with figures in millions of pounds]:

  ---------------------- -------------------- ----------------------------
  _(Through December)_   _Licenses granted_   _Railroads actually built_
  1843                   81.9                 65.8
  1844                   20.4                 6.7
  1845                   60.5                 16.2
  1846                   131.7                37.8
  1847                   44.2                 40.7
  1848                   15.3                 38.2
  1849                   3.9                  29.6
  ---------------------- -------------------- ----------------------------

This railroad construction created a huge demand for products and for
labor (200,000 workers). Prices for iron increased enormously. From 1844
on, there was madder and madder speculation on railroad construction.

Then in 1845 a potato blight struck in Ireland and England, and the
entire crop was destroyed. There were also bad grain harvests in 1845
and 1846. _Famine in Ireland_. Parliament had to authorize relief
payments of 8 million pounds sterling. At the same time, however, there
was mad speculation by the grain dealers. Then the _cotton crop_ failed
[in the United States]. In spite of this, the prices of cotton yarn and
cotton goods did not go up at all, because demand went down.
(Consumption of cotton fabrics in England in 1845 fell by [a quantity
worth] 21 million pounds sterling, and in 1846, by 13 million pounds
sterling.) Thereupon, there were cutbacks in the cotton industry. On top
of that came business failures on a large scale among the grain
speculators. In April and May 1847, English grain traders had purchased
enormous quantities of grain [abroad] at the very highest prices. This
grain was delivered in July and August (it took two months to transport
it!) just as prices dropped because of the very good prospects for the
harvest [in England in 1847]. The bankruptcies of the grain speculators
brought bank failures in their wake: the Royal Bank in Liverpool, the
Liverpool Credit Company, etc. After that a general panic broke out.
Then the prices of railroad stocks fell. [A few figures will show this,
as follows]:

  ------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------- --------------------------------------------- ---------------------------------------------
                                                                                              _In December 1845_                            _In December 1849_
  Capital invested in railroad construction:                                                  100 million pounds sterling                   230 million pounds sterling
  The stock exchange price that could actually be obtained for railroad shares amounted to:   160 million pounds sterling                   110 million pounds sterling
  Profits and losses amounted to:                                                             Profits in 1845: 60 million pounds sterling   Losses in 1849: 120 million pounds sterling
  ------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------- --------------------------------------------- ---------------------------------------------

Ruin of many shareholders. In 1848 a general fall in prices. _The cotton
industry suffered the worst_, and then the mining industry, coal and
iron ore in particular.

In 1854–55, a crisis in Australia ([involving the newly discovered] gold
deposits)

1857. First worldwide crisis.

Abolition of the corn laws in 1846 and from then on England’s transition
to free trade. The free trade advocates prophesied that [with free
trade] crises would not happen any more.

The discovery of _gold deposits_ in California and Australia opened new
markets for English industry. Until 1850 and 1851 gold production was
mainly in Brazil and Siberia, the annual average extraction of gold in
the whole world then being worth 150 million marks. By 1853, it had
risen to 760 million marks (now, in 1909,⁷ it is 460 million dollars).
The ending of the _Crimean War_ in 1856 gave English industry new
[opportunities for] expansion.

Meanwhile, however, capitalist industry in other European countries had
also developed after the revolutions of 1848. Therefore the crisis now
affected Germany, Sweden, Denmark, and above all, the United States.

Under the impact of political unrest (1848) European capital had flowed
massively to the United States. According to an estimate by [Albert]
Schäffle, during 1849–54, 1,000 million guilders (a guilder = _+/–2_
marks) were invested in American securities. There was an enormous boom
in the United States. The Crimean War had interrupted the export of
grain from Russia, which America took advantage of. The purchase of and
speculation on public lands, and at the same time massive emigration to
the United States from Germany, Russia, and Poland. In 1852–53 in the
United States, public lands worth 1.7 million dollars were purchased,
but in 1852–54, the figure was 20.4 million dollars. Along with that, a
tremendous amount of railroad construction. In 1856, the rail network in
the United States was enlarged by almost 4,500 miles and even more was
projected. The prices of goods rose, which attracted imports. In 1857,
the import of goods [into the United States] increased by 32 million
dollars. A failure of the cotton crop, and [therefore] high cotton
prices, but in spite of that, enormous expansion of the demand for
cotton. American banks and import-export dealers engaged in colossal
speculation on the import of goods from Europe.

In 1857, [there was] an exceptionally good grain harvest in Europe. That
caused a series of bankruptcies among grain-exporting businesses in
America. The failure of one small bank gave the signal for a panic on
all the American stock exchanges. In December 1857, prices [in the
United States] plunged by 20 to 30 percent.

The American crisis was immediately transmitted to England. In October,
there was a suspension of payments by one Liverpool bank. Thereupon,
panic in all of England.

From there the crisis was transplanted to France (where the bank rate
had always been 4 percent, and only in 1847 went up to 5 percent; but in
November 1857 it rose to 10 percent!).

There immediately followed a collapse in _Hamburg_, from which the
crisis spread to Prussia and at the same time to Sweden and South
America, with which Hamburg had strong trade relations.

_1861–65_

The price of cotton per kilo rose from [the equivalent of] 60–80
pfennigs to 4–5 marks!

[Total] exports from England to the United States

In 1861, 23 million pounds sterling

In 1862, 11 million pounds sterling.

[Drop in the value of] Consumption of cotton in England

In 1860, 1,084 million pounds sterling

In 1862, 452 million pounds sterling

The cotton shortage brought about a general slowdown in English
industry. To be sure, the cotton mill owners and cotton dealers not only
did not suffer from this crisis but even gained from it. The blow fell
mainly on the small manufacturers, who were ruined.

  ------ ------------------------------------- ---------------------------------
         _Number of cotton mills in England_   _Number of spindles in England_
  1862   2,887                                 30,387
  1867   2,549                                 32,000
  ------ ------------------------------------- ---------------------------------

On the other hand, the cotton shortage led to the enrichment of the big
cotton mill owners. In mid-1861 very substantial stocks of unsold raw
cotton and cotton goods had been built up. A consequence of the
breaking-off of imports from the United States [because of the Civil
War] was that prices for these stored-up goods experienced an
extraordinary increase. According to one calculation, the mill owners
and cotton traders gained more than 19 million pounds sterling from the
[sale of the stocks of] raw cotton, and 16 million pounds sterling from
the cotton goods, for a total of more than 36 million pounds sterling.
Mainly the Lancashire capitalists.

It was different for the workers! By the 1860s the workers of Lancashire
had reached the highest level within the English working class. They had
the highest wages, and were the most intelligent and best-organized
workers. Wages and working conditions were held to firmly established
standards. Many workers had some savings. The percentage of those on
relief was lower than anywhere else in the country. And it was precisely
these workers who for several years were robbed of the very means of
existence. Beginning in autumn 1861 unemployment grew so much that
charity, both public and private, had to step in to an extraordinary
extent. By January 1862 unemployment reached threatening dimensions.
Cutbacks in production in the spring of 1862 were so large that by
April, out of the 47,504 workers who had earlier been employed in the
cotton industry in Manchester, only 23,722 remained fully employed, as
against 15,393 on half-time, and 8,369 completely unemployed. In
Blackburn and its surrounding areas, out of 40,000 workers, 8,459 were
completely unemployed and most of the rest worked only 2–4 days a weeks.
The workers had to pawn or sell their furniture, beds, etc., and the
wives and children went begging. In May of 1862 the number of jobless
workers in the county of Lancashire reached 58,000; according to some
sources, the number was as high as 100,000. Large numbers of small
business owners were [also] ruined. A relief committee was founded in
London. The workers of Lancashire engaged in a struggle with local
charity officials, who wanted to force the cotton mill workers to
perform the crudest kinds of labor [at workhouses].

The behavior of the _free-trade advocates_ was characteristic. [John]
Bright was concerned above all to minimize the extent of the disaster.
He claimed that impoverishment had been much worse under the Corn Laws
in the early 1840s. He also defended the local charity officials
energetically and demanded the least possible interference by the
central government in the sphere of jurisdiction of the local
poor-relief authorities. He opposed all large-scale relief action,
because in his view that would only increase pauperism in Lancashire

The _Tories_, as always, did more for the workers than the liberal
factory owners. In the House of Lords they defended quite warmly the
demand of the workers for the elimination of forced labor. Meanwhile,
the workers’ struggle with the local poor-relief authorities continued.
In Blackburn a thousand unemployed workers refused to work at breaking
up rocks.

In July [1862], out of the 355,000 workers in the textile mills of the
county of Lancashire, 80,000 were completely unemployed, and the rest
were employed only part of the time. Charity contributions however
flowed in abundantly. The government and society feared social unrest,
and that was the reason for charity action on a large scale. But it was
precisely the cotton mill owners who were least inclined to make
sacrifices, and complaints were printed [even] in the conservative
newspapers that they [the mill owners] did not want to sign the lists
[for charity donations]. In Parliament, Cobden spoke out sharply against
the proposal that relief in the counties of England be organized on a
broader basis. That would mean the ruin of the mill owners, said Cobden.
He advocated a public loan that would provide relief [through a public
works program]. Lord Palmerston stated publicly: “In reality they want
to shift the entire burden from the wealthy to the poor.” However, the
mill owners won.

In Manchester the mortality rate rose to a level 60–70 percent higher
than in the rest of the country.

By an energetic struggle, the workers won their demands: [first,] that
relief was to be paid entirely in money, instead of half of it being
paid in kind; second, that forced labor be replaced by instruction at
schools. Special schools were established for the workingmen, and sewing
schools for their wives.

December 1862 was the high point of the crisis. In Lancashire and
Cheshire [counties] 271,983 persons were receiving public assistance,
[and] 236,310 were receiving [other types of] assistance. Out of those
271,983 on public relief, only 12,500 were at workhouses.⁸

At the end of January 1863, in the cotton-industry districts the number
of those completely unemployed was 247,230, of those who were employed
part time the number was 165,600, and those employed full time, 121,129.
Wages were driven down by 10–20 percent! The mill owners once again
walked off with the winnings!

At the end of 1862 a movement for emigration began. The best workers
emigrated. Invitations came from New Zealand. One province in New
Zealand offered 10,000 pounds sterling for emigrants from England. Large
gatherings of workers began. They demanded public support to cover the
costs of emigration. On top of that, there were storms of indignation
against the mill owners.

In March 1863, in a number of small factory towns of Lancashire, workers
began to engage in public disorders because public relief had been
reduced. Stores were looted, etc. The Tories supported the emigration
movement. However, the government, under pressure from the mill owners,
provided credit amounting to 1.2 million pounds sterling for a public
works program. _Cobden_ defended this in order to counteract emigration.
But these public works came into existence after the greatest need had
already passed. The work consisted of road building, canal building,
labor on aqueducts, the laying out of parks, etc. Thus public works were
constructed at ridiculously low wages. A laughable number of workers
were employed on these public works—8,324. Counting their families that
meant 30–40,000 persons benefited somewhat from that.

By 1864 there was an upturn in the economic conjuncture. Cotton was
being imported from India and Egypt, to replace American cotton, and
soon the mill owners were complaining about the shortage of work hands.

English Imports of Raw Cotton:

In 1861, from India 15 million pounds sterling

from Egypt 10 million pounds sterling

In 1864, from India 52 million pounds sterling

from Egypt 20 million pounds sterling

_Crisis of 1866/67_

The enormous amount of cotton imported from the Orient caused a severe
monetary crisis in England.

There was a rapid outflow of silver to India and the East. The Bank of
England tried to counteract this by frequently raising the bank rate.
But trade and industry remained undisturbed. The founding of new
companies flourished. In 1863–65 the joint-stock companies founded in
England had a total nominal capital of 582 million pounds sterling.
Speculative fever.

The end of the American Civil War gave new impetus to English industry.

England’s exports to the United States [increased as follows:]

1864 [exports were worth] 16.7 million pounds sterling.

1866 [exports were worth] 28.5 million pounds sterling.

[The following table shows the prices of goods during the boom and
during the bust:]

  --------------- --------------------------- ---------------------------
                  _Increase in prices 1866_   _Decrease in prices 1867_
  Coffee          +11%                        –17%
  Sugar           +11%                        –9%
  Tea             +31%                        –23%
  Silk            +27%                        –9%
  Flax and Hemp   +6%                         –17%
  Copper          +21%                        –20%
  Cotton          +15%                        –28%
  --------------- --------------------------- ---------------------------

All this led to a crisis in 1866. There was a sudden outbreak of panic
in May as the result of the bankruptcy of a big firm, Overend & Co. In
two weeks the reserves of the Bank of England were almost completely
emptied. Banks that functioned as joint-stock companies failed, as did
railroad companies. Those hit hardest by the crisis were the iron
industry, the machine industry, and shipbuilding.

In 1869, a money and credit crisis in the United States.

Second worldwide crisis, _1873_.

The years 1871–73 were a time of extraordinary industrial growth in all
of Europe. Billions of francs as payment of war reparations from France
poured into Germany. The founding of many new companies.

Statistics on joint-stock companies.

Germany and Austria become the main arena of stock market speculation.
The building of new railroads, home building, real estate speculation,
particularly in Vienna.

[The following table shows] the length of standard-gauge railroads in
Germany:

  ------ --------------------------------
         _[Total length in kilometers]_
  1845   2,143
  1855   7,326
  1865   13,900
  1875   27,881
  1880   33,645
  1890   41,818
         53,822
  ------ --------------------------------

In Austria, in the years 1867–73, among the newly licensed businesses
were 175 [regular] banks, 34 railroad enterprises, 645 industrial
companies, 104 housing and construction banks [_Baubanken_], 39
insurance companies, and 8 shipping companies, with a total amount of
capital involved, all together, of 4 billion guilders. Only 682 [of
these] companies actually came into existence, with joint-stock share
capital worth 2,577 billion guilders.

The craze for the founding of new companies spread to the United States,
where an enormous economic upturn had followed the end of the Civil War.
Railroads: in the years 1870–73, in the United States, a network of new
railroad lines of 23,406 miles was built. In 1864 there also began the
system of high indirect taxation and high protective tariffs.

In England, unparalleled prosperity in the iron and coal industries.

Total value of exports from England to the US:

  ------ ---------------------------------------------------------------------------
  1870   28.3 million pounds sterling
  1872   40.7 million pounds sterling
  1873   14.6 million pounds sterling (showing the effects of the crisis [of 1873]
         
  ------ ---------------------------------------------------------------------------

Total exports of iron, steel, and hard coal from England [to all the
world]:

  ------ ------------------------- ------------------------------
  1868   Iron and steel together   17.6 million pounds sterling
  1868   Exports of hard coal      5.4 million pounds sterling
  1873   Iron and steel            37.7 million pounds sterling
  1873   Hard coal                 13.2 million pounds sterling
  ------ ------------------------- ------------------------------

Total exports from England of cotton, wool, and linen fabrics:

  ------ ----------------------------- -------- -----------------
                   _Cotton_             _Wool_   _Linen fabrics_
  1868     53 million pound sterling     19.6          7.1
  1873    81.5 million pound sterling    25.4          7.3
  ------ ----------------------------- -------- -----------------

Statistics on pig iron production in England:

  ------ --------------------------------------------- -----------------------------
         _Production ofpig iron in millions of tons_   _Median price for pig iron_
  1867   4.7                                           52 shillings, 6 pence
  1868   4.9                                           52 shillings, 9 pence
  1869   5.4                                           53 shillings, 3 pence
  1870   5.9                                           54 shillings, 4 pence
  1871   6.6                                           59 shillings
  1872   6.7                                           101 shillings, 10 pence
  1873   6.8                                           117 shillings, 3 pence
  ------ --------------------------------------------- -----------------------------

The price rose so high because the expansion of production could not
keep pace with the growing demand, caused by the increasing needs of
railroad construction. In this connection, very heavy speculation on
foreign loans developed on the London Stock Exchange.

In the years 1870–75 foreign loans taken out in London amounted to a
value of 260 million pounds sterling! Most of these were Oriental
governments, but they did not pay back the loans. At the end of the
1870s the following governments did not pay the interest on their loans
or made only partial payments: Turkey, Egypt, Greece, Bolivia, Costa
Rica, Ecuador, Honduras, Mexico, Paraguay, Uruguay, Peru, Venezuela, and
Santo Domingo.

Total value of securities issued on American and European stock
exchanges:

  ------ ----------------------
  1870   4,560 million marks
  1871   12,560 million marks
  1872   10,110 million marks
  1873   8,722 million marks
  1874   3,368 million marks
  ------ ----------------------

_In general_: great technological changes in the United States, England,
Germany, etc.: machinery, steam power, railroads!

The crash began separately in the United States, with the collapse of
speculation on the railroads, and in Europe, in Vienna on May 3, 1873.

By May 28 in Vienna there had already been 100 bankruptcies and shares
had lost 300 million guilders in value. In June there was a panic in
Germany. The value of securities suddenly fell by 30–50 percent.

The American crash intensified the general collapse.

Then a severe commercial crisis followed in England. There were more and
more bankruptcies from 1873 to 1875 and even later. In 1878 some
top-ranking banks failed. In England in 1878 there was a major crisis in
the cotton industry and also in the iron industry and coal mining. The
high point was 1879.

From 1873 to 1880 the crisis spread across Italy, Russia, Holland,
Belgium, South America, and Australia and affected all the major
branches of industry: iron and coal, textile, the chemical industry, the
food industry, the railroads, and shipbuilding.

_The Crisis of 1882 and the Depression of 1883–86_

In France, recovery after the [Franco-Prussian] war, the Third Republic,
and also the subsidence of Communism.⁹ In 1875 an upturn begins.
Founding of the Union Générale and the Banque de Lyon by Bontoux,
supported by the Catholic party in France and Austria—in opposition to
the Rothschild group. Also the founding of the Vienna Agricultural Bank.
[The Bontoux group] bought up its own shares, to make the house look
more prosperous. To put their capital to use, new enterprises were
founded on a massive scale: gas works, coal mines, insurance companies,
railroads, etc. Newspapers were purchased in order to influence public
opinion. The first collapse came in Lyon. A sudden plunge in the value
of shares. Also in Vienna. On January 29, 1882, bankruptcy of the Union
Générale.

Also in other countries: After 1879 a new upturn began. In the United
States, the feverish building of railroads: in the years 1880–82, 28,240
miles [were added to] the railroad network.

[The value of] exports from England to the United States was:

  --------- ------------------------------
  In 1878   14.6 million pounds sterling
  In 1882   31.0 million pounds sterling
  --------- ------------------------------

[The value of] exports from England in general [was as follows (in
millions of pounds sterling):]¹⁰

  ------ ---------------- ------------- ------------------ ---------------- -----------------
          _Iron & Steel_   _Machinery_   _Cotton fabrics_   _Wool fabrics_   _Linen fabrics_
   1878        18.4            7.5             52,9              16.7              5.5
   1882        31.6           11.6             62.9              18.8               6
  ------ ---------------- ------------- ------------------ ---------------- -----------------

In 1884 in the United States there was a severe economic crash involving
the railroads. A general fall of prices in England followed, about 15–20
percent. The drop in prices [of agricultural products] on the world
market has given rise to an entire body of literature. In particular,
grain prices fell ([because of cheaper] transport, and American grain!).
According to the _price charts_ recorded in Hamburg, from 1884 to 1886
prices fell by 31 percent for agricultural products, by 7 percent for
industrial products, and by 12 percent for products from colonies.

_The crisis of 1890 (South America and England)_

After 1886 [there was] a new industrial upturn.

Exports from England:

  ------ -------- ------------- -------- ------------------ ---------------- ---------------------
          _Iron_   _Machinery_   _Coal_   _Cotton fabrics_   _Wool fabrics_   _Linen fabrics^(†)_
   1886    21.7       10.1        9.8           57.4              19.7                5.5
   1890    31.6       10.4        19.0          62.1              20.4                5.7
  ------ -------- ------------- -------- ------------------ ---------------- ---------------------

Exports to _Argentina_ were especially strong.¹¹

At the end of the 1880s a mad craze for founding new companies developed
in Argentina.

In the years 1887–89, 250 joint-stock companies were founded in
Argentina with a nominal capital of 764 million dollars.

The national debt of Argentina was:

  --------- ------------------------------
  In 1874   10 million pounds sterling
  In 1890   59.1 million pounds sterling
  --------- ------------------------------

London was the main source [of funding for Argentina]

The railroad network in Argentina:

  --------- -------------------
  In 1883   3,123 kilometers
  In 1893   13,691 kilometers
  --------- -------------------

This was the amount actually built. Much more was projected. In 1889
alone, [new] railroad construction was licensed for 12,000 kilometers.

In 1890 in Argentina there was a tremendous economic crash, and a
revolution.¹² As a result, there came a crisis in England. The largest
English private bank, R. Baring & Co., collapsed in November 1890.

Then a crash in Transvaal followed, and in Mexico, Uruguay, etc.

A severe commercial crisis in England.

_1893 The United States and Australia_

Railroad construction at a furious pace in both countries.

In the United States, in addition, the confused uproar of the “silver
party” over currency policy; also, trust scandals (the “Whiskey
Trust,”¹³ the cornering of the wheat market, etc.). Bankruptcies on a
massive scale in the United States. Trade grinds to a halt completely.
Failure of 600 banks in August 1893.

Total number of bankruptcies:

  ------ ---------------------------------------------------
  1890   7,538 with liabilities worth 93 million dollars
  1893   11,174 with liabilities worth 324 million dollars
  ------ ---------------------------------------------------

Among these, 74 railroad companies, with 29,000 miles of track, went
bankrupt. In May 1893, the shares of the trusts fell in value by 25–50
percent.

Pig iron production:

  ------ ----------------
  1892   9,157,000 tons
  1893   7,124,000 tons
  ------ ----------------

_March on Washington by the unemployed_.¹⁴ Demand for public works (road
building). On Easter Sunday in 1894 the first march began, and arrived
in Washington on May 1. In Australia, the government had borrowed 112
million pounds sterling from English capitalists. Of that, 81 million
pounds sterling went into railroad and streetcar construction.

Length of the railroad network in Australia:

  ------ --------------
  1880   4,900 miles
  1895   15,600 miles
  ------ --------------

Real estate and construction craze.

In 1891 the construction companies began to collapse. In 1893 a general
crash. Almost all the Australian banks stopped payments.

In 1895 a _stock exchange crisis_.

In 1895 _a crisis in_ the value of South African mines (extraction of
gold began in Transvaal in 1882–85). The market value and assets of 146
gold trusts on October 1, 1895, were 5,095 million marks; on February
28, 1897, they were 1,960 million marks.

Beginning in 1896, an unparalleled _upswing_.

The Sino-Japanese war.

The Trans-Siberian railroad.

Trade treaty between Germany and Russia, upsurge of electric power
technology, [an upsurge in] gold production in South Africa, Australia,
and the Klondike (and Alaska).

NB: orders [and contracts] given out by the army and navy!

(Parvus’s pamphlet)¹⁵

1898 Bernstein!¹⁶

_The World Crisis of 1900–01_

Terrible unemployment in Germany, Austria, England, Russia, France,
Italy, Belgium, and East Asia. It first appeared in Russia.

In _England_ imports fell by [the equivalent of] about 35 million marks,
and exports by about 235 million marks, particularly the import of raw
materials (cotton, etc.) and the export of coal and iron. — In
_Austria_, an enormous drop in prices for iron goods and machinery, a
colossal decline in exports, business cutbacks and unemployment.

In _Russia_ the iron and coal industry as well as the oil industry
suffered the most. Prices and [_MS. Illegible—single word_] fell, in
part, by a third.

In _China_ the Boxer Rebellion and the campaign by “the Huns” brought
about a severe general crisis. Commerce was laid low completely. As a
result _Japan_ was also drawn into the crisis, because China,
particularly its southeastern coastal districts, was a significant
customer for Japan.

The _United States_ remained unaffected. Indeed, it was registering
great prosperity: there was full employment in the textile and iron
industries, and strong demand on the railroads. As a result new trusts
were formed and new businesses started. [All] that would contribute to
the next major world crisis.

_1907_

[The crisis of 1907] started out precisely from the United States.

In the years 1903–06 [there was] a boom. The military and the navy, high
protective tariffs, high prices. Then a panic and the collapse of prices
on the New York Stock Exchange, which spread to London, Berlin, etc.
Almost all countries were affected.

In Germany in 1908 [there were] 11,581 bankruptcies (even in [the crisis
of] 1901 there had been only 10,566).

The world crisis was most clearly reflected in the downturn in maritime
shipping, which was unparalleled. The two largest shipping firms, H.A.S.
and North German Lloyd, had _none at all!_¹⁷

[This was the] consequence of overproduction in shipbuilding during the
boom. In north German harbors even at the beginning of 1909, ships with
a capacity of two million freight tons were lying at anchor, unused.
_Trade unions_.

NB: emigration!

Number of between-deck passengers from Hamburg and Bremen to New York:

  ------ ----------------------------------
  1907   268,000
  1908   77,000 (???Is that correct?)^(†)
  ------ ----------------------------------

On the North German Lloyd line alone:¹⁸

  ------ ------------------------------------------
  1908   to America: 59,000 from America: 89,000
  1909   to America: 151,000 from America: 35,000
  ------ ------------------------------------------

Crises in _particular economic sectors!_

Prices fall universally

Three sets of index numbers

  --------- -------------------------------- -------------------- ---------------------
             _According to the "Economist"_   _Acc. to Palgrave_   _Acc. to Sauerbeck_
   1865–69                100                        100                   100
   1870–79                 93                         97                   97
   1880–87                _77_                        82                   78
  --------- -------------------------------- -------------------- ---------------------

(different types of goods [calculated, using] different methods)

In 1886 a commission was established in England to investigate the
causes of the economic slowdown. Various causes were explained: (1)
increased cost of gold; (2) depreciation of silver; (3) protective
tariffs by many countries as an obstacle to trade. But the explanations
agreed mainly on two things: (1) radical changes in production
technology; and (2) radical changes in the means of transport. The
report of the commission states, among other things: “In recent years
with the help of science, and with the application of machinery to the
production and transport of goods in all countries of the world, a
revolution of the greatest significance has been enacted in the vital
relations of the entire civilized world. The quantity of labor that is
required for the accomplishment of a particular result in the sphere of
production or transport has diminished to an extraordinary extent and
continues to diminish.”¹⁹

_Technology_: The total number of steam engines (in the _world_),
expressed in _horsepower_ amounted to: 6.3 million in 1850; 11.4 million
in 1860; 19.5 million in 1870; 28.9 million in 1880; and 35 million in
1885. Of these: 10.5 million were in the United States; 9.7 million in
England; and 14.8 million in the heartland of Europe.

Just one example:

Steam engines in Prussia

  ------ --------------------------- --------------
         _Number of Steam Engines_   _Horsepower_
  1837   437                         7,514
  1840   634                         12,279
  1843   1,090                       27,241
  1846   1,491                       41,130
  1849   1,969                       67,150
  1852   2,833                       92,476
  1855   4,085                       161,774
  1861   8,685                       365,631
  1878   37,320                      2,891,867
  1885   48,868                      1,426,739
  1889   58,782                      1,773,454
  1901   99,096                      4,328,778
  ------ --------------------------- --------------

(The figures for 1837–78 do not include locomotives or steam engines
used on ships. The figures for 1885–1901 do not include locomotives or
steam engines used on naval vessels.)

Transport: (1) railroads in the United States, Russia, India; (2) the
Suez Canal (1869); (3) steamships replace sailing ships; (5) ships built
of steel instead of wood; (5) enormous increase in the power of the
machinery.

Freight costs become cheaper in the 1880s. The freight cost for
[approximately] one quarter [ton] of grain (217.7 kilograms) from New
York to England was: in 1874, 10.5 shillings; in 1884, 4 shillings; and
from Odessa to England: in 1874, for one ton (1,000 kilograms), 40
shillings; in 1884, 16 shillings.

The steep drop in prices on the [world] market for agricultural products
lowered the purchasing power of the rural population with regard to
industrial products. According to one estimate, during the 1880s
agricultural income in England declined by 42.8 million pounds sterling.
In the United States in the 1880s the ruin of millions of [family]
farmers occurred. They lost their farms on a massive scale or became
tenant farmers instead of farm owners.

Statistics on the agricultural crisis²⁰

[The table below shows] average prices on the most important markets for
agricultural products in Prussia. [This table covers] four eight-year
periods.

  ---------- ------------------- ------------------- ------------------- -------------------
              _1868/69_–_75/76_   _1876/77_–_83/84_   _1884/85_–_91/92_   _1892/93_–_99/00_
    Wheat         223 marks           207 marks           181 marks           155 marks
     Rye          173 marks           166 marks           156 marks           131 marks
    Barley        165 marks           158 marks           148 marks           138 marks
     Oats         160 marks           148 marks           142 marks           138 marks
   Potatoes       56 marks            59 marks            53 marks            49 marks
    Straw         46 marks            50 marks            48 marks            43 marks
     Hay          72 marks            65 marks            60 marks            59 marks
  ---------- ------------------- ------------------- ------------------- -------------------

_Cotton crisis in Egypt_

The Civil War in the United States and the [resulting] high prices for
cotton provided the impetus for the expansion of cotton production in
Egypt on an enormous scale. Cotton cultivation was introduced in Egypt
under Mohammed Ali in the beginning of the nineteenth century, but not
on a large scale. Now speculation enters in. The khedive Ismael Pasha
stole land and converted it into cotton plantations. There was an entire
revolution in crop cultivation, the irrigation system, deep ploughing,
steam engines for pumping water, steam-driven ploughs (machines from
England), and [the employment of] serf-type forced labor. Loans from
English and French capitalists. In 1865, a collapse. In [???]²¹ in
Egyptian cotton.

Cotton Cultivation in 1900:

  ------------------ ------------------ -------------------------------------
                     _Area_             _Yield_
  United States      25 million acres   9 million bales (500 lbs. per bale)
  India                                 1.5 million bales
  Egypt                                 1.3 million bales
  World production                      14 million bales
  ------------------ ------------------ -------------------------------------

But Egyptian cotton, because of its quality, brings a higher price and
is even imported by the United States in substantial amounts.

Bank rates in the 1860–80s:

  ----------- --------- --------
  London      1861–70   4.3%
              1871–75   3.5%
              1876–80   2.9%
              1885      2.5%
  Amsterdam   1884–87   2.5%
  Berlin      1870s     4.5%
              1884–87   3–3.5%
  ----------- --------- --------

The strong expansion of joint-stock companies also intensified
competition in industry. Industry developed in a series of new
countries: Germany, Austria, the United States, Russia. As a result of
all this, an intensified competitive struggle on the world market. And
from that, the strong efforts to form monopolies.

(1) Long-term _protective tariff policies_

(2) _Cartels and trusts_


_BIBLIOGRAPHY on the theory of crises and history of crises_

[Eugene von] Bergmann[,] _Geschichte der [Nationalökonomishen]
Krisentheorien_ [History of the Political Economy of Theories on
Crises], Stuttgart[:Kolhammer, 1895].

Max Wirth[,] _Geschichte der Handelskrisen_ [History of Commercial
Crises], Frankfurt[:J.D. Sauerländer,] 1858 (fourth edition, 1890).

Herkner’s article [entitled “Crises”] in the _Handwörterbuch der
Staatswissenschaften_²²

Tugan Baranowsky[,] _Studien zur Theorie und Geschichte der
Handelskrisen in England_ [(Studies in the Theory and History of
Commercial Crises in England)], Jena[: G. Fischer,] 1901.

Parvus[,] _Die Handelskrisis und die Gewerkschaften_ [The Trade Crisis
and the Trade Unions], Munich: Verlag M. Ernst, 1907.

[Parvus,] _Der wirtschaftliche Aufschwung und die Gewerkschaften_ [The
Economic Boom and the Workers’ Movement], Dresden 1896(?)²³

Georg Bernhard[,] _Krach–krisis und die Arbeiterklasse_ [Crash—Economic
Crisis and the Working Class], Berlin: Vorwärts, 1902.


PROBLEMS

Do cartels and trusts regulate production? (The crises since 1880)

Can cartels and trusts arbitrarily set prices?

Can cartels and trusts be expanded to include all [spheres of]
production?

Cartels, trusts, and the working class.

Cartels, trusts, and tariff policy.

_International contradictions_

Legislation against cartels and trusts

Raw materials and processing

In 1911 [_even] without [counting] the world market!_²⁴

  ---------------------------- -----------
  Chemical industry            156, 405
  Textile industry             922,817
  Metal and machine industry   1,657,863
  Timber industry              429,975
  (timber for building)        
  (and for commercial use)     
  ---------------------------- -----------

_Gold_ and _silver_ as _monetary material_

Do cartels represent progress?

(2)²⁵ “_Regulation of Industry_” — Crises

[Crises] since the 1880s[:] 1893 in America, _1900_ in Europe, _1907_ in
America and Europe—the ups and downs are extremely sharp, as before.
Other methods [are necessary.]

The trade unions suffer the least; those that are weaker suffer the
most.

(3) _Price policy_. (1) on occasion [i.e., conditionally there might
be?]: a trust [limited to?[the “homeland”; (2) competition from
“outsiders”; (3) on the world market (export premiums, giveaway prices);
(4) competition through surrogates; (5) all-sided? struggle among
cartels [producing] finished goods, semi-finished goods, and raw
materials.

(4) Can a “universal cartel” come into existence?

(5) [General] Trends: 1) Conglomeration ????²⁶ the smaller [swallowed
up] by the larger, elimination of the middleman; 2) High protective
tariffs, international conflicts; 3) Subjugation of the state!; 4)
Exhaustion of the mass of the people, and of the petty bourgeoisie.

(6) The position of the workers

In general: sharpening of the contradictions, greater anarchy [of
production], acceleration of development.

(7) Trusts and tariff policy. [See] Table 59, Liefmann, this page

(8) Do cartels and trusts represent progress?

[A list of] crises [beginning with] 1815.²⁷ [mention] Robert Owen

1815, 1825, 1836/9, 1847 _England_ (South America, the United States)

Canal building, railroad construction, _speculation_, exports [from
England] to America.

After 1825, the _steam-powered loom_ and radical change in the smelting
of iron.

_1842_ Opening of the Chinese market.

_1857_ world crisis (abolition of the corn laws in 1846; gold deposits
in California and Australia in 1850 and 1851; the Crimean War in 1855.
After the _1848 revolutions_: [economic expansion in] France, Germany,
Sweden, Denmark, the United States. The crisis breaks out in America,
then [spreads to] England, France, Hamburg.

_1861–65_ the “cotton famine.”

In 1863 250,000 totally unemployed; 170,000 partly; only 122,000 fully
employed.

1867 enormous imports to England from the Orient (cotton). After the
American Civil War, an upturn.

_1873_ Second worldwide crisis: [involving] the United States, Germany,
Austria, England, Italy, Russia, Holland, Belgium, South America. _The
iron industry_.



PRACTICAL ECONOMICS: VOLUME 3 OF MARX’S _CAPITAL_


The content of Volume 3 of _Capital_ breaks down into two parts:

(1) The development of the rate of profit; and

(2) How it is divided up into different parts: entrepreneur’s profit;
commercial profit; interest on loan capital; and ground rent. Most
important and decisive is the development of the rate of profit. Once
again, this is specifically Marx’s scientific explanation of the profit
rate, and to this day it remains the only one.

Volume 3 is the most important and interesting [part of _Capital_] after
Volume 1.

It is written clearly in its theoretical aspect, and if we study it on
our own, it will not cause us any special difficulties. To be sure it
requires effort in order to follow the how the profit rate develops. But
it is not as difficult as the theory of value in Volume 1.

The third volume is especially important because after its publication,
great confusion arose. [In some circles] people had the impression that
the content of the third volume disproved teachings presented in the
first volume.¹ As a result there was uncertainty in the circles
indicated, which found expression in the allegation that Marx’s theory
did not have a solid footing despite the fact that in particular areas
it was capable of achieving a great deal.

And so, first of all, _development of the rate of profit_.

Everyone probably had the impression that the theory of value [in
general], not just Marx’s, is the cornerstone of economic life.

Marx’s [theory of value] is, however, distinct from all others. It makes
a distinction between two things:

(1) the hidden laws that operate invisibly behind the scenes in the
bourgeois economy; and

(2) the outward forms in which those laws reach the consciousness of
human beings.

The main thing is the great conversion of the objective laws of the
capitalist economy into pictoral representations [_Vorstellungen_]
[showing] how those laws prevail on the surface of that economy: i.e.,
the way in which the rate of profit is formed.

The value of a commodity is represented by the amount of socially
necessary labor embodied in it. How is that represented in capitalist
terms?

In a capitalist enterprise how does the value of a commodity arise?

The value of a commodity contains: constant capital[;] The value of
labor power: variable capital[;] surplus value.

_Those are the distinctions we Marxists make_.

Is this representation of value meaningful for the entrepreneur? No.
What sticks in his mind as value is what he can stick in his pocket,
what he has gained [in profit].

For the _capitalist a different way of dividing up the value of the
commodity_ is important, one different from the method of scientific
inquiry.

From the capitalist’s point of view we can break down the value of each
commodity into the _cost price of the commodity_, that is, into constant
and variable capital, [on the one hand,] and into _surplus value_ [on
the other]. That expresses the capitalist point of view. For the
capitalist, everything that he has laid out are on one sheet of paper,
and on the other, everything he has taken in as an increase [of his
capital].

Surplus value in this way has been separated from capital outlays,
because the capitalist has put all his outlays together [in one place],
and as a result surplus value is viewed in connection with cost price as
a whole.

_Surplus value, when viewed in connection with total cost price, appears
to him to be profit_.

What follows from this? That the capitalist has placed surplus value,
which he has also placed in his pocket, in a proportional relationship
with all the outlays he has made in the production of a commodity. _From
this it follows [in his view] that surplus value is a result of the
application of [his] capital, i.e., that it comes equally from all parts
of his capital_. Its [real] origin is [thus] veiled. Profit as a FRUIT
PRODUCED BY CAPITAL is the result of this conception.

What strengthens the capitalist in this conception? First, he has the
experience that he can never produce without means of production. Then
there is an additional appearance, that his outlays for wages are placed
in the same category with [outlays for] the various other means of
production.

Among the means of production are those from which only a small portion
goes into the commodity and those that enter into the commodity
entirely: that is, raw materials.

For the capitalist, all the costs of the means of production have now
been accounted for.

The capitalist probably makes a distinction between the expenditures
whose value goes completely into the product and the expenditures he has
made that last for a longer period of time. He distinguishes between
_fixed and circulating capital_, that is, between that which is
stationary and that which moves around.

_Raw materials belong to circulating capital, as do wages_.

_From the standpoint of this distinction, the [real] origin of surplus
value is obscured all the more_. The capitalist is reinforced in the
conception that the surplus value he obtains has no connection with any
_one_ part of his capital. He thinks it comes from the capital as a
whole.

_What happens when machines are introduced?_

Their application means that living labor is displaced. _The capitalist
shifts part of his variable capital over to constant capital. His
surplus value does not become smaller. To the contrary, at first it is
even larger_. At first he obtains an extra amount of surplus value.

This strengthens him in his conception _that profit comes from all the
various parts of capital_.

Profit [in the view of the capitalist] is that part of the commodity
that is obtained over and above the cost price. _Only after the sale of
the commodity does the capitalist see whether he has obtained a profit.
On the market what happens for him is that, depending on supply and
demand, he obtains a larger or smaller profit. From this he derives the
conception that the profit is the result of the circulation of the
commodity, because depending on the conditions of the market he obtains
a larger or smaller profit_.

_The average capitalist receives more profit, the more he succeeds in
reducing the cost price_. The capitalist makes savings if he succeeds
_in driving down the wages of the workers, but also if he buys raw
materials more cheaply_. Thus the more he can drive down the cost price,
the more profit he has. This strengthens him in his false conception.

It seems as though the profit of the capitalist is the result of the
_activity of the capitalist_.

_Capital appears here as a self-fructifying relationship_.

But this is more like the illusion of the capitalist’s thinking.

If I, for example, with a capital of 100 marks, 80 of which go into
constant capital and 20 of which go into variable capital, at the same
time obtain 20 marks [profit], _then it makes no difference, to begin
with, whether or not I imagine that I obtained them by means of the
entire capital or just the variable capital_.

_But there is indeed a difference if I express the profit as a
percentage_.

The rate of surplus value is never the same as the rate of profit. The
latter will always be smaller than the rate of surplus value.

This is also not true in reality, as we shall see.

_Examples:_

Let us imagine: 5 capitals. Each would amount to 100 marks. These 5
capitals break down in different ways into constant capital [c] and
variable capital [v].

1: 80 c + 20 v. Surplus value 100% The surplus value amounts to 20
marks. The value of the products comes to 120 marks, and the rate of
profit 20%.

_Tables:_

In the tables below, it is assumed that the _entire constant capital_
passes over into the new products. This is seldom or never the case [in
reality].

  -------------- -----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
  1st capital:   80c + 20v, with the rate of surplus value at 100%. Thus surplus value is 20 marks and the value of the products, 120 marks, but the rate of profit is only 20%.
  2d capital:    70c + 30v, the rate of surplus value 100%. Surplus value is 30 marks, the value of the products is 130 marks, and the rate of profit, 30%.
  3d capital:    60c + 40v, with the rate of surplus value 100 %. Thus surplus value is 40 marks, the value of the products is 140 marks, and the rate of profit, 40%.
  4th capital:   85c + 15v, with the rate of [s] 100%. Thus surplus value is 15 marks, the value of the products is 115 marks, and the profit rate 15%.
  5th capital:   95c + 5v, with the rate of surplus value 100%. Thus surplus value is 5 marks, the value of the products is 105 marks, and the profit rate 5%.
  -------------- -----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

The larger the constant capital and the smaller the variable capital,
the smaller the rate of surplus value and the rate of profit will be.

First, the size of the constant capital in the various steps
[represented by the 5 different capitals in the above tables] depends on
advances in technology in one and the same branch of production. Only
after that do other, _different_ branches of production come into
consideration.

There are in reality no two enterprises in which the distribution of
constant and variable capital is the same.

_From this it follows, however, that the various capitalists, depending
on which branch of production they invest their capital in and depending
on what the level of technology is in that branch of production (with
all other things being equal—that is, the degree of intensity of
exploitation, the rate of surplus value, etc.) the result comes out
differently, depending on the distribution of capital. The different
capitalists receive quite different rates of profit_.

_Even with completely equal rates of surplus value, quite different
rates of profit will result_.

For the capitalist the rate of surplus value does not exist at all—only
the rate of profit.

And so he encounters the following result: the more varied his capital
investments are, he finds himself in the peculiar situation of obtaining
quite different rates of profit.

But he derives his profit unalterably from the investment of capital.

These dissimilar, or uneven, profit rates would be an abnormality,
however, from the standpoint of the capitalist mode of production [as a
whole]. To understand how this situation is amended, let us imagine the
following:

The 5 different capitals [in the table] belong to one and the same
capitalist. What would happen to him when he saw the result [in the form
of these] disparate profit rates?

If, for example, a capitalist owns a rolling mill² and a coal-mining
operation, he would by no means get rid of the rolling mill just because
he doesn’t make as much profit from it as he does from the coal-mining
operation. Because he needs the rolling mill for his coal mining.

_And so the capitalist will view his 5 capitals as a single unit of
capital and will calculate an average profit from it_. He will then
observe whether this average profit is as high as that of his colleagues
and competitors.

_Thus the individual, private capitalist will calculate an average rate
of profit_. He will regard his separate units of capital as a single
whole, see them all together as a single whole, a collective quantity of
capital.

How does capitalist society as a whole act [in this regard]?

It acts exactly the same way, except that it does not calculate
everything as a collective owner, but it does view itself as equally
justified, like every individual capitalist does.

The capitalist will seek to withdraw his capital from the investment
that does not bring in as much profit. Other capitalists will do that
too. They put their capital into businesses that earn a higher profit.
This results in an inflow of capital to those businesses and an outflow
from the old businesses from which the capitalists are turning away, and
as a result there is a rise in the rate of profit.

A capital inflow results in an increase in production, and therefore a
larger market is needed. However, the market is not guided by the amount
of capital investment, and hence the capital inflow leads to a lowering
of prices.

What will happen in the areas from which there is a capital outflow? A
shrinking of production will result. Production will drop, and then
there will be an onset of increased demand [because these goods are now
in short supply]. Prices will climb, and [with that] the rate of profit
will rise.

How far will the rise and fall of the profit rate go on in the two
businesses? Until it reaches a middle level.

What helps decide this middle level?

Social demand, and social need. In either case it must be satisfied.

Must we assume that things will constantly go as follows: after prices
are driven down in the most profitable branches so that they [no longer]
earn abnormally high profits, will the capital flow go back into the old
businesses?

_In certain branches of production prices must constantly be higher than
their value, because otherwise the law of the equal rate of profit would
be cancelled out_.

_The law of the rate of profit or the law of value?_ That is the chief
difficulty to which the various critics of Marx take exception.
Certainly Smith and Ricardo were unable to solve this problem.

_Is it possible for commodities to be sold at their real value and for
everyone to indeed obtain an equal rate of profit?_ (After all, every
commodity requires a different labor input and therefore has a different
value.)

_To be sure, in every single, separate branch of production upward or
downward deviations occur_.

_But if we take all branches of production together, it turns out that
prices all come out in the same way, so that the law of value really
does hold true so that prices coincide with value_.

_The law of value holds true for the system of capitalist production as
a whole_.

_Is this a violation of the law of value_? Not at all. Those who take
that position obviously proceed from the following [mistaken] conception
of the law of value:

[They think it means that] _each individual commodity ought to be sold
at its value_. But can the law of value hold true for anything other
than the total amount of social labor?

How could one think, after absorbing the first volume of _Capital_, that
the law of value means that each individual commodity is exchanged in
accordance with the amount of labor that was necessary for its
production?

The concept of socially necessary labor is the result of the most varied
branches of production and individual enterprises conceived of as acting
in combination.

_It is as if society is an entirety that hangs together despite the
anarchy [of production]. The law of value is precisely what holds it
together_.

_The total amount of social labor is decisive in determining the prices
of the total number of commodities_.

_The law of the equal rate of profit is nothing other than the law of
value transformed capitalistically_.

_Postscript on the development of the rate of profit_.

The rate of surplus value is the relation of surplus value to variable
capital.

_The rate of profit is the relation of surplus value to total capital_.

Surplus value is the relation of unpaid labor to paid labor.

In the concept of profit the concept of unpaid labor disappears.

The rate of profit blurs over and obscures the source of surplus value.

The concept of _the rate of surplus value_ is the formulation of the
relation between capital and labor. The _rate of profit_ is the relation
of capital to itself. According to that conception, capital fructifies
itself and produces a surplus of its own accord.

_Is the transformation of the rate of surplus value into the rate of
profit something more than a mere illusion of the capitalists? Yes, it
is:_

From the concept of the rate of profit it follows as a law for the
capitalist mode of production that all capitals of the same size must
bring in the same profit.

What practical actions are linked to the various concepts? The
capitalists derive profit from the application of capital as a whole.
From this it follows that: If it is capital that produces profit, then
each individual quantity of capital of the same size must produce the
same profit. For [the concept of] surplus value this is incorrect,
because it [profit] comes from variable capital. Depending on the size
of the latter, the size of the surplus value will vary. The distribution
of capital into constant and variable differs depending on the branch of
production and the individual business operation. One branch of
production will use more dead means of production and less living labor,
while for another the opposite is true. That depends on the
technological composition of the business in question. The distribution
of capital into constant and variable is not exactly the same in one
business as in another.

_In practice the equal rate of profit for all [individual capitals]
holds true_. A capital of 100 marks, for example, will bring in as much
profit as another capital of 100 marks that is invested in another
branch of production and whose division into constant and variable
capital differs from the first.

This carrying through [of the equal rate of profit for all units of
capital] happens in the following way (see above): one quantity of
capital produces more profit in a business than the same amount of
capital in another business, and so the second quantity of capital will
flow away from the second business and turn its flow toward the first
business. And it is not only this one quantity of capital that will do
this, but all other capitals of the same size that are earning less
profit than the first. As a result, in the business to which the flow of
capital is turning, production will rise, and as a result supply will
again become greater than demand, and because of that, once again, many
goods will not be sold or will be sold at a lower price. In both cases
the rate of profit falls. Meanwhile in the second business, which has
experienced an outflow of capital, demand becomes greater than supply,
and as a result prices rise and the rate of profit becomes higher.

_As a result of this constant movement of capital an equal rate of
profit is obtained_.

This brings about the fact that in some particular branches of
production goods are sold regularly at prices below their value and in
others they are sold regularly above their value.

The average rate of profit for all capitals thus signifies that the
following phenomenon will occur:

_Some capitalists, in the rate of profit they obtain, receive less
surplus value than they have actually extorted_.

_Other capitalists receive more surplus value than they have actually
extorted_.

With each _individual_ capitalist and in each individual branch of
production there is thus a distortion of the real state of affairs,
which not only results in a different designation but also in a
different quantity.

_If one views the capitalist class as a whole and the working class as a
whole, the law of value applies exactly_.

Practice contradicts the theory of value, as long as we have our eyes
fixed on the _individual_ enterprise and the _individual_ branches of
production. But that is not so when we look at all enterprises as a
whole and the working class as a whole.

In practice vulgar economics seems to be right when it says that it
depends on the market prices how much surplus value one will receive,
not the number of workers [employed].

_In the law of the generally equal rate of profit, we find the
formulation, or expression, of the class solidarity of the employers as
opposed to the workers_.

Joint stock companies have created the possibility for capital to flow
back and forth with insane speed. On the stock exchange everything can
change in a few hours. The quicker that happens, the more rapidly the
rate of profit evens out.

The development of the credit system also contributes to the rapid
evening out of the rate of profit.

  ---------------- ------------------------ ----------------- ------------------ ------------- ------------------------ --------------
     _Capitals_     _Rate ofsurplus-value_   _Surplus-value_   _Rate of profit_   _Used up_ c   _Value of commodities_   _Cost price_
    I. 80c + 20v             100%                  20                20%              50                  90                  70
   II. 70C + 30v             100%                  30                30%              51                 111                  81
   III. 60c + 40v            100%                  40                40%              31                 131                  91
   IV. 85c + 15v             100%                  15                15%              40                  70                  33
    V. 95c + 5v              100%                   5                 5%              10                  20                  15
    390c + 110v               —                    110               110%              —                  —                 — Total
     78c + 22v                —                    22                22%               —                  —                — Average
  ---------------- ------------------------ ----------------- ------------------ ------------- ------------------------ --------------

  ---------------- ----------------- ------------------------ ----------------------------- ------------------------ ------------------ ----------------------------------
     _Capitals_     _Surplus-value_   _Value of commodities_   _Cost-price of commodities_   _Price of commodities_   _Rate of profit_   _Divergence of price from value_
    I. 80c + 20v          20                    90                         70                          92                   22%                         +2
   II. 70c + 30v          30                   111                         81                         103                   22%                         –8
   III. 60c + 40v         40                   131                         91                         113                   22%                        –18
   IV. 85c + 15v          15                    70                         55                          77                   22%                         +7
    V. 95c + 5v            5                    20                         15                          37                   22%                        +17
  ---------------- ----------------- ------------------------ ----------------------------- ------------------------ ------------------ ----------------------------------

From Volume 3 of _Capital_ by Marx, this page, to the end of this page,
this page, this page.³

Does what we have said about socially necessary labor still remain valid
or not?

The raw materials that pass over completely into a commodity cost as
much as the socially necessary labor put into them. This is expressed in
the form of money.

Thus, if the capitalist calculates that he paid so-and-so much for raw
materials, for tools, and so on, he is only totalling up the social
labor that was necessary to produce those things.

The new value that has been put into the product is always larger than
wages. That will also be true in a socialist society. Every human being
can create more [_MS. Missing words_]

Then comes the new value—the human labor that has entered into the
product. The new value that has been put into the product is always
higher than wages. That will also remain true in socialist society. Most
human beings are capable of creating more than is necessary to maintain
them.

So the capitalist calculates in addition to his expenditures for raw
materials, and so on. [He says to himself:] “I have spent so-and-so much
on wages.” In so doing, he is adding a calculation for a part of the
surplus value that has been created.

If he now finishes his calculations and gives an expression to the
commodity in the form of its price, would he have summed up the real
value of the commodity?

No, because an additional portion of human labor has been put into the
commodity that was not paid for.

In order to express the real value of the commodity, the capitalist must
add to his calculation all the unpaid labor as well, even though he did
not spend anything for it.

How does he express this part? What point of departure does he have for
doing that?

For this [part] there does not exist any subjective experience [on the
part of the capitalist]. It is only from common sense that he has any
concept of this. He knows: in his branch of production, one gets a
return of 10 percent or 20 percent on what one lays out. He says to
himself, “If I did not fight for that percentage, I would be a fool.”

_But we know that he is merely adding to his calculations the part of
the labor that was not paid for. The value of the commodity now
represents socially necessary labor_.

What does this average profit have to do with the size of the unpaid
labor which has been put into the commodity and which still needs to be
taken into account? Does it correspond to the part of the unpaid labor
that is still stuck inside the commodity?

Does profit match up with the sum total of unpaid labor?

Not in all cases. Only in those where by chance the rate of profit an
individual receives happens to agree with the average rate of profit.

_For every individual business the profit will not correspond, but for
all commodities taken together it will. If we calculate all commodities
together, what is calculated as profit will coincide with the part of
socially necessary labor that is unpaid_.

This fact is confirmed even if we take into account the fluctuations in
prices in a given branch of production.

One question that especially interests us is this: How do wages affect
the way prices of commodities may move?

What impact does the movement of wages have on the value and price of
commodities?

If food becomes cheaper, wages drop: the employers is then in a position
to put more surplus value into his pocket.

That is, the movement of wages affects only the rate of surplus value.
That rate changes, or moves, in an opposite way in relation to wages. It
rises when wages fall and falls when wages rise.

_According to the theory of value, the level of wages does not affect
the value of commodities at all_.

The capitalist knows what his capital outlays are, and he knows the
profit that he is entitled to fight for. Of surplus value he knows
absolutely nothing.

Let us assume that we have a branch of production in front of us in
which the combination of constant and variable capital coincides with
the average [rate of profit].

_The average rate of profit would be as follows:_

  ----- ----- ------------------------- --------------- ----------------------
   _C_   _V_   _Rate of Surplus Value_   _Profit Rate_   _Price of Commodity_
   80    20              100                  20                 120
  ----- ----- ------------------------- --------------- ----------------------

Wages rise 25 percent, and the rate of surplus value drops to 75
percent. The rate of profit will now come to 15 percent instead of 20
percent. The composition of the price [of production is now]: 80c, 25v,
and 15 for the rate of profit. Thus it amounts to 120, as before.

  ----- ----- ------------------------- --------------- ----------------------
   _C_   _V_   _Rate of Surplus Value_   _Profit Rate_   _Price of Commodity_
   92     8              100                  20                 120
  ----- ----- ------------------------- --------------- ----------------------

[Let there be] an increase in wages of 25 percent. The variable capital
would now amount to 10 instead of 8. The cost price would now be 102.
Add to that 14 [],⁴ and the price of the commodity will amount to 116
[]. Thus prices have been influenced by the level of wages. A lowering
of the prices has been the outcome.

  ----- ----- --------------------- ---------------
   _C_   _V_   _Increase in Wages_   _Profit Rate_
   50    50            25%                20%
  ----- ----- --------------------- ---------------

The cost price [now amounts to] 112 and ½, [and the rate of profit is]
16 ⅞ percent. When added up, the price of the commodities would come to
129 ⅜. And so [in this case too] prices have risen.

In those branches of production where outlays for wages are higher than
the outlays for constant capital, the prices of commodities rise. But in
those branches where the outlays for variable capital are lower than the
outlays for constant capital, prices fall.

The lowering of prices [in one part of the economy] is counteracted by
the raising of prices [in another].

For the totality of all branches of production the rise in prices in one
case and the fall in prices in another compensate for one another, and
as a whole the outcome will be what theory has shown us. Marx:
_Capital_, Volume 3, this page, Part I.⁵

If the capitalists say to us in each particular case: Every rise in
wages must invariably have the consequence that prices will rise, that
would be wrong in that general form. In one case the price rises, but in
another it does not. In the one case prices went higher, but in the
other they fell.

_For capital as a whole there is only one consequence: if wages rise,
profits will be smaller_.

  ----- ----- --------------- ---------
   _C_   _V_   _Profit Rate_   _Price_
   50    50         20%          120
  ----- ----- --------------- ---------

Wages rise by 25 percent.

Now:

  ---- -------- ---------------
  C    _V_      _Profit Rate_
  50   _62_ ½   14 []%
  ---- -------- ---------------

Added all together, this comes to 16½ percent, and the price of the
commodities will be 128 []. Thus, the price of the commodities have
increased. But not as much as the wages, 25 percent, but only by 6½
percent. Wages have here increased by 25 percent, the prices from 120 to
128 [], that is, by 6½ percent.

This is proof that the capitalists do not have to increase prices to the
exact same extent as the rise in wages. Here the rise in wages was 25
percent, but the increase in prices was only 6½ percent. [This shows]
that after all wages are only part of capital.⁶

  ----- -----
  _C_   _V_
  92    8
  ----- -----

A wage increase of 25 percent. The cost price, 92 plus 10, would come to
102. On top of that we add a profit rate of 14 [] percent, which gives a
price of production amounting to 116 [].

That is, the price of production has fallen 3 percent. Wages went up 25
percent, and prices fell 3 percent.

The rate of profit has taken away approximately as much as corresponds
to the average variable capital, but here the variable capital is
smaller than the constant capital.

These are the results if there is an _overall_ rise in wages or if a
general falling-off of wages occurs. Only a general rise or fall can
have a standardizing, or regulating, effect on the average rate of
profit.

How do things stand if the workers have imposed a wage increase in a
particular branch of production? The employer says he will now have to
raise prices by such-and-such an amount. Can he really do that? No,
[because] for him the average rate of profit is the determining factor
as a rule. In order to charge for the wage increase, he would have to
push prices way up. The consequence would be that he would price himself
out of the market. And the result of that would be that, in order to
stick with the old prices, he would have to pocket a smaller profit.

That is the outcome, just as the theory of value has shown. _An increase
in wages brings with it a reduction in profit_.

_For society as a whole, what we have learned from the law of value
holds true completely_.

_Let us assume for a moment a case where along with a rise in wages
prices also rise_. We are taking only _one_ branch of production.

  ----- ----- --------------------------
  _C_   _V_   _Average rate of profit_
  92    8     20
  ----- ----- --------------------------

Wages rise by 25 percent. In this case the average rate of profit is 14
[] percent.

Now the capital outlays are 102. To that we add the old rate of profit:
20. The result is that the prices of the commodities are 122. Prices
have risen exactly as much as wages.

Can this branch of production deal with wages in such a way that it
grabs approximately 6 percent more in prices? No, the average rate of
profit comes into play. If that did not happen, there would be an
immediate inflow of capital into this branch until the rate of profit
dropped back down to the average.

[Let us consider another case:]

  ----- ----- --------------------------
  _C_   _V_   _Average rate of profit_
  50    50    20
  ----- ----- --------------------------

An increase in wages of 25 percent. As a result the average rate of
profit drops. Capital outlays, taken altogether, are now 112 ½. If the
_old_ rate of profit were added to that, it would give 132 ½.

[But] if the old profit rate really was added, again an inflow of
capital would take place until the average rate of profit was again
established.

The movement of prices does not happen at the will of the capitalists.
In setting prices they have to stick with those that correspond by and
large to the value of all commodities.

Average:

  ----- ----- --------------------------
  _C_   _V_   _Average rate of profit_
  80    20    20
  ----- ----- --------------------------

Wages have increased by 25 percent. And so capital outlays of 80 plus 25
= 105.

We assume that profit will be calculated at the old rate, and this gives
125 for commodity prices.

[But what] for example, if this should happen in all of Germany? The
consequence would be that it would be hit hard on the world market.
Because other countries would not accept this price increase, Germany
would have to back down. Or else we would experience this phenomenon: To
the extent that the German producer found it possible to pursue a dual
policy, he would do the following: Inside the country he would charge
extra high prices, but on the world market his prices would be as low as
possible. That corresponds to the actual policies of the cartels.

  ----- -----
  _C_   _V_
  60    40
  70    30
  80    20
  85    15
  95    5
  ----- -----

This table above shows an increase in constant capital and a decline in
variable capital. This corresponds to the reality. With the increasing
productivity [of labor] constant capital rises at the expense of
variable capital.

This succession [the series of numbers, in the table above] is the
_capitalist_ expression of the growing productivity of labor.

In general the productivity of labor expresses itself in the fact that
less human labor is necessary to produce something. This is expressed in
capitalist terms in the fact that constant capital rises at the expense
of variable capital.

That is how we arrive at the historical succession showing the
development of capital.

The average rate of profit is the [same as] total surplus value, [that
is,] as a total amount that is thrown together and then divided up among
capitals of equal size.

What movement of the rate of profit is to be expected with the
progressive development of capitalist production? Does it indeed proceed
in the order of succession shown in the table above?

With the development of capitalist production variable capital becomes
smaller and smaller. Surplus value is calculated on the basis of an
ever-increasing amount of capital. If productivity rises, surplus value
also must rise. But then the increasing productivity of labor results in
a decline in the cost of maintaining the existence of the workers.

_Variable capital increases absolutely. It declines only relatively to
constant capital_. The total number of workers increases. For that
reason alone the total amount of surplus value must grow.

_With regard to the rate of surplus value_: the productivity of labor
rises as the number of employed workers increases, because technology is
also advancing. The rate of surplus value, that is, the relation between
surplus value and variable capital, is bound to increase. _At the same
time it turns out that the rate of profit falls_.

Here it becomes evident that the rate of profit is nothing other than a
misleading and indeed falsifying way of calculating surplus value.

The general law of the fall in the rate of profit was already known to
the classical authors of bourgeois political economy. They could not
explain it because they had not calculated surplus value correctly.

_Calculated as a percentage, the rate of profit declines_.

From this the capitalists draw the conclusion that they will constantly
obtain less profit.

But this is [also] true: The rate of surplus value constantly rises.

The first explanation of this phenomenon, so filled with contradictions,
was given by Marx. [See] _Capital_, Vol. 3, Part 1, this page [of the
first German edition].⁷

_All roads in political economy lead to the law of value_.

_It is the cornerstone of_ [Marxist] _political economy. If this [the
law of value] is left out, nothing remains of Marx’s doctrine_.

By this one can measure the worth of [Eduard] Bernstein’s statement in
his _Prerequisites of Socialism_ to the effect that Marx’s doctrine
would be very good if only the law of value wasn’t so bad.⁸

[See Volume 3 of _Capital_ by Marx, Part I,] this page.⁹ From this
passage it follows that Marx assumed the number of capitalists would
grow in absolute terms even if capital was being concentrated more
quickly. [See] this page, this page until the end of the chapter. [See]
this page ff.¹⁰

The growing productivity of labor, on the other hand, has the
consequence of _a constant devaluation of capital_. That is, machines
are made obsolete by new ones and then have to be reappraised as though
they were cheaper.

That is an aspect that tends to stop the falling rate of profit, that
is, slows it down.

_(Final Section)_¹¹

Is it not strange that someone invests his capital and gets back only
part of the profit, instead of supplying all of the capital himself and
obtaining the entire profit?

Answer: First, if someone lends his capital, it is guaranteed that he
will receive a specified [rate of] interest. But if he invests it
himself, he does not know whether [or not] he will receive surplus
value, or how much surplus value he will receive.

Second, smaller capitals are completely insufficient for making [big]
profits. The basis for that becomes constantly larger.

Third, small amounts of capital have the possibility, through the system
of interest payments, of becoming profitable. By themselves they were to
small to make a profit.

According to what laws is the level of interest determined?

Is interest determined according to some laws based in the production
process, for example, the rate of wages, or is it there no definite
determining factor?

For relations, or conditions, within the realm of production it makes
absolutely no difference whether the capital is one’s own or someone
else’s. It is thus a private matter between the two people to whom the
given amounts of capital belong. But of course it is not an entirely
arbitrary matter.

The demand for capital at any given time and the [available] supply of
loan capital determine the level of interest.

What course of motion does interest take from the very outset?

The colossal piling up of capital is what constantly expands the supply
on the capital market. That is why the rate of interest is bound to
fall. Mark my words: [we are talking about] interest on loans to
capitalists.

_Ground Rent Theory_

Until now we have had two major theoreticians who have expanded [the
theory of] ground rent: (1) Ricardo, who was the dominant figure up
until Marx; (2) Rodbertus.

What Marx gives us goes beyond them both.

Ricardo knew only differential ground rent. Rodbertus knew only absolute
ground rent.¹²

Marx was the first to distinguish two types of ground rent: (1) absolute
ground rent; and (2) differential ground rent.

_Conditions in England:_

How high must the profit be that a quantity of capital seeks to obtain
in agriculture? For example, a tenant farmer.

The profit must be at least as high as the average rate of profit. But
in addition, it must also include the ground rent due to the capitalist.

The price of the products from the land must be high enough that, over
and above profit, the ground rent can also be paid.

In reality there are also a large number of possibilities that allow,
sometimes temporarily, sometimes [_MS. Incomplete_]

_Differential Ground Rent_. This results from the differences in
fertility of the various pieces of land that are put to agricultural use
by various private landowners. The level of the prices for food is so
great in agriculture that a certain [amount of] rent must be deducted
from it.

Differential ground rent provides extra income for the class of
landowners who happen to possess the worst land.

This differential ground rent is naturally subject to a certain amount
of fluctuation. If an entirely new [quantity of] land suddenly appears
on the world market, so that an entire large quantity of products at a
quite insignificant price are thrown [onto it.]

The costs of production are governed at any given time by the poorest
type of land. Prices on the world market have fallen.

In the 1880s we experienced a drop in food prices, but on the other
hand, since then, food prices have constantly risen. And if we look more
closely, we have to say: This is based on the general trend of
capitalist society. We will have to expect, unfortunately, that things
will be no different [in the future], that prices will continue to rise.
The capitalists will hold the line on wages and will want to push them
down. That is important for the union movement. From this standpoint,
our prospects are not at all rosy. But as realistic politicians, we have
to take this into account.¹³



HISTORY OF POLITICAL ECONOMY


There is no decent book on political economy. Only a good Marxist could
write a history of political economy.

The fundamental aspects are in Marx’s _Theories of Surplus Value_. But
[to read] that is very heavy going, except for the first part.

The least demanding small book that I can recommend to you as a
reference work [is]: [John Kells] _Ingram, History of_ [_Political
Economy_]. A very superficial presentation, but useful as a reference
work.¹

_By and large, we can distinguish the following schools of political
economy_.

The oldest are the _mercantilists_. The mercantile system had already
developed in the sixteenth century, with the [growing] money economy in
the cities, and absolutism’s great need for money. The first issue they
dealt with was: “Wealth equals gold.” Hence [they wrote] inquiries into
the question of money.

The very titles of [the first mercantilist] writings are indicative:
[Gaspero] _Scaruffi_, “_About Money_,” written in 1582.² The second is:
[Bernardo] _Davanzati, “Lectures on Money,”_ 1588.³

Then an interesting work: _Antonio Serra, “Brief Treatise Concerning the
Basis on Which States Possessing No Mines Can Obtain Gold and Silver,”_
written in 1613. This book title is typical of the mercantilists.⁴

The primary thought content of the [mercantilists’] school is: “wealth
equals gold.” Their main concern: “How to bring gold into a country?”
The balance of trade [was the answer]: to trade so that more was
imported than exported. To pay premiums for exports and to embargo
imports or impose tariffs on them.

Anyway, the [key question for the mercantilists [was]: the question of
[foreign] trade.

The most important English mercantilists are:

_Thomas Mun, A Discourse of Trade from England unto the East Indies_,
1621.⁵

[Josiah] _Child_, “_On Trade and Interest on Money_,” 1668.⁶

[William] _Temple, Observations upon the United Provinces of the
Netherlands_, 1672.⁷

(At that time the Netherlands had come up in the world,⁸ and was
England’s biggest competitor.)

All the economists of Germany in the seventeenth and eighteenth
centuries were mercantilists. But not outstanding, just parroters of the
Italians.

The _physiocrats_ were the second school. Marx dates the history of
political economy from them. France is the place of their birth. They
stand in sharp opposition to the mercantilists. They explain: What is
wealth? Land and the soil, nature and labor. [They hold that] only
agriculture is productive. Why? Because here labor provides more in
quantity of output than labor itself costs. In contrast, trade and
industry are unproductive.

At first glance this seems to be a feudal theory. In outward appearance,
a purely reactionary school.

However, they draw the following conclusion: Since agriculture is the
only productive branch of the economy, it is therefore fair and just
that all taxes be applied to agriculture and that industry and trade be
left entirely free from taxation.

In the first part of _Theories of Surplus Value_, Marx wrote very
beautifully on this subject.⁹ Until then one could not tell whether this
theory [of the physiocrats] was reactionary or revolutionary. Marx
showed that with this theory the bourgeoisie made its appearance, though
still under the wing of feudalism.

They [the physiocrats] demanded personal freedom and equality for the
people working on the land, so that this branch of the economy could
develop sufficiently for it to bear all the burdens placed upon it.
Therefore a fight against feudal burdens. And thus it was a highly
revolutionary school of thought.

The main founders of this school were:

[First, Pierre Le Pesant de] Boisguilbert: 1. _“Treatise on Grain and
the_ _Grain Trade.”_¹⁰ 2. “_On the Nature of Wealth, Money, and
Taxes_”¹¹ He died in 1714.

Second was the official founder of this school, _Fr[ancois] Quesnay,
personal physician of the king_ [_Louis XV_]. He [Quesnay] lived from
1694 to 1774. His chief work is his famous _Tableau Économique_.¹² In it
he portrayed the society as a whole. The book had as its motto: “Poor
farmers, poor kingdom; poor kingdom, poor king.”

Third: [Anne-Robert-Jacques] _Turgot_, finance minister under Louis XVI.
His main activity was to carry out reforms and take measures that were
in the spirit of this school. His chief written work was “_Reflections
on the Formation and Distribution of Wealth_.”¹³

This school had a colossal influence on thinking people. Above all, it
had a retroactive effect in relation to Italy.

The names of the most prominent Italian physiocrats, who all lived in
the eighteenth century [are]: [Antonio] Genovesi, [Pietro] Verri,
[Giovanni Rinaldo] Carli, [Cesare] Becarria (author of a brilliant book
against the death penalty).¹⁴

The German physiocrats, who lacked all significance, [included]: _Karl_

_Friedrich Margrave of Baden_.¹⁵ He wrote his book in French, so that
Germans would not be able to learn the principles he advocated.


THE CLASSICAL SCHOOL

[Among the French authors in] the classical school Marx counts the
physiocrats, from [_MS. Illegible_]¹⁶ to [Jean Charles Léonard de]
Sismondi.¹⁷

[Englishmen of this school were:]

_[David] Ricardo_: 1772–1823.

His main work was:¹⁸ His most famous pupils were John Stuart Mill and
the latter’s father, James Mill.

_Adam Smith_, 1723–90. His main work, about the “wealth of nations,”
appeared in 1776.¹⁹

Among Smith’s followers in Germany, only two became more or less well
known, although they were entirely lacking in independent significance
and merely parroted Smith:

Prof. [Karl Heinrich] _Rau_ and Prof. [Heinrich von] _Storch_.²⁰ The
latter lived in St. Petersburg [in Russia], although he was a German.

Thus it may be said that until then Germany did not exist as far as
political economy is concerned.

The only [German economic school] is the so-called _historical school_.
Its founder is Professor [Wilhelm Georg Friedrich] _Roscher_, but
Professor[s] [Bruno] _Hildebrand_ and [Karl] _Knies_ [were] together
with him.

From the historical school, [German] _Kathedersozialismus_²¹ developed.
It was founded in 1872 at Eisenach.

This school wants to gloss over class conflicts entirely.

Its main representatives are: [Albert] _Schäffle, [Adolph] Wagner,
[Gustav von] Schönberg_, all of them professors.

_Kathedersozialismus_ has long since passed away, having been absorbed
into the camp of the employers.

One of these professors even voted for the anti-socialist laws.


FURTHER READING (AN INCOMPLETE LIST)

Volume 2 of Marx’s _Capital_.

Volume Five of the _Handwörterbuch für Staatswissenschaften;_ the essay
on crises by Prof. [Heinrich] Herkner of Zurich.²²

Volume 3 of Marx’s _Capital_.

Parvus [Alexander Helphand], _Aufschwung und Gewerkschaften_, published
in Dresden.²³

[Max] Schippel, _Hochkonjunktur und Wirtschaftskrise_.²⁴



APPENDIX: THEORY OF THE WAGES FUND


(1) Content of the Wages Fund Theory. How it is usually linked with
population theory.¹

(2) Dissemination of the Theory. Adam Smith—[Jeremy] Bentham²
([Jean-Baptiste] Say).³

(3) Its Historical Justification (small-scale producers, the Middle
Ages)

(4) Its True Social Roots (the fate of workers being dependent on
capital)

(5) (a) The Iron Law of Wages of [David] Ricardo–[Ferdinand] Lassalle⁴

(b) Bentham

(6) Critique of the Theory of the Wages Fund

(a) [William] Thompson⁵

(b) [Friedrich Benedict Wilhelm] Hermann⁶

(c) [Johann Karl] Rodbertus⁷

(d) [William Thomas] Thornton⁸

(e) [Jean Charles Léonard de] Sismondi⁹

(f) Professor [Julius] Wolf¹⁰

(7) Critique of These Critiques

(a) Individually

(b) In General: They cannot be refuted by abstracting from currently
existing institutions. The opposite is true.

(8) Marx on the wages fund theory.¹¹ Marx on the “Iron Law of Wages.”¹²

(9) Prof. [Julius] Wolf’s criticism in regard to Marx.

(10) Reply [to his criticism].

One can say that up to now economic science has put forward only two
theories of wage labor: the theory of the wages fund and the theory of
the industrial reserve army,¹³ the first a product of bourgeois
economics and the latter, of socialist economics. Obviously it should
not be said therefore that all economics theoreticians without exception
have sworn by one or the other of these theories. There have also been
writers who took a very critical attitude toward the wages fund theory
without at the same time showing any awareness of the industrial reserve
army theory, which of course had not yet been put forward.¹⁴ In the most
recent period on the other hand a [new] theory has been advanced which
subjects both of the above-named theories to thorough criticism and
regards both of them as mistaken—we have in mind the theory of Professor
Julius Wolf, which quite recently has been adopted and reiterated by
some German economists, such as [Adolph von] Wenckstern.¹⁵ However, if
we leave aside these products of the most recent times—which we will go
into in more detail further below—we find, during the entire lengthy
period from the beginning of classical political economy to our own
times, only the two above-named theories about the wages paid for
labor—the wages fund theory and that of Marx.

As early as Adam Smith we find the wages fund doctrine stated clearly
and explicitly. In his [_Wealth of Nations_,] Book 1, Chapter 8, “On
Wages,” he comments approximately as follows: The natural wage is the
product of the amount of labor expended. However, this wage is paid only
in primitive social conditions. With the accumulation of private
capital, wages are determined by a struggle between capital and labor.
The result of this struggle depends as a rule on the relation between
supply and demand for labor. By “demand for labor” Smith understands the
[size of the] _capital fund_ at any given moment. In Adam Smith we also
find the inseparable addition to the hypothesis of the “wages
fund”—population theory: the labor supply, says Smith, depends in turn
on the frequency of births [i.e., the birth rate] among working people
at any given time—but this in turn is precisely geared at every moment
to capital’s demand [for labor]. (Unless we are mistaken, Smith used
that very word—“precisely.”)¹⁶

The same propositions are put forward by David Ricardo, the last
classical author of the bourgeois school of political economy, in
another connection—namely, in his theory of ground rent. In the
chapter¹⁷ where he deals with wages _ex officio_ we read only that
wages—like the prices of all other commodities—are determined according
to relative supply and demand. But what Ricardo means by this he tells
us in a different place—in his ingenious explanations about ground rent.
Here the theory of the wages fund serves him naturally as a logical link
for constructing a connection between rent and the movement of capital.
Rent, he tells us, rises with the growth of capital. How so? Through the
intervention of the working class. Capital consists at any given time of
a _wages fund of a determinate size_. With the growth of capital or,
which amounts to the same thing, with the growth of the demand for
labor, _the number of workers increases_ (through natural increase!),
but with that the demand for the means of subsistence also grows, above
all for the products of agriculture. The growing demand increases the
price of these products, and as a direct consequence ground rent
increases.

Both above and below when we refer to statements by the theoreticians we
are discussing, going by memory, we are not in the least disregarding
the demand for exactness in _one’s mode of expression_. Turns of phrase
such as “he said,” serve merely to distance ourselves from unpleasant
association.¹⁸

Thus we find in Ricardo as well [as in Smith] the same linking of the
wages fund theory with population theory, or to put it more exactly, the
same mediation of the wages fund theory by the population theory: the
latter is the medium through which the domination of the wages fund over
wages themselves is made a reality.

It would take us too far afield if we were to follow in the same detail
the course of thought among the other adherents of the wages fund
theory. This would also be superfluous because the theory was neither
carried further nor even modified by the other representatives of
classical political economy. Among them we encounter the same
formulations as were once given by Adam Smith and David Ricardo, with
almost the exact form of expression, and this is true of both the
epigones of classical political economy and the founders of vulgar
economics: James Mill (_Defence of Commerce_, 1808), J.B. Say (_Traité
de l’Economie politique_, 1803), [Antoine Comte de] Destutt de Tracy
(_Traité de la volonté et de ses effets_, 1821), John Stuart Mill
(_Principles of Political Economy_, 1856), [and] [Henry] Fawcett (_The
Economic Position of the British Laborer_, 1865),¹⁹ and finally this
applies as well to “old man” [Karl Heinrich] Rau, and [John Ramsey]
MacCulloch, and all the others.²⁰

In economics as in all social sciences [_MS. Missing word(s)_] two kinds
of criticism are possible: (1) One may criticize the content of a given
theory _in and of itself_, to reveal its inconsistency, its logical
insufficiency; (2) One may, on the other hand, also deal with the object
of criticism in its historical connection to the social realities of its
time, the basis on which the criticized theory first arose. Here the
objective material basis of the theory must be revealed, and the latter
must be viewed not in and of itself, not on a logical-theoretical basis,
but from a material-historical standpoint. The first critical method
passes judgment absolutely, like the members of a jury: either “guilty”
or “not guilty” (or more exactly, either “true” or “false”). The second
method takes into account the relativity of truth, that is to say, that
truth is conditioned by the times. It does not condemn the theory in
question, but only shows that the theory eventually became outdated. We
believe that there is no effective refutation other than the one that
demonstrates the social context in which a doctrine [at one time]
represented “reason,” [a refutation] that makes it possible to follow
the [emergence of a] changed social context in which the doctrine has
becomes “meaningless.” Obviously this method cannot be applied in all
cases: that which, in the case of Adam Smith or David Ricardo at the
turn of the century [between the 18th and 19th centuries] was a
historically determined error is in the case of [Lujo] Brentano at the
end of the [19th] century merely apologetics, and although perhaps in
both cases “material relations” are to blame for the theory, that is
true in two entirely different senses …

Before we criticize the wages fund doctrine from a theoretical
standpoint, we want to examine it briefly from a historical one.

So what, in short, do we have to say about the theory?

There is at any point in time a quantitatively specific amount of
capital that represents the demand for hired hands. As a result, in
relation to this capital there arises a larger or smaller number of
hands for hire [to be paid with] a larger or smaller amount in wages. It
is obvious that, if this theory is to have some justification, _a
single_ basic determining element in [the existing] social relations is
necessary: [i.e.,] a certain degree of stability in the conditions of
production, so that, first of all, [there would be] a technically given
relation between a specific amount of capital and the number of workers
employed by it; and secondly, that because of market conditions a
definite relation could be observed as a _constant factor_ between the
time required for production and exchange and the time required for the
reproduction of human beings. Both of these are conditions that our
present-day capitalist economy would look down on with a supercilious
smile. They would appear to it as something like “a fairy tale from days
of yore.” First of all, depending on the level of productive technology
and exploitation (length and intensity of the working day in connection
with the wage form), at any moment one and the same quantity of capital
can harness the labor power of a highly variable number of workers; not
only that, but this relationship is altered at every moment by advances
in technology, so that both in time and space the concept of a constant
[fixed] proportion (a coefficient) between capital and labor can only be
a fiction. Secondly, the time spans required for modern production no
longer correspond in any way with the amounts of time necessary for
human reproduction. During the last twenty-five years, speaking
approximately, the modern production cycle takes up not even half of
that time.²¹ If we take into account only the biggest economic crises in
our century, we see the following: 1825, 1836, 1847, 1857, and finally
1867.²² Thus, almost exactly in ten-year intervals, there has been an
economic cataclysm, and after each one a convulsive contraction of
capital, then a gradual expansion, followed by a sudden unrestrained
boom until once again the wings of capital are clipped by the next
crisis. Given the short and—as we will show—constantly shorter length of
the production cycle, given this tendency of capital toward sudden
contractions and expansions, [the notion] that the size of the
population can be regulated by the amount of available capital in
relation to the natural amount of time necessary for the propagation of
a new generation of workers once again becomes nothing but a fiction.
Obviously one can say that capital reigns over the death of the worker,
but not that it is a dominant influence in the number of workers who are
born. It is well known that three or four days of not eating (that is,
of joblessness) are enough to cause death; but to give birth to and
raise a human being requires many long years.

All this was quite different in Ricardo’s time and even more so in that
of Adam Smith. Machinery was just beginning to revolutionize the
relations of production, and generalized economic crises were still in
the offing. To be sure, Ricardo experienced the first significant
economic crisis in England, which followed after the establishment of
Napoleon’s continental system. However, in that case the capitalist hoof
was concealed behind historical “accident,” and it was easy to conceive
of this crisis as a quite specific consequence of the machinations of
“that fiend Napoleon.” In general the predominant mode of
production—manufacture—was still based on manual labor, trade relations
were still dominated almost exclusively by England, and hence were
fairly stable and easy to observe, the time periods necessary for
production were relatively lengthy and slow, and the technical
proportionality between capital and labor power was up to [a point] a
given.²³ Here lies the relative justification for the classical theory
of the wages fund, but here at the same time lies [the basis for] its
condemnation by history. Gone are the lovely days of peaceful,
phlegmatic, seemingly patriarchal capital. Today [it is] nervous,
constantly stirred up, at one moment “storming the heavens,” at the next
“in the depths of depression”; today one can calculate neither how much
labor power capitalism will need at the next moment nor even the number
of workers to be supplied. With capital on its wild chase the workers,
waiting upon its command, have time enough only to die, but not to be
born. And it is well to note that the time when the wages fund theory
had its relative justification was extremely short. Before Ricardo’s
very eyes the mighty process of industrial transformation in England
took place. The second edition of Ricardo’s main work already contains a
section about machinery (and this is already characteristic), a section
in which he himself refutes his “theory of compensation,” and thus
indirectly and unconsciously throws out the very proposition he himself
put forward about the wages fund.²⁴ And if today, in the age of [the
monopoly capitalists] Krupp and [Carl Ferdinand] Stumm,²⁵ German
economists put the old theory of the wages fund back on the table and
seek to cover up the modern phenomena of capitalism with shreds and
tatters from the old classical theory, it is the kind of work that Heine
knew only too well.

They plug up the holes in the universe

With bits of old dressing-gown and nightcap.²⁶

Incidentally the old theory of the wages fund served not only for
plugging the holes in the capitalist universe. In it there also lay a
real kernel [of truth], independent of its specifically historical
justification: it was the first general theoretical formulation of the
social dependency of the working class on capital. But now it became
possible for two different kinds of conclusions to be drawn from this.
In the hands of _Lassalle_ the wages fund theory became a revolutionary
lever for the emancipation struggle of the working class. Jeremy
Bentham, father of utilitarianism, knew how to “utilize” this theory in
a different way: from it he concocted a dogma, which entirely removed
any social responsibility from the capitalist and against which all the
demands of the working class were intended to bounce off as though from
a suit of armor.

Ricardo’s work, containing the clearest and most decisive formulation of
the wages fund theory, appeared in 1817. As early as seven years later
it ran into criticism. _William Thompson_, in his _Inquiry into the
Principles of the Distribution of Wealth_ (1824), pointed out that this
theory was thoroughly one-sided, that it only took into account the
quantity of accumulated capital, but that the productive forces of the
nation (potentially) at any moment and even the yearly consumption by
the nation at any moment were illimitably greater than this.²⁷ It is
obvious that a comment like this, even if it is quite correct in and of
itself, could not touch a hair on the head of the theory being
criticized, because in any discussion of wages it is not the existing
wealth of the world, past or future, which comes under consideration,
but unfortunately the portion of that wealth which at any given time the
worker encounters in the form of capital. Between the overall wealth of
the productive forces of the society and the working class stands
precisely the individual capitalist with his demand [for labor]; and
here we run into a wall. Thompson’s critique might seem quite
incomprehensible if we did not know that he belonged to that utopian
school of older English socialists who wanted to reshape capitalist
reality so thoroughly, wanted to eliminate capitalist reality so badly,
that they abstracted [from that reality] in their economic theory.
Thompson had such a great desire to cancel the dependency of the workers
on capital, as formulated in the wages fund doctrine, that in his
criticism he abolished the very existence of the private capitalist.

The later critics of the wages fund theory are the Germans Hermann and
Rodbertus.

_Hermann_, in his _Staatswirtschaftlichen Untersuchungen_ (1832), puts
forward the proposition that the worker is paid not from the employer’s
capital but by the consumers of the commodities produced. The employer
is presented here in the innocent and at the same time noble role of a
personally disinterested intermediary between the worker and the
consumer, as though he were a mere clerk. The only problem is that in
one way or another it is notoriously well known that the worker receives
his wages _before_ the sale of the products of his labor, and indeed he
receives them directly from the employer out of that person’s private
capital, and thus the actual question that was raised has not been
touched on at all.

_Rodbertus_ is no more fortunate in his criticism. In his work _Zur
Erkenntnis unserer staatswirtschaftlichen Zustände_²⁸ he held that the
wages for labor are not paid out of the capital already accumulated
before the production period began but out of the product of that same
period. This consoling notion, derived from a bizarre disregard for the
elementary phenomena of the capitalist mode of production, needs no
further refutation. Any child knows that the production period in most
realms of economic activity—from the beginning of production through the
sale of the goods on the market—takes half a year or a full year, but
workers receive their wages every two weeks or even every week, and so
the employer must have a reserve supply of capital in advance; wages
cannot be taken, bit by bit, out of current production.

Here, as in so many other fields of economics, Marx provided the first
true criticism. Above all he knew—in accordance with his dialectical
method—that there cannot be any general law of wages that is absolutely
applicable in all cases. Every mode of production has its own law of
population and its own special law of wages.

He went on to outline the law of wages for the production period in
large-scale industry. This consists of two aspects: on the one hand, the
existing _reserve supply of capital_; and on the other, the existing
_reserve army of workers_. The accumulation of capital, on the one hand,
and the proletarianization of the middle layers of the population, the
small producers, on the other, have already advanced so far, he held,
that the needs of production today cannot be squeezed into any natural,
or so to say, physical, limits, neither on the side of capital nor on
the side of the workers: the expansion of production in and of itself
could be unlimited, but it would always find enough capital and “Arme”
(in the dual sense).²⁹ In reality then what does the mass of employed
workers depend on and what does the amount [size] of their wages depend
on? Solely and exclusively on the interests of the capitalist at any
given moment, on his _need for the utilization of capital_.³⁰ However,
this depends, on the one hand, on the market, but today the market has
become a world market, where hurricanes rage on a world scale, and so
the market is at any given moment a totally variable quantity, because
of changes in production technology, which at every moment change the
need for the utilization of capital. Thus today the so-called demand for
labor depends neither on the quantity of someone’s capital nor on the
number of [available] workers, but on the market and production
conditions taken as a whole, which constantly fluctuate and the sum
total of which actually constitutes the entire modern mode of
production. The law of wages today—Marx cries out!—is worse than an
“iron law”; it is “elastic”! Today it can be given neither the name of
“wages fund” nor that of any special law, [it can be given] no name
other than that of the modern economy as a whole, [no name] other than
that of capitalism itself!

We mentioned at the beginning that a new theory, that of _Prof. J[ulius]
Wolf_, rejects both theories—the wages fund theory as well as Marx’s
theory of the industrial reserve army. Prof. Wolf says that the theory
of Ricardo-Lassalle is false because, first of all, an increased wage
does not necessarily cause a greater number of children to be born; and
secondly, the demand for workers may also increase with their
[increased] number. Both of these arguments concur essentially with the
criticism that Marx directed at the wages fund theory, and thus to a
certain extent it may allow a common theory [to be stated].³¹ Matters
stand otherwise with regard to the positive assertions of Marx’s theory
of wages. The extensive expansion of production—says Prof. Wolf—rushes
forward more quickly than the intensive development of production as a
result of the advance of technology, and therefore the reserve army does
not grow but gradually diminishes. On these questions it is difficult,
we must concede, to offer direct proofs. If the school of Marx were to
cite a series of statistical data in support of its assertion, Prof.
Wolf would present a series of statistical results in opposition to
those. Given the present-day condition of statistics, it can provide
proof, as is well known, in the same degree either for or against any
assertion. Nevertheless we think that proofs may be sought precisely in
an indirect way, in such social phenomena as can be explained for us
only by accepting the notion of an advancing proletarianization. Thus,
for example, the [constant] overseas emigration, as well as the dubious
attempts of all governments to “save the middle class” (see the recent
proposal for a government organization to promote German handicrafts!);
and also the ease with which even the largest industrial actions of the
working class can be broken by “reservists” from the industrial reserve
army (see the recent strike in Hamburg); and likewise the unceasing
“de-specialization” (to make up a word ad hoc) of the workers and with
that the fact that skilled workers are increasingly being rendered
superfluous; and also, finally, the growing dissatisfaction among the
masses of the people and consequently the growth of the workers’
movement. These are all facts with which a theory of wages must deal in
one way or another, and all of them seem to lead to the conclusion that
there is an increasing proletarianization of the middle classes, and
with that comes the growth of the reserve army. Without going into these
questions any further we want to restate in its essentials the unique
wages theory put forward by Prof. Wolf. In reality—says Prof. Wolf—the
level of wages at any given time depends on (1) the supply of workers
available for hire; (2) their wages policy—an aspect which, as far as we
know, no other German bourgeois economist has brought up with such
emphasis, and among English economists was raised only by Thornton in
his work _On Labor_ (1869); and (3) on the prosperous condition of
business in general; and lastly (4) it depends on the effect of prices
on consumption as well as the share that wages have in the costs of
production.³²



AUTHOR’S NOTES


THE INDUSTRIAL DEVELOPMENT OF POLAND

I See O. Flatt, _Opis miasta Lódzi pod wzgledem historycznym,
statystycznym i przemyslowym_ (Historical, Statistical and Industrial
Description of the City of Łódż) [(Warsaw: Drukarnia Gazety, 1853)], pp.
133–42; Witold Zalęski, _Statystyka porównawcza Królestwa Polskiego_
(Comparative Statistics of the Kingdom of Poland) [(Warsaw, 1876)], pp.
170–1; _Diplomatic and Consular Reports. Foreign Office_. [Annual
Series: On the Trade of Warsaw (London: Her Majesty’s Stationary Office,
1888),] No. 321, p. 5; and T. Rutowski, _W sprawie przemyslu krajowego_
(On the Question of the Country’s Industry) [(Kraków: Drukarnia
Zwiazkowa, 1883)], p. 34 ff.

II See I.S. Poznanskii, _Proizvoditelnye sily Tsarstva Polskogo_
(Productive Forces of the Kingdom of Poland) [(St. Petersburg:
Tsederbauma i Goldenbliuma, 1880)], pp. 67, 106; also, Zalęski,
_Statystyka porównawcza Królestwa Polskiego_, p. 71.

III See Poznanskii, _Proizvoditelnye sily Tsarstva Polskogo_, p. 140.

IV Raw materials from Russia and Poland were declared to be duty-free; a
tariff of 1 percent was levied on goods manufactured from either
country’s own raw materials and one of 3 percent ad valorem on goods
manufactured from the raw materials of a foreign country. Sugar and raw
cotton were exceptions; duties of 25 percent and 15 percent,
respectively, were placed on them. From Russia’s standpoint the tariff
on raw cotton was quite senseless, but for Poland, which had been
importing this cotton from Russia in large quantities, the tariff was
extremely favorable because it protected the Polish cotton industry from
Russian competition, but at the same time it encouraged the export of
Polish woolen materials to Russia.

V Flatt, _Opis miasta Lódzi pod wzgledem historycznym, statystycznym i
przemyslowym_, p. 62; K. Lodyshenski, _Istoriia russkogo tamozhennogo
tarifa_ (The History of the Russian Tariff) [(St. Petersburg: Balashev,
1886)], pp. 217 and 218.

VI Zalęski, _Statystyka porównawcza Królestwa Polskiego_, p. 47.

VII Source of above figures: Lodyzhenskii, _Istoriia russkogo
tamozhennogo tarifa_, p. 218. According to F. Rodecki in _Obraz
geograficzno-statystyczny Krolestwa Polskiego_ (Geographical-Statistical
Depiction of the Kingdom of Poland) [(Warsaw: Drukarni Antoniego
GaŁęzowskiego i Kompanii, 1830)], Table III, the export of products of
the Polish wool industry to Russia in 1827 amounted to 13.2 Polish
guilders (one guilder being worth 15 kopecks).

VIII Source of above figures: K. Lodyzhenskii, _Istoriia russkogo
tamozhennogo tarifa_ (History of the Russian Tariff). St. Petersburg,
1886, p. 219.

IX Flatt, _Opis miasta Lódzi pod wzgledem historycznym, statystycznym i
przemyslowym_, p. 61.

X Lodyzhenskii, _Istoriia russkogo tamozhennogo tarifa_, p. 223. Raw
materials were still imported duty-free, as before, and duties on many
manufactured goods increased by a factor of between three and five, but
the duty imposed on the chief export item from Poland, woolen goods, was
raised to the same high level paid for Russian woolen goods imported
into Poland, that is, 15 percent _ad valorem_.

XI See I[van] I[vanovich] Ianzhul, _Istoricheskii ocherk razvitiia
fabrichno-zavodskoi promyshlennosti_ (Historical Sketch of the
Development of Factory Industry) [(Moscow, 1887)], p. 32.

XII Rutowski, _W sprawie przemyslu krajowego_, p. 241.

XIII Ibid., pp. 250, 251; see also J[an] Bloch, _Przemysl fabryczny
Królewstwa Polskiego 1871–1880_ (The Factory Industry of the Kingdom of
Poland, 1871–1880) [(Warsaw: Drukarni Cotty, 1884)], pp. 29–31, 111–12,
12–13, and 58.

XIV W. Zalęski, _Statystyka porównawcza Królewstwa Polskiego_
(Comparative Statistics of the Kingdom of Poland), Warsaw, 1876, p. 172.

XV Lodyzhenskii, _Istoriia russkogo tamozhennogo tarifa_, p. 252.

XVI One result of the formation of a tariff zone including Poland was
that an innovation was now made in the Russian tariff system: the
introduction of a so-called differential tariff. Since Poland had
pursued significantly more of a free-trade policy toward Western Europe,
a new distinction was made after the Russian tariff boundary was
extended to include Poland—a distinction between the land border and the
maritime border. A lower tariff was set for goods being shipped by sea.

XVII _Istoriko-statisticheskii obzor promyshlennosti Rossii_
(Historico-Statistical Review of the Industry of Russia), D. A.
Timiriazev, ed. 2 vols. [(St. Petersburg: 1883)], Vol. 2, p. 95.

XVIII [For the source of the following figures, see] Rutowski, _W
sprawie przemyslu krajowego_, p. 241.

XIX Ivan I. Ianzhul, _Istoricheskii ocherk razvitiia fabrichno-zavodskoi
promyshlennosti_ (Historical Sketch of the Development of Factory
Industry), Moscow, 1887, p. 36

XX The total length of the railroad network in Russia was as follows:

  --------- ------------------------------------
  In 1838   25 versts [one verst = 3,500 feet]
  In 1850   468 versts
  In 1860   1,490 versts
  In 1865   3,577 versts
  In 1870   10,090 versts
  --------- ------------------------------------

Let us, while we are at it, review the data from later years as well:

  ------ ---------------
  1875   17,718 versts
  1880   12,226 versts
  1885   24,258 versts
  1890   28,581 versts
  1891   29,156 versts
  ------ ---------------

[Source:] _Gornaia Promyshlennost Roissii. Vsemirnaia kolumbbova
vystavka v Chikago 1893_ (Russia’s Mining Industry. Report for the
Chicago World’s Fair 1893), [Rossiia, Departament Gornog Dela,
Ministervo Gosudarstvennykh imushchestv (issued by the Mining Department
of Russia’s Ministry of State Properties), St. Petersburg, 1893], p. 61.
From 1891 to 1896, 10,625 versts of new railroad lines were opened to
traffic, and another 10,000 versts are now under construction, according
to _Trudy Imperatorskogo Svobodnogo Ekonomicheskogo Obshchestva_
(Proceedings of the Imperial Free Economic Society) [published twice
monthly], 1897, No. 6, p. 132.

XXI See G. Simonenko, _Sravnitel’naia statistika Tsarstva Pol’skogo i
drugikh evropeiskikh stran_ (Comparative Statistics of the Kingdom of
Poland and Other European Countries) [(Warsaw: Tipografiia Meditsinskoi
gazety, 1879)], p. 127; and W. Zalęski, _Statystyka porównawcza
Królestwa Polskiego_, pp. 172 and 273.

XXII _Fabrichno-zavodskaia promyshlennost i torgovlia Rossii. Vsemirnaia
kolumbova vystavka v Chikago 1893_ (Factory Industry and Trade of
Russia. Chicago World’s Fair 1893), [by Departament Torgovli i
Manufaktur Ministerstvo Finansov (Department of Trade and Manufactures
of the Ministry of Finances), St. Petersburg, 1893,] XIX, pp. 156–83.

XXIII [On the source of the figures in the above table] see ibid., XX,
p. 185.

XXIV _Petitions by the Imperial Free Economic Society. Review of Russian
Custom-Tariffs_ [St. Petersburg: 1890], p. 116.

XXV _Trudy Imperatorskogo Svobodnogo Ekonomicheskogo Obshchestva_, No.
6, pp. 129 and 127 [1897].

XXVI [On the source of the data in the table above see] _Petitions by
the Imperial Free Economic Society. Review of Russian Custom-Tariffs_,
p. 150.

XXVII _Vestnik Finansov_, No. 17, May 9, 1897.

XXVIII _Trudy Imperatorskogo Svobodnogo Ekonomicheskogo Obshchestva_,
No. 6, p. 134.

XXIX _Diplomatic and Consular Reports_. [_Foreign Office. Annual Series:
On the Trade of the District of the Consulate-General at Warsaw_
(London: Her Majestry’s Stationary Office, 1894),] No. 1449 (1894), p.
14.

XXX Ibid., No. 461, p. 3.

XXXI On the development of the metal and coal industries, see below, pp.
14–18, 23, 37–40 [in this volume.] The table above was compiled from
Zalęski, _Statystyka porównawcza Królestwa Polskiego_, pp. 172 and 246;
Bloch, _Przemysl fabryczny Królewstwa Polskiego 1871–1880_, p. 151;
_Factory Industry and Trade of Russia_, p. 33; Rutowski, _W sprawie
przemyslu krajowego_, p. 241; _Materials on Trade and Industrial
Statistics of Russia_, [_Data on the Factory Industry in Russia for the
Year 1890_ [(St. Petersburg: Department of Trade of the Finance
Ministry, 1893)], pp. 158–82; _Materials_ [_on Trade and Industrial
Statistics of Russia, Data on the Factory Industry in Russia_] _for the
Year 1891_ [(St. Petersburg: Department of Trade of the Finance Ministry
1894),] pp. 124–44. The data cited about total production are only
approximately accurate, because they are significantly lower than the
actual volume of production. For the most part we compiled the data from
reports by the entrepreneurs, who notoriously gave too low a figure for
the volume of business at their factories, in order to avoid higher
taxes. Thus, J[an] G. Bloch considered it necessary, in order to obtain
an accurate conception of the volume of industrial output, to tack on
about 25 percent to the official data. Another Polish statistician, J.
Banzemer, in his _Obraz przemyslu w kraju naszym_ (A Picture of Industry
in Our Country) [(Warsaw: Drukarni Noskowskiego, 1886)], showed with
numbers, that the before-tax value of total industrial production for
the year 1884 was not 182 million rubles, as the official reports state,
but 199 million rubles. On the grounds of similar considerations we have
come to the conclusion that production in Poland in the year 1890
represented a value not of 240 million rubles, but at least 300 million.
— We arrived at the figure of 240 million for total production in 1890,
since for the sake of uniformity [i.e., consistency] we increased the
figure of 210 million rubles, given in the report to the 1893 Chicago
World’s Fair (the volume on _Factory Industry and Trad of Russia_, p.
33), in order to take account of the increased excise tax on alcohol,
etc. These excise taxes were included in the data for previous decades,
and they should not be left out. — The figure concerning total
production of the cotton industry in 1891 is only approximately correct.
Here we have, again for the sake of consistency, added an amount for
dyeing and finishing, which although it is not a large amount, was
included for other branches of the textile industry. In the year 1891,
cotton weaving and spinning alone show up as having 86 factories, with
21,229 workers, and production worth 36.8 million rubles. In the above
table, we took this year into account, because it was not appropriate to
treat the Polish cotton industry as an exception.

XXXII [On the source of the data in the above table] See _Reports of the
Members of the Commission for Investigation of the Factory Industry in
the Kingdom of Poland_ (St. Petersburg, 1888), Vol. 1, p. 84.

XXXIII Bloch, _Przemysl fabryczny Królewstwa Polskiego 1871–1880_, p.
142–3. Bloch included many small businesses in his calculations, which
to a certain extent distorted the general picture of the concentration
of industry.

XXXIV _Factory Industry and Trade of Russia_, p. 33; and _Materials on
Trade and Industrial Statistics of Russia … for the Year 1890_, p. 134.
With regard to the value of production for one firm in 1890, we have
been able to determine that only for branches of industry not subject to
excise tax (that is, for all industries except mining, distilling,
tobacco processing, and sugar refining). In terms of earnings in that
year, the branches on which excise taxes were not imposed certainly
accounted for 74 percent of all industry. For other branches of
production, exact data about the number of businesses is lacking.

XXXV [On the sources of the data in the last line of the above table:]
The figures “1,612” and “5,303” are from Bloch, _Przemysl fabryczny
Królewstwa Polskiego_, pp. 14–15; and the figure “139,298” is from
_Materials on Trade and Industrial Statistics of Russia … for the year
1890_, pp. 158–95.

XXXVI [On the sources of the data in the last line of the above table:]
The figures “994” and “7,950” are from Bloch, _Przemysl fabryczny
Królewstwa Polskiego_, pp. 14–15. According to Rutowski, the value of
cotton production in 1880 was 33 million rubles. The figure “291,736” is
from _Materials on Trade and Industrial Statistics of Russia … for the
year 1890_, pp. 124–45.

XXXVII [On the source of the data in the above table] See A.S., _Bor’ba
mezhdu Moskvoi y Lodzem_ (The Conflict between Moscow and Łódż) [(St.
Petersburg, 1889], p. 17.

XXXVIII See _Factory Industry and Trade of Russia_, Vol. 1, pp. 11 and
13. The figures for the Russian cotton industry refer to the Russian
Empire not including Finland and Poland.

XXXIX [On the figures in the above table:] The figure “1,803” in the
last line is from _Materialy po statistiki parovykh mashin v rossiiskoi
imperii_ (Materials for Statistics on Steam Engines in the Russian
Empire), [Rossiia, Tsentral’nyi statisticheskii komitet (Central
Statistical Committee of Russia), St. Petersburg, 1888], pp. 158 and
163. In the column under “1890,” the first two figures are from
_Materials on Trade and Industrial Statistics of Russia … for the Year
1890_, pp. 134 and 158–94, the top figure referring only to coal mining
and to branches of industry to which no excise tax applied. The last
figure, “10,497,” refers to coal mining alone, and is from _Russia’s
Mining Industry_, p. 74.

XL _Reports of the Members of the Commission for Investigation of the
Factory Industry in the Kingdom of Poland_, Vol. II, pp. 1–2.

XLI In making this assumption [of 120 million] we base ourselves on the
growth of the city of Łódż, [about which] see the following page(s). But
since Ianzhul [in his _Historical Sketch of the Development of Factory
Industry_], p. 48), and after him [W.] Sviatlovskii, _Fabrichnyi
rabochii (iz nabliudeniia fabrichnogo inspektora)_ (The Factory Worker
[Warsaw, 1889], p. 23) both consider the figure for 1885 too low—a
figure we have taken from the official data—and since they estimate the
value of this region’s production as already 70 million rubles as early
as 1886 and 1883, respectively, the present-day value of the region’s
production may be significantly higher than our estimate.

XLII Ianzhul, _Istoricheskii ocherk razvitiia fabrichno-zavodskoi
promyshlennosti_, pp. 44–6; Flatt, _Opis miasta Lódzi pod wzgledem
historycznym, statystycznym i przemyslowym_, pp. 47, 71, and 110.

XLIII [On the sources for the data “in 1860” and “in 1878” in the above
table:] Ianzhul, _Istoricheskii ocherk razvitiia fabrichno-zavodskoi
promyshlennosti_, pp. 44–6; and Flatt, _Opis miasta Lódzi pod wzgledem
historycznym, statystycznym i przemyslowym_, pp. 47, 71, and 110. [On
the source for the data “in 1885” see] _Reports of the Members of the
Commission for Investigation of the Factory Industry in the Kingdom of
Poland_, Vol. II, p. 1. According to other sources, in 1886 the proceeds
from production in Łódż already amounted to 40–46 million rubles.
(_Diplomatic and Consular Reports_. [_Foreign Office. Annual Series: On
the Trade of the Kingdom of Poland_ (London: Her Majestry’s Stationary
Office, 1887)], No. 128, p. 4.) [On the source for the number of
inhabitants “in 1895” see] _Vestnik finansov_, No. 21, June 6, 1897.
This number actually refers to January 1897. [On the source for the
value of production in 1895 see] _Gazeta Handlowa_ [Warsaw], December 1,
1896.

XLIV _Reports of the Members of the Commission for Investigation of the
Factory Industry in the Kingdom of Poland_, Vol. II, p. 23.

XLV [On the source of the data in the following table see] A. S., _The
Conflict between Moscow and Łódż_, p. 51.

XLVI _Reports of the Members of the Commission for Investigation of the
Factory Industry in the Kingdom of Poland_, Vol. II, p. 25.

XLVII Ibid., p. 46.

XLVIII See “Stan historia I terazniejszosc Miasta Łódż” (The History and
Present Condition of the City of Łódż), _Gazeta Handlowa_ (Newspaper of
Poland), December 3, 1896.

XLVIX See _Reports of the Members of the Commission for Investigation of
the Factory Industry in the Kingdom of Poland_, Vol. I, p. 33.

L [On the source of the data in the following table see] Ibid., p. 38.

LI Ibid., p. 87.

LII Sviatlovskii, _Fabrichnyi rabochii_, p. 24.

LIII [For the source of] “78.4,” see Timiriazev,
_Istoriko-statisticheskii obzor promyshlennosti Rossii_, Vol. 1, Tables
XIV–XV. [The source for the figure “150.8” is] _Russia’s Mining
Industry_, p. 91. The above figures refer only to private industry.
Production from state-owned mines in 1860 was 7.2 million poods, and in
1870, 6.3 million poods. Since 1878, coal extraction from state mines
has stopped completely.

LIV [On the source of the above data see] _Russia’s Mining Industry_, p.
72.

LV Ibid., p. 92.

LVI See _Proizvoditel’nye sily Rossii_ (The Productive Forces of Russia.
[For the regional industrial exhibition at Nizhny Novgorod), Rossiia,
Ministerstvo Finansov (issued by the Ministry of Finance), St.
Petersburg, 1896], Vol. VII, p. 39.

LVII _Gazeta Handlowa_, December 14, 1896.

LVIII The average annual import of foreign coal into Russia was as
follows: 1866–70: 70 million poods; 1871–75: 605 million poods; 1876–80:
971 million poods; 1881–85: 1,122 million poods; 1886–90: 1,097 million
poods. [Source:] _Russia’s Mining Industry_, p. 75.

LVIX _Prawda_ (Truth), No. 52, December 26, 1896.

LX _Russia’s Mining Industry_, p. 57.

LXI Ibid., pp. 58 ff.

LXII Ibid., p. 5; [see] also _Factory Industry and Trade of Russia_,
Vol. XIX, p. 181.

LXIII [On the source of data in the following table see] _Russia’s
Mining Industry_, pp. 65 and 66. The percentage of imported foreign
metal used annually in Russia, as against domestically produced metal,
was as follows:

  --------- ---------------- -------------
               _Pig Iron_    
             _(total used)_   _(foreign)_
   1866–70   106 mln poods        8%
   1871–75   133 mln poods        11%
   1876–80   171 mln poods        26%
   1881–85   220 mln poods        32%
   1886–90   256 mln poods        21%
   1891–95   402 mln poods        9%
  --------- ---------------- -------------

  --------- --------------- -------------
                _Iron_      
               _(total)_     _(foreign)_
   1866–70   97 mln poods        12%
   1871–75   122 mln poods       31%
   1876–80   132 mln poods       35%
   1881–85   135 mln poods       26%
   1886–90   146 mln poods       19%
   1891–95   159 mln poods       23%
  --------- --------------- -------------

[Source:] _Vestnik finansov_, No. 21, June 6, 1897.

LXIV [On the sources of the data in the following table see] Timiriazev,
_Istoriko-statisticheskii obzor promyshlennosti Rossii_, Vol. 1, Tables
viii–ix and x–xi; _Russia’s Mining Industry_, pp. 58 and 60. The figures
above refer only to the private sector. Production of pig iron at
state-owned plants in 1860, 1870, and 1880, respectively, was 0.65,
0.47, and 0.29 million poods; and for iron and steel the corresponding
figures are 0.33, 0.1, and 0.1 million poods.

LXV _Encyklopedia Rolnicza_ (Agricultural Encyclopdia), Vol. 3 [(Warsaw:
Drukarnia Artystyczna Saturnina Sikorskiego, 1894)], p. 15. According to
Orlov (in _A Register of the Factories of European Russia_, [_including
the Kingdom of Poland and the Grand Duchy of Finland_ (St. Petersburg,
1881)], p. 620), there were already 66 machinery factories in 1879 with
production amounting in value to 6.7 million rubles.

LXVI _Encyklopedia Rolnicza_, Vol. 2 (1891) [(Warsaw: Drukarnia
Artystyczna Saturnina Sikorskiego, 1891)], pp. 530 ff.

LXVII _Factory Industry and Trade of Russia_, Vol. XIII, pp. 6–7.

LXVII Ibid., p. 7.

LXIX _Diplomatic and Consular Reports. [Foreign Office. Annual Series:
On the Trade of the District of the Consulate-General at Warsaw_
(London: Her Majestry’s Stationary Office, 1894),] No. 1449, p. 7.

LXX [On the source of the data in the following table see] _Factory
Industry and Trade of Russia_, Introduction, pp. 32–3. The Moscow
region, i.e., central Russia, includes the following provinces: Moscow,
Vladimir, Kaluga, Kostroma, Nizhny Novgorod, Smolensk, Tver, and
Yaroslavl; within the St. Petersburg region are the provinces of St.
Petersburg, Pskov, Novgorod, Courland, Livonia, and Estonia.

LXXI See _Vestnik finansov_, No. 8, March 7, 1897.

LXXII See _Factory Industry and Trade of Russia_, Vol. I, p. 11.

LXXIII See _Materials_ [_on Trade and Industrial Statistics of Russia,
Data on the Factory Industry in Russia_] _for the Year 1892_ [(St.
Petersburg: Department of Trade of the Finance Ministry 1895),] pp.
192–204.

LXXIV _Reports of the Members of the Commission for Investigation of the
Factory Industry in the Kingdom of Poland_, p. 18.

LXXV [On the source of the data in the following table see] Ibid.,
Appendix I, pp. 41–3. According to English sources, the export of
products from the textile industry of Łódż to Russia in 1886 was 970,791
poods, while 229,900 poods remained in Poland; in 1887, 264,665 poods
stayed in Poland, and 721,115 poods went to Russia (_Diplomatic and
Consular Report: On the Trade of Warsaw_, No. 321, p. 7).

LXXVI Ianzhul, _Istoricheskii ocherk razvitiia fabrichno-zavodskoi
promyshlennosti_, p. 63.

LXXVII On the source of the data in the following table see] _Ateneum_,
1890, Vol. I, No. 2, pp. 294–6. In particular, the market in the
Caucasus for Polish iron was as follows: in 1887, 310,500 poods; in
1888, 299,044 poods; in 1889, 340,905 poods; and in 1890, 398,210 poods
(_Ateneum_, 1891, Vol. III, No. 3, p. 612).

LXXVIII _Ateneum_, 1891, Vol. III, No. 3, p. 611.

LXXIX _Kraj_ (Our Country), 1889, No. 43.

LXXX Ibid., 1888, No. 21.

LXXXI _Prawda_, 1893, No. 3.

LXXXII Ibid., 1894, No. 51.

LXXXIII Ibid., 1896, No. 5.

LXXXIV For a brief history of this reform and of the relations between
landowners and peasants in Poland, see the English [_Foreign Office.
Miscellaneous Series Reports. On the Peasantry and Peasant Holdings in
Poland_ (London: Her Majesty’s Stationary Office, 1895)], No. 355.

LXXXV See J[an] Bloch, _Landed Property and Its Indebtedness_ [(Warsaw,
1890)]. (Note also this statement:) “There is no doubt that the great
majority of the landowners in Poland live under the most difficult
conditions” [_Foreign Office. Miscellaneous Series Reports. On the
Position of Landed Proprietors in Poland_ (London: Her Majesty’s
Stationary Office, 1895)], No. 347, p. 11). Some related material is
also in J[an] Bloch, _The Peasants’ Bank and Parcelization_ (Warsaw,
1895), pp. 1 and 16.

LXXXVI Bloch, _The Factory Industry of the Kingdom of Poland_, p. 181.

LXXXVII _Factory Industry and Trade of Russia_, pp. 32 and 33.

LXXXVIII Cf. J[an] Bloch, _O Selskokhozaistvennom Melioratzionnom
Kreditye v Rossi i Inostrannykh Gosudarstvakh_ (Agricultural
Amelioration Credit in Russia and Foreign States) [(Warsaw, 1892)];
also, L. Górski, _Our Mistakes in Agriculture_ (Warsaw, 1874).

LXXXIX “The encouragement thus given to foreign immigrants and to local
industry and trade in general has caused a very remarkable industrial
development, especially in that part of Poland which is nearest to
Germany, whence the vivifying element came; but the policy which had
been followed uninterruptedly for 73 years, and by which the industries
of this country had been built up, was suddenly reversed on March 14,
1887, by the well-known imperial ukase forbidding foreigners from
acquiring real property in the kingdom of Poland and in the Baltic
provinces.”—“Another measure which will seriously affect the industries
of this country is the new regulation prohibiting the erection of
buildings within a quarter mile of the frontier.”—“This and the other
measures in contemplation are attributed to the jealousy of the Moscow
manufacturers, who at the last fair of Nizhny Novgorod addressed a
memorial to the Government asking for protection against the Polish
industries.” (_Diplomatic and Consular Reports. Foreign Office. Annual
Series: On the Trade of Warsaw_, No. 321, pp. 6 and 7). Further, [see
Gerhart von] Schulze-Gävernitz, “Der Nationalismus in Russland und seine
wirtschaftlichen Träger” (Nationalism in Russia and Its Economic
Spokesmen), _Preussische Jahrbücher_ (Prussian Yearbooks), Vol. 75,
Jan.–March, 1894. See also _Blue Book: Royal Commission on Labor,
Foreign Reports, Vol. X, Russia_ (London: 1894), p. 9. The extracts
quoted here from the latter publication are based on the English
consular reports from Poland, which on this particular subject have not
always remained free of one-sided influence from the local [Polish]
capitalist press.

XC Lodyzhenskii, _Istoriia russkogo tamozhennogo tarifa_, pp. 220, 218,
and 222.

XCI A.S., _The Conflict between Moscow and Łódż_, p. 22.

XCII [Sergei Fedorovich] Sharapov, _Sobranie sochinenii_ (Collected
Works) (St. Petersburg: 1892), Vol. 1, pp. 70–94.

XCIII A.S., _The Conflict between Moscow and Łódż_, p. 22.

XCIV _Reports of the Members of the Commission for Investigation of the
Factory Industry in the Kingdom of Poland_, “Introduction,” pp. 1 and 2.

XCV Ibid., Vol. 1, p. 101, and Vol. 2, pp. 101–7.

XCVI Ibid., Vol. 1, pp. 102, 103, and 104.

XCVII _Diplomatic and Consular Reports. Foreign Office. Annual Series:
On the Trade of Warsaw_, No. 321, page 7; A. S., _Moscow and Łódż_, p.
23.

XCVIII On the basis of what has been said before, it is easy to judge
how far these two figures were below the real profits.

XCIX _Diplomatic and Consular Reports. Foreign Office. Annual Series: On
the Trade of Warsaw Diplomatic and Consular Reports_, No. 321, page 7.

C Ibid., p. 6.

CI A. S., _Moscow and Łódż_, p. 23.

CII Ibid., pp. 29, 32–5, 40–2, and 60.

CIII _Ateneum_, 1891, Vol. III, p. 609.

CIV _Diplomatic and Consular Reports_. [_Foreign Office. Annual Series:
On the Trade of the District of the Consulate-General at Warsaw_
(London: Her Majestry’s Stationary Office, 1893)], No. 1183, pp. 5 and
6.

CV _Reports of the Members of the Commission for Investigation of the
Factory Industry in the Kingdom of Poland_, Vol. 1, p. 30.

CVI Ibid., pp. 30–1.

CVII Ibid., pp. 32–3.

CVIII [The figures in the following table are from] _Factory Industry
and Trade of Russia_, Vol. 1, pp. 16–17.

CIX See Schulze-Gävernitz, “Der Nationalismus in Russland und seine
wirtschaftlichen Träger,” p. 359.

CX For the price of coal, see _Reports of the Members of the Commission
for Investigation of the Factory Industry in the Kingdom of Poland_,
Vol. II, p. 104 and Vol. I, p. 33. The price of one pood of naphtha coal
is arrived at in the following way: “For the equivalent of 100 units of
weight of coal,” writes [Dmitri Ivanovich] Mendeleyev, “only 67 units of
weight of naphtha residue are required.” But according to the same
source, the price of naphtha residue has varied “in recent years … in
Moscow between 20 and 30 kopecks per pood.” (_Factory Industry and Trade
of Russia_, Vol. XII, pp. 311–12.

CXI Ibid., Vol. I, p. 17, note; Vol. XXII, p. 264; and “Introduction,”
p. 21.

CXII Ibid., Vol. XII, p. 310.

CXIII Ibid., [Vol. XII,] p. 312.

CXIV Ibid., pp. 312–313.

CXV _Vestnik Evropy_, No. 21, June 2, 1895

CXVI R. Mikhailov, “Investigation of Naphtha Residue,” _Zapiski
Imperatorskogo russkogo tekhnicheskogo obshchestva_ (Reports of the
Russian Imperial Technology Society) (St. Petersburg), No. 1, January
1898.

CXVII _Reports of the Members of the Commission for Investigation of the
Factory Industry in the Kingdom of Poland_, Vol. 1, p. 35.

CXVIII “[W]eekly wages are higher in Poland than in Russia … [but] the
workday in Russia is so much longer,” etc. See Schulze-Gävernitz, “Der
Nationalismus in Russland und seine wirtschaftlichen Träger,” p. 359;
similarly, see S. G., “Die Industrielle Politik Russlands in dessen
polnischen Provinzen” (Russia’s Industrial Policy in Its Polish
Provinces),” _Neue Zeit_, 1893–94, Vol. 2, No. 51, p. 791.

CXIX [On the source of the data in the table below see] _Reports of the
Members of the Commission for Investigation of the Factory Industry in
the Kingdom of Poland_, Vol. 1, p. 39.

CXX Ibid., p. 41.

CXXI Ibid., pp. 42 and 43. Cf. Sviatlovskii, _Fabrichnyi rabochii_, p.
39.

CXXII Sviatlovskii, _Fabrichnyi rabochii_, pp. 59–60.

CXXIII _Reports of the Members of the Commission for Investigation of
the Factory Industry in the Kingdom of Poland_, Vol. 1, p. 71.

CXXIV [On the source of the data in the following table see] Ibid., p.
39.

CXXV Sviatlovskii, _Fabrichnyi rabochii_, p. 47. — [K.V. Davydov,]
_Report of the Factory Inspector for the St. Petersburg Region_ [(St.
Petersburg: 1886),] p. 11. — In three industrial districts of Moscow
province, where the relevant investigations were made, 56.8 percent of
all the male workers lived in factory barracks; among spinners and
weavers this figure rose to 66.8 percent. See Y[evstafy] M[ikhailovich]
Dement’ev, _Fabrika: chto ona daet naseleniiu i chto ona u nee beret_
(The Factory: What It Gives to the Population and What It Takes Away)
[(Moscow: 1893)], p. 42. According to the same investigations, 22.2
percent of those living in the barracks were not included in the total
number of workers living there. These were members of workers’ families
who were not themselves employed at the factory (ibid., p. 44).

CXXVI See I.I. Ianzhul’s article “The Factory Worker in Central Russia
and in the Kingdom of Poland,” _Vestnik Evropy_ (European Herald),
February 1888, p. 794.

CXXVII Ibid., p. 792.

CXXVIII Out of all the workers in the three above-mentioned industrial
districts of Moscow province, the number of grown men who left the
factory in the summer amounted to 14.1 percent, and for the textile
workers the figure was 19.7 percent (Dement’ev, _Fabrika: chto ona daet
naseleniiu i chto ona u nee beret_, p. 4).

CXXIX [I.I. Ianzhul,] _Report of the Factory Inspector for the Moscow
Region_ [(St. Petersburg, 1884)], p. 81.

CXXX [Dr. Peskov,] _Report of the Factory Inspector for the Vladimir
Region_ [(St. Petersburg, 1886)], p. 68.

CXXXI Cf. Thomas Brassey, _Work and Wages_ [London: Bell and Daldy,
1872]; see also [Lujo] Brentano, _Über das Verhältnis von Arbeitslohn
und Arbeitszeit zur Arbeitsleistung_ (On the Relation of Wages and labor
Time to Productivity) (Leipzig: Duncker & Humboldt, 1893).

CXXXII “In countries where capitalist production stands at different
levels of development and between which the organic composition of
capital consequently varies, the rate of surplus value (one factor that
determines the rate of profit) may be higher in a country where the
normal working day is shorter than in one where it is longer. Firstly,
if the English working day of 10 hours, because of its higher intensity,
is equal to an Austrian working day of 14 hours, then, given the same
division of the working day, 5 hours’ surplus labor in the one country
may represent a higher value on the world market than 7 hours in the
other. Secondly, a greater part of the working day in England may form
surplus labor than in Austria.” See Marx’s _Das Kapital_, Band 3
(Hamburg: Otto Meisner, 1894), Part I, pp. 195–6 [_Capital_ Vol. 3,
translated by David Fernbach (New York: Vintage, 1981), pp. 321–2.]

CXXXIII See Ianzhul, “The Factory Worker in Central Russia and in the
Kingdom of Poland,” p. 791. — According to Sviatlovskii, _Fabrichnyi
rabochii_, p. 61, only the work of weavers is cheaper in Poland; in
contrast, the work of spinners is more expensive than in Russia. —
According to _Factory Industry and Trade of Russia_, Vol. 1, p. 17, the
cost of production of one pood of cotton in Poland and in Russia is on
the whole approximately the same, and in this situation the Polish
factory owner, even if he pays about 52 kopecks less [per pood] for
fuel, nevertheless pays _more_ for labor power than the Moscow factory
owner, and that amounts to 33 kopecks [per pood of cotton]. We consider
more reliable the data on wages that we have cited in the text, which
were obtained as a result of Ianzhul’s personal investigations. As a
former factory inspector in the Moscow region and as leader of the
[1886] commission investigating industry in Poland, he had the
opportunity to become acquainted with both Polish and Russian industry
from his own observations. — “Despite the lower wages, labor in Russia
is very expensive. In England three workers can operate 1,000 cotton
spindles; in Russia, according to Mendeleyev, [the corresponding number
is] 16.6 [workers]. Thus even if the English worker earns four times
more in wages than the Russian, he still works far more cheaply. But in
addition to wages [in Russia] there are also the high costs for
supervision, passports, workers’ housing, hospitals, etc., which are not
present at all in England, and for the most part are absent in Poland as
well.” (Schulze-Gävernitz, “Der Nationalismus in Russland und seine
wirtschaftlichen Träger,” p. 361.) All this, however, does not prevent
the selfsame Professor Schulze-Gävernitz from citing the higher weekly
wage, as we have seen, as a disadvantage offsetting the advantage of
cheaper fuel. —The point is made clearly, on the other hand, in the
English Royal Commission’s _Blue Book_: “Although the Russian
manufacturer appears to have an advantage in these respects (i.e., “the
extraordinarily low rate of wages”—R. L.), the cost of production is
greater for him than for the Polish manufacturer” ([_Blue Book:_] _Royal
Commission [on Labor, Foreign Report_,] Vol. X, [_Russia_ (London: Eyre
and Spottiswoode, 1894)], p. 9). Furthermore: “There is a still more
striking difference between the Polish and Russian workpeople. The
latter, although now nominally free, are but little removed from their
former condition [of serfdom], and have small ambition to improve their
position. The Poles have a far higher standard of comfort, and since
they depend entirely upon their wages for their support, they are not
contented with low earnings, but still their work is found to be less
expensive than that of the Russians” (_ibid_.). By the way, this
characterization of the Russian workers is highly antiquated: the big
strikes that have continued unceasingly in Russia since 1896 show that
the workers there too “have ambition to improve their position.” The
_Neue Zeit_ article entitled “Russia’s Industrial Policy in its Polish
Provinces,” p. 791, contains this statement: “Labor power in Russia is
also cheaper than in Poland … Labor time in Russia is much longer than
in Poland … _But as far as the intensity of labor is concerned, as the
above-mentioned factory inspector Svyatlovsky assures us, it is the same
in both countries_.” (Emphasis added—R. L.) Actually, not a trace of
such “assurance” is to be found in the writings of Sviatlovskii. By the
way, it would be difficult for Sviatlovskii to give the kind of
assurance that has been put in his mouth [by the author S. G.], first,
because in no instance does he [Sviatlovskii] betray any inclination to
assure the reader of anything that does not exist, an inclination that
is strongly inherent in the author of “Russia’s Industrial Policy in its
Polish Provinces”; and second, because on the question of the intensity
of labor in Poland he [Sviatlovskii] rather “assures us” of the exact
opposite. See Sviatlovskii, _Fabrichnyi rabochii_, pp. 59–61.

CXXXIV _Reports of the Members of the Commission for Investigation of
the Factory Industry in the Kingdom of Poland_, Vol. 1, p. 10.

CXXXV The cost of 1,000 bricks, for example, was 14–15 rubles in Łódż in
1876; in Moscow in 1874, it was ca. 32 rubles; in Łódż in 1886, 8–9
rubles; in Moscow in 1887, ca. 22 rubles. Ibid., p. 13.

CXXXVI The cost of construction of barracks and the like, for example,
for two of the larger Russian factories, was as much as 400,000 rubles
each, or ca. one-sixth of the total fixed capital. Ibid., p. 12.

CXXXVII Ibid., p. 36.

CXXXVII [On the sources of the data in the following table see]
_Materials on Trade and Industrial Statistics of Russia … for the Years
1885–1887_, pp. vi and xi; _Materials on Trade and Industrial Statistics
of Russia … for the Year 1888_, pp. 106 and 126; _Materials on Trade and
Industrial Statistics of Russia … for the Year 1889_, pp. 134 and 158;
_Materials on Trade and Industrial Statistics of Russia … for the Year
1890_, pp. 110 and 131. The figures for Russia, here and further on, at
pp. 169 and 174, unless more details are given, refer only to European
Russia, without Finland and Poland. The Asian part of Russia does not
come into consideration at all on the question of competition, and
citing that data for comparison would only make the picture more
unfavorable to Russia. [The author of an article cited earlier, S. G.,]
“Die industrielle Politik Russlands in dessen polnischen Provinzen” (The
Industrial Policy of Russia in Its Polish Provinces), p. 791, asserts
the following: “Lastly, capital in Russia is more concentrated. The
average gross profit of a factory in Russia is 45,898 rubles, in Poland
35,289 rubles.” This assertion, as well as the figures he quotes, are
simply made up out of whole cloth.

CXXXIX _Russia’s Mining Industry_, pp. 71 and 73.

CXL _Productive Forces of Russia_, Vol. 7, p. 39.

CXLI [The sources of the data in the following tables are] Compiled from
_Materials on Trade and Industrial Statistics of Russia … for the Year
1890_, pp. 172–9, with reference only to cotton spinning and cotton
weaving. Here and in the next table, below, we compare only the steam
power in the two countries, because water-power plays only a miniscule
part in the Russian cotton and wool industries, while in those of Poland
it is infinitesimal.

CXLII Ibid., pp. 160–3. In the [following] table above we compare wool
spinning and wool weaving especially, which in Poland represented 72
percent of all profit of the wool industry for that year (1890).

CXLIII _Russia’s Mining Industry_, p. 75.

CXLIV Ibid., pp. 71, 73, and 74.

CXLV _Vestnik finansov_, No. 29, July 28, 1895.

CXLVI _Factory Industry and Trade of Russia_, Vol. XIII, p. 13.

CXLVII Ibid., p. 11.

CXLVIII Ibid., p. 16.

CXLVIX “Thus all the conditions of production are more favorable for
Russia than for Poland.” This upside-down conclusion is drawn by [the
author of an article cited earlier]: S. G., “Die industrielle Politik
Russlands in dessen polnischen Provinzen” (The Industrial Policy of
Russia in Its Polish Provinces), p. 791. He derives this from his data
about the relations of production between Russia and Poland, data that
are twisted upside down in every respect, and in the process he has
entirely forgotten two “minor” points—production technology and the type
of fuel used as a heat source. However, since it is an undeniable fact
that in the real world Polish goods are driving Russian goods from the
battlefield [i.e., outselling them in the market] and therefore with one
good sweep the assertion about “all the unfavorable conditions of
production” must be tossed in the dump, the author tries to get himself
out of this difficulty by referring to the individual abilities of
Polish manufacturers: “The only (!) reason for this state of affairs is
the greater commercial skill of the Polish industrialists and especially
the better educated upper-level factory personnel, who consist mainly of
_Germans and Austrians_.” (Emphasis added—R. L.) The author apparently
does not know that we live in an age when the decisive factor on the
capitalist battlefield is steam power, and that among those standing
before the countenance of Mercury [the god of commerce], there are no
chosen people. [On the sources of the data in the tables below see]
Bloch, _The Factory Industry of the Kingdom of Poland,, op. cit_, pp.
14–15, 86–7, 102, 126–7; _Materials on Trade and Industrial Statistics
of Russia_, [_Data on the Factory Industry in Russia for the Years
1885–87_ (St. Petersburg: Department of Trade of the Finance Ministry,
1889)], p. x; _Materials_ [_on Trade and Industrial Statistics of
Russia, Data on the Factory System in Russia for the Year 1888_ (St.
Petersburg: Department of Trade of the Finance Ministry, 1891)], p. 126;
_Materials_ [_on Trade and Industrial Statistics of Russia, Data on the
Factory System in Russia for the Year 1889_ (St. Petersburg: Department
of Trade of the Finance Ministry, p. 1891)], p. 158; _Materials on Trade
and Industrial Statistics of Russia … for 1891_, p. 146; _Materials on
Trade and Industrial Statistics of Russia … for 1892_, p. 164 (the
volumes of this publication for more recent years have not yet appeared
in bookstores); _Istoriko-statisticheskii obzor promyshlennosti Rossii_,
Vol. 1, Tables VIII–IX, X–XI, and XIV–XV; _Russia’s Mining Industry_,
pp. 58–60; _Vestnik Finansov_, No. 52, January 5, 1896 and No. 8, March
7, 1897.

CL Respectively it was about 26 percent for this branch of industry
(textiles) if we compare the period of 1871 to 1886 (fifteen years) with
the period 1885–92 (six years)—because the year 1885 was especially
unfavorable for the textile industry in view of the economic crisis of
1884.

CLI Lodyzhenskii, _Istoriia russkogo tamozhennogo tarifa_, p. 294.

CLII _Petitions by the Imperial Free Economic Society. Review of Russian
Custom Tariffs_, p. 21.

CLIII A. S., _The Conflict Between Moscow and Łódż_, p. 32.

CLIV The quotation is from _Novoe vremia_ as translated in _Kraj_, No.
51, 1894. The cited article’s headline was characteristic: “How Central
Russia Was Neglected.”

CLV _Kurjer Warszawski_ (Warsaw Courier), November 5, 1894.

CLVI “The increase in the sharply differentiated railroad rate (for
grain) ought to meet with no difficulties because of the alleged (!)
interests of the lower classes in Poland … (The difficulty is) the
impoverishment of the landowning population of Poland (as a result of
the increased differential rate on grain), which also brings with it a
worsening of the material situation for the textile industry and only
benefits the entrepreneurs in large-scale industry. They alone reap
benefits in the midst of the general disaster because of the lower wages
that result from lower grain prices … On the basis of all that has been
stated above it cannot be doubted that _in the interests of the
landowners_ of both the regions located near the internal market,
[i.e.,] _of the Polish and the northern Black Earth regions, as well as
all the landowners in the regions located near harbors_, it seems
desirable that the railroad rate on grain should be revised along the
following lines …” (_Memorandum of the Warsaw Stock Exchange Commission_
[_About the Railroad Tariffs for Grain_], pp. 31, 32, and 37).

CLVII _Sankt-Peterburgskie Vedomosti_ (St. Petersburg News), 1896, Nos.
242 and 243; _Gazeta Handlowa_, September 21, 1896.

CLVIII _Gazeta Handlowa_, October 8, 1896.

CLVIX _Kurjer Warszawski_ (Warsaw Courier), November 7, 1894.

CLX _Gazeta Handlowa_, November 30, 1896.

CLXI “This development of the economic and commercial forces of Poland
is attributed by the same authority (the Russian-language organ of the
Polish government, _Varshavskii Dnevnik_ [Warsaw Journal]) to the
establishment of branch agencies by the principal Russian banks, among
others the ‘Azov-Don,’ which disposes of considerable capital, and has
representatives at all the Black-Sea ports, besides being in direct
commercial relations with Bukhara and Teheran. It is, says the ‘Warsaw
Journal,’ through this and other Russian banks, which have established
branch houses at Warsaw and Łodz, that the manufacturers of Poland have
opened up new channels of trade and strengthened the already existing
ones.” (_Diplomatic and Consular Reports: On the Trade of the District
of the Consulate-General at Warsaw_, No. 1183, p. 4.)

CLXII See _Kraj_, August 1888.

CLXIII _Ibid_.

CLXIV See _Ateneum_, November issue, 1894, p. 378. Anti-German bias
exists, it should be noted, not only in a certain stratum of the Polish
bourgeoisie. Compare [for example] the weekly _Rola_ (Plowland), organ
of the “Christian landowners,” which has a regular headline, “Jews,
Germans, and Us.” See also the petty bourgeois publications _Gazeta
Polska_ (Polish Gazette), _Niwa_ (Field), etc.

CLXV The constantly growing demand in Poland for iron ore from southern
Russia is reported, among others, by _Vestnik Finansov_, No. 52, January
5, 1896. As early as 1893, in relation to the total amount of raw cotton
processed, the use of Central Asian cotton in the main centers of the
Polish textile industry was as follows: in Pabianice and Zgerz, 30
percent; in Łódż, 40 percent; and in Bedzin, 45 percent (_Przeglad
Tygondniowy_, No. 49, 1894]. — The government, for its part, favors this
shift by Polish industry toward the use of Russian raw materials by a
corresponding policy on the railroad system. In 1895 it established a
special low railroad rate from the Donets Basin to Poland in order to
make cheaper the delivery of southern Russian coke to Polish iron works
(_Vestnik Finansov_, No. 27, July 14, 1895). Likewise, the Polish owners
of iron and steel works were promised a reduction in transport costs for
southern Russian iron ore in 1897 (_Gazeta Handlowa_, December 11,
1896). In 1893 the Polish spinning mills were provided with a reduction
of about 20 percent on the freight costs for wool from southern Russia
(_Diplomatic and Consular Reports: On the Trade of the District of the
Consulate-General at Warsaw_, No. 1183, p. 4). On the raising of sheep
in southern Russia especially for the Polish spinning mills, see
_Diplomatic and Consular Reports_. [_Foreign Office. Annual Series: On
the Trade of the District of the Consulate-General at Warsaw_ (London:
Her Majestry’s Stationary Office, 1891), No. 863, p. 2. — On the other
hand, the government is promoting the expansion of Polish coal into
Russia. In 1895, for example, as part of a general revision of railroad
rates for coal, lower terms were set for the transport of Polish coal
into Russia than for coal from southern Russia, and the motivation for
this was that “an evening-up of the sales opportunities for Polish coal
should be introduced, because in terms of average heat-producing
capacity, coal from the Donbas performs less well” (_Vestnik Finansov_,
No. 27, July 14, 1895).

CLXVI How much the production and exchange of the two countries
complement one another and are interconnected, precisely because they
have a market in common and can establish a division of labor between
them, is shown by the fact that in 1897 a cartel between Moscow and Łódż
was projected, with the types of goods to be produced by each of the
parties to be determined, so that they would jointly regulate the market
(_Torgovo-Promyshlennaya Gazeta_, July 31, 1897). Even if this plan
falls through, nevertheless the very idea [of such a cartel] remains
strikingly indicative of the relations that actually exist.

CLXVII Since we have set ourselves the task of probing this question
thoroughly, we want, additionally, to shed some light on a few relevant
statements that we did not have the opportunity to take up in the body
of our text.

1) What belongs here, first of all, are the remarks made by Professor
Schulze-Gävernitz (“Der Nationalismus in Russland und seine
wirtschaftlichen Träger,” p. 344) regarding Russia’s _tariff policy_.
“Even the tariffs on coal, which make fuel more expensive for the
western border regions, serve Moscow’s interests.” Professor
Schulze-Gävernitz is so mistrustful about all of Russia’s measures in
trade policy that he has come to a conclusion here that is the exact
opposite of what he should have come to, based on all the evidence. If
coal tariffs make fuel more expensive for Polish _factories_, they
benefit Polish _coal-mining businesses_ to the same extent. At any rate,
the tariff is not aimed against Poland as such, but against one group of
capitalists—to the benefit of another group. But how the tariff on coal
could serve Moscow’s interests remains obscure. As an industrial region
that has to obtain its coal from elsewhere—because naphtha fuel for the
time being, as has been shown, can meet only a small part of the
demand—Moscow can scarcely derive any advantage from more expensive
coal. That is obvious. Also, the result of the “coal crisis,” as we have
seen, was that the central region saw itself forced to obtain fuel from
Poland, and the corresponding prices were of course higher. Thus the
Polish coal industry began massive sales of its product in the interior
of Russia.

2) Mr. S. G., in his article in _Neue Zeit_ on Russia’s industrial
policy in Poland (“Die industrielle Politik Russlands in dessen
polnischen Provinzen,” p. 790), asserts, among other things, that the
government of Russia “did not keep people waiting for long” before it
took measures against Polish industry. “First it raised the tax on trade
and industry in the Polish provinces …” This assertion is once again, to
put it mildly, unfounded. In 1887 the distribution of government taxes
in the various regions [of the Russian empire] was as follows:

  ------------------------------------------------- --------------------------------------
  _Regions_                                          _Percentage of all government taxes_
  St. Petersburg and Moscow gubernias (provinces)                   13.16%
  Southwestern region                                               8.10%
  Little Russia [Ukraine]                                           5.49%
  Black earth region                                                17.80%
  Central industrial region                                         9.12%
  Baltic region                                                     2.26%
  Northwestern region                                               6.08%
  Southern region                                                   8.43%
  Eastern region                                                    11.30%
  Northern region                                                   3.20%
  Caucasus                                                          1.20%
  Russia in Asia                                                    6.60%
  Poland                                                            6.05%
  ------------------------------------------------- --------------------------------------

  ------------------------------------------------- -------------------------------------------
  _Regions_                                          _Taxes as a percentage of total turnover_
  St. Petersburg and Moscow gubernias (provinces)                      4.26%
  Southwestern region                                                  8.47%
  Little Russia [Ukraine]                                              6.25%
  Black earth region                                                   7.73%
  Central industrial region                                            5.99%
  Baltic region                                                        3.50%
  Northwestern region                                                  7.84%
  Southern region                                                      4.39%
  Eastern region                                                       5.22%
  Northern region                                                      6.51%
  Caucasus                                          
  Russia in Asia                                    
  Poland                                                               6.01%
  ------------------------------------------------- -------------------------------------------

  ------------------------------------------------- ---------------------------------------
  _Regions_                                          _Public taxes per capita (in rubles)_
  St. Petersburg and Moscow gubernias (provinces)                    26.75
  Southwestern region                                                6.56
  Little Russia [Ukraine]                                            5.78
  Black earth region                                                 6.66
  Central industrial region                                          5.38
  Baltic region                                                      6.28
  Northwestern region                                                4.59
  Southern region                                   
  Eastern region                                                     5.05
  Northern region                                                    5.51
  Caucasus                                          
  Russia in Asia                                    
  Poland                                                             5.64
  ------------------------------------------------- ---------------------------------------

[Source:] (Sibir’ I sibirskaia magistralopolskii, [_Geographic
Distribution of Government Revenue in Russia_], Vol. 1, pages 131 and
236.)

As is evident from the above table, the distribution of the public tax
burden among the various regions is highly uneven; in many regions it is
significantly lower than in Poland, but in others much higher, so there
can be no question of a special tax policy toward Poland. Certainly
Polish landed property has a significantly heavier tax burden than its
Russian counterpart, but that is connected with causal factors of an
entirely different nature—among others, with the Polish nobility’s
battles in the past for freedom from Russian rule. In any case, it has
no connection with the question of present-day Russia’s industrial
policy toward Poland. As far as the special taxing of industry goes, and
in the given instance this is relevant, in 1887 it was significantly
lower in Poland than in the two main industrial regions of Russia, as
was shown in _Reports of the Members of the Commission for Investigation
of the Factory Industry in the Kingdom of Poland_, Vol. 1, p. 47, which
shows the ratio of taxes to value of production in 1887 [in the table
below]:

  ----------------- ---------- ------------------- ---------------------------
                     _Poland_   _Moscow province_   _St. Petersburg province_
  Cotton industry     0.33%           6.64%                   0.78%
  Linen industry      0.27%                                   0.59%
  Wool industry       0.28%           0.50%                   1.00%
  Metal industry      0.35%                                   0.61%
  ----------------- ---------- ------------------- ---------------------------

The higher percentages of taxation in Russia can certainly be explained
by various special circumstances, e.g., the ownership by Russian
entrepreneurs of forests, peat bogs, workers’ barracks, factory-linked
inns or taverns, etc.

With the constant swelling of the Russian budget, taxes on industry were
also raised in 1893, but this was done throughout the empire without
exception and on an equal basis. In all the materials that have been at
our disposal we found no trace of any special taxes whose aim was to
place Polish industry in a less favorable position than Russian
industry.

3) Lastly, this same author of the _Neue Zeit_ article about Russia’s
industrial policy toward Poland (S.G., “Die industrielle Politik
Russlands in dessen polnischen Provinzen,” p. 790) reports that the
Russian government “introduced the so-called _differential tariff_,
which means that goods going from Russia to Poland pay lower railroad
rates than those which are transported from Poland to Russia. By this
last measure the customs border between Poland and Russia was
reestablished.” Once again this tale is a figment of the author’s
imagination. This person had apparently heard something about the
introduction of a differential railroad rate in Russia, but had no
opportunity to find out what that actually was. This terrible measure,
however, simply meant that the railroad charge for goods transported
over longer distances would be calculated at a lower rate than goods
going shorter distances, and this had not the slightest thing to do with
special treatment of Poland.

There is one fact, or circumstance, that plainly lies at the basis of
the uninformed assertion made above by Mr. S. G., and that is the
following: As long as the policy for railroad rates in Russia was made
by the railroad companies on their own initiative, there existed on the
railroad lines going from the European border to the interior of Russia
a special lower rate for foreign goods. In 1891, when uniform regulation
of the transport system was introduced, the government regarded these
lower railroad rates from the border primarily as a direct violation of
the protective tariff wall, a violation that benefited foreigners, but
also as “an unjustified preferential treatment in railroad rates for the
industry of the border region (Poland and the Baltic provinces) relative
to the industry of central Russia” (with regard to the purchase of
foreign goods). (See _The Agriculture and Forest Industry of Russia_, p.
478.) The freight charges in dealings with foreign countries were also
brought into line with those of domestic commerce (ibid.). The
above-mentioned reform did not apply especially to Poland, as one can
see, but to all of Russia’s border regions, to areas on the Black Sea as
well as on the Baltic, and it conformed in its purposes with the general
aims of [the government’s] protective tariff policy. The mutual exchange
of goods between Poland and Russia, whose tariff reform Mr. S. G. is
discussing, was not even remotely an issue in this case, because what
the government was dealing with was direct trade by parts of the empire
with the outside world.

By the way, it ought to be pointed out that the “differential tariff,”
which Mr. S. G. knows how to report on in such a confident tone, is
purely fictional, [as is shown by] the exposition of the entire actual
course of events, which we have laid out for the detailed information of
the reader. The following figures suffice to refute the assertions made
by Mr. S. G.: The tariff on products of the textile industry (and of
course this industry is the one under discussion above all) “from Łódż
to Moscow _or from Moscow to Łódż_ amounted to 60 kopecks per pood (and
under the new tariff of 1893, 91 kopecks per pood), from _Moscow to
Odessa_ (that is, inside Russia itself) it was 86 kopecks (in 1893, 105
kopecks), and from Łódż to St. Petersburg _or in the reverse direction_
it was 62 kopecks (in 1893, 79 kopecks).” (See _Novosti_, August 1893.)
Thus the tariffs today, just as before, are calculated in exactly the
same manner for goods being transported from Poland to Russia as for the
same kind of goods going from Russia to Poland. All of Mr. S. G.’s
argumentation, including his grandiose conclusion about the
“reestablishment of the customs border between Poland and Russia,” must
therefore be thrown out onto the garbage heap.

One parting comment about this author [S. G.] who we have cited so many
times. In addition to those we have criticized here, most of the other
assertions and details in his article are either made up out of whole
cloth or turned upside down [_verkehrt_]. Thus, for example, he
manufactures some information about the establishment of the
Russian-Polish customs border, which as any third-grader in Poland
knows, was done in 1851, but S. G. declares that it was the direct
result of the Polish uprising of 1863 (“Die industrielle Politik
Russlands in dessen polnischen Provinzen,” p. 789). And so on. This and
all the other topsy-turvy assertions were obviously meant to demonstrate
that Polish capitalism was being destroyed by Russian persecution, and
from this [supposedly] a material basis could be derived for Polish
national aspirations. This method of basing a political programme on
statistical inaccuracies is in and of itself undoubtedly wrong, but let
it not be disputed that in the given instance one may sympathize very
much with the motivation behind these distortions—namely, the sincere
desire on the part of the author to contribute to the best of his
ability to the liberation of his country.

CLXVIII Lodyzhenskii, _Istoriia russkogo tamozhennogo tarifa_, p. 220.

CLXVIX Ibid., p. 245.

CLXX _The Factory Industry and Russian Trade_, “Introduction,” p. 29.

CLXXI This side of the question, which we cannot go into in more detail
here, has been dealt with by us quite thoroughly in a number of essays
related to the political development of Polish society. See “Der
Sozialpatriotismus in Polen” (Social Patriotism in Poland), _Neue Zeit_
(Stuttgart), 1895–96, No. 41, pp. 37–51; “Von Stufe zu Stufe. Zur
Geschichte der bürgerlichen Klassen in Polen” (Step by Step: Toward a
History of the Bourgeois Classes in Poland), _Neue Zeit_, 1897–98, No.
6, pp. 94–111; and “La questione polacca al Congreso internazionale di
Londra” (The Polish Question at the International Congress in London),
_Critica sociale, Revista quindicinale del Socialismo Scientifico_
(Milan), 1896, No. 14.

CLXXII See the decrees of December 1892 concerning repayment of customs
duties on exported products of the textile industry, and later on
exported sugar.

CLXXIII [The names of these banks were] Deutsch-Asiatische Bank;
Comptoir National d’Escompte de Paris; Hong Kong and Shanghai Banking
Corporation; Chartered Bank of India, Australia, and China; Chartered
Mercantile Bank of India, London and China; Bank of China, Japan and the
Straits.

CLXXIV _Vestnik Finansov_, No. 52, January 5, 1896.

CLXXV [On the source of the data in the following table see] _Sibir’ i
sibirskaia magistral’. Vsemirnaia kolumbbova vystavka v Chikago 1893_
(Siberia and the Great Siberian Railroad. [Report for the World’s Fair
in Chicago), Rossiia, Departament Torgovli, Ministervto Finansov (issued
by the Department of Trade of Russia’s Finance Ministry), St.
Petersburg, 1893], p. 246.

CLXXVI [On the source of the data in the table above see] _Productive
Forces of Russia_, [section on] “Foreign Trade,” p. 26.

CLXXVII [On the source of the data in the following table see] _Vestnik
Finansov_, No. 44, November 11, 1894.

CLXXVIII [On the source of the data in the following table see] _Vestnik
Finansov_, No. 44, November 11, 1894. In Bukhara, from 1890 through
1893, total sales of products from the textile industry of Russia
averaged 140,000 poods per year.

CLXXIX This was the year of the cholera outbreak.

CLXXX The figure for 1893 is also from _Vestnik Finansov_, No. 44,
November 11, 1894.

CLXXXI _Productive Forces of Russia_, Vol. VII, p. 5. According to
_Vestnik Finansov_, No. 44, November 11, 1894, it was 120,000 poods
yearly.

CLXXXII [On the source of the data in the following table see] _Vestnik
Finansov_, No. 52, January 10, 1897; also, _Productive Forces of
Russia_, [section on] “Foreign Trade,” pp. 25–6.

CLXXXIII One [researcher] who says this is B. H. Kuhn in his 1892 book
_Die Baumwolle, ihre Cultur, Structur und Verbreitung_ (Cotton: Its
Culture, Structure, and Distribution) [Vienna: A. Hartleben, 1892)]:
“Russian products show to advantage with respect to their
durability … For the most part only small quantities have been produced,
but with these Russia can compete successfully even with England.”
[Quoted in] (_Productive Forces of Russia_, Vol. I, p. 23).

CLXXXIV _Vestnik Finansov_, No. 44, November 11, 1894.

CLXXXV As was stated by the government, many sugar shipments gave their
destination as Central Asia merely for the sake of appearances, in order
to have the excise tax reimbursed, and taking advantage of the deficient
functioning of the border guards, simply sent the shipments “back to the
Fatherland.” Many shipments made the trip several times before they
actually reached their sales destination in Persia. This led the
government to temporarily suspend reimbursement of the excise tax on
sugar and to reorganize border guard operations (_Vestnik Finansov_, No.
15, April 25, 1897).

CLXXXVI The newspaper _Sibir_ (Siberia), January 8–20, 1897, reports:
“Some Moscow factories, in their relations with Siberia, have finally
decided to resort to the system of _commis voyageur_ [traveling agent],
but because of our clumsiness more confusion and misunderstanding than
necessary has arisen from this. In the summer the Konshin Company sent
its agent to Siberia with samples of goods, and not long ago he obtained
two orders from Vladivostok, but the company has already refused to fill
them exactly, because they are no longer able (they say) to produce
goods corresponding to the sample.”

CLXXXVII The same issue of _Sibir_ reports the following: “The firm
Pyotr Vereshchagin & Co. in Hankow, which intends to devote itself
exclusively to the sale of Russian goods in China, sent messages to 14
Moscow factories on September 6 (in 1896) requesting samples and above
all the initiation of regular relations, but to date (January 1897) only
a single reply has been forthcoming.”

CLXXXVIII _Vestnik Finansov_, No. 44, November 11, 1894.

CLXXXIX Thus the newspaper _Sibir_ wrote on January 20, 1897: “Protected
by nearly prohibitive tariffs and all sorts of other government
measures, the apathetic Moscow entrepreneurs do not feel any need for
new markets.”

CXC _Vestnik Finansov_, No. 52, January 10, 1897.

CXCI Cited in _Gazeta Polska_, December 3 and 5, 1894.

CXCII _Vestnik Finansov_, No. 44, November 11, 1894.

CXCIII _Diplomatic and Consular Reports. Foreign Office. Annual Series:
On the Trade of Warsaw_, No. 321 [1888], p. 5: “In consequence of some
important orders for carriages and linen which the Shah of Iran had
given to the manufacturers of those articles in Poland, the attention of
the mercantile community in this country was called to the possibility
of establishing direct commercial relations with Persia; … with this
object in view a [major] commission agent proceeded to that country
about the end of last year for the purpose of making himself thoroughly
acquainted with its markets, taking with him a considerable quantity of
samples of different kinds of goods, and it is said that, if his journey
is attended with favorable results, a wholesale depot and commission
agency will be opened at Teheran.”

CXCIV _Vestnik Finansov_, No. 44, November 11, 1894.

CXCV Ibid.

CXCVI Ibid.

CXCVII _Diplomatic and Consular Reports. Foreign Office. Annual Series:
On the Trade of Warsaw_, No. 321, p. 4.

CXCVIII _Gazeta Handlowa_, November 25, 1896.

CXCIX _Ateneum_, Vol. IV, No. II, pp. 241–2.

CC Diplomatic and Consular Reports. Foreign Office. Annual Series: _On
the Trade of Warsaw_, No. 321, p. 5.

CCI _Novosti_, November 4, 1893.

CCII We have taken this excerpt [from the Russian-language “Warsaw
Journal”] as quoted in Diplomatic and Consular Reports. Foreign Office.
Annual Series: On the Trade of the District of the Consulate-General at
Warsaw, No. 1183, p. 4.


BACK TO ADAM SMITH!

I This conception appeared even more crassly in, for example, Ad[am]
Smith, who in fact declared the “inclination to exchange” a distinctive
feature of human nature, after having sought it in vain among animals,
such as dogs, etc. As is well known, this, like so many other passages,
provided later bourgeois economists much occasion for superior smiles
and shoulder shrugs. Smith’s sassy young followers had no idea that his
“classical deduction” was most classically expressed precisely in the
old master’s much-mocked naïveté and that they, the bourgeois
economists, irrecoverably lost, along with that naïveté, their Samson’s
hair, the source of their research strength.

II In this light, the fact that attempts have conversely been made in
our ranks (recently and in all seriousness, and especially by those who
prolong their professional existence by discretely living on Marxian
treasures) to renovate and to “advance” this very same Marxian doctrine
by borrowing from the young bourgeois economists seems especially
tragi-comic. This procedure vividly reminds us of the drunk who
_partout_ wants to fetch a pinch of snuff from his own shadow.


INTRODUCTION TO POLITICAL ECONOMY

I Gustav Schmoller, “Volkswirtschaft, Volkswirtschaftslehre und-methode”
(Economics, Economic Doctrine, and Method), in _Handwörterbuch der
Staatswissenschaften_, Vol. 7, edited by Johannes Conrad, et al. (Jena:
G. Fischer, 1901), pp. 546–7.

II See Eugen Dühring, _Kritische Geschichte der Nationalökonomie und des
Sozialismus von ihren Anfängen bis zur Gegenwart_ (Critical History of
Political Economy and Socialism from its Beginnings to the Present)
(Leipzig: C. P. Naumann, 1899), p. 16.

III See Eugen Dühring, _Kritische Geschichte der Nationalökonomie_, pp.
20–6.

IV Gustav Schmoller, “Volkswirtschaft, Volkswirtschaftslehre
und-methode,” p. 546.

V Karl Bücher, _Die Entstehung der Volkswirtschaft; Vorträge und
Versuche_ (The Emergence of Economies: Lectures and Investigations),
fifth edition (Tübingen: H. Laupp, 1906), p. 85.

VI Ibid., pp. 141–2.

VII W[erner] Sombart, _Die deutsche Volkswirtschaft im Neunzehnten
Jahrhundert_ [The German National Economy in the Nineteenth Century],
second edition [Berlin: Georg Blondi Verlag,] 1909, pp. 400–20.

VIII Hermann Schulze-Delitsch, _Capitel zu einem deutschen
Arbeiterkatechismus. Sechs Vorträge vor dem Berliner Arbeiterverein_
(Leipzig: E. Keil, 1863), p. 15.

IX Ferdinand Lassalle, _Herr Bastiat—Schulze von Delitzsch_, pp. 72–5.

X Gottfried August Bürger, _Leonore_, in _Bürgers Werke in einem Band_
(Weimar: Volksverlag, 1962), p. 67.

XI Background in India: the “national economy” of the peasant community
is breaking up. Industry … The crude figures of imports and exports give
telling information on this. [Marginal note by R.L.]

XII Karl Bücher, _Die Entstehung der Volkswirtschaft_, p. 142.

XIII Nikolai Sieber, _David Ricardo und Karl Marx_, Moscow 1879, p. 480.
[N. J. Siber, “David Rikardo i Karl Marks v ish
obstchestvenno—ekonomitcheskich issiedowanijach” in _Isbrannyie
ekonomitscheskiye proisvedenija v dvuch tomach_, Vol. 1, Moscow, 1959,
pp. 448–9.]

XIV D., p. 245. [Charles Darwin, _Reise eines Naturforschers um die
Welt_, second edition (Stuttgart: E. Schweizerbart, 1899), p. 245.
Charles Darwin, _Journal of researches into the natural history and
geology of the various countries visited during the voyage of H.M.S.
Beagle under command of Captain Fitz Roy RN_ (London: John Murray,
1902), pp. 213–14.]

XV Karl Bücher, _Die Entstehung der Volkswirtschaft; Vorträge und
Versuche_, p. 135.

XVI Ibid., p. 136.

XVII Ferdinand Lassalle, “Die Wissenschaft und die Arbeiter,” in
_Ferdinand Lassalle’s Reden und Schriften. Neue Gesammtausgabe. Mit
einer biographischen Einleitung hrsg. von Ed. Bernstein_, Vol. 2
(Berlin: Verlag der Expedition Vorwärts, 1893), p. 83.

XVIII Cited in Maksim Kovalevsky, _Obshchinnoe Zemlevadenie. Priciny,
khod i posledstviia ego razlozeniia_ (Communal Land Ownership: The
Causes, Processes, and Consequences of its Disintegration), Volume 1
(Moscow, 1879), p. 81.

XIX Ibid., p. 78.

XX Ibid.

XXI Ibid., pp. 81–2.

XXII Information from [Heinrich] Cunow [_Die Soziale Verfassung des
Inkareichs. Eine Untersuchung des altperuanischen Agarkommunismus_ (The
Social Constitution of the Incas: An Investigation of Ancient Peruvian
Agrarian Communism) (Stuttgart: J.H.W. Dietz Verlag, 1896)], p. 6.

XXIII C.N. Starcke, _Die Primitive Familie in ihrer Entstehung und
Entwicklung_ (The Primitive Family in its Origin and Development)
(Leipzig: F.A. Brockhaus, 1888), p. 221.

XXIV The critiques and theories of Starcke and Westermarck were
subjected to a fundamental and devastating examination by von Cunow in
his _Verwandschaft-Organisationen der Australneger_ [Kinship
Organizations of the Black Australians (Stuttgart: J.H.W. Dietz Verlag,
1894)], to which the two gentlemen, as far as we know, have not answered
with a single word. This does not however prevent more recent
sociologists, such as von Grosse, for example, from being unashamedly
celebrated as refuters of Morgan and prime authorities. The same is more
or less true for Morgan-refuters as Marx-refuters: bourgeois science is
content with tendentious treatment of the hated revolutionaries, and
good intent substitutes here for any scientific achievement.

XXV Lippert, _Kulturgeschichte der Menschheit in ihrem organischen
Aufbau_, Vol. 2, Part 1, p. 40.

XXVI Karl Bücher, _Die Entstehung der Volkswirtschaft_, pp. 8–9.

XXVII Professor E[duard] Meyer, likewise, writes in his introductory
_Geschichte des Altertums_ [History of Antiquity (Stuttgart: J.G. Cotta,
1884–1902)], (p. 67): “The assumption of G. Hansen, well-founded and
generally accepted, that private ownership of land was everywhere
preceded originally by a common ownership, as Caesar and Tacitus
describe it among the Germans, has been strongly challenged in recent
years: the Russian _mir_, at least, only arose in the seventeenth
century.” This latter contention Professor Meyer takes over uncritically
from the old theory of the Russian Professor [Boris] Chicherin.

XXVIII Ernst Grosse, _Die Formen der Familie und die Formen der
Wirtschaft_ (The Forms of the Family and Forms of the Economy) (Freiburg
and Leipzig: J.C.B. Mohr, 1896), p. 3.

XXIX Ernst Grosse, _Die Anfänge der Kunst_ (The Beginnings of the Arts)
(Freiburg and Leipzig: P. Siebeck, 1894), pp. 34–5.

XXX Ibid., p. 35.

XXXI Ernest Grosse, _Die Formen der Familie und die Formen der
Wirtschaft_, pp. 4–5.

XXXII Collect material and “observed facts,” just like the Verein für
Sozialpol [Association for Social Politics] with monograph. [Marginal
note by R.L.]

XXXIII [Ernst] Grosse, _Die Anfänge der Kunst_, p. 34.

XXXIV H. S. Maine, _Village-Communities in the East and West_ (London:
J. Murray, 1913), p. 7.

XXXV Grosse, _Die Anfänge der Kunst_, pp. 35–7 and 38.

XXXVI Grosse, _Die Formen der Familie_, p. 238.

XXXVII Ibid., pp. 215 and 207.

XXXVIII Grosse, _Die Formen der Familie und die Formen der Wirthschaft_,
pp. 38–9.

XXXIX Ibid., p. 57.

XL Grosse, _Die Formen der Familie und die Formen der Wirthschaft_, p.
137.

XLI Ibid., pp. 30–1.

XLII [Alfred William] Howitt, cited in [Felix] Somló [_Der Güterverkehr
in der Urgesellschaft_ (Social Intercourse in Primitive Society)
(Brussels, Leipzig and Paris: Misch et Thron, 1909)], pp. 44–5. [See
Alfred William Howitt, _The Native Tribes of South-East Australia_
(Canberra: Aboriginal Studies Press, 1996) (first pub. 1904), p. 767.]

XLIII Friedrich Ratzel, _Völkerkunde_ [Ethnology], 2 vols. [(Leipzig:
Verlag des Bibliographie Institute, 1886)], p. 64.

XLIV [Alfred William] Howitt, cited in [Felix] Somló [_Der
Güterverkehr_], p. 42 [_The Native Tribes of South-East Australia_, p.
756. Emphases by R.L.].

XLV See Howitt [_The Native Tribes of South-East Australia_, p. 759],
cited in Somló [_Der Güterverkehr_], p. 43.

XLVI See Ratzel, [_Völkerkunde_, Vol. 1], p. 333.

XLVII William John McGee, _The Seri Indians_, p. 190. Cited in Somló,
_Der Güterverkehr_, pp. 124–5.

XLVIII Karl von den Steinen, _Unter den Naturvölkern Zentral-Brasiliens.
Reiseschilderung und Ergebnisse der zweiten Schinu-Expedition 1887–1888_
(Among the Primitive Peoples of Brazil. Travel Narrative and Results of
the Second Xingu Expedition) (Berlin: D. Reimer 1894), p. 491.

XLIX Karl von den Steinen, _Unter den Naturvölkern Zentral-Brasiliens_.
p. 502.

L Report of the 8th session of the International Congress of
Americanists in Paris, 1890, account of M. G. Marcel, Paris, 1892, p.
491. [Gabriel Marcel, _Les Fuégiens à la fin du XVIIe siècle. D’après
des documents français inédits. Congrès international des Américanistes.
Compte-rendu de la 8ème session, tenue à Paris en 1890_ (The Fuegians in
the Late Seventeenth Century, According to Unpublished French Documents.
International Congress of Americanists. Proceedings of the Eighth
Session held in Paris in 1890)].

LI See Man, cited after Somló, pp. 96–9. [E. H. Man, _On the Aboriginal
Inhabitants of the Andaman Islands_ (London: Bibling & Sons, 1932), p.
26.]

LII Siegfried Passarge, _Die Buschmänner der Kalahari_, (Berlin: D.
Raiser, 1907), p. 54.

LIII Ibid., pp. 57–8.

LIV See Somló [_Die Güterverkehr in der Urgesellschaft_], pp. 116.

LV Peruvians—but of course they’re not nomads. Arabs, Kabyls—Kirghiz,
Yakuts. Examples from [Émile Louis Victor de] Leveleye! [Marginal note
by R.L.]

LVI Ernst Grosse, _Die Formen der Familie_, p. 158.

LVII See Somló [_Die Güterverkehr in der Urgesellschaft_], pp. 155–77.

LVIII [Karl] Bücher, _Die Entstehung der Volkswirtschaft_, pp. 86–8.

LIX Ibid., p. 91.

LX See Georg Ludwig von Maurer, _Geschichte der Markenverfassung in
Deutschland_ (Erlangen: E. Enke, 1856), p. 119.

LXI This was also the position of craftsmen in the Greek communities of
the Homeric age: “All these people (metal worker, carpenter, musician,
doctor—R.L.) were _demiurgoi_ (from _demos =_ people—R.L.), i.e. they
worked for the members of the community rather than for themselves, they
were personally free, but were not accepted as full members, standing
below the real community members, the small farmers. They may well have
not been sedentary, but moved from place to place, or even, if they had
made a name for themselves, be called away.” (Eduard Meyer, _Die
wirtschaftliche Entwickelung des Altertums: ein Vortrag_ [The Economic
Development of Antiquity: A Lecture] [Jena: G. Fischer, 1895], p. 17.)

LXII [Max Weber, “Agrargeschichte. I:] Agrarverhältnisse im Altertum”
(Agrarian History, I: Agrarian Relations in Antiquity). [In]
_Handwörterbuch der Staatswissenschaften_, 2nd edn, Vol. 1, [Jena 1898],
p. 69.

LXIII C., pp. 37–88. [Ettore Cicotti, _Der Untergang der Sklaverei im
Altertum_ (The Decline of Slavery in Antiquity) (Berlin: Vorwärts,
1910)]

LXIV _Brevissima Relación de la destruycion de las Indias_ [Brief
Account of the Destruction of the Indies) (Sevilla: Sebastián Trugillo],
1552), cited in [Maksim] Kovalevsky, [_ObshchinnoeZemlevadenie. Priciny,
khod i posledstvija ego razlozenija_ (Communal Land Ownership: The
Causes, Processes, and Consequences of its Disintegration), Vol. 1
(Moscow 1879),] p. 47.

LXV Heinrich Handelmann, _Geschichte der Insel Hayti_ [History of the
Island of Haiti (Kiel: Schwere, 1856)], p. 6.

LXVI Girolamo Benzoni, _Storia del mundo nuovo_ [(History of the New
World) (Venezia: F. Rampazetto], 1565), cited in Kovalevsky, pp. 51–2.

LXVII [Pierre François-Xavier] Charleroix, _Histoire de l’Isle Espagnole
ou de St. Dominique_ [(History of the Island of Hispaniola and Santa
Dominica) (Paris: F. Barrois], 1730), part 1, p. 228, cited in
Kovalevsky, _Obshchinnoe Zemlevadenie_, p. 50.

LXVIII [José de] Acosta, _Historia natural y moral de las Indias_
[(Natural and Moral History of the Indies) (Barcelona: I. Cendrat,]
1591), cited in Kovalevsky [_Obshchinnoe Zemlevadenie_], p. 52.

LXIX Cited in Kovalevsky, _Obshchinnoe Zemlevadenie_, p. 49.

LXX Kovalevsky, _Obshchinnoe Zemlevadenie_, p. 49.

LXXI Relations here similar to those in India, Algeria (Russia), Java,
etc. [Marginal note by R.L.]

LXXII Zurita, [_Rapport sur les différentes classes de chefs dans la
Nouvelle-Espagne_], pp. 57–9, cited in Kovalevsky[, _Obshchinnoe
Zemlevadenie_,] p. 62.

LXXIII Zurita, [_Rapport sur les différentes classes de chefs dans la
Nouvelle-Espagne_,] p. 329, cited in Kovalevsky, [_Obshchinnoe
Zemlevadenie_,] pp. 62–3.

LXXIV Zurita, [_Rapport sur les différentes classes de chefs dans la
Nouvelle-Espagne_,] p. 329, cited in Kovalevsky, _Obshchinnoe
Zemlevadenie_,] p. 65.

LXXV Cited in Kovalevsky, [_ObshchinnoeZemlevadenie_,] p. 66.

LXXVI Cited in Kovalevsky, _Obshchinnoe Zemlevadenie_, p. 68.

LXXVII Zurita, [_Rapport sur les différentes classes de chefs dans la
Nouvelle-Espagne_,] p. 87, cited in Kovalevsky, [_Obshchinnoe
Zemlevadenie_,] p. 69.

LXXVIII Zurita, [_Rapport sur les différentes classes de chefs dans la
Nouvelle-Espagne_,] p. 341 [cited in Kovalevsky, _Obshchinnoe
Zemlevadenie_, p. 60].

LXXIX _Memorial que presenta a su Magestad el licenciado Juan Ortez de
Cervantes, Abogado y Procurador general der Reyno del Peru y
encomenderos, sobre pedir remedio del daño, y diminución des los Indios_
[Memorial Presented to His Majestry the Lawyer and Attorney General Juan
Ortez de Cervantes on the Encomenderos of the Kingdom of Peru on the
Request for the Remedy of the Damage and Diminution of the Indians],
[Madrid:] 1619, cited in Kovalevsky, [_ObshchinnoeZemlevadenie_,] p. 61.

LXXX 1. Canal building (division of labor). Despite this, mark
community. 2 Several types (Kovalevsky) of society. 3. All this remains
despite the Muslim conquest and feudalization. 4. English! [Marginal
note by R.L.]

LXXXI James Mill!! [Marginal note by R.L.]

LXXXII Karl Marx, _Das Kapital_, Vol. I [(Hamburg: Verlag von Otto
Meissner, 1867)], p. 321. [_Capital_ Volume One (New York: Penguin
Books, London 1976), pp. 477–9. Emphases by R.L.]

LXXXIII The new edition of the _Handwörterbuch_ on Plekhanov and Russian
Social-Democracy. However, Engels in “Afterword [1894] to Social
Relations in Russia” [See _Marx-Engels Collected Works_, Vol. 27 (New
York: International Publishers, 1990), pp. 432–3].

LXXXIV 1 _dessiatine =_ 1.09 hectares [about two and a half acres].

LXXXV See [W. G.] Trirogov, [_Obstschina i podat_, St. Petersburg:
Suvorina, 1882,] p. 49.

LXXXVI The first “audit,” which Peter enacted by ukase in 1719, was
organized like a kind of penal expedition on foreign soil. The military
was ordered to handcuff defaulting governors and place them under arrest
in their own office, leaving them there “until they improve.” Clerics
who were assigned the task of implementing the peasant list and allowed
the concealment of “souls” to go on, were relieved of their positions
and “after being subjected to a relentless beating upon the body, had to
submit to penal servitude, even if they were advanced in age.” People
who were suspected of hiding “souls” were placed on tenterhooks. The
later “audits” continued to be just as bloody, though they were carried
out with decreasing stringency.

LXXXVII See C[arl] Lehmann and [Alexander] Parvus [_Das hungernde
Russland. Reiseeindrücke, Beobachtungen und Untersuchungen_ (Stuttgart:
J.H.W. Dietz, 1900)].

LXXXVIII _Stanleys und Camerons Reisen durch Afrika_ [Richard
Oberländer, _Livingstones Nachfolger. Afrika von Osten nach Westen quer
durchwandert von Stanley und Cameron. Nach den Tagebüchern, Berichten
und Aufzeichungen der Reisenden_ (Livingston’s Successor, Across Africa
from East to West, Travels of Stanley and Cameron. According to the
Diaries, Reports, and Records of the Travelers) (Leipzig : Otto Spamer,
1879)], pp. 74–80.

LXXXIX We shall go on to examine whether, or how far, such a hypothesis
is justified. [Marginal note by R.L.]

XC Now however it is no longer the community as a whole that he deals
with and that always has a need for his product, but rather the
individual community members. [Marginal note by R.L.]

XCI Social labor 1) as sum of the labors of the members of society for
each other, 2) in the sense that the product of each individual is
itself a result of the collaboration of many (raw materials, tools),
even the whole society (science, need). In _both_ cases, the social
character is mediated by exchange. Knowledge in the future community, in
slave society and today. [Marginal note by R.L.]

XCII NB. Overproduced, unexchangeable commodities and unconsumable
stocks in an organized society: commercial community (Indian rice),
slave and _corvée_ economy. Relationship between “need” (incalculable
need on the one hand and overproduction of unsalable commodities on the
other), overproduction in socialist society. [Marginal note by R.L.]

XCIII Cotton drove out linen in the nineteenth century. [Marginal note
by R.L.]

XCIV Aristotle on slavery. [Marginal note by R.L.]

XCV The discarding of use-value is complete in metallic money. [Marginal
note by R.L.]

XCVI [Joseph François Lafitau], _Mœurs des sauvages américains comparées
aux mœurs des premiers temps_ [Habits of the American Indians Compared
with the Morals of the Early Times) (Paris: Saugrain laîné, 1724)], Vol.
2, pp. 322–3, cited in [N.J.] Sieber [“David Ricardo i Karl Marks b ich
obstchestvenno—ekonomistcheskich issledovaniach,” in _Isbrannyie
ekonomistcheskie orisuvedenia v dvuch tomach_, Vol. 1, Moscow, 1959], p.
245.

XCVII NB. Prehistoric discoveries! _First_ of all, nomadism. [Marginal
note by R.L.]

XCIII Sieber, [“David Ricardo i Karl Marks b ich obstchestvenno,”] pp.
245–6.

XCIX Sieber, [“David Ricardo i Karl Marks b ich obstchestvenno,”] p.
246. [Marginal note by R.L.]

C _Reise zu den Nilquellen_ [_Der Albert Nyanza, das große Becken des
Nil und die Erforschung der Nilquellen_, t. 1 (Jena: Costenoble, 1867)],
p. 326. [Samuel Baker, _The Albert N’Yanza Basin of the Nile; and
Exploration of the Nile Sources_ (London: Macmillan and Co., 1866), p.
380.]

CI Why did precious metals keep this role? [Marginal note by R.L.]

CII Sieber, [“David Ricardo i Karl Marks b ich obstchestvenno,”] p. 247.
[Marginal note by R.L.]

CIII NB. Replacement of useful metals by precious metals, particularly
gold. [Marginal note by R.L.]

CIV More detail. [Marginal note by R.L.]

CV Karl Marx, _Das Kapital_, Vol. 1, p. 197. [Marginal note by R.L.]
[_Capital_ Vol. 1, p. 345.]

CVI Karl Marx, _Das Kapital_, Vol. 1, pp. 198–200. [Marginal note by
R.L.] [_Capital_ Vol. 1, pp. 346–8.]

CVII NB. _Faux frais_ [incidentals] of unplanned society; this must as
it were produce once more its total wealth. [Marginal note by R.L.]

CVIII NB. Cultural importance of trade from prehistory on.
_International_ connection! [Marginal note by R.L.]

CIX NB. Money illusions: hunt for gold—discovery of America. Charles V’s
mercantile policy. Alchemy (gold). [Marginal note by R.L.]

CX Natural economy. [Marginal note by R.L.]

CXI Cf. John Bellers, [Eduard] Bernstein, _Engl[ish] Rev[iew]_, p. 354.
[Marginal note by R.L.] [See “John Bellers, Champion of the Poor and
Advocate of a League of Nations,” in Eduard Bernstein, _Sozialismus und
Demokratie in der grossen englischen Revolution_ (Socialism and
Democracy in the Great English Revolution) (Stuttgart: J.H.W. Dietz,
1908). For an English translation, see _Cromwell and Communism_, by
Eduard Bernstein (London: George Allen & Unwin, 1963), chapter 17.]

CXII Thomas Robert Malthus, _Principles of Political Economy Considered.
With a View to their Practical Application_ (chapter 7, section 4)
(London: John Murray, 1820), p. 383.

CXIII Interests of capitalist production itself? [Marginal note by R.L.]

CXIV Egyptian slavery. [Marginal note by R.L.]

CXV Since the introduction of general military service, the average
height of adult men has steadily declined, and with it the legally
prescribed size for enlistment. Before the great Revolution, the minimum
height for infantrymen in France was 165 cms, then a law of 1818 reduced
this to 157 cms, and it was further reduced to 156 cms in 1852, while on
average, over half of men called up in France are rejected on account of
insufficient height or weakness. In Saxony, the military height in 1780
was 178 cms, whereas by the 1860s it was only 155 cms, and 157 cms in
Prussia. In 1858, Berlin could not supply its replacement contingent,
being 156 men short.

CXVI Rise of the reserve army. [Marginal note by R.L.]

CXVII Typhus in India due to hunger. [Marginal note by R.L.]

CXVIII Extermination of primitive peoples. [Marginal note by R.L.]



 EDITOR’S NOTES


INTRODUCTION

¹ To Leo Jogiches (April 19, 1899), in _Rosa Luxemburg, Gesammelte
Briefe_, Band 1 (Berlin: Dietz Verlag, 1989), p. 307. Wladyslaw Heine
was a fellow Pole who studied with Rosa Luxemburg at the University of
Zurich during the time she was writing her dissertation, _The Industrial
Development of Poland_.

² For an especially valuable work that sheds important illumination on
Luxemburg’s contribution to this conception, see _In the Steps of Rosa
Luxemburg: Selected Writings of Paul Levi_, edited and introduced by
David Fernbach (Leiden and Boston: Brill, 2011).

³ One of the difficulties in obtaining access to Luxemburg’s entire
legacy is that her manuscripts are not found in one place but are in an
assortment of archives and libraries, such as the Bonn Archives of the
Social-Democratic Party, the SAMPO Federal Archives in Berlin, the
Polish State Archives in Warsaw, the International Institute of Social
History in Amsterdam, the Russian State Archive for Social and Political
History in Moscow, and the Hoover Institution at Stanford University in
California.

⁴ See especially the companion volume to the _Complete Works, The
Letters of Rosa Luxemburg_, edited by Georg Adler, Peter Hudis, and
Annelies Laschitza (London and New York: Verso Books, 2011).

⁵ Although an impressive number of works on Luxemburg have appeared in
the English-speaking world in the past decade, most have focused on her
political writings without emphasizing her work as an economic theorist.
An important exception is _Rosa Luxemburg and the Critique of Political
Economy_, edited by Riccardo Bellofiore (London and New York: Routledge,
2009). See also _Socialist Studies/Études Socialistes_, Vol. 6, No. 2
(2010) for its special issue on Luxemburg.

⁶ A section of the manuscript on slavery in the ancient world was
published in _The Rosa Luxemburg Reader_, edited by Peter Hudis and
Kevin B. Anderson (New York: Monthly Review Books, 2004), pp. 111–22.

⁷ To Leo Jogiches, January 9, 1899, in _Gesammelte Briefe_, Band 1, pp.
249–50.

⁸ For the circumstances under which Luxemburg revised her dissertation
for publication as a book, see _The Letters of Rosa Luxemburg_, pp. 49,
62, 66, 75, 87–8. Those who praised the work included her dissertation
director, Julius Wolf, an important economist in his own right who did
not let his objections to the Marxian doctrine get in the way of
appreciating his inquisitive and combative student. For Wolf’s critique
of Marxism, see his _Sozialismus und Kapitalistische
Gesellschaftsordung. Kritische Würdingung beider als Grundlegung einer
Sozialpolitik_ (Socialism and Capitalist Social Organization. An
Assessment of Both as a Critical Foundation for Social Policy)
(Stuttgart: J.G. Cotta, 1892). Luxemburg’s view of Wolf is contained, in
part, in the manuscript “Theory of the Wages Fund,” written while she
attended the University of Zurich, in 1897. It appears here as an
Appendix.

⁹ _The Industrial Development of Poland_, p. 73, below.

¹⁰ For a recent discussion of Marx’s writings on Poland, see Kevin B.
Anderson, _Marx at the Margins: On Nationality, Ethnicity, and
Non-Western Societies_ (Chicago: University of Chicago Press, 2010), pp.
42–79.

¹¹ _The Industrial Development of Poland_, p. 64, below.

¹² J.P. Nettl referred to the period from 1906–1909 as “the lost years.”
See Chapter 9 of _Rosa Luxemburg_ (London: Oxford University Press,
1966). For a different assessment of this period, see Raya Dunayevskaya,
_Rosa Luxemburg, Women’s Liberation, and Marx’s Philosophy of
Revolution_ (New Jersey: Humanities Press, 1981), pp. 1–30; and Annelies
Laschitza, _Im Lebensrausch, trotz alledem Rosa Luxemburg_ (Berlin:
Aufbau-Verlag, 1996), pp. 215–429.

¹³ Heinrich Schulz, the SPD’s educational expert, explained the impetus
for starting the school: “The Russian revolution released a flood of
energy and mobility … and the desire for discussing the fundamental
questions … [the need for] theoretical education increased accordingly.”
See Heinrich Schulz, “Zwei Jahre Arbeiterbildung,” _Die Neue Zeit_, Band
2, No. 50, September 11, 1908, p. 883.

¹⁴ Nettl, _Rosa Luxemburg_, p. 392.

¹⁵ Quoted in Ibid., p. 394.

¹⁶ _The Mass Strike, the Political Party, and the Trade Unions_, in _The
Rosa Luxemburg Reader_, p. 185.

¹⁷ _Introduction to Political Economy_, p. 140, below.

¹⁸ See _The Letters of Rosa Luxemburg_, p. 118: “As for the statement
that it is ridiculous to be an idealist in the German movement, I don’t
agree with that … Because the _suprema ratio_ [supreme principle] with
which I have succeeded in all my Polish–German revolutionary practical
work is this: always to be myself, without any regard to the
surroundings or other people. Indeed, I am an idealist and will remain
one, as much in the German movement as in the Polish.” (Letter to
Jogiches of May 1, 1899.)

¹⁹ See her letter to Wilhelm Pieck of August 1, 1908, in _Gesammelte
Briefe_, Band 2, p. 365.

²⁰ This represents one relatively early version of the subjects that she
lectured on at the party school. Unfortunately, we have no records of
the content of most of her courses from 1907 to 1914.

²¹ The planned table of contents as of 1910 reads as follows: 1) What Is
Political Economy?; 2) Social Labor; 3) Material on Economic History
(primitive communism, slave economy, _corvée_ economy, guild commerce);
4) Exchange; 5) Wage Labor; 6) The Rule of Capital (rate of profit); 7)
Crises; 8) Tendencies of the Capitalist Economy.

²² _Introduction to Political Economy_, p. 296, below.

²³ Ibid., p. 300, below.

²⁴ The planned table of contents as of 1916 reads as follows: 1) What Is
Economics?; 2) Social Labor; 3) Economic-Historical Perspectives:
Primitive Communist Society; 4) Economic-Historical Perspectives: Feudal
Economic System; 5) Economic-Historical Perspectives: The Medieval Town
and Craft Guild; 6) Commodity Production; 7) Wage Labor; 8) The Profit
of Capital; 9) The Crisis; 10) The Tendencies of Capitalist Development.

²⁵ See her letter to Johann Heinrich Dietz of July 18, 1916, in
_Gesammelte Werke_, Band 6, p. 130. As of this point she had completed
the first three chapters, while the rest was ready in draft form. She
still intended for the respective chapters to appear first as separate
brochures or pamphlets, with the complete book published afterwards.

²⁶ See “Back to Adam Smith!,” pp. 86, below.

²⁷ The precise date of composition for these three manuscripts is
unknown, but they appear to have been composed between 1909 and 1913.

²⁸ Rosi Wolfstein made these four transcripts of Luxemburg’s lectures in
1912–13.

²⁹ Wolf stein was the wife of Paul Frölich, Luxemburg’s biographer.
Frölich had access to these manuscripts and typescripts in the 1920s and
intended to publish them as part of Luxemburg’s Complete Works. That
project was cut short, however, by Luxemburg’s denunciation by the
international communist movement in mid-1920s, and the materials were
largely forgotten until six of the seven were rediscovered by Prof.
Narihiko Ito in 2001 at the Russian State Archive for Social and
Political History in Moscow. The other two manuscripts—Luxemburg’s notes
on slavery and on the history of political economy—are at the SAMPO
Federal Archives in Berlin. See Narihiko Ito, “Erstveröfftenlichung von
Rosa Luxemburgs Schrift ‘Slavery,’ ” in _Jahrbuch für Historische
Kommunishmus-forschung_ (Berlin: Aufbau-Verlag, 2002). I wish to thank
Narihiko Ito for making copies of the original manuscripts available to
us, and Prof. Michael Krätke for providing us with electronic
transcripts of the seven manuscripts.

³⁰ I wish to thank Éric Sevault for his assistance with some of the
footnotes to the _Introduction to Political Economy_ and manuscripts
from the party school that are found in this volume. See _Rosa
Luxemburg, À l’école du socialism, Oeuvres completes_, Tome II (Paris:
Agone & Smolny, 2012).

³¹ Luxemburg undoubtedly composed a number of manuscripts in preparation
for her lectures and the _Introduction to Political Economy_ that have
not survived. For instance, there is no manuscript of her research on
the Middle Ages, even though we have a lengthy transcript of her lecture
on that subject at the party school.

³² The popularity of Luxemburg’s lectures was attested to by her
secretary and friend Mathilde Jacob: “Even if some of the numerous
listeners who came to the Bartsch Assembly rooms in Neukölln [where
Luxemburg’s lectures were given] on these Sunday mornings did not always
agree with her conclusions, everybody followed the masterly dialectical
exposition with keen interest.” See Mathilde Jacob, _Rosa Luxemburg: An
Intimate Portrait_, translated by Hans Fernbach with an Introduction by
David Fernbach (London: Lawrence & Wishart, 2000), p. 25.

³³ Although Luxemburg was asked by Karl Kautsky to help prepare Marx’s
voluminous manuscripts and unpublished work for publication, she turned
down the request. It is therefore unclear if she knew of Marx’s
“Notebooks on Kovalevsky” or the other materials composed by him at the
end of his life on pre-capitalist societies.

³⁴ Laschitza’s tireless research and compilation of Luxemburg’s
manuscripts, letters and papers, along with the work of Narihiko Ito,
Holger Politt, Feliks Tych, and others, has proven of indispensable
importance in bringing to light Luxemburg’s multifaceted legacy.

³⁵ Michael Krätke, “Rosa Luxemburgs unveröffentlichte Texte zur
Politischen Ökonomie,” in _Rosa Luxemburg als politische Ökonomin:
Unveröffentlichte ökonomische Schriften_ (Berlin: Dietz Verlag,
forthcoming).

³⁶ For a critique of this reading of Marx, see C. J. Arthur’s _The New
Dialectic and Marx’s Capital_ (Leiden and Boston: Brill, 2002).

³⁷ Paul Frölich, _Rosa Luxemburg_ (New York: Modern Reader, 1972), p.
149. See also Krätke, “Rosa Luxemburgs unveröffentlichte Texte zur
Politischen Ökonomie”: “Popularization does not mean, however, that
economic theory is replaced by economic history, it means rather to
trace the logic of the historical development of a mode of production,
showing their contradictions.”

³⁸ To Clara Zetkin, late June 1909, in _Gesammelte Werke_, Band 3, p.
39.

³⁹ See _Introduction to Political Economy_, p. 162, below.

⁴⁰ Ibid, p. 227, below.

⁴¹ Ibid., p. 295, below.

⁴² To Leo Jogiches, January 9, 1899, in _Gesammelte Briefe_, Band 1, pp.
249–50.

⁴³ For more on the critical importance of the concept of dissolution in
Marx’s critique of capitalism, see Peter Hudis, _Marx’s Concept of the
Alternative to Capitalism_ (Leiden and Boston: Brill, 2012).

⁴⁴ See the _Introduction to Political Economy_, p. 144, below: “It is
clear then why Marx placed his own economic doctrine outside official
political economy, calling it a ‘critique of political economy.’ The
laws of capitalist anarchy and its future downfall that Marx brought to
light are certainly a continuation of the political economy that was
created by bourgeois scholars, but a continuation whose final results
stand in very sharp contrast to the points of departure of this. The
Marxian doctrine is a child of political economy, but a child that cost
its mother her life.”

⁴⁵ See Georg Lukács, “Reification and the Consciousness of the
Proletariat,” in _History and Class Consciousness: Studies in Marxist
Dialectics_ (London: Merlin Press, 1968), p. 170.

⁴⁶ See Rosa Luxemburg, _The Accumulation of Capital: An Anti-Critique_
(New York: Modern Reader, 1972), p. 77.

⁴⁷ _Introduction to Political Economy_, p. 134, below.

⁴⁸ Friedrich Engels, “A Critique of the Draft Programme of 1891,” in
_Marx-Engels Collected Works_, Vol. 27 (New York: International
Publishers, 1990), p. 224.

^(49X) _Introduction to Political Economy_, p. 134, below.

⁵⁰ For more on this, see Peter Hudis, “Rosa Luxemburg’s Concept of a
Post-Capitalist Society,” in _Critique_, Vol. 40, No. 3 (2012), pp.
323–35.

⁵¹ _Introduction to Political Economy_, p. 251, below.

⁵² _Economic and Philosophical Manuscripts of 1844_, in _Marx-Engels
Collected Works_, Vol. 3 (New York: International Publishers, 1975),
p.p. 279-80.

⁵³ The German edition of the _Complete Works_, published by Dietz Verlag
in Berlin, is currently being supplemented by a number of additional
volumes containing material that did not appear earlier in the
_Gesammelte Werke_. All of these writings will be included in the
English-language _Complete Works_.


THE INDUSTRIAL DEVELOPMENT OF POLAND

¹ A reference to Book of Revelation in the New Testament, in which John,
the author of the fourth gospel, reports that the revelation was secured
by seven wax seals.

² The first partition of Poland between Prussia, Austria–Hungary, and
Russia occurred in 1772; the second partition occurred in 1793. The
third and final partitioning of Poland occurred in 1795, in which Poland
was absorbed in the three surrounding empires.

³ The Duchy of Warsaw was established in 1807 by Napoleon. It consisted
of Prussian-occupied parts of Poland that were surrendered under the
terms of the Treaties of Tilset. It did not function as a truly
independent country, serving as a satellite state of France. It was
occupied and divided between Prussia and Russia following Napoleon’s
defeat in Russia in 1814.

⁴ After the defeat of Napolean, the European heads of state gathered at
the Congress of Vienna, from September 18, 1814 to June 9, 1815, to
implement a territorial reorganization of Europe. Among other things,
the Congress of Vienna established a nominally independent Kingdom of
Poland, subordinated to the tsarist regime through a “personal union”
with Russia under Tsar Alexander I. This “Kingdom of Poland” is also
frequently referred to as “Congress Poland,” since the Congress of
Vienna founded it.

⁵ On November 21, 1806, Napoleon prohibited the countries of the
European Continent from having any economic dealings with Great Britain.
This embargo was meant to isolate England and bring all of Europe under
the control of the French Empire. This policy collapsed by 1812 in the
face of Britain’s economic power, its military control of the seas, and
the resistance of several of the European countries to the embargo,
especially Russia.

⁶ That is, with goods in kind.

⁷ In the original edition the name is given as “Coqueril.” John
Cockerill was a British-born Belgian entrepeneur whose steel factories
in Liège helped spur the industrial revolution in Belgium. After the
company that he founded (named after himself) went bankrupt in 1839 due
to a banking scandal, he traveled to Russia to expand his business and
raise funds. He died while staying in Warsaw in 1840. For a study of his
company’s impact on Russia and Poland, see “John Cockerill in Southern
Russia, 1885–1905: A study of Aggressive Foreign Entrepreneurship,”
_Business History Review_, Vol. 41, No. 3 (Autumn 1967), pp. 243–56.
Joseph Fraget (1797–1867) was a French businessman who set up a famous
tableware factory in Warsaw, in 1824, with his brother Alfons Fraget.
Philippe de Girard was a French entrepreneur who was invited to
Russian-occupied Poland in 1825 to help create the country’s textile
industry. The town in which his biggest factory was located, Zyradów
(about twenty-seven miles southwest of Warsaw) is named after him.

⁸ The Napoleonic code was established by Napoleon I in 1804 and became
subsequently adopted by numerous countries conquered by or allied with
France. This comprehensive civil code eliminated many feudal laws by
stipulating, among other things, that government jobs be based on
qualifications and not birth. It also allowed for freedom of religion.

⁹ The German _Seehandlung_, or Prussian Maritime Enterprise, was a
trading firm established by Frederick the Great of Prussia in the early
1760s. It served as a predecessor of the Prussian State Bank,
established in 1765.

¹⁰ Kankrin was Russia’s Finance Minister from 1823 to 1844.

¹¹ A military revolt in Warsaw on November 29, 1830, developed into a
popular uprising against foreign rule, i.e., the rule of the Russian
tsars. Nearly a year later, with the recapture of Warsaw by Russian
troops on September 7, 1831, the uprising was suppressed.

¹² The Scheibler firm was founded in 1848 by Karol Scheibler, a German
industrialist who was a citizen of Belgium. He played an instrumental
role in helping to initiate the industrialization of Lodz. By the 1870s
his firm was one of the largest textile manufacturers in Europe.

¹³ Zyrardow, a town in central Poland, was founded as a textile factory
in 1833. The factory was owned by Philippe de Girard, which the town is
named after. Girard was hired by the Kingdom of Poland in 1825 to create
a textile industry in the country. He had earlier invented the first
flax spinning frame. The factory developed into one of the most
important centers of textile production in nineteenth-century Poland.

¹⁴ D. A. Timiriazev (ed.), _Istoriko-statisticheskii obzor
promyshlennosti Rossii_ (Historico-Statistical Review of the Industry of
Russia), Vol. 2, (St. Petersburg, 1883), p. 23.

¹⁵ The verst, an old Russian measure of distance, was the equivalent of
about two-thirds of a mile, i.e., approximately 3,500 feet to the mile’s
5,280 feet.

¹⁶ A wave of peasant revolts in 1860–61 culminated in the popular
uprising of January 22, 1863. The rebellion, which occurred in the
Kingdom of Poland, and in Lithuania, Belorussia, and parts of Ukraine,
was directed against both national and social oppression by the tsarist
regime, was bloodily suppressed during 1863 and 1864. Marx, who
supported the uprising, considered it one of the most significant
revolts of the nineteenth century. See Karl Marx, “Proclamation on
Poland by the German Workers’ Educational Society in London,” in
_Marx-Engels Collected Works_, Volume 19 (New York: International
Publishers, 1984), p. 296: “The Polish question is the German question.
Without an independent Poland there can be no independent or united
Germany, no emancipation of Germany from the Russian domination that
began with the first partition of Poland.”

¹⁷ The British entrepreneur John Hughes was actually Welsh, not English.
His company, the New Russia Association for Coal, Iron, and Rails
Production, contracted with the Russian government in 1869 to build an
ironworks and produce rails for Russia’s railroads. Hughes brought about
seventy British engineers and technicians to southern Russia and founded
a town in a coal basin there, the Donets Basin (the so-called, Donbas,
now part of Ukraine). The town was given the name “Hughes-ovka”—in
Russian, Yúzovka (today Donetsk). Hughes’s company built a vast
industrial complex, including mines, blast furnaces, rolling mills,
metallurgical plants, repair shops, etc.

¹⁸ The Zyrardow factory was actually 45 kilometers outside of Warsaw.

¹⁹ However, a small river does run through Łódż.

²⁰ The term “fustian” originally referred to a coarse cloth of cotton
and linen, but now means thick cotton cloth with a short nap, such as
velveteen or corduroy.

²¹ Lancort is a cheap kind of cotton cloth originally made in Lancourt,
a textile town in Belgium.

²² Bjas is a fabric woven out of cotton from Bukhara.

²³ Bjas is a word that is Arabic in origin. In Russian, the term occurs
as _byaz_ and sometimes means “coarse calico” but also may refer to a
less coarse type of cotton cloth, as used for underwear or sheets.

²⁴ Mitkal in Russian means calico.

²⁵ The word “vigogne” is derived from a word derived from “vicuña,” the
very fine wool of the animal (native to the Andean region of South
America) that it is named after.

²⁶ Werdau and Crimmitschau were textile towns in the state of Saxony in
Germany.

²⁷ Roubaix was a textile center in France. The firm referred to here,
General Company of the Spinning Industry Allart Rousseau Joint Stock
Company, operated from 1879 to 1949.

²⁸ A pood is eqiuvalent to 16.38 kilograms, or 36.11 pounds.

²⁹ The term “new Russia” was used by the tsarist government from the
mid-1700s onward to refer to Ukraine, Crimea, Bessarabia and parts of
southern Russia that it had conquered from the Crimean Khanate, the
Ottoman Empire, and other states. The term has been rejected as a
description of their homeland by Ukrainians.

³⁰ The Congress of Berlin, in which all the major powers of Europe took
part, along with the Ottoman Empire, took place June 13–July 13, 1878,
and brought an end to the Russo-Turkish war of 1877–78. The decisions of
the congress mainly revolved around the partial dismemberment of the
Ottoman Empire. Russia obtained several areas in Asia, and
Austria-Hungary was given the right to occupy Bosnia-Herzegovina. In
addition, several Balkan territories that had previously been under the
Turkish rule attained formal independence.

³¹ The Trans-Siberian railroad was inaugurated in 1890. Although it was
heralded at the time for opening up eastern Asia to European commerce,
it initially had the disadvantage of having only one track, enabling
traffic to move in only one direction at a time.

³² The tsarist government was forced, as of March 2, 1864, to abolish
serfdom in Poland and thereby to guarantee to the Polish peasantry the
rights they had won during the fighting and social upheavals of 1863–64.

³³ That is, curative elements that can transform it.

³⁴ In the text of the following endnote by Luxemburg the quotations were
in English, and have been reproduced here in the Victorian English in
which they were written. As Luxemburg explains at the end of her
footnote, she took these quotations, or “excerpts,” from the _Blue Book_
of the _Royal Commission on Labor, Foreign Reports_ (Vol. X, on Russia,
1894). In turn, the _Blue Book_ apparently quoted them from Foreign
Office _Diplomatic and Consular Reports: On the Trade of Warsaw_ of
1888.

³⁵ The reference is to Sergei Fedorovich Sharapov, a conservative
Russian politician who argued against the introduction of foreign
capital into Russia on the grounds that it undermined domestic industry.
He advocated a strong, autarkic national state.

³⁶ Ivanovo-Voznesensk was a center of the Russian textile industry.

³⁷ We have been unable to locate the identity of “Ilyin.”

³⁸ We have been unable to locate the identity of “Ber.”

³⁹ A possible reference to Semyon Semyonovich Abamelik-Lazareva, a
leading Russian mining magnate, industrialist and scholar, who later
made important contributions to archeology.

⁴⁰ Naphtha is a by-product created by the processing of crude oil; it is
similar to gasoline. In the period in which Luxemburg was writing,
naphtha was often used to heat steam engines (along with kerosene).
Naphtha residue is what remains after naphtha has been distilled for
obtaining various lighting and heating oils. At the time she was
writing, most naphtha residue was produced in Baku, in modern-day
Azerbaijan.

⁴¹ Naphtha coal is produced by the distillation of coal tar. Naphtha can
also be obtained from shale and crude oil.

⁴² In addition to being a pathbreaking chemist and inventor who first
formulated the periodic table of the elements, Mendeleyev helped found
the first oil refinery in Russia and wrote extensively on the
composition of crude oil. For a study of this dimension of his work, see
John Moore, Conrad Staniski, and Peter Jurs, _Chemistry: The Molecular
Science_, Vol. I (Belmont, CA: Brooks/Cole, 2008).

⁴³ This is because naphtha residue is what remains after naphtha has
been distilled for obtaining various lighting and heating oils.

⁴⁴ Luxemburg’s footnote to this sentence was added to her dissertation
after it had been approved in May 1897 by Zurich University and while it
was being prepared for publication by the Duncker & Humblot book
company.

⁴⁵ All other things being equal.

⁴⁶ A _desyatin_ is 2,700 acres.

⁴⁷ A berkovets measures mass and weight in Old Russian. One berkovets is
equal to about 163.8 kilograms.

⁴⁸ One-headed and two-headed eagles symbolize Poland and Russia,
respectively.

⁴⁹ The Moscow Agricultural Society was founded in 1819 as a forum to
discuss agricultural policy. Most of its members came from the
conservative, landowning nobility. Leading members of the Society, such
as Shcherbatov, advocated the elimination of the peasant communes and
the establishment of private property and a market economy.

⁵⁰ The decree of March 14, 1887, prohibited foreigners from acquiring
real estate in the entire western zone of Russia. In 1892 it was made a
condition of employment for all factory official that they have
knowledge of Polish or Russian.

⁵¹ A war of all against all.

⁵² The footnote to this sentence is another instance in which Luxemburg
added material after the May 1897 approval of her dissertation. This
July 1897 addition, for the book version of her doctoral thesis, is
apparently from the Russian-language _Newspaper of Trade and Industry_
(or more literally, “Commercial-Industrial Gazette”).

⁵³ Drucki-Lubecki was Finance Minister from 1821 to 1830. By removing
customs barriers between Congress Poland and Russia, he enabled Polish
capital to obtain new markets in the East. He also founded the National
Bank of Poland, in 1828.

⁵⁴ In actuality, Finland was to become politically independent in
December 1917. Poland in turn secured its political independence in
November 1918.

⁵⁵ This passage indicates the extent to which Luxemburg’s economic
analysis of industrial development in Poland is integrally connected to
her rejection of calls for Polish national self-determination. The
latter remains one of the most contentious aspects of her legacy.

⁵⁶ The first two articles, which are by Luxemburg, can be found in Rosa
Luxemburg, _Gesammelte Werke_, Band 1/1 (Berlin: Dietz Verlag, 2007),
pp. 37–51 and pp. 94–112 respectively.

⁵⁷ For an English translation of the book in which Pozdneyev reported on
his 1892 expedition, see Alexei M. Pozdneyev, _Mongolia and the
Mongols_, Vol. 1 (Bloomington: Indiana University Press, 1971).

⁵⁸ Enzeli is a port on the Caspian Sea, which was renamed Pahlevi in
1925; after the 1979 Iranian Revolution, the populace of the city
restored its original name.

⁵⁹ The Trans-Caspian Railway was built by Russia in 1879 in order to
facilitate its expansion into Central Asia. It extended from the Caspian
Sea to Tashkent, the capital of Uzbekistan.

⁶⁰ Construction on the Chinese Eastern Railroad, which ran through
Manchuria and greatly reduced the amount of time it took Russian goods
to reach the Pacific, began in 1896, just at the time that Luxemburg was
writing the dissertation. Control over the railway later became a
contentious issue in Russia’s relations with Japan.

⁶¹ Aranjuez, in central Spain, was the site of a palatial residence of
the King of Spain in the eighteenth century. In 1808 it was the site of
the Mutiny of Aranjuez, a popular uprising against King Charles IV,
which was largely a response to an economic crisis that resulted in a
sharp drop of industrial production.

⁶² Where possible, we have provided the Polish and Russian titles of the
works cited. Where we were not able to find the Polish or Russian
original, we provide a translation of the title as given in German in
the edition of the dissertation found in Luxemburg’s _Gesammelte Werke_.
The works are listed in the order in which they appear in the original
list of writings. With some exceptions (such as Dementyev, Svyatlovsky,
Yanzhul) the names of Russian authors have been given according to the
US Library of Congress transliteration system. The system for
transliterating names from the Russian alphabet into German, which of
course was used by Luxemburg, differs substantially from systems for
transliterating from Russian to English.

⁶³ That is, it was not circulated through the book trade.


BACK TO ADAM SMITH!

¹ This essay originally appeared in _Die Neue Zeit_, Year 18, 1899/1900,
Volume II, pp. 180–6.

² Richard Schüller was a bourgeois economist associated with the
neo-classical Austrian School of economics. See his _Die klassiche
Nationalökonomie und ihre Gegner. Zur Geschichte der Nationalökonomie
und Socialpolitik seit A. Smith_ (Classical and Political Economy and
its Enemies: On the History of Political Economy and Social Policy Since
Adam Smith) (Berlin: C. Heymann, 1895). For Bernstein’s review of this
work, see “Die klassiche Nationalöknomie und ihrer Gegner,” _Die Neue
Zeit_, Year 13, 1894/95, Vol. 2, pp. 211–14.

³ See Richard Schüller, _Die Wirtschaftspolitik der Historischen Schule_
(The Political Economy of the Historical School), (Berlin: C. Heymann,
1899).

⁴ On the historical school of economics see endnote 2 on p. 89 [in
_Introduction to Political Economy_].

⁵ The “romantic course” in economic theory refers to those who opposed
the goals of the French Revolution and industrial capitalism in the name
of traditional values. The economic romantics also tended to deny that
societies operate according to general economic laws. Haller and Müller
were both political reactionaries, resembling in some respects the
positions of English theorist Edmund Burke and the French writer and
racialist Joseph de Maistre. See Haller’s _Restauration der
Staatswissenschaft oder Theorie des naturich-geselligen Zustandes_
(Restoration of the Science of the State, or the Theory of the State of
Nature) (Winterthur: Steiner, 1816–34) and Müller’s _Von der
Notwendigkeit einer theologischen Grundlage der gesamten
Staatswissenschaften_ (On the Necessity of a Comprehensive Theological
Foundation for Political Science) (Leipzig, 1819).

⁶ Karl Ernst Jarcke, a political and social conservative, originally
from Prussia, accepted Metternich’s offer to serve in the Austrian
government in the 1830s. His main contribution, like that of Haller and
Müller, was to extol the virtues of medieval society as superior to the
democratizing tendencies of the modern world. See Jarcke’s _Handbuch des
gemeinen deutschen Strafrechts_ (Handbook of German Common Criminal Law)
(Berlin: Ferdinand Dümmler, 1830).

⁷ Marx criticized List as follows: “The whole theoretical part of List’s
system is nothing but a disguising of the industrial materialism of
frank political economy in idealistic phrases. Everywhere he allows the
thing to remain in existence but idealizes the expression of it.” See
“On Friedrich List’s Book _Das Nationale System de Politischen
Ökonomie_,” in _Marx-Engels Collected Works_, Vol. 4 (New York:
International Publishers, 1975), pp. 265–94.

⁸ Alexander von der Marwitz (1787–1814) was a Prussian nobleman; in 1809
he became a friend and lover of Rahel Varnhagen, with whom he carried on
an active correspondence. Varnhagen was a prolific writer, critic, and
feminist; her _Collected Works_ comprise 10 volumes. For more on
Varnhagen, see Hannah Arendt, _Rahel Varnhagen: Life Story of a Jewess_
(Baltimore: John Hopkins University Press, 2000).

⁹ The Stein–Hardenberg period refers to the reforms of the Prussian
state and society promoted by Karl Freiherr vom Stein and Karl August
Fürst von Hardenberg following the defeat of Prussia by Napoleon’s
forces in 1807. The reforms were based on Enlightenment ideals and led
to the abolition of serfdom and suppression of guild monopolies. By 1820
this reform movement largely came to an end.

¹⁰ Scharnhorst, Gneisenau and Witzleben served as Prussian officers
during the Battle of Jena in 1806, when Napoleon’s France decisively
defeated Prussia. In response, they supported a series of reforms to
modernize the Prussian military. Scharnhorst promoted the reorganization
of its military from a professional force of noblemen to a national army
based on universal service. Gneisenau worked closely with Scharnhorst in
promoting these and other reforms, often in the face of opposition from
King Friedrich Wilhelm of Prussia. Witzleben allied himself with
Scharnhorst’s reform efforts with his 1807 book _Ideas on the
Reorganization of the Light Infantry_. For more on these efforts to
reform the Prussian military, see William McNeill, _The Pursuit of
Power: Technology, Armed Force, and Society_ (Chicago: University of
Chicago Press, 1982), pp. 218–50 especially.

¹¹ In the double battle of Jena and Auerstedt on October 14, 1806, the
two main armies of the reactionary Prussian state were defeated by
Napoleon’s troops. Prussia’s defeat prompted a move on the part of a
number of its leading intellectuals, politicians and military leaders to
implement liberal reforms in Prussia, which was still functioning along
feudal lines. This period of reform proved of critical importance in
transforming Prussia into a modern state.

¹² Friedrich Julius Heinrich, Graf von Soden wrote several works on
economics in which he critically discussed the work of Adam Smith. In
contrast to Smith’s emphasis on the difference between use-value and
exchange-value, Soden maintained that the fundamental distinction was
between “positive value” and “comparative value”; only the former, he
held, is value in the true sense of the word. See his
_Nazional-Ökonomie_ (National Economics) (Leipzig: J.A. Barth, 1805).
Heinrich Luden criticized Smith’s work in his _Handbuch der
Staatsweisheit oder de Politik_ (Manual of Statecraft or Politics)
(Jena: Frommann, 1811). Friedrich von Cölln served as an official of the
Prussian government during the Napoleonic Wars and was primarily
responsible for formulating taxation policy. After the Battle of Jena he
became a firm supporter of the Stein–Hardenberg reforms. See his
_Vertrauten Briefe über die inner Verhältnisse am preußischen Hofe siet
dem Tode Friedrichs II_ (Familiar Letters on the Internal Relations of
the Prussian Court Since the Death of Frederick II) (Amsterdam: Peter
Hammer, 1807).

¹³ The Holy Alliance was a coalition of Russia, Austria and Prussia,
formed in 1815, for the purpose of safeguarding against further European
revolutions. It essentially went out of existence in 1825, due to
differences between its respective members.

¹⁴ Wilhelm Roscher is considered the founder of the historical school.
The historical school did not share the romantic attachment for the
feudal past that Luxemburg criticizes above. Roscher drew more heavily
on Smith’s ideas than did other members of the older historical school,
such as Hildebrand, even though he differed from Smith in numerous
respects. He especially held that the classical political economists
placed too much emphasis on production and not enough on consumption.
Like Hildebrand, Knies, and other members of the older historical
school, he opposed Smith’s model of perfect competition in favor of
emphasizing historical contingency and variability.

¹⁵ William Thompson, John Gray and John Francis Bray utilized Smith and
Ricardo’s labor theory of value to attack the unequal distribution of
income that characterizes capitalist society. Karl Heinrich Rau was
Wilhelm Roscher’s teacher and mentor. A follower of Adam Smith, he
placed greater emphasis on the potential role of the state in redressing
economic inequality. See his _Lehrbuch der politischen Ökonomie_
(Principles of Political Economy) (Leipzig and Heidleberg: C.J. Winter
Verlag, 1863). Johann Heinrich von Thünen was not a socialist, though he
was critical of the fact that the remuneration of the industrialist is
always much greater than that of the workers. See Thünen’s _Der
isolierte Staat in Beziehung auf Landwirtschaft und Nationaloekonomie_
(The Isolated State in Relation to Agriculture and Political Economy),
edited by Walter Braueur and Eberhard E.A. Gerhardt (Darmstadt:
Wissenschaftliche Buchgesellschaft, 1966 [orig. 1826]).

¹⁶ The “old” historical school refers to its earliest proponents, which
included Wilhelm Roscher, Karl Knies, and Bruno Hildebrand. They opposed
the “leveling” or “categorical” character of classical political economy
in so far as they rejected the universal validity of economic laws.

¹⁷ Although Knies (like Roscher and Hildebrand) was critical of aspects
of bourgeois society, he never considered himself any kind of socialist.

¹⁸ Latin for “to each its own.”

¹⁹ Luxemburg is closely following the argument in Chapter 1 of Marx’s
_Capital_ Vol. 1, in which he wrote: “However, the labor that forms the
substance of value is equal human labor, the expenditure of identical
human labor-power. The total labor-power of society, which is manifested
in the values of the world of commodities, counts here as one
homogeneous mass of human labor-power … I was the first to point out and
examine critically this twofold nature of the labor contained in
commodities. As this point is crucial to an understanding of political
economy, it requires further elucidation.” See Marx’s _Capital_ Vol. 1,
translated by Ben Fowkes (New York: Penguin Books, 1976), pp. 129, 132.

²⁰ In _Reform or Revolution_, written in the same period as this
article, Luxemburg likewise stated: “The secret of Marx’s theory of
value, his analysis of money, his theory of capital, his theory of the
rate of profit, and consequently of the whole existing economic system
is the transitory nature of the capitalist economy, its collapse:
thus—and this is only another aspect of the same phenomena—the final
goal, socialism. And precisely because, _a priori_, Marx looked at
capitalism from the socialist’s viewpoint, that is, from the historical
viewpoint, he was enabled to decipher the hieroglyphics of capitalist
economy.” See _Reform or Revolution_, in _The Rosa Luxemburg Reader_, p.
151.

²¹ The call to go “back to Kant” was raised by a number of German
philosophers in the 1860s as part of an effort to combat the legacy of
Hegel’s dialectical idealism. It led to the German neo-Kantian revival,
which dominated central Europe thought until the 1920s. The neo-Kantian
movement strongly influenced the thought of Eduard Bernstein and the
Austro-Marxists, part of which (as seen in the work of Hermann Cohen,
among others) explicitly embraced a moderate version of socialism. For
more on this, see Timothy Keck, _Kant and Socialism: The Marburg School
in Wilhelmian Germany_ (Madison: University of Wisconsin Press, 1975);
and Michael Friedman’s two books, _The Kantian Legacy in Nineteenth
Century Science_ (Cambridge: MIT Press, 2006) and _A Parting of the
Ways: Carnap, Cassirer, and Heidegger_ (Chicago: Open Court, 2000).


INTRODUCTION TO POLITICAL ECONOMY

¹ This unfinished manuscript of 1909–10 grew out of Rosa Luxemburg’s
lecture course at the SPD party school. It was originally designed for
publication in eight pamphlets as well as in book form. Luxemburg
described its conception as follows: “General title: _Introduction to
Political Economy_. Subtitles for the pamphlets: 1) What Is Political
Economy?; 2) Social Labor; 3) Material on Economic History (primitive
communism, slave economy, _corvée_ economy, guild commerce); 4)
Exchange; 5) Wage Labor; 6) The Rule of Capital (rate of profit); 7)
Crises; 8) Tendencies of the Capitalist Economy” (Róza Luksemburg,
_Listy do Leona Jogichesa-Tyski_, 3 vols, Warsaw 1971, p. 98). Her
decision to embark on _The Accumulation of Capital_ led Luxemburg to
break off work on the “Introduction,” and she did not take up the
project again until her imprisonment at Wronke in 1916. Luxemburg
maintained the original basic conception, but now envisaged it as ten
pamphlets. This incomplete text was eventually published by Paul Levi in
1925. The six chapters of the manuscript bear the numbers I, III, IV,
III, IV and VII, which reflect the changes she made working on the
manuscript.

² The historical school of economics emerged in Germany in the 1840s as
a reaction against the classical political economy of Smith and Ricardo.
It dominated much of German academic economic thought for the rest of
the century. It is generally divided into three phases: the older
historical school, comprising Wilhelm Roscher, Bruno Hildebrand, and
Karl Knies; the Younger School, comprising Gustav von Schmoller and
Adolph Wagner, and the Youngest School, comprising Werner Sombart and
Max Weber. The historical school rejected universal theoretical systems
and denied the capitalist economy could be understood in terms of an
underlying universal logic or set of laws. They emphasized instead
local, cultural, and historical influences on economic behavior. Its
thinkers also differed from Smith and Ricardo in placing greater
emphasis on the state in fostering economic development. In this
qualified sense, some of its proponents considered themselves to be
socialists, although they were hostile to the revolutionary socialist
aspirations of Marx and the Marxists.

³ Hans Karl Emil von Mangoldt is primarily known for his theory of
prices. See especially his _Grundriss der Volkswirthschaftslehre_
(Outlines of Economic Doctrine) (Stuttgart: Engelhorn, 1863).

⁴ Wilhem Roscher, _Grundlagen der Nationalökonomie, Ein Hand- und
Lesebuch für Geschäftsmänner und Studierende_ (Foundations of Economics:
A Handbook and Guide for Businessmen and Students) (Stuttgart: Cotta,
1900), p. 41. For an English translation, see _Principles of Political
Economy_ (New York: Arno Press, 1878).

⁵ The German term for “political economy” (_Nationalökonomie_),
literally translated, is “national economy.” Hence, as Luxemburg
indicates, it is circular to “define” _Nationalökomonie_ as the theory
of the economy of a given nation.

⁶ The _Handwörterbuch der Staatswissenschaften_ was an important
resource in late nineteenth and early twentieth century German economic
thought. It was published in four editions. The first edition appeared
from 1890 to 1895, the second from 1895 to 1901, the third edition
between 1909 and 1911, and the fourth and final edition from 1923 to
1929. The first three editions were edited by Johannes Conrad, Wilhelm
Lexis, L. Elster, and Edgar Loening, who were part of the Verein für
Sozialpolitik (The Association for Social Politics). For more on this
influential publication, see Vitantonio Gioia, “Arthur Spiethoff: From
Economic Crisis to Business Cycle Theory,” in _Crises and Cycles in
Economic Dictionaries and Encyclopedias_, edited by Daniele Besomi
(London and New York: Routledge, 2012), pp. 361–2.

⁷ Auguste Blanqui actually did not directly participate in the Paris
Commune of 1871, since he was arrested shortly before the uprising and
was in prison during most of it. His followers, however, played an
important role in the Commune.

⁸ Adolphe Blanqui, _Histoire de l’économie politique en Europe, depuis
les anciens jusque à nos jours_ (Paris: Guilloumin, 1837). See _History
of Political Economy in Europe_, translated by Emily J. Leonard (New
York: G.P. Putnam’s Sons, 1880).

⁹ Ferdinand Lassalle, _Herr Bastiat—Schulze von Delitzsch, der
ökonomische Julian, oder Kapital und Arbeit. In Ferdinand Lassalle’s
Reden und Schrifte_. Neue Gesammtausgabe. Mit einer biographischen
Einleitung hrsg. von Eduard Bernstein, Volume 3 (Mr. Bastiat-Schulze
Delitzsch, the Economic Julian, or Capital and Labor) (Berlin: Verlag
der Expedition des Vorwärts, 1893), p. 18. For Marx’s critique of this
work of Lassalle, see the “Preface to the First Edition” of _Capital_
Vol. 1, pp. 89–90.

¹⁰ Cockaigne is a medieval mythical land of plenty, with abundant luxury
and pleasure and ease of living.

¹¹ Adam Smith, _An Inquiry into the Nature and Causes of the Wealth of
Nations_, two volumes (London: W. Strahan and T. Cadell, 1776).

¹² Alizarin is a red dye used in textile production. Originally obtained
from the roots of plants of the madder genus, it was first chemically
synthesized by German scientists in the 1860s.

¹³ Nitre is the mineral form of potassium nitrate; it is also known as
saltpeter.

¹⁴ See _Statistisches Jahrbuch für das Deutsche Reich_, edited by the
Imperial Statistical Office (Berlin: Puttkammer & Mühlbrecht, 1914). The
_Statistisches Jahrbuch_ was published yearly, beginning in 1880.

¹⁵ The small differences in this and the following addition result from
Luxemburg ignoring the thousands in the component categories.

¹⁶ As _Patrimonialrichter_, Schulze-Delitsch was a magistrate in charge
of adjudicating matters of inheritance.

¹⁷ The manuscript wrongly has “exports” here.

¹⁸ This suggests that Luxemburg did not consider a “war economy” as any
sort of panacea for the problem of capital accumulation. As she notes,
the debts incurred through incessant militarization can become an
important impediment to further economic growth.

¹⁹ A major war fought between Britain, France, and the Ottoman Empire
from 1853 to 1856 against Russia over control of the Balkans and the
Dardanelles, which resulted in Russia’s defeat. With its use of such new
technologies as the railway and the telegraph, it is widely considered
the first truly “modern” war.

²⁰ This refers primarily to Russian Tsar Alexander II’s freeing of the
Russian peasants from serfdom, with his decree of March 3, 1861. Other
reforms implemented in the early years of his reign included ending
corporal punishment in the military, reorganizing the judiciary, and
allowing for limited self-government in rural districts and large towns
through the _zemstvo_ system.

²¹ The Skoda works, taken over by Emil Skoda in 1869, was the largest
industrial conglomerate in the Austro-Hungarian Empire, and during the
twentieth century became one of Europe’s most important steel works and
munitions manufacturer.

²² Friedrich Krupp AG Hoesch-Krupp, launched by Friedrich Krupp
(1787–1826) and led for many years by industrialist and inventor Alfred
Krupp (1812–87), was the largest company in Europe at the beginning of
the twentieth century, specializing in metal production and armaments.
The company later became central to the rearmament of Germany under the
Nazis. Gustav Krupp (1870–1950), who headed the company from 1909–43,
was the only person to be indicted for war crimes in both World War I
and World War II.

²³ Marx cited this April 16, 1863 speech by Gladstone in _Capital_ Vol.
1, p. 806. He earlier quoted directly from Gladstone’s speech in his
“Inaugural Address of the Working Men’s International Association.” See
_Marx-Engels Collected Works_, Vol. 20 (New York: International
Publishers, 1985), p. 7.

²⁴ This term, literally “migration of peoples,” particularly connotes
the Germanic and Slavic migrations into Europe of the first millennium
AD.

²⁵ Luxemburg is mistaken here. It was not until January 1, 1863 that the
Emancipation Proclamation granted freedom to all slaves in the
Confederate states, though this could only be applied when and where
these states were occupied by Union forces. Slavery in all US states and
territories was finally banned by the Thirteenth Amendment in 1865.

²⁶ On July 11, 1882 Great Britain began a military offensive against
Egypt. The war concluded with a siege of Cairo on September 14, 1882.
Egypt became a British protectorate, although it remained nominally part
of the Ottoman Empire.

²⁷ This refers to the Opium Wars of 1839–42 and 1856–60, in which
Britain insisted on its “right” to import opium into China in defiance
of Chinese law and authority. The first Opium War of 1839–42 forced
China to grant Britain trade and territorial concessions, including
control of Hong Kong; the second Opium War of 1856–60, codified in the
Treaty of Tientsin, to which France, Russia, and the US were also
signatories, opened numerous foreign ports to Europeans and legalized
the import of opium. It signalled the decline of the Qing Dynasty and
the era of European colonial domination of China.

²⁸ Chartism was a working-class movement for radical political and
economic reform in Britain between 1838 and 1848. Named after the
“People’s Charter” of 1838, which called for universal male suffrage, a
secret ballot, an end to property qualifications for voting, pay for
members of Parliament, constituencies of equal size, and annual
elections for Parliament, the movement also led to massive work
stoppages, strikes, and demands for improved working conditions.
Chartism is considered to be the world’s first mass working-class labor
movement. For a recent study of the movement, see David Black and Chris
Ford, _1839: The Chartist Insurrection_ (London: Unkant, 2012).

²⁹ This refer to the followers of Robert Owen (1771–1858), utopian
socialist and pioneering figure of the cooperative movement. The
Owenites argued for the creation of cooperatively organized,
self-sustaining townships that combined industry and agriculture without
class distinction or private property. In the early 1830s the Owenites
also embraced the formation of an equitable labor exchange system in
which members of cooperatives would be remunerated by means of labor
notes instead of money. The movement died out by the mid-1840s, although
Owen (who was highly regarded by Marx) had an enduring impact on later
socialist movements.

³⁰ The spontaneous revolt of weavers in Silesia and Bohemia between June
and August 1844 were the first large-scale working class movement in
Central Europe. In response to a severe economic depression that pushed
living conditions for many below subsistence, weavers attacked the homes
and warehouses of merchants and destroyed machines as well as the
property deeds to them. The young Karl Marx was deeply impacted by the
revolt, viewing the weavers’ attack on the instruments of their
oppression as a sign of a profound level of class consciousness. See
“Critical Marginal Notes on the Article ‘The King of Prussia and Social
Reform. By a Prussian,’ ” _Marx-Engels Collected Works_, Vol. 3 (New
York: International Publishers, 1975), pp. 189–206.

³¹ The “March Revolution” refers to the series of revolutions that broke
out in numerous German states at the beginning of 1848. Initially
dominated by middle-class revolutionaries demanding political freedom,
an end to censorship, and governance based on democratic constitutions,
the revolutions included a working-class dimension that also called for
a transformation of economic relations and living conditions. In
response to increased working-class militancy, the middle-class forces
wavered in forcefully taking on the conservative forces centered in
Prussia and Austria, which eventually defeated the revolutions.

³² Vogtland is in southeastern Germany, comprising parts of the state of
Bavaria, Saxony, and Thuringia, bordering the Czech Republic.

³³ The Congress of Vienna in 1815 had designated Russian-occupied Poland
as the “Kingdom of Poland,” placing it under complete Russian control.
This re-confirmed the third partition of Poland of 1795, which divided
the country between Russia, Prussia, and the Austro-Hungarian Empire.

³⁴ Zgierz is a town in central Poland, just north of Lodz. At the time
Zgierz was a center of light industry, based on textile production.

³⁵ The 1896 St. Petersburg strike was in response to the refusal of the
owners of the textile factories to pay wages for the week of May 15–17,
when the enterprises were closed because of the coronation of Tsar
Nicolas II. As the strike expanded, the workers raised demands for a
reduction of the working day from thirteen hours to ten and a half. On
June 4 a general strike was declared, involving 30,000 workers in
eighteen factories. It was the most significant revolt of the Russian
working class to that point.

³⁶ Luxemburg’s words here closely follow Marx and Engels’s discussion in
the _Communist Manifesto_: “The bourgeoisie, by the rapid improvement of
all instruments of production, by the immensely facilitated means of
communication, draws all, even the most barbarian, nations into
civilization. The cheap prices of its commodities are the heavy
artillery with which it batters down all Chinese walls, with which it
forces the barbarians intensely obstinate hatred of foreigners to
capitulate.” See _Marx-Engels Collected Works_, Vol. 6 (New York:
International Publishers, 1976), p. 488.

³⁷ A possible reference to the Federalist Riograndense Revolution of
1893–95 in southern Brazil, launched by monarchists against the
declaration of the Brazilian Republic in 1889. The revolutionaries,
called Maragotos, were defeated at the Battle of the Pulador.

³⁸ Karl Marx, _Capital_ Vol. 1, p. 616, note 27. Marx is quoting from
Stewart’s _Collected Works_, Vol. 8, edited by William Hamilton
(Edinburgh: Thomas Constable and Sons, 1855), pp. 327–8.

³⁹ At the end of the eleventh and beginning of the twelfth century, as
the Catholic Church sought to inspire the faithful to take part in the
Crusades against the Muslims, a legend was propagated that Charlemagne’s
wars of conquest had paved the way for them. In fact, these “crusades”
of Charlemagne were military expeditions aimed at conquest and were not
primarily motivated by religious considerations.

⁴⁰ Capitularium were a series of administrative acts issued by the
Frankish Merovingian and Carolingian dynasties. The Capitulare de Villis
Imperialis was issued by Charlemagne around 800, and (among other
things) delineated the plants (89 in all, some but not all of medicinal
value) that should be included in gardens throughout his empire. The
list was probably compiled by Abbot Benedict of Aniane.

⁴¹ The Capitula Episcoporum was a series of written instructions sent to
bishops and their clergy, beginning shortly before 800, which aimed to
raise the rural priesthood to a level of chastity and literacy in the
face of the widespread corruption that dominated the priesthood at the
time.

⁴² The _Mark_ was an ancient Germanic communal form of village
organization that survived in modified form into modern times. Luxemburg
subsequently uses the term more universally, applying to what she saw as
similar forms in various societies around the world.

⁴³ Frederick Engels, _Anti-Dühring. Herr Eugen Dühring’s Revolution in
Science, Marx-Engels Collected Works_, Vol. 25 (New York: International
Publishers, 1987), p. 263.

⁴⁴ Thomas Malthus, _An Essay on the Principle of Population, as It
Affects the Future Improvement of Society, with Remarks on the
Speculations of Mr Godwin, M. Condorcet, and other Writers_ (London: J.
Johnson, 1803), pp. 531–2. This celebrated passage appeared only in the
earlier editions of Malthus’s book, and was subsequently omitted.

⁴⁵ The German Peasants’ War was a massive popular revolt that swept
Central Europe from 1524 to 1526. It involved almost half a million
peasants (as well as many artisans and town dwellers), and represented
both an economic and religious revolt against oppressive living
conditions (especially concerning the destruction of the commons and
debt peonage) and social hierarchy (especially among the clergy). It was
put down with great bloodshed; as many as 100,000 peasants were
massacred.

⁴⁶ The manuscript wrongly says “fifteenth century.”

⁴⁷ The French _lumières_ were the members of the French Enlightenment,
which included such individuals as Rousseau, Voltaire, Diderot,
D’Holbach, and others.

⁴⁸ A reference to Darius III, the last king of the Archaemenid Empire of
Persia. After suffering major defeats in several battles with Alexander
the Great, he retreated eastward (towards present-day Afghanistan). With
Macedonian and Greek forces in hot pursuit, two of his generals stabbed
him with a lance and left him to die. When the Macedonian troops
arrived, they found him crying out for water—a result of his serious
wounds. He died soon thereafter.

⁴⁹ The position summarized here by Luxemburg corresponds to the views of
the French Physiocrats, a school of economics (whose most important
proponent was Francois Quesnay) that held that agricultural labor is the
source of all value.

⁵⁰ This refers to the reforms inaugurated in Prussia by Karl Freiherr
vom Stein, Karl August Fürst von Hardenberg, and Gerhard Johann David
von Scharnhorst following the defeat of Prussian forces by Napoleon at
the battle of Jena-Auerstedt in 1806. Prussia’s defeat (it lost half its
territory to the French) led an effort to reorganize its government
along “rational” and “enlightenment” principles. The reforms included
the abolition of serfdom and suppression of the guilds.

⁵¹ “Young Germany” (_Junges Deutschland_) was a movement of progressive
writers from 1830 to 1850 that advocated democracy, socialism, equal
rights, and the emancipation of women. Its foremost representatives were
Heinrich Heine, Ludwig Börne and George Herwegh. Luxemburg was a great
admirer of the movement.

⁵² Alexander von der Marwitz, a Prussian nobleman, stated in a letter to
Rahel Varnhagen in 1810, “Next to Napoleon, [Adam Smith] is now the
mightiest monarch in Europe.” For more on their relationship, see Hannah
Arendt, _Rahel Varnhagen: Life Story of a Jewess_.

⁵³ This refers to Babeuf’s “Conspiracy of the Equals,” in which he
sought (along with Philippe Buonarroti, Sylvain Maréchal and Germain
Charles Augustin-Alexandre Darthé) to overthrow the Directory in the
waning days of the French Revolution, in 1796, and forcefully impose a
regime based on equality and shared property. The Conspiracy proved a
failure.

⁵⁴ The Jacobin Club was a revolutionary circle of middle-class democrats
who led the French Revolution of 1789 during its most radical phase, in
1793–94.

⁵⁵ The revolts of the silk weavers in Lyon in 1831 and 1834 were the
first independent political actions of the French working class. The
uprising of 1831 was in response to the refusal of the manufacturers to
accept the higher wages for weavers that had been negotiated earlier.
The workers routed government troops, who were forced to abandon the
city before crushing the revolt, a week later. Another revolt broke out
in 1834 over the arrest and firing of workers who had taken part in an
earlier strike.

⁵⁶ Proudhon advocated the “abolition” of money while retaining commodity
exchange, by substituting money with notes or “chits” denoting the hours
of labor performed by the worker. Marx sharply criticized Proudhon’s
approach in _The Poverty of Philosophy_, the _Grundrisse, Capital_, and
other writings. Louis Blanc, a leader of the 1848 Revolution in France,
advocated the creation through existing government institutions of
“national workshops” to eliminate unemployment and poverty. Although an
opponent of Bonapartism, he did not support the Paris Commune and
remained largely aloof from the events of 1871.

⁵⁷ Louis-Philippe was overthrown in February 1848, during the French
Revolution of that year. He had come to power in 1830, and was the last
king to rule France.

⁵⁸ On June 23, 1848, the populace of Paris rose up in a major
insurrection, becoming known as the June days. It was brutally crushed
by the forces of reaction. The June massacres paved the way for Louis
Napoleon to assume power on December 2, 1848.

⁵⁹ See Marx and Engels, _Manifesto of the Communist Party, Marx-Engels
Collected Works_, Vol. 6 (New York: International Publishers, 1976), p.
482.

⁶⁰ Engels sought to address this after Marx’s death, by qualifying the
statement “The history of all hitherto existing society is the history
of class struggles” with a footnote to the 1888 edition of the
_Manifesto_ that read, “That is, all written history.” Marx, however,
who had studied the work of Morgan, Haxthausen and Kovalevsky prior to
and independent of Engels, did not choose to qualify the sentence when
he co-authored the Preface to the second Russian edition of the
_Manifesto_ in 1882.

⁶¹ Georg Ludwig von Maurer, _Einleitung zur Geschichte der Mark-, Hof-,
Dorf- und Stadt-Verfassung und der öffentlichen Gewalt_ (Introduction to
the History of the Mark, Manor, Village and Town Constitution) (Munich:
C. Kaiser, 1854).

⁶² In many ancient northern Scandanavian societies, the land was
originally cultivated by groups based on intimate kinship ties. These
were called frändalid and skulldalid, which means an association of
friends. Such lands could not be alienated.

⁶³ The Suevi, or Swabians, were a Germanic people originally from east
of the Elbe. In the first century BC they unsuccessfully tried to enter
Gaul and settled between the Rhine and the Danube, in southwestern
Germany.

⁶⁴ The Allemanni were originally an alliance of several German tribes,
located in the Upper Rhine, in southwestern Germany and northern
Switzerland. By 800 AD they were absorbed by the Franks. The Vandals
were an eastern German tribe that may have originally come from Sweden.
In the fifth century they invaded northern Africa, Sicily, Corsica, and
Sardinia, and sacked Rome in 455 AD. Their kingdom was destroyed in the
sixth century by the Eastern Roman Emperor Justinian I.

⁶⁵ Latin for “mine and yours.”

⁶⁶ The Odenwald is a mountain range in southwestern Germany, in the
northern part of Baden-Würtemberg.

⁶⁷ August Freiherr von Haxthausen, _Studien über die inneren Zustände,
das Volksleben und insbesondere die ländlichen Einrichtungen Russlands_
(Studies on the Internal Conditions of Russia, the Life of its People
and Especially its Rural Institutions) (Hanover: Hahn, 1847–52).

⁶⁸ See August Freuherr von Haxthausen, _Die ländliche Verfgassung
Russlands_ (The Rural Constitution of Russia) (Leipzig: Brockhaus,
1866).

⁶⁹ Several recent studies have cast doubt on some of Haxthausen’s
findings on the grounds that he made generalizations about Russia as a
whole on the basis of conditions that prevailed only in certain areas.
See especially T. K. Dennison and A. W. Carus, “The Invention of the
Russian Rural Commune: Haxthausen and the Evidence,” _The Historical
Journal_ (2003), Vol. 46, pp. 561–82.

⁷⁰ The _mir_ refers to the communal possession of the land as well as
the association of representatives that govern the working of the land.
For Marx’s analysis of the _mir_, see _The Late Marx and the Russian
Road: Marx and “the Peripheries of Capitalism,”_ edited by Teodor Shanin
(New York: Monthly Review Press 1983), pp. 95–133. A comparison of Marx
and Luxemburg’s studies of the _mir_ can be found in “Accumulation,
Imperialism, and Pre-Capitalist Formations: Luxemburg and Marx on the
non-Western World,” by Peter Hudis, _Socialist Studies/Études
socialistes_, Vol. 6, No. 2 (Fall 2010), pp. 75–91.

⁷¹ Slavophilism was an intellectual movement in nineteenth century
Russia that opposed Western European influences and promoted Russian
nationalism. It had adherents on the Right as well as the Left. Among
its early proponents were Aleksei Khomyakov, Ivan Kireyevsky, and the
brothers Ivan and Konstantin Aksakov.

⁷² See Marx’s letter to the editorial board of the Russian-language
publication _Otechestvennye Zapiski_ of 1877, in speaking of Alexander
Herzen: “My reproach against this writer had been that he discovered the
Russian commune not in Russia but in the book by Haxthausen, a Prussian
government councilor; and that, in his hands, the Russian commune merely
served as an argument to show that old, rotten Europe must be
regenerated through the victory of pan-Slavism.” _Late Marx and the
Russian Road_, p. 134.

⁷³ Luxemburg did not know of Marx’s draft letters to Vera Zasulich of
1881, in which he discussed the possibility that Russia could achieve a
socialist transformation ahead of the industrially developed West. The
draft letters were not published until 1924. However, what was available
to her was the Preface to the second Russian edition of the _Communist
Manifesto_ of 1882, in which Marx and Engels state that “Russia’s
peasant communal land-ownership may serve as the point of departure for
a communist development.” See _Late Marx and the Russian Road_, p. 139.

⁷⁴ Luxemburg was probably not aware that Marx had taken extensive notes
on Maine’s work at the end of his life. See “Marx’s Excerpts from Henry
Sumner Maine, _Lectures on the Early History of Institutions_,” in _The
Ethnological Notebooks of Karl Marx_, transcribed and edited by Lawrence
Krader (Assen: Van Gorcum, 1972), pp. 285–336.

⁷⁵ See Erwin von Nasse, _Über die mittelalterliche Feldgemeinschaft in
England_ (On the Community Field System in Medieval England) (Bonn, A.
Marcus: 1869).

⁷⁶ This is a reference to Dareste’s _De la Propriété en Algérie,
commentaire de la loi du 17 juin 1851_ (Paris: A. Durand, 1852). The
work was cited by Kovalevsky. Unknown to Luxemburg, Marx also called
attention to Dareste’s work in his “Notebooks on Kovalevsky.” See _Karl
Marx über Formen vorkapitalischer Produktion: Vergleichende Studien zur
Geschichte des Grundeigentums_, edited by Hans-Peter Harstick
(Frankfurt: Campus Verlag, 1977), p. 94.

⁷⁷ The Kabyles are a Berber people living in North Africa. They comprise
a large percentage of the non-Arab population of Algeria and Tunisia.
Many have retained their distinct language and culture.

⁷⁸ See Aristide Letourneux, _La Kabylie et les coutumes kabyles_ (Paris:
Imprimerie nationale, 1872–73); reissued by Éditions Bouchène (Paris) in
2003.

⁷⁹ See Alonzo de Zurita, _Rapport sur les différentes classes de chefs
dans la Nouvelle-Espagne, sur les lois, les mœurs des habitants, sur les
impôts établis avant et depuis la conquête, etc., etc_. (Report on the
Different Classes of the Leaders of New Spain, the Laws, Customs of the
Inhabitants, the Taxes Assessed Before and After the Conquest, etc.),
translated by M. Henri Ternaux-Compans (Paris: A. Bertrand, 1840). First
published in Spanish in the sixteenth century, the book is considered an
important source for the early history of Mexico.

⁸⁰ Cuzco served as the Incan capital from the thirteenth century until
its conquest by the Spanish in 1532. The city was divided into four
parts (or _suyos_), corresponding to the major parts of the Incan
Empire. Leaders of these four parts of the Empire were required to live
in Cuzco part of the year.

⁸¹ Cited in Maksim Kovalevsky, _Obshchinnoe Zemlevadenie. Priciny, khod
i posledstviia ego razlozeniia_, p. 158. See Jean-Antoine Dubois,
_Description of the Character, Manners and Customs of the People of
India, and of their Institutions, Religious and Civil_ (London: Longman,
Hurst, Rees, Orme and Brown, 1816).

⁸² Cited in Kovalevsky, _Obshchinnoe Zemlevadenie_, p. 158. Bernier’s
book was first published in 1670, not 1699. See François Bernier,
_Voyages, contenant la description des États du Grand Mogul_ (Travels,
with a Description of the States of the Grand Mogul) (Amsterdam: Paul
Marret, 1670).

⁸³ Kovalevsky, _Obshchinnoe Zemlevadenie_, p. 159. Taking François
Bernier as his main source, Mill argued that the sovereign was the sole
possessor of the land in India. This served as the basis of the theory
of “Oriental Despotism.” In his “Notebooks on Kovalevsky,” Marx rejected
Mill’s claim (later repeated by his son John Stuart Mill) that the
monarch exerted “despotic” control over village communal life. As
Lawrence Krader notes, “J.S. Mill never pierced through to the practical
meaning of the doctrine of the sovereign as landowner and landlord, as
Marx was able to do.” See _The Asiatic Mode of Production, Sources,
Development and Critique in the Writings of Karl Marx_.

⁸⁴ Marx was much more cautious about making such generalizations about
“primitive communism” in his studies of Morgan, Maine, and Kovalevsky.
Unlike Engels, he did not treat “primitive communism” as a single,
undifferentiated stage of human history. As he put it in one of his
draft letters to Vera Zasulich (1881), “The history of the decline of
the primitive communities still has to be written (it would be wrong to
put them all on the same plane; in historical as in geological
formations, there is a whole series of primary, secondary tertiary and
other types). So far, only very rough sketches have been made.” See
_Late Marx and the Russian Road_, p. 107, as well as _The Ethnological
Notebooks of Karl Marx_.

⁸⁵ Some modern anthropologists no longer accept Morgan’s claim that all
forms of “primitive” society are based on kinship instead of political
relations, though others still agree with his premise.

⁸⁶ Lewis Henry Morgan, _Ancient Society, or Researches in the Line of
Human Progress from Savagery through Barbarism to Civilization_ [1877]
(New Brunswick NJ: Transaction Publishers, 2000), p. 435. Luxemburg made
use of the German edition, _Die Urgesellshaft oder Untersuchung über den
Fortschritt der Menschheit aus der Wildheit durch die Babarei zur
Zivilisation_ (Berlin: J.H.W. Dietz Verlag, 1891). This idea of Morgan’s
has long been rejected by some Marxist and non-Marxist anthropologists.

⁸⁷ The _gens_ (plural, _gentes_) was a clan or family group in ancient
Rome that shared a common name, traceable to a common ancestor. Descent
was through the male heir.

⁸⁸ Morgan, _Ancient Society_, pp. 85–6.

⁸⁹ Ibid., pp. 561–2.

⁹⁰ Although it was widely known at the time that Marx studied Morgan’s
work shortly after _Ancient Society_ was published, there are
considerable differences between Marx and Engels’s appraisal of Morgan’s
work. Marx tended to be more critical of Morgan’s formulations and
conclusions, although he also expressed appreciation for his work. Since
Marx’s _Ethnological Notebooks_ were not published until the 1970s,
Luxemburg was most likely unaware of these differences.

⁹¹ Marx himself disclaimed efforts to identify his “materialist theory
of history” with a unilinear evolutionism positing a single course of
human development. As he wrote in response to a Russian critic who
attributed such a unilinear perspective to him, “He absolutely insists
on transforming my historical sketch of the genesis of capitalism in
Western Europe into a historico-philosophical theory of the general
course fatally imposed on all peoples, whatever the historical
circumstances in which they find themselves placed … But I beg his
pardon. This is to do me both too much honor and too much discredit.”
See _Late Marx and the Russian Road_, p. 136.

⁹² The National Assembly met in Bordeaux on February 13, 1871, at which
it fostered French control of Muslim land in Algeria through the
expropriation of indigenous communal holdings by French capitalists and
speculators. The Warnier Law was named after August Warnier, a French
politician who was elected to the National Assembly in July 1871. The
Warnier Law greatly facilitated land purchases from the indigenous
peoples of Algeria, accelerating the break-up of their traditional
communal relations of working the land in favor of private land
ownership.

⁹³ Probably unbeknownst to Luxemburg, Marx quoted from the same sentence
of Kovalevsky in his notebooks on his work. See “Excerpts from M.M.
Kovalevsky,” in _The Asiatic Mode of Production_, p. 405.

⁹⁴ This refers to the period of German history lasting from 1815 to the
formation of the German Empire in 1871.

⁹⁵ In May 1873 three major Viennese banks went bankrupt, producing a
financial crisis that soon spread to Germany.

⁹⁶ The Anti-Socialist Laws (officially termed the “Law Against the
Public Danger of Social Democratic Endeavors”) was introduced by
Bismarck in 1878 and lasted until 1890. Although it did not explicitly
ban the Social-Democratic Party, it banned newspapers, public events,
and trade unions that the government considered “subversive.”

⁹⁷ The German Social-Democratic Party grew rapidly following the
expiration of the Anti-Socialist Laws in 1890. By 1912, the SPD obtained
the most votes of any party in Germany. It had over a million members
and hundreds of publications.

⁹⁸ Quoted in Julius Lippert, _Kulturgeschichte der Menschheit in ihrem
organischen Aufbau_ (The Cultural History of Humanity in its Organic
Structure) (Stuttgart: F. Enke, 1886) Vol. 2, Part 1, p. 40. See
Loskiel’s _Geschichte der Mission der evangelischen Brüder unter den
Indianern in Nordamerika_ (History of the Mission of the Evangelical
Brothers among the Indians of North America) (Barby an der Elbe:
Brüdergemeinen, 1789).

⁹⁹ A clan organization here refers to a group whose members share a
common ancestor, land rights, and rules of marriage.

¹⁰⁰ The “Hottentots” was the derogatory name given by the South African
Afrikaners to the Khoikhoi peoples of what is now Namibia and
southwestern South Africa. From 1904 to 1907, Khoikhoi peoples living in
Namibia joined forces with the Nama and Herero peoples to combat German
imperialism. Many of them perished as a result of genocidal reprisals by
the German colonial authorities.

¹⁰¹ The _jobbaggio_ was a form of _corvée_ labor in which peasants were
required to perform unpaid service to the feudal lords during
emergencies. Over time, the requirements became more and more onerous.
For Marx’s discussion of the _jobbaggio_, see _Capital_ Vol. 1, pp.
347–8.

¹⁰² Modern anthropologists tend to dispute this. For instance, in the
highlands of New Guinea pig farming (a central aspect of social life) is
the responsibility of women.

¹⁰³ See especially Émile Louis Victor de Laveleye, _De la Propriété et
de ses formes primitives_ (Property and its Primitive Forms) (Paris:
Baillière, 1877).

¹⁰⁴ The Botocudos is the name European explorers and colonizers gave to
the Aimorés or Krenak peoples of eastern Brazil. Devastated by European
colonization, they were forced from their homelands to Minas Gerais,
where small numbers of their descendants still survive.

¹⁰⁵ The full article is “Über die Botocudos,” by P. M. A. Ehrenreich, in
_Zeitschrift für Ethnologie_ 19 (1887), pp. 49–82.

¹⁰⁶ The Haidah are the Native American inhabitants of Queen Charlotte’s
Island and other islands off the western coast of Canada.

¹⁰⁷ Latin for “That was to be demonstrated.”

¹⁰⁸ Pygmies are not a race, but a term used for a variety of cultures
and ethnic groups around the world in which individuals are of
diminutive stature. The term derives from the ancient Greek term for
“dwarf” and has no morphological or cultural significance. Most
“pygmies” prefer to be referred to according to their respective ethnic
group (Aka, Mbuti, Twa, etc.).

¹⁰⁹ “Bushmen” is a generalized term for a wide variety of African
indigenous peoples, such as San, Sho, Barwa, and Kung. They form part of
the Khoisan group. Those in the Kalahari have traditionally been hunters
and gatherers.

¹¹⁰ The Vedda are indigenous hunter-gatherers of Sri Lanka who also
practiced a form of slash and burn agriculture.

¹¹¹ The Mincopie is a term applied to indigenous hunter-gatherers off
the coast of India, who subsist largely from fishing and eating
shellfish.

¹¹² The Kubu are nomadic peoples of the forests of southern Sumatra who
live by hunting and the cultivation of tubers.

¹¹³ The Aeta are indigenous inhabitants of Luzon, in the northern
Philippines, who were possibly the first inhabitants of the archipelago.

¹¹⁴ The Bororó are an Amazonian people living in southern Matto Grosso.
Claude Lévi-Strauss discusses them at length in his famous work,
_Tristes Tropiques_. Karl von den Steinen, a German ethnologist, studied
them during several trips to central Brazil in the 1880s.

¹¹⁵ Since Australia was the only continent exclusively populated by
hunter-gatherers at the time it was discovered by Europeans, many early
colonial settlers and commentators assumed that its populace was the
most “backward” of any on earth. Marx himself did not share this view,
as seen from his discussion of the Australian aborigines in his critical
notes on the work of John Lubbock. See Marx’s _Ethnological Notebooks_,
pp. 339–51.

¹¹⁶ This is the name French explorers gave to the Inuit peoples of
Siberia, Greenland, and Arctic North America.

¹¹⁷ Although many European travelers to Australia brought back tales of
“cannibalism” on the part of the aboriginal peoples, there is little
documented evidence that it widely prevailed.

¹¹⁸ The Chepara is an indigenous group living in the Australian state of
Queensland.

¹¹⁹ Cited in Felix Somló, _Der Güterverkehr in der Urgesellschaft_, pp.
61–2, which gives the source as I. G. Frazer, “Observations on Central
Australian Totemism,” _Journal of the Anthropological Institute_, 1899,
p. 284.

¹²⁰ The Isla del Tiburón is the largest island in the Gulf of California
and the largest island in Mexico. “Tiburón” is Spanish for “shark.” It
is the traditional homeland of the Seri Indians. In 1975 the Mexican
government granted the Seri title of communal property with regard to
the island.

¹²¹ In 1895, United States scientists undertook an expedition to study
the Seri tribe. The results were described by William John McGee in _The
Seri Indians_ (Washington, DC: Smithsonian Institution, 1898).

¹²² McGee, cited in Somló, p. 128 (W. G. McGee, _The Seri Indians_, p.
273).

¹²³ The French pirates, based in what is now Haiti, spent seven years
plundering the coast of South America in the late 1600s. In response, on
December 18, 1698, the French government sent an expedition to the
southern seas, funded by the twenty richest financiers in France.

¹²⁴ See Edward Horace Man, _On the Aboriginal Inhabitants of the Andaman
Islands_ (London: Tübner, n.d.). Reprinted as _On the Aboriginal
Inhabitants of the Andaman Islands_ (New Delhi: Mittal, 2001).

¹²⁵ We have been unable to locate the identity of “Schurze.” The
reference may actually be to Hermann Schulze-Delitzsch.

¹²⁶ The Bishopric of Bamberg (in Bavaria) was established in 1007 to
encourage the spread of Christianity in Germany. In the twelfth century
the Bishopric rose to great power and prominence.

¹²⁷ See Friedrich Bruno Hildebrand, _Die Nationalökonomie der Gegenwart
und Zukunft_ (Frankfurt am Main: J. Rütten 1848).

¹²⁸ See Julius Caesar, _The Conquest of Gaul_, translated by S.A.
Handford (New York: Penguin Books, 1982), pp. 94–7 and pp. 137–8.

¹²⁹ See Tacitus’s _Germania_, translated by J.B. Rives (Clarendon:
Oxford University Press, 1999). Tacitus wrote the book around 98 BC, but
it was not discovered until the early 1500s.

¹³⁰ Frickhofen is a town in northwestern Germany, in the modern state of
Hessen.

¹³¹ The Bavarian Palatinate, or Rhenish Bavaria, was a kingdom of the
German Confederation.

¹³² Luxemburg gives these areas in _Morgen_, a traditional German
measure. The _Morgen_ varied considerably from one part of Germany to
another, but in many areas it was equivalent to between one-half to
two-and-a-half acres. It roughly corresponded to the amount of land that
a farmer could plough in a given morning.

¹³³ The Vendée is a mainly rural and agricultural department in the
Pays-de-la-Loire region of west central France, on the Atlantic ocean.
It was the center of a famous peasants’ revolt against the revolutionary
government of 1793.

¹³⁴ Luxemburg uses here the old-fashioned term _Flur_, adding that these
_Fluren_ were also known as _Oesche_ or _Gewanne_.

¹³⁵ The Wölpe is a tributary of the river Aller in the German state of
Lower Saxony, which flows through woods, grassland, and farms.

¹³⁶ Luxemburg left blank here the figures for area and population.

¹³⁷ Engels makes the same point in his _Origin of the Family, Private
Property, and the State_: “Cunow has proved fairly clearly (in the
journal _Ausland_, 1890, Nos. 42–44) that in Peru at the time of the
conquest there was a form of constitution based on marks (called,
curiously enough, _marca_), with periodical allotment of arable land and
consequently with individual tillage.” See Frederick Engels, _Origin of
the Family, Private Property and the State_ (New York: International
Publishers, 1964), p. 52.

¹³⁸ The Inca Empire was actually formed several centuries later. Prior
to 1438 Incan rule was restricted to the small city-state Kingdom of
Cuzco.

¹³⁹ Luxemburg actually writes “Vechua” rather than “Keshua,” the
standard German for “Quechua,” apparently transliterating directly from
one of her principal sources, the Russian anthropologist Maksim
Kovalevsky’s book, _Obshchinnoe Zemlevadenie. Priciny, khod i
posledstviia ego razlozeniia_ (Communal Land Ownership: The Causes,
Processes, and Consequences of its Disintegration) (Moscow, 1879). Marx
knew Kovalevsky and made notes on his book shortly after it appeared. It
is possible that Luxemburg was aware of this. A translation of most of
Marx’s notes can be found in the appendix to Lawrence Krader, _The
Asiatic Mode of Production_; the full version appeared in Hans-Peter
Harstick, ed., _Karl Marx über Formen vorkapitalischer Production_.

¹⁴⁰ During each Winter Solstice in Cuzco, the residents gathered to
honor the Sun God and plead for its “return” (the day before the Winter
Solstice having the longest night of the year). The ceremony was banned
by the Spanish in the 1570s, but it survives among many of the Quechua
of modern Peru as the holiday of Inti Raymi.

¹⁴¹ The Dorians were one of the four main subgroups of the ancient
Greeks. It is disputed as to whether or not the distinctions were based
on ethnicity. The earliest literary mention of the Dorians occurs in
Homer’s _Odyssey_, where they are held to inhabit the island of Crete.
According to historical tradition, the Dorians invaded Greece from the
north during the twelfth century BC and displaced the Mycenaeans, but
there is little or no archeological evidence of this. The origin of the
Dorians remains an issue of considerable scholarly controversy.

¹⁴² The Helots were a subjugated people who performed agricultural and
domestic labor for the Spartans, who ruled over them. They may have been
the native inhabitants of the area around Sparta; the name “Helot”
derives from the Greek term “to be captured or made prisoner.” As much
as 90 percent of the Spartan kingdom consisted of Helots, who had no
political rights.

¹⁴³ Excavation of this ancient town in Arcadia had begun in 1884, which
was also when the Gortyn Code, the oldest survival of a Greek legal
code, was discovered.

¹⁴⁴ At birth each Spartan was assigned a _kleros_, a piece of land,
along with Helots to work it. This enabled Spartan males to concentrate
all their time and energy on military exercises, training, and combat.

¹⁴⁵ The _sysities_ were communal meals or messes, generally of ten to
fifteen men at a time, which was a central obligation of social life
among the Spartans.

¹⁴⁶ The _Fideikommiss_ was a form of family wealth based on large-scale
landownership, which was inalienable and could not be divided through
inheritance. It was designed to preserve large landed property as the
economic foundation of the Junkers’ political power. _Rentenanstalten_
were joint savings companies, which provided a lifetime annuity in
return for an annual contribution or an investment of capital.

¹⁴⁷ Gross-Lichterfelde was the main Prussian military academy,
established in 1882. From 1933 to 1945 the grounds of the academy was
the home of Adolf Hitler. During the Cold War it housed the US Army’s
Berlin Brigade.

¹⁴⁸ A region of Greece, south of Mt. Olympus and bordering the Aegean
Sea.

¹⁴⁹ The _Penestai_ were a class of people between slaves and freemen,
much like the Helots in Sparta. They were essentially serfs attached to
the land and could not be sold. They were allowed to serve on naval
ships and to bear arms. They were descendants of the Aeolians, one of
the four subgroups of ancient Greeks, who were forced into servitude
when the Thessalians conquered the area.

¹⁵⁰ Bithynia is in western Asia Minor. The _Mariandynoi_, subjected by
Thracian invaders, had a similar social status as the _Penestai_ of
Thessaly and Helots of Sparta.

¹⁵¹ Lacedaemonians is another word for Spartans.

¹⁵² A people who lived in northern Thessaly.

¹⁵³ A people who lived in eastern Thessaly.

¹⁵⁴ In many places of the Americas, death rates for the indigenous
inhabitants after the entrance of European conquerors and colonizers
reached 90 percent. Many died from overwork and systematic oppression by
the Europeans, though most died from the epidemic diseases that the
Europeans brought with them.

¹⁵⁵ Luxemburg actually refers to the island of “Kumagna” and the port of
“Kumani,” transliterating both names directly from Kovalevsky (p. 51),
who cites Girolamo Benzoni’s _Storia del mundo nuovo_ (History of the
New World) (Venice: F. Rampazetto, 1565). Consulting Benzoni directly,
we have identified “Kumani” as the port city of Cumana in present-day
Venezuela, but were unable to identify “Kumagna.” Cumana is the oldest
European city in South America, founded in 1523.

¹⁵⁶ The _repartimientos_ was a colonial forced labor system imposed on
the indigenous peoples by the Spanish. It was a tribute labor system,
similar to the _mita_ of the Inca Empire, though generally of a far more
brutal character.

¹⁵⁷ The decree was issued by Charles V in 1525.

¹⁵⁸ Although ritual cannibalism was practiced in some parts of the
Caribbean, the claim by early European explorers and colonists that it
was a widespread practice has no factual accuracy. For analyses of how
the myth of Caribbean “cannibalism” became widespread, see _Cannibalism
and the Colonial World_, edited by Francis Barker, Peter Hulme, and
Margaret Iversen (Cambridge: Cambridge University Press, 1998).

¹⁵⁹ Marly de Chåtel was the pen name of Martin Fumée, Lord of
Marly-La-Ville. The book was actually by Francisco López de Gómara, a
Spanish historian who never set foot in the Americas. Marly de Chåtel
was the translator of the French edition, published in 1569. For the
original, see López de Gómara, _Historia general de las Indias_ (General
History of the Indies) (Saragossa: Edición Nucio Martin, 1554).

¹⁶⁰ A widespread prejudice among many Spanish commentators in the
seventeenth century was that the Native Americans were descended from
Ham, the cursed son of Noah.

¹⁶¹ Ujiji is a city in western Tanzania, on the shores of Lake
Tanganyika. Ujiji was a center of the slave trade in East Africa at the
time, which David Livingstone vowed to eliminate. Henry Morgan Stanley
and other European colonists subsequently used the excuse of wanting to
eliminate the slave trade to brutally subjugate and control Central and
Eastern Africa.

¹⁶² Horace Waller, _Letze Reise von David Livingston in Centralafrika
von 1865 bis zu seinem Tode 1873_ (The Final Trip of David Livingston in
Central Africa from 1865 to his Death in 1873) (Hamburg: Hoffmann &
Campe, 1875), pp. 189, 209, 219. See _The Life and African Explorations
of Dr. David Livingstone_ (New York: Cooper Square Press, 2002 [orig.
1874]), pp. 328–9.

¹⁶³ In the _encomienda_ system, the Spanish crown awarded Europeans with
a specific number of Native Americans for whom they had to take
responsibility. In exchange for educating and converting the Native
Americans, the receiver of the grant could obtain tribute from them in
the form of labor or gold. Although it was intended to alleviate the
abuses of the _encomiendas_, it led to widespread and massive abuse of
the indigenous population.

¹⁶⁴ In the Inca Empire the _mitayos_ were not actually a tribe, but
rather people who were mobilized to work for the _mita_, work groups
organized by the state and paid in kind instead of in wages. The Spanish
later made use of this system in order to force the indigenous peoples
to work in the mines. Under Spanish rule, hundreds of thousands perished
from overwork under this arrangement.

¹⁶⁵ In 1785 William Herschel mapped out the Milky Way by using a series
of measurements that he called “star gages.” It actually failed to
properly measure the size and shape of the Milky Way.

¹⁶⁶ The Code of Manu, also known as Manusmriti or Manusmruti, is one of
the most important of the sacred texts of Hinduism in the Indian
Brahmanical system. It is a long poem written in Sanskrit, divided into
twelve chapters, dealing with law, politics, pleasure, and rules for
regulating the caste system. It was composed much earlier than Luxemburg
states, probably as early as the third century BC. See _Manu’s Code of
Law: A Critical Edition and Translation of the Manava-Dharmasastra_,
translated by Patrick Olivelle (Oxford: Oxford University Press, 2006).

¹⁶⁷ The Yajnavalkya is a code of moral and ethical obligations,
originally composed in Sanskrit and written around the fifth century AD.
See _Yajnavalkya Smrte: Sanksrit Text, Transliteration and English
translation_, translated by B.S. Bist (New Dehli: Chaukhamba Sanskrit
Pratishthan, 2004).

¹⁶⁸ The Code of Narada is one of the best known of the
Dharmashastras—ancient Hindu collections of rules regulating personal
and political life, especially criminal law. They were composed between
the fourth and sixth centuries AD. See _The Narada Purana_, translated
and annotated by G.V. Tagare, Ganesh Vasudeo Tagare, Hemendra Nath
Chakravorty (New Dehli: Motilal Banarsidass Publishers, 2008).

¹⁶⁹ The _Ramayana_ is an epic poem composed in Sanskrit around the
eighth or ninth century. According to tradition it was written by
Valmiki. It focuses on the duties and responsibilities of relationships.

¹⁷⁰ The _Mahabharata_ is one of the major Sanskrit epics of ancient
India. It consists of a philosophic discussion of the main purposes of
life_—dharma_ (right action), _artha_ (purpose), _kama_ (pleasure), and
_moksha_ (liberation).

¹⁷¹ In referring to “the Muslim conquest and feudalization” in her
marginal note to this sentence, Luxemburg is following Kovalevsky, who
had argued that the Muslim conquest of North Africa and northern India
introduced feudalism in land relations. Marx, who tended to avoid
applying to non-European societies categories that were specific to
Europe, rejected this claim of “Oriental feudalism” in his commentary on
Kovalevsky’s work. See “Karl Marx. Excerpts from M.M. Kovalevsky,” in
_The Asiatic Mode of Production_, pp. 370–83.

¹⁷² A reference to Timur (also known as Tamerlane), the
fourteenth-century conqueror and founder of the Timurid dynasty who
conquered much of the Middle East, southern Russia, and Central Asia.
While he claimed descent from the Mongol warrior Genghis Khan, he was
actually a Muslim Turk.

¹⁷³ Similar to the Russian village commune, the _mir_, the _zadruga_ of
Bosnia-Herzegovina was a family or village community characterized by
common possession and working of the land.

¹⁷⁴ The terms in parenthesis are drawn from Kovalevsky, pp. 84–5, who
leaves them in the Western alphabet. He sources an 1845 British report
on the Northwest Frontier Provinces, a Pashto-speaking area of
present-day Pakistan and Afghanistan. In Pashto, _wund_ also refers to
the periphery of a village. _Culmee_ refers to land that lacks natural
or artificial irrigation and thus depends for its fertility upon
rainfall.

¹⁷⁵ The discussion of Algeria is missing in the manuscript and may have
been used in _The Accumulation of Capital_.

¹⁷⁶ Marx made a similar point in a letter to Nikolai Danielson of March
22, 1873: “The way in which that form of property was founded
(historically) in Russia, is of course a secondary question, and has
nothing whatever to do with the value of that institution. Still, the
German reactionists like Professor A. Wagner in Berlin, etc., use that
weapon put in their hands by Chicherin. At the same time all historical
analogy speaks against Chicherin. How should it have come to happen that
in Russia the same institution had been simply introduced as a fiscal
measure, as a concomitant incident of serfdom, while everywhere else it
was of spontaneous growth and marked a necessary phase of development of
free peoples?” See _Marx-Engels Collected Works_, Vol. 44 (New York:
International Publishers, 1989), p. 487.

¹⁷⁷ Luxemburg left blank here the figures for area and population.

¹⁷⁸ The first Cossacks were free peoples with a tradition of making
decisions based on a common assembly and who roamed the Russian steppes
after it was depopulated by the Mongol invasions of the thirteenth
century. Those who settled between the rivers Don and Donets became
known as the Don Cossacks. From the sixteenth century they protected the
border territories of Muscovy and became a major pillar of the tsarist
regime. They were subject to a policy of repression and extermination
after the Russian Revolution.

¹⁷⁹ Imperial appanages were portions of the royal domain granted to
blood relatives of the sovereign.

¹⁸⁰ A large percentage of these communal lands were still in existence
at the time of the 1917 Revolution. About 138 million acres of arable
land, meadows and forest were communal and collective property by 1917.

¹⁸¹ Saratov is a region southeast of Moscow, on the Volga River.

¹⁸² “Land captains” were officials imposed on the _mir_ by the state.
They included clerks as well as policemen.

¹⁸³ Orissa is a state in northeast India.

¹⁸⁴ In November 1906 the Tsar decreed a new agricultural policy, aimed
at the destruction of the village communes, as a way to spur capitalist
development in the countryside. As a result of the ensuing “reforms,”
between 1907 and 1915 about 25 percent of the village communities of
Russia were eliminated.

¹⁸⁵ Luxemburg is considerably overstating the case here, since the _mir_
hardly went out of existence by the time of the end of the 1905
Revolution. Not only did it still exist, in some respects it rebounded
in strength immediately following the 1917 Revolution, since government
pressures and restrictions on the _mir_ were lessened. The _mir_ was
actually dealt its death blow by Stalin’s forced collectivization
campaign of the 1930s. For a study of the persistence of the _mir_, see
Pierre Pascal, _Civilisation paysanne en Russie_ (Lausanne: L’Âge
d’homme, 1969).

¹⁸⁶ “Reason becomes unreason, a benefit becomes a scourge” (_Vernunft
wird Unsinn, Wohltat Plage_) is a quote from Goethe’s _Faust_.

¹⁸⁷ The _ager publicus_ is the Latin name for the public lands of
ancient Rome. These public lands were often expropriated from Rome’s
enemies.

¹⁸⁸ The Kazembe was a powerful kingdom of the Kiluba-Chibewa speaking
peoples of south-central Africa, also known as the Lunda-Lunda. “Mwata”
was the title given to its most powerful chiefs. The “Mwate Kazembe” to
which Luxemburg refers is Mwata Kazembe III Lukwesa Ilunga, who repulsed
Portuguese efforts in 1831 (led by Major José Monteiro and António
Gamito) to conquer the kingdom. In 1867, David Livingston encountered
the Lunda-Lunda, led at the time by Mwata Kazembe VII. Mwata Kzembe VII
was later killed by traders. In 1894 the kingdom was divided up between
the British (who took control of what is now Zimbabwe) and Belgium (who
took control of what is now the Democratic Republic of the Congo).

¹⁸⁹ The Marawi were a Bantu people living around Lake Malawi from the
sixteenth century.

¹⁹⁰ The Chewa (sometimes referred to as the Nyanja) resides in central
and southern Africa and is originally from the Congo. They are closely
related to the Bemba. The Portuguese first made contact with them in the
early 1600s. There are currently about 1.5 million Chewa, living
primarily in Malawi and Zambia.

¹⁹¹ Cowries are bits of porcelain that have long served as a form of
money in India and Sub-Saharan Africa.

¹⁹² An island off the east African coast, Zanzibar was a possession of
the Sultans of Omar on the Arabian peninsular until it was taken over by
the British in 1890. For many years it was a center of the African slave
trade.

¹⁹³ This introductory paragraph appears to be, like Luxemburg’s marginal
notes, a reminder to herself rather than part of the intended text.

¹⁹⁴ Luxemburg is referring to the chapter of the manuscript on the
Middle Ages that has unfortunately not been found. Several chapters that
she drafted for the _Introduction to Political Economy_ have never been
found. For more on this, see the Editor’s Introduction to this volume.
For her notes on the Middle Ages, see this volume, pp. 339–419.

¹⁹⁵ Luxemburg is here paraphrasing Marx’s comment in the Preface to his
_Contribution to the Critique of Political Economy_ of 1859: “Mankind
thus inevitably sets itself only such tasks as it is able to solve,
since closer examination will always show that the problem itself arises
only when the material conditions for its solution are already present
or at least in the course of formation.” See _Marx-Engels Collected
Works_, Vol. 29 (New York: International Publishers, 1987), p. 263.

¹⁹⁶ Luxemburg wrongly reversed the roles of the English and Dutch here.

¹⁹⁷ The bracketed expression, which was crossed out in the manuscript,
does not appear in either the original 1925 edition of the _Introduction
to Political Economy_ (edited by Paul Levi) or in the edition contained
in the German-language _Collected Works_ (_Gesammelte Werke_, Band 5
[Berlin: Dietz Verlag, 1990]). On numerous occasions Luxemburg spoke out
against Germany’s genocide against the Herero and Nama peoples of
modern-day Namibia from 1904–08. See especially _The Crisis in German
Social Democracy_ (1915): “The ‘civilized world’ that has stood calmly
by when this same imperialism doomed tens of thousands of Hereros to
destruction; when the desert of the Kalahari shuddered with the insane
cry of the thirsty and the rattling breath of the dying …” See _The Rosa
Luxemburg Reader_, p. 339. The German general who organized the
genocide, Lothar von Trotha, later became an important mentor to the
young Adolf Hitler. The German government did not officially accept
responsibility for this genocide—which slaughtered at least 80 percent
of the Herero people—until August 2004.

¹⁹⁸ _Hegel’s Logic: Being Part One of the Encyclopedia of the
Philosophical Sciences_, translated by William Wallace (Oxford: The
Clarendon Press, 1975), para. 119, _Zusatz_, p. 174. This is one of a
very few direct references to a text by Hegel in Luxemburg’s writings.

¹⁹⁹ In Homer’s _Illiad_, Glaucus was a captain of the Lycian army, which
was allied to Troy. In the epic he meets Diomedes, one of the greatest
warriors of the Greeks, in the field of battle, but instead of taking up
Diomedes’ offer to engage in combat, Glaucus puts down his weapons and
declares his friendship. Diomedes reciprocates by taking off his armor,
worth ten oxen, and gives it to Glaucus.

²⁰⁰ Lemnos is a Greek island in the northern part of the Aegean Sea.

²⁰¹ See Genesis, 23:16: “Abraham closed the bargain with him and weighed
out the amount that Ephron had named in the hearing of the Hittites, 400
shekels of the standard recognized by merchants.” _The Revised English
Bible_ (Oxford: Cambridge University Press, 1989), p. 17.

²⁰² The _shekel_ was used as the unit of currency by the ancient
Hebrews. _Shekel_ is actually an Akkadian word; it was first used as a
standard of measure in the Sumerian civilization of ancient Mesopotamia,
around 3,000 BC. It originally referred to an amount of barley.

²⁰³ One of the most famous of these slave revolts was led by the
Thracian slave Spartacus in 73 BC. Marx considered him one of his
greatest heroes. Luxemburg later named her revolutionary tendency that
opposed World War I and fought to promote social revolution in Germany,
the _Spartakusbund_, after him.

^(C204) The Hanseatic League was an alliance of trading cities that
dominated the Baltic and Northern Europe between the thirteenth and
seventeenth centuries.

²⁰⁵ The intended quotation is missing in the manuscript, and does not
seem to be the substance of Smith’s remarks. Cf. “Nobody ever saw one
animal by its gestures and natural cries signify to another, this is
mine, that yours; I am willing to give this for that” (_The Wealth of
Nations_, Book 1, Chapter 2).

²⁰⁶ The Junkers were members of the landed nobility of Prussia.

²⁰⁷ David Ricardo, _Principles of Political Economy and Taxation_
(London: John Murray, 1817), Chapter 23.

²⁰⁸ A. Von Humboldt, _Versuch über den politischen Zustand des
Königreichs Neu-Spanien_, Vol. 3 (Tübingen: J. G. Cotta, 1812), pp.
17–18; Alexander von Humboldt, _Political Essay on the Kingdom of New
Spain_, translated by John Black (London: Longman, 1811), pp. 420, 426.

²⁰⁹ Ibid., p. 22; English trans., p. 429.

²¹⁰ A royal _cedula_ was an edict issued by the King of Spain.

²¹¹ Alexander Von Humboldt, _Versuch über den politischen Zustand des
Königreichs Neu-Spanien_, pp. 23–4; _Political Essay on the Kingdom of
New Spain_, p. 428.

²¹² Marx made a very similar statement in his 1869 “Preface to the
Second Edition of _The Eighteenth Brumaire of Louis Bonaparte_”: “People
forget Sismondi’s significant saying: The Roman proletariat lived at the
expense of society, while modern society lives at the expense of the
proletariat.” _Marx-Engels Collected Works_, Vol. 21 (New York:
International Publishers, 1985), p. 57. See Jean Charles Léonard Simonde
de Sismondi, _Études sur l’économique politique_, Vol. 1 (Paris:
Treuttel et Würtz, 1837), p. 24

²¹³ The Maurusmünster Abbey in Alsace, a Benedictine monastery, was
built in 590 and was rebuilt and expanded many times during the Middle
Ages, especially in the twelfth century. It played an important economic
role in the High Middle Ages, controlling a significant amount of
territory. For a study of the Abbey, see August Hertzog, _Rechts-und
Wirtschafts-Verfassung des Abteigebietes Maursmünster Wáhrend des
Mittlealters_ (Strassburg: Heitz & Mündel, 1888). Also see first
footnote on page 347.

²¹⁴ Martinmas, or the Feast of St. Martin, is celebrated at harvest
time. It is similar in some respects to the American holiday of
Thanksgiving.

²¹⁵ Cited in Karl Marx, _Capital_ Vol. 1, p. 378. These comments by
William Ferrand were made in a speech to the House of Commons on April
27, 1863.

²¹⁶ Cited in Karl Marx, _Capital_ Vol. 1, p. 353, note 31. See John
Wade, _History of the Middle and Working Classes, with a Popular
Exposition of the Economical and Political Principles which have
influenced the Past and Present Condition of the Industrious Orders_
(London: E. Wilson, 1835), p. 114.

²¹⁷ The American Civil War of 1861–65, and especially the critical role
of Black slaves in attempting to secure their emancipation, was an
important impetus to the development of the US labor movement in the
post-Civil War period. Shortly after the war, in 1867, the first US
National Labor Union was formed to promote the fight for an eight-hour
day. At its founding convention it declared, “The National Labor Union
knows no north, no south, so east, no west, neither color nor sex, on
the question of the rights of labor.” See Timothy Messer-Kruse, _The
Yankee International: Marxism and the American Reform Tradition,
1848–76_ (Chapel Hill: University of North Carolina Press, 1998), p.
191. For a discussion of the impact of the US Civil War on both Marx’s
_Capital_ and the struggle for the eight-day day, see Raya Dunayevskaya,
_Marxism and Freedom, from 1776 Until Today_ (Amherst. NY: Humanity
Books, 2000), pp. 81–91.

²¹⁸ In response to agitation from the workers, on June 1, 1882 the Law
of the Protection of Minors was passed in Russia, which prohibited
children under the age of twelve from working in mills and factories. On
June 3, 1885, an additional law prohibited night work for women and
adolescents under the age of seventeen in the textile industry.

²¹⁹ On June 2, 1897 the Russian government agreed to enact legislation
limiting the working day to eleven and a half hours per day. It took
effect in early 1898.

²²⁰ Marx quotes here from Engels’s article, “The English Ten House Bill”
(1850), in which Engels referred to “The callously brutal exploitation
of children and women at that time—an exploitation which did not let up
so long as there was a muscle, a sinew or a drop of blood left to
extract profit from them.” See _Marx-Engels Collected Works_, Vol. 10
(New York: International Publishers, 1978), p. 288.

²²¹ The phrase “serpent of their agonies” is taken from the title of the
poem by the German poet Heinrich Heine, “Der die Schlange meiner
Qualen.”

²²² Karl Marx, _Capital_ Vol. 1, pp. 415–16. The emphases are Rosa
Luxemburg’s.

²²³ This was written in an anonymous book entitled _An Essay on Trade
and Commerce. By the Author of ‘Considerations on Taxes’_ (London:
1870), pp. 44, 46. It was quoted by Marx in _Capital_ Vol. 1, p. 748.

²²⁴ Ibid.

²²⁵ Rumford’s soup was invented by the American scientist Benjamin
Thompson, Count Rumford, around 1800 as a ration for Bavarian
workhouses, and acquired widespread use for military rations. Its basic
ingredients are pearl barley, dried (yellow) peas and potatoes, with
sour beer and salt being added. The corn and herrings are optional
additions. Luxemburg is presumably quoting a German secondary source.
Marx quoted Count Rumford’s work on this same issue in his 1861–63 draft
of _Capital_, but Luxemburg could not have known of this since the draft
was unknown during her lifetime and was published only decades after her
death. Marx wrote, “The cheapest meal which can be prepared, according
to this ‘philosopher,’ is a soup of barley, Indian corn, pepper, salt,
vinegar, sweet herbs and four herrings in eight gallons of water.” See
_Economic Manuscripts of 1861–63: A Contribution to the Critique of
Political Economy, Marx-Engels Collected Works_, Vol. 30 (New York:
International Publishers, 1988), p. 46. For Count Rumford’s work, see
Benjamin Thompson, _Essays Political, Economical and Philosophical_,
Vol. 1 (London: T. Cadell and W. Davies, 1796–1802), p. 294.

²²⁶ See Justus von Liebig, _Die Chemie in ihrer Anwendung auf Agricultur
und Physiologie_ (Chemistry in its Application to Physiology and
Agriculture), Vol. 1 (Braunschweig: Friedrich Vieweg, 1862), p. 194:
“The workers in the mines of South America, whose daily task (the
heaviest perhaps in the world), consists in bringing to the surface on
their shoulders a load of metal weighing from 180 to 200 pounds, from a
depth of 450 feet, live on bread and beans only; they themselves would
prefer the bread alone for food, but their masters, who have found out
that the men cannot work so hard on bread, treat them like horses, and
compel them to eat beans; beans are relatively much richer in bone-ash
than is bread.” Marx quotes this in _Capital_ Vol. 1, p. 718.

²²⁷ Prior to the introduction of the Euro in 2001, a Deutschmark was
comprised of 100 pfennigs. At the current rate of exchange, four
pfennigs would be worth only a few cents.

²²⁸ At least 20,000 people were murdered between May 21 and 28, 1871 by
the counter-revolutionary forces that crushed the Paris Commune. Most
were summarily executed by the government after the fighting was over.
Tens of thousands of others who survived were imprisoned and banished.

²²⁹ _Lumpenproletariat_ is generally a derogatory term to refer to those
excluded from useful labor (the permanently unemployed, beggars, petty
thieves, etc.) and therefore unlikely to develop class consciousness. It
has connotations similar to the present-day term “the underclass.”
Although Marxists traditionally have looked upon the _lumpenproletariat_
in disdain, in some of her writings—especially _Mass Strike, the
Political Party, and the Trade Unions_—Luxemburg noted its capacity to
sometimes play a relatively progressive social role, as in the 1905
Russian Revolution.

²³⁰ Marx, _Capital_ Vol. 1, p. 798. Marx’s emphasis.

²³¹ In European feudalism, enfeoffment was the act by which an
individual was provided with land in exchange for a pledge of service to
the lord.

²³² Cited in Marx, _Capital_ Vol. 1, p. 800. See Joseph Townsend, _A
Dissertation on the Poor Laws_ (London: V. Dilly, 1786), pp. 15, 38, 41.

²³³ Aristotle, _The Politics_ in _The Complete Works of Aristotle_, Vol.
2, edited by Jonathan Barnes (Princeton: Princeton University Press,
1984, p. 1990) [1254b22–1255a2].

²³⁴ Luxemburg is arguing that relative wages can decline even as
absolute wages increase, since the higher nominal wages obtained by
workers tend to be offset by increased gains in productivity. The
implication is that simply securing a higher nominal or absolute wage
does not directly threaten the capitalist system. On the other hand,
wage increases that challenge capital’s ability to extract additional
amounts of surplus value through technological innovation and increased
labor productivity relative to workers’ wages challenges the very basis
of capitalist accumulation.

²³⁵ _Kurmade_ (also _die kurmede_), _besthaupt_ and _gewandrecht_
(literally, “a right to the robe”) refers to a manorial levy extracted
from peasants upon the death of a lord or a change of ownership in the
manor. Payment could be made in kind (through grain or cattle), money,
or even by granting the lord of the manor allowance to sleep with a
peasant’s wife. It essentially served as an inheritance tax.

²³⁶ The term “total personal freedom of property” was deleted in the
manuscript in pencil in the margin and replaced by the term “political
freedom.”

²³⁷ The argument here provides a theoretical basis for Luxemburg’s
criticism of the conservative tendencies of the trade union movement,
which is a persistent theme in her writings from _Reform of Revolution_
onward. Trade unions, concerned with immediate bread-and-butter issues,
tend to focus on increasing the workers’ absolute wage while neglecting
the tendency of their relative wages to decline. This by no means
renders the role of trade unions superfluous, however, since as their
struggles unfold in the context of a broader revolutionary challenge to
the system, the need to challenge the decline in the relative wage can
come increasingly to the fore.

²³⁸ According to Marx, the value of labor power is not a given magnitude
independent of contingent cultural, moral, and social considerations; it
is instead directly dependent upon them. What is “necessary” to sustain
a worker in one area or era is not the same as what is necessary in
another. Luxemburg is showing that the class struggle itself determines
the value of labor power. The subjective factor is integral to the
objective determination of a central economic category of capitalism.

²³⁹ This reference to the outbreak of revolution in Russia shows that
Luxemburg re-edited the text for publication as late as 1917–18, while
imprisoned in the Wronke fortress.

²⁴⁰ A “yellow” union is a company union, generally formed by employers
or the government in order to head-off independent working-class action
and militancy. The color yellow was initially chosen for such unions in
order to distinguish them from the socialist unions’ embrace of red. The
first yellow union was established in France in December, 1899 at
Montceau-les-Mines.

²⁴¹ Lassalle held that since the capitalist law of value is defined by
paying workers according to the minimum necessary for their subsistence,
the effort of trade unions to raise wages above this minimum “abolishes”
the law of value. In contrast, Luxemburg holds that since the value of
labor power is largely determined by the intensity of the class
struggle, the efforts of trade unions to raise workers’ wages instead
_realizes_ the capitalist law of value.

²⁴² Lassalle’s theory of the “iron law of wages” held that in capitalism
wages tend towards the minimum requirements necessary to sustain the
laborer. According to this alleged “iron law,” wages can never drop
below subsistence levels, since that would threaten the physical
existence of the worker, but neither can they rise much above
subsistence, given the competition among workers for employment. The
logical implication of the theory is that the effort of trade unions to
secure higher wages for its members is bound to prove ultimately
fruitless. Although Marx is often associated with the idea, Lassalle’s
“iron law of wages” owes more to Malthus’ theory of population than to
Marx’s work. Marx fervently opposed Lassalle’s conception of the iron
law of wages on both empirical and theoretical grounds; he argued that
while there is a _tendency_ for wages, at certain historic junctures, to
gravitate towards subsistence, wages are dependent on the level of class
struggle between workers and capitalists and therefore are subject to no
“iron” laws at all.

²⁴³ See _Capital_ Vol. 1, pp. 781–94. 1867 was the year Marx published
the first volume of _Capital_.

²⁴⁴ Luxemburg’s discussion of the Duchess of Sutherland closely follows
Marx’s critique of her policies in _Capital_ Vol. 1, p. 891.

²⁴⁵ Wilhelm Wolff’s pamphlet _Die schlesische Milliarde_, on the
weavers’ uprising in Silesia, was first published as an article series
in Marx’s _Neue Rheinische Zeitung_. Exiled in Manchester, Wolff
remained a staunch friend of Marx and Engels until his death in 1864,
and Marx dedicated the first volume of _Capital_ to “my unforgettable
friend Wilhelm Wolff—intrepid, faithful, noble protagonist of the
proletariat” (this dedication is unfortunately omitted in the Penguin
edition). See Wilhelm Wolff, _Die schlesische Milliard mit einer
Einleitung von Friedrich Engels_ (Hottingen-Zurich: Verlag der
Volksbuchhandlung, 1886). See also Engels’s series of articles “Wilhelm
Wolff” in _Marx-Engels Collected Works_, Vol. 24 (New York:
International Publishers, 1989), pp. 129–71.

²⁴⁶ At the end of this chapter the following words were added to the
manuscript in pencil: “Reformation! Bl. 293ff. Formation of the
psychological _type_ of the modern wage-slave out of the persecuted
beggar, Bl. 350.”

²⁴⁷ This is more exhaustively treated in Luxemburg’s _Accumulation of
Capital_.

²⁴⁸ By 1900, 75 percent of world coffee production was in Brazil. In
1907, a fall in price on the international coffee market led to the
first great coffee crisis in the state of São Paulo.

²⁴⁹ This serves as the central argument of Luxemburg’s _Accumulation of
Capital_, which argues that the barriers to continued capitalist
development lie in the failure to realize surplus-value.


SLAVERY

¹ The _Mark_ was an ancient Germanic communal form of village
organization that survived in modified form into modern times. Luxemburg
subsequently uses the term more universally, applying to what she saw as
similar forms in various societies around the world.

² Friedrich Engels, _Herrn Eugen Dühring’s Umwalzung der Wissenschaft_
(Stuttgart: Verlag von J.H.W. Dietz, 1894); _Anti-Dühring: Herr Eugen
Dühring’s Revolution in Science, Marx-Engels Collected Works_, Vol. 25
(New York: International Publishers, 1987), pp. 146–71.

³ _Herrn Eugen Dühring’s Umwalzung der Wissenschaft; Anti-Dühring: Herr
Eugen Dühring’s Revolution in Science_, pp. 168–9.

⁴ The gens (plural, _gentes_) was a clan or family group in ancient Rome
that shared a common name, traceable to a common ancestor. Descent was
through the male heir.

⁵ The archeological discoveries of Arthur Evans from 1900 to 1905, which
excavated the ancient Minoan city of Knossos, showed that Cretan history
long preceded the “Dorian conquest” of 1,200 BC; literate Minoan
civilization goes back to at least 2,700 BC.

⁶ The notion that a “Dorian conquest” of Greece occurred around 1,200 BC
that ushered in a “dark age” lasting until the ninth century was first
formulated by German scholars in the early nineteenth century to explain
the apparent sudden collapse of Mycenaean civilization in southern
Greece and islands in the Aegean. There is no scholarly consensus,
however, as to whether the collapse resulted from invasions by
Greek-speaking Dorians who were initially external to the region. Some
point to internal factors, such as ecological or social collapse, while
others contend that the destruction of Myceanaean civilization may have
been undertaken by the “sea peoples” who ravaged the eastern
Mediterranean at the end of the second millennium BC.

⁷ In Greek mythology the Minotaur is a creature with the body of a man
and the head of a bull that resides in a maze-like construction, the
labyrinth. The Minotaur feasted on human flesh; according to Greek
mythology, custom demanded that seven Athenian youths and seven virgins
be sent on a regular basis to be devoured by it.

⁸ Bithynia was a region in what is now northwest Turkey, close to the
Bosporus straights.

⁹ The _Periokoi_ were mainly farmers and merchants who lived in the
vicinity of Sparta. They were remnants of a conquered people who lived
in the less fertile hills and along the coasts. Although they lacked
citizens’ rights, they were not slaves or Helots.

¹⁰ The use of minted coin as money originated in Asia Minor, in the
Kingdom of Lydia, around 650 BC.

¹¹ Homer lived in the eighth century BC. Luxemburg’s reference to a
“great migration of the Germanic peoples” probably refers to a purported
expansion of German-speaking tribes from southern Scandinavia to the
Lower Rhine and Eastern Germany between 850 and 650 BC. The period is
clouded in obscurity, however, and there is little scholarly consensus
about the extent or nature of this migration; some argue that it
actually occurred much later.

¹² The Solonian Revolution refers to the series of reforms introduced by
the Athenian statesman Solon in the sixth century BC. Central to these
was the cancellation of onerous debts that the Athenian poor owed the
aristocrats and large landowners. His reforms also lowered the property
and financial qualifications for voting and holding public office, which
served as an important foundation for the later emergence of Athenian
democracy.

¹³ See Karl Julius Plötz’s _Auszug aus der alten, mittleren und neuren
geschichte_ (Abstract of Ancient, Medieval, and Modern History) (Berlin:
A.G. Ploetz, 1895). The book has undergone dozens of editions since the
nineteenth century; it is now published under the title _Der Große
Ploetz—Auszug der Geschichte_ (Göttingen: Vandenhoeck & Ruprecht, 2008).

¹⁴ Karl Johann Rodbertus, a German economist and conservative socialist,
rejected Eduard Meyer’s contention that ancient Greek slavery
represented a form of incipient capitalism. Max Weber later praised
Rodbertus’s studies on the ancient world as influencing his own approach
to the understanding of this issue. Luxemburg is probably referring to
Rodbertus’s _Zur Frage des Sachwerths des Geldes in Altertum_ (Or the
Question of the Intrinsic Value of Money in Antiquity) (Jena: Druck und
Verlag von Freidrich Mauke, 1870).

¹⁵ See Karl Bücher, _Die Aufstände der unfreien Arbeiter_ (The
Rebellions of Unfree Labor) (Frankfurt am Maine: Druck von C. Adekmann,
1874). Marx made notes of this work of Bücher’s on slave revolts, which
will appear for the first time in the forthcoming Vol. IV/27 of the
_Marx-Engels Gesamtausgabe_.

¹⁶ See Karl Kautsky, _Der Ursprung des Christentrums: Eine historische
Untersuchung_ (Stuttgart: J.H.W. Dietz, 1908). For an English
translation, see _Foundations of Christianity_, translated by Jacob
Hartmann (New York: Monthly Review, 1972).

¹⁷ See Eduard Meyer, “Die Bevölkerung im Altertum,” _Handwörterbuch der
Staatswissenschaften_, Vol. 2 (1886), pp. 674 ff. In this work Meyer
took issue with the claim that ancient Greece suffered from a severe
decline in population from the seventh century BC.

¹⁸ In the original, the word “comrade” is crossed out.

¹⁹ Pericles actually lived from 495 to 429 BC. He led Athens from 461 to
429 BC.

²⁰ These figures, compiled by the German economic historian and
demographer Karl Julius Beloch, are considered by today’s scholars to be
largely accurate. See his highly influential _Griechische Geschichte_
(Greek History), three volumes (Strasbourg: Verlag von Karl J. Trubner,
1893–1904).

²¹ Metics were resident aliens who did not have citizen rights, although
they served in the military and were subject to special tax burdens.

²² Aristotle’s _Politics_, in _The Complete Works of Aristotle_, edited
by Jonathan Barnes, p. 1988 [1253b4].

²³ Ibid., p. 1982 [1255b30–32].

²⁴ The statement is actually not from Book III but rather Book I of
Aristotle’s _Politics_. See Ibid., pp. 190–1 [1254b5–1255b1],

²⁵ By tradition, Rome was founded in 753 BC.

²⁶ Homer himself is reputed to have lived in the latter part of the
eighth century BC, although the odes that came to become known as the
_Iliad_ may have been orally composed and transmitted as early as the
tenth or eleventh centuries BC.

²⁷ The Punic Wars were fought between Rome and Carthage. Rome obtained
Sicily as a result of the First Punic War (264 to 241 BC), southern
Spain and much of the North African coast as a result of the Second
Punic War (218 to 201 BC), and the remainder of Carthage through the
Third Punic War (149 to 146 BC).

²⁸ The _villicus_ was an estate manager.

²⁹ Several words are missing from the manuscript. Luxemburg appears to
be referring to a manor house or villa.

³⁰ The head of a Roman family.

³¹ The gods that were held to watch over and protect the goods of a
household were called _penates_. When Romans sat down for a meal, they
would traditionally throw a bit of the food into the hearth to feed the
_penates. Lares_ were guardian deities that were held to watch over and
protect people in a given location.

³² There were actually four Macedonian Wars, the last being between 150
and 148 BC, in which Rome put down a Macedonian rebellion against Roman
rule.

³³ Antioch became the capital of the Seleucid Empire in the third
century BC. Shortly after 197 BC, its ruler Antiochus III invaded Greece
and came into conflict with Roman forces. He was defeated by the Romans
and forced to sign the Treaty of Apamea in 188, which ceded Antioch and
all of western Asia Minor to the Romans.

³⁴ The Aetolian League was a confederation of cities in central Greece
established in the third century BC in response to pressure from
Macedonians in the north and the Achean League (which included Thebes,
Megara, and Corinth) in the south. It was the first Greek alliance to
side with the Romans, fighting alongside them in the First Macedonian
War of 215 to 205 BC. It later tried to maintain its independence from
Rome, but was defeated (along with other Greek allies) by the Romans in
the Achaean War of 146 BC.

³⁵ Numidia was an ancient Berber kingdom in what is now eastern Algeria
and western Tunisia. By the end of the Third Punic War it was allied
with Rome and retained for a generation more its independence. The
Numidians stubbornly resisted Rome’s ultimately successful effort to
conquer them from 111 to 105 BC.

³⁶ A reference _to F.W. Putzgers Historischer Schul-Atlas_ (Putzger’s
Historical School Atlas) (Leipzig: Velhagen and Klasing, 1877). This
historical atlas was widely used in schools at the time and it has
appeared in many new editions since. It remains in print today. See
_Putzger—Atlas und Chronik zur Weltgeschichte_ (Berlin: Cornelius,
2002).

³⁷ The Cimbri, by tradition from Denmark, were either a Germanic or
Celtic people who migrated south in the second century BC and attacked
the Roman Republic. They defeated the Romans in a series of battles
between 109 and 103 BC, reaching as far south as northern Spain and
Italy. The Romans finally defeated them at the Battle of Vercallae in
101 BC, after which the Cimbri were exterminated by the Romans. The
Teutones, also originally from Denmark, were allied with the Cimbri. In
102 BC the Romans defeated them in the Battle of Aquae Sextiae, in
modern-day France.

³⁸ The kingdom of Pontus was a Persian state on the southern coast of
the Black Sea in modern-day Turkey. It fought Rome in a series of three
bitter wars between 88 and 63 BC, known as the Mithridatic Wars. It
finally succumbed to Rome in the Third Mithridatic War, which ended in
63 BC.

³⁹ The Roman conquest of Gaul was led by Julius Caesar.

⁴⁰ The Alexandrian wars of 30 BC represented the final chapter in Rome’s
effort to conquer Egypt. Alexandria (the most important city in Egypt at
the time) was captured by Octavian, the future emperor of Rome, on
August 1, 30 BC. To celebrate the victory, Octavian renamed himself
Augustus (“The Great One”) and changed the name of the month to August.

⁴¹ That is, a proletarian was one who produced many offspring, hence
“prolific.”

⁴² See Marx’s statement in his 1869 “Preface to the Second Edition of
_The Eighteenth Brumaire of Louis Bonaparte_”: “People forget Sismondi’s
significant saying: The Roman proletariat lived at the expense of
society, while modern society lives at the expense of the proletariat.”
_Marx-Engels Collected Works_, Vol. 21 (New York: International
Publishers, 1985), p. 57. See Jean Charles Léonard Simonde de Sismondi,
_Études sur l’économique politique_, Vol. 1 (Paris: Treuttel et Würtz,
1837), p. 24.

⁴³ Luxemburg is referring to the quest by many middle class people to
return to an era prior to the ruination of their class.

⁴⁴ Tiberius and Gaius Gracchus were Roman social reformers who sought to
give more power to the plebeian class by breaking up large landed
estates and distributing land to soldiers, disenfranshised peasants and
the poor. Tiberius Gracchus was elected tribune in 133 BC and appealed
to the people to support his revolutionary proposals, which included
limiting the amount of land that could be owned by any individual.
Threatened by his proposals, Roman Senators had Tiberius and several
hundred of his followers clubbed to death. Gaius Gracchus, his brother,
was elected as tribune in 123 BC and pushed for land redistribution as
well as extending citizenship rights to non-Roman Italians. Thousands of
his followers were slaughtered by patrician forces.

⁴⁵ For the English-language text of Tiberius Gracchus’s speech, see
Plutarch, _The Parallel Lives_, translated by Bernadotte Perrin
(Cambridge: Harvard University Press, 1921), p. 167.

⁴⁶ At the time Luxemburg was composing this piece, a lively debate was
taking place in Germany and within the German Social-Democratic movement
concerning the existence of capitalism in the ancient world. On one side
stood Karl Bücher and Eduard Meyer, who contended that a relatively
modern form of capitalism existed in ancient Greece and Rome. This was
contested by Guiseppe Salvioli, an Italian Marxist, as well as by Karl
Kautsky. See Giuseppe Salvioli, _Der Kapitalismus im Altertum. Studien
über die römische Wirtschaftsgeschichte_ (Capitalism in Antiquity:
Studies on Roman Economic History) (Stuttgart: J.H.W. Dietz Nachfolger,
1922 [orig. 1912]). Kautsky wrote the Preface to Salvioli’s book and
weighed in on the debate on other occasions. For a recent study of this
debate, see Daniel Gaido, “Karl Kautsky on Capitalism in the Ancient
World,” in _The Journal of Peasant Studies_, Vol. 30 (2) January 2003,
pp. 146–158.

⁴⁷ Apulia is a region of southern Italy bordering the Adriatic Sea. It
includes the “boot” of Italy. During the Roman Empire it was an
important center for the growing of grain and oil. The slave revolt that
Luxemburg refers to actually occurred in 185 BC.

⁴⁸ Etruria, named after the Etruscans, is in northwest Italy. The slave
revolt that Luxemburg mentions actually took place in 196 BC.

⁴⁹ A series of slave revolts occurred in Sicily in the second century
BC, especially from 135 to 132 BC and 103 to 101 BC. These were the
“most threatening” of all the many slave revolts in ancient Rome because
some of them led to the creation of temporary but relatively stable
slave-run states. As many as a quarter of a million slaves took part in
some of the Sicilian slave revolts.

⁵⁰ 113 BC appears to be a slip of the pen, since the second Sicilian
slave revolt occurred from 103 to 101 BC.

⁵¹ Spartacus was originally a shepherd from Thrace, to the north of
Greece. After being captured by the Romans, he became a gladiator and a
slave. After escaping from a gladiator school in 73 BC, he formed an
army (numbering as many as 100,000) that defeated four Roman armies and
controlled most of southern Italy. He was captured and crucified (along
with 6,000 others) in 71 BC.

⁵² Luxemburg is here probably referring to invasions by barbarian
tribes.

⁵³ A system of land tenure in which a tenant farmer was given land to
work in return for a fixed payment or for certain stated labor services
of a nonmilitary nature.

⁵⁴ _Colonus_ (plural, _coloni_) is Latin for farmer or colonist, derived
from _colo_, one who toils, cultivates, or worships the soil. In the
Roman Empire the _coloni_ were impoverished farmers who worked for
landed proprietors, either for money, service, or labor. They often
sought protection on the landed estates from invaders or government
officials. In exchange for working the land, they were forbidden to sell
or leave it. Their descendants became the serfs of the European Middle
Ages.

⁵⁵ At this point in the typescript, the following paragraph was heavily
crossed out: In Greece, a refinement of craft production emerged as a
result of slavery, without which this refinement would not have been
possible. In Rome, the opposite is the case: there the work of craftsmen
took a definite step backward. Only the crudest tools, for their own
use, were produced by the slaves or peasant farmers; all more refined
products [by skilled craftsmen] were imported from the subjugated lands.
In this respect, then, Roman slavery brought no progress.

⁵⁶ That is, their statues and other sacred objects, as well as those who
worshipped them whom the Romans made slaves and prisoners.

⁵⁷ See Joseph Dietzgen, _Wesen der menschlichen Kopfarbeit_ (The Nature
of Human Mental Labor) (Hamburg: O. Meissner, 1869)

⁵⁸ See Karl Vorländer, _Geschichte der Philosophie_ (History of
Philosophy) (Leipzig: Dürr’schen Buchandlung, 1908).

⁵⁹ See Friedrich Engels, _Herrn Eugen Dühring’s Umwalzung der
Wissenschaft; Anti-Dühring: Herr Eugen Dühring’s Revolution in Science,
Marx-Engels Collected Works_, Volume 25.

⁶⁰ See Eduard Meyer, _Die wirtschaftliche Entwicklung des Altertums. Ein
Vortrag_ (Economic Development in Antiquity: A Lecture) (Jena: G.
Fischer, 1895); _Die Sklaverei im Altertrum_ (Slavery in Antiquity)
(Dresden: v. Jahn & Jaensch, 1898); and “Die Bevölkerung im _Altertum_,”
_Handwörterbuch der Staatswissenschafte_, Vol. II (3), pp. 674 ff.

⁶¹ See Karl Kautsky, _Vorläufer des neueren Sozialismus. Erster Band:
Plato_ (Forerunners of Modern Socialism: Vol. 1, Plato) (Stuttgart:
J.H.W. Dietz, 1895); and Der _Ursprung des Christentums_.

⁶² See Karl Kautsky, _Der Ursprung des Christentrums: Eine historische
Untersuchung_ (Stuttgart: J.H.W. Dietz, 1908). For an English
translation, see _Foundations of Christianity_, translated by Jacob
Hartmann (New York: Monthly Review, 1972).

⁶³ In the typescript at the bottom of this page a note appears, which
was not written by Luxemburg; it reads: “In regard to Kautsky’s
_Foundations of Christianity_: In that work Kautsky elucidates the role
of the slaves a little differently than does Rosa Luxemburg. He
perceives slavery as exclusively a form of decline and retrogression;
that is because his focus is on Roman slavery. But Greek slavery was
decisive in world history. Roman history can be interpreted only as
further development of Greek. Comrade Luxemburg, in her view of slavery,
agrees with Marx and Engels, namely, with the view that slavery was a
point of departure for important steps forward.” Luxemburg must have
emphasized her disagreement with Kautsky on this point, and the student
or stenographer who wrote this is presumably echoing what Luxemburg
said.

⁶⁴ See Friedrich Engels, _Ludwig Feuerbach und der Ausgang der
klassischen Philosophie_ (Berlin: J.H.W. Dietz, 1886); _Ludwig Feuerbach
and the End of Classical German Philosophy, Marx-Engels Collected
Works_, Volume 26 (New York: International Publishers, 1990), pp.
353–98.

⁶⁵ See Beloch’s _Griechische Geschichte_ (Greek History), four volumes
(Strassburg: Verlag Karl J. Trubner, 1893–1904).

⁶⁶ See Karl Bücher, _Die Entstehung der Volkswirtschaft_.

⁶⁷ See Theodor Mommsen, _Römische Geschichte_ (History of Rome), 3
Volumes (Darmstadt: Wissenschaftliche Buchgesellschaft, 2010 [orig.
1854–56]). English edition, _The History of Rome_, volumes 1–5,
translated by William Purdie Dickson (Piscataway, NJ: Gorgias Press,
2010).

⁶⁸ See Max Weber, “Agrarian Relations,” _Handwörterbuch der
Staatswissenschaften_, Vol. I (3), 1909, pp. 52–188. For an English
translation, see _The Agrarian Sociology of Ancient Civilizations_,
translated by R.I, Frank (Bristol: Classical Press, 1976).

⁶⁹ This refers to a series of articles by Paul Ernest under the title
“Die sozialen Zustände im römishcen Reiche vor dem Einfall der Barbaren”
(Social Conditions in the Roman Empire Before the Invasion of the
Barbarians),” published in Vol. XI of _Die Neue Zeit_, in 1893.

⁷⁰ See “Aus der römischen Geschichte” (From Roman History),
_Gleichheit_, Nos. 13, 14, 15, 1908–09.

⁷¹ “Der Sklavenaufstand in Sizilien” (The Slave Uprising in Sicily),
_Gleichheit_, 18 (1908), pp. 57–9. At this point at the end of the
typescript, the following parenthetical comment, not by Rosa Luxemburg,
appears: “(Both [or _all_ the items referred to in the children’s
supplement] are either by Rosa or by Clara [Zetkin].” Rosa Luxemburg’s
close friend Clara Zetkin was the editor of the socialist women’s paper
_Gleichheit_, based in Stuttgart; and that the children’s supplement was
at that time being edited by Clara’s son, Konstantin (Kostya) Zetkin,
with whom Luxemburg was also closely associated.


NOTES ABOUT THE ECONOMIC FORM OF ANTIQUITY/SLAVERY

¹ The greater part of these “Notes About Slavery” seem to have been
expanded more fully in Luxemburg’s longer manuscript entitled “Slavery,”
which from the internal evidence (in the bibliography) was written in
1909 or after. However, there is some material here that does not appear
in the longer manuscript, for example, Luxemburg’s notes on the price of
slaves at the beginning of this manuscript, and later on, her listing of
what seem to be three proverbs showing the contemptuous attitude of the
Roman rulers toward their slaves, and also her references to Gibbon and
Blair on the number of slaves compared to the number of freemen.

² The “two persons” here may well refer to two slaves.

³ Lucius Licinius Lucullus was a Roman politician and general who
conquered much of Asia Minor in the Third Mithridatic War of 73 to 63
BC. He returned to Rome from the war with massive numbers of slaves and
captured goods and became one of the wealthiest men in the Roman
Republic.

⁴ The passage in brackets is in the original typescript.

⁵ The Gracchi refers to the brothers Tiberius and Gaius Gracchus, Roman
plebeians who sought to limit the power of the large landowning
patricians, at the end of the second century BC.

⁶ According to tradition, Rome was founded in 753 and was led for the
next centuries by kings who were chosen by the people of Rome. The end
of Rome’s “age of kings” was not 570 BC, as stated in the text, but
rather 509 BC. In that year the last Roman king, Lucius Tarquinius
Superbus, was overthrown in a popular uprising that led to the creation
of the Roman Republic.

⁷ The Roman Republic was formed in 509 BC, not 570 BC. It lasted until
31 BC.

⁸ The three Punic Wars between Rome and Carthage were fought in the
years 264–241 BC, 218–201 BC, and 149–146 BC.

⁹ Julius Caesar was undisputed ruler of Rome from 49 to 44 BC.

¹⁰ The Roman Empire lasted from 31 BC to 476 AD.

¹¹ This refers to a series of reforms initiated by the Roman King
Servius Tullius in the sixth century BC, which undermined the power of
the aristocrats in favor of the plebeians.

¹² The _Ager publicus_ were the public lands of ancient Rome, which were
often obtained through the conquest of Rome’s opponents.

¹³ In 494 BC a group of Roman plebeians, deciding that they could suffer
oppression and discrimination by the Roman state no longer, left Rome
and occupied a hill on the banks of the A’nio River, a few miles outside
of the city. They refused to abandon their occupation until Rome met
their demands for greater economic rights and political participation.
The patricians acceded to many of their demands by promising to release
all plebeians imprisoned for non-payment of debts and to allow plebeians
to veto decisions by magistrates.

¹⁴ The Law of the Twelve Tablets, formulated in the middle of the fifth
century BC, was the foundation of Roman law during the Republic. The
laws were adopted despite fierce opposition from the patricians due to
the protests of plebeians, who threatened to leave Rome if their rights
were not recognized. According to tradition, the laws were composed by a
committee of ten men who traveled to Athens to study Solon’s
constitution of Athens.

¹⁵ A morgen, a rough unit of measurement in medieval Germany, was
equivalent to one-half to two-and-a-half acres. It was based on the
amount of land one person could farm with an ox in a day.

¹⁶ _Familia rustica_ is Latin for farm slaves.

¹⁷ _Villa rustica_ is Latin for countryside villa, used for the purpose
of agricultural production.

¹⁸ Rye is native to central and eastern Turkey. Although it was
cultivated in parts of northern and central Europe in the Bronze Age, it
was not cultivated by Romans until the end of the Republic. It was often
disparaged by Romans as an unappealing grain. Oats was also cultivated
in the Bronze Age, but its use in southern Europe is not mentioned in
extant literature until the first century AD.

¹⁹ A sheaf is a large bundle in which grain is bound together after
reaping. In ancient Rome hired reapers were often paid in the sixth and
ninth sheaf of grain instead of in wages.

²⁰ See William Blair, _An Inquiry into the State of Slavery Amongst the
Romans; From the Earliest Period, Till the Establishment of the Lombards
in Italy_ (Edinburgh: Thomas Clark, 1833).

²¹ Miletus was an ancient Greek city on the western shores of modern
Turkey. It was one of the wealthiest Greek cities, in part because of it
was a center for extracting purple dye from sea snails.

²² “Royal Purple,” the purple natural dye extracted from sea snails, was
also known as Tyrian purple, from the city in Phoenicia in which much of
it was produced. It was extremely expensive; it was worth its weight in
silver.

²³ As a result, the vast majority of the soldiers in the Roman army in
the third and fourth centuries AD were actually members of Germanic
tribes.

²⁴ For a discussion of the slave revolt in Apulia, in southern Italy, in
185 BC, see Thomas Wiedemann, _Greek and Roman Slavery_ (Baltimore and
London: John Hopkins University Press, 1981).

²⁵ The battle was between Roman armies and rebel slaves, whose revolt
was quickly suppressed.

²⁶ The slave revolt in Latium was initiated by prisoners of war from
Carthage, whom the Romans had enslaved during the Second Punic War.

²⁷ Delos, an island in the eastern Mediterranean, became a major market
for the slave trade in the second century BC.

²⁸ The leader of this slave revolt, known as the First Servile War, was
Eunus, who was from the Middle East. He led the slaves of eastern Sicily
in a major revolt, which at one point had over 200,000 participants. The
Romans put down the revolt with great difficulty.

²⁹ The second slave war in Sicily actually lasted from 104 to 100 BC.

³⁰ For a recent study of the Spartacus slave revolt, which lasted from
73 to 71 BC, see Brent Shaw, _Spartacus and the Slave Wars: A Brief
History with Documents_ (Bedford: St. Martin’s Press, 2001).

³¹ The question marks are in the original typescript.

³² Antonius Pius, Roman Emperor from 138–161 AD, made it illegal for a
master to kill his slave.

³³ The _colonatum_ consisted of _coloni_, peasant farmers with a status
similar to serfs.



 EDITOR’S NOTES


THE MIDDLE AGES. FEUDALISM. DEVELOPMENT OF CITIES

¹ See the first footnote on page 301.

² A word is crossed out here in the original typescript.

³ The term given here for _Erbgut_, inherited property, can also be
translated as ancestral estate.

⁴ The _Blutbann_, literally “blood spell,” refers to the power of the
Emperor of the Holy Roman Empire to impose capital punishment. Over time
the power to impose the _Blutbann_ became usurped by territorial nobles.

⁵ That is, immunity from taxation.

⁶ A _Hufe_ (“hide” in old English) were long strips of arable land,
extending roughly 500 meters long and 200 meters wide. A _Hufe_,
originally cultivated by one family, was often split into various sizes
over the passage of time. It was also a term of taxation for the amount
owed to the lord for using the particular strip of land. In medieval
Germany, few peasant farms were larger than two or four _Hufe_, each
_Hufe_ being approximately 15 to 30 acres. The size of a _Hufe_ varied
widely, depending on geographical area and historical periods; its size
would even vary within the same district (in some cases it consisted of
80 to 120 acres). In modern times a _Hufe_ was established as 41.5
acres.

⁷ This is a reference to the German Peasant wars of the early sixteenth
century.

⁸ A _Gau_ was a geographical region or district of German tribal
organization that comprised two or more marks. The _Gauverfassung_ was
the constitution (i.e., the legal and administrative structure) of that
region or district.

⁹ Literally, those settled in the back or down below.

¹⁰ An institution consisting of _coloni_; singular, _colonus_.

¹¹ _Landereien_ can also refer to parcels of land on an estate.

¹² These bondsmen were also referred to as _coloni_, peasants tied to
the land.

¹³ _Wends_ refers to an assortment of western Slavic peoples living
close to areas of German settlement. In the Middle Ages, the term was
often used for Slavs living within the Holy Roman Empire.

¹⁴ The _Ministerialen_ were people subject to the orders of the
“ministers,” that is, the officials of the estate.

¹⁵ The undivided mark consisted of the lands held in common by the mark
community.

¹⁶ That is, land partly cultivated by tenant farmers. _Salländereien_
can also be translated as “manor hall lands.”

¹⁷ The Maurusmünster Abbey (also known as Marmoutier Abbey) in Alsace
was founded in the sixth century AD by a community of Irish monks. In
the eighth century it was reorganized as a Benedictine monastery under
Maurus, from which its name derives. In the twelfth century it become
extremely prosperous and controlled a large amount of surrounding
territory. It began to go into decline during the late Middle Ages. Also
see the first footnote on page 269.

¹⁸ In some cases Luxemburg’s typescript has Arabic numerals when
enumerating something such as goods in kind (e.g., 6 loaves of bread)
and in other cases it did not (e.g., three times a year). For the most
part we have followed the usage in the typescript.

¹⁹ St. John’s Day was also known as Midsummer Day, the feast of St. John
the Baptist. In many countries of Europe it is celebrated on June 24.

²⁰ Service people under the officials of the manorial household.

²¹ _Das spanische Rohr_ in the typescript—that is, a cane originally
from Spain.

²² This is a reference to Sigurd Syr Halfdansson (died 1018), who was a
king of northern Ostlandet, in modern Norway. He was renowned for
eschewing royal prerogatives, preferring instead to carefully manage his
rural property. His surname “Syr” may derive from the word for “sow,”
indicating that he was “rooted to the soil like a pig.”

²³ Ferdinand Lassalle, _Herr Bastiat-Schulze von Delitzsch, der
Ökonomische Julian, oder, Kapital und Arbeit_.

²⁴ The short paragraph is a repetition; the point made above is also
made elsewhere in the typescript.

²⁵ That is, they were granted the same powers as the _Gaugraffs_.

²⁶ A benefice is a reward obtained in exchange for services rendered (or
to be rendered in the future) to a feudal lord. A benefice received from
a king or nobleman was known as a fief. It generally took the form of a
gift of land for services rendered to the lord.

²⁷ The Abbey of St. Germain de Prés, on the outskirts of medieval Paris,
was founded in the sixth century. Thanks to royal patronage, it became
one of the richest abbeys in France during the High Middle Ages. In the
eleventh century it became an intellectual center of the Benedictine
order. The philosopher René Descartes is buried in one of its chapels.

²⁸ A polyptych is a painting divided into a series of sections or
panels. This appears to be a reference to a painting in one of the
Romanesque cathedrals in the French town of St. Emilion.

²⁹ The passage suggests that the peasant had the right to provide proof
that because of poverty he was unable to make his obligatory payments.

³⁰ The Abbey of Corvey in Westphalia, in northeast Germany, was founded
in 815 as a Benedictine monastery. It was one of the most important
monasteries in the Carolingian period. In the tenth century it became a
major economic power when it was granted the power to obtain labor
services and payments from the surrounding peasants. It also obtained
the power to mint its own coins. The Abbey went into decline after the
fifteenth century.

³¹ Wolff, who was from Silesia, became a close friend of Marx in 1846,
to whom he dedicated Vol. 1 of _Capital_. During the 1848 Revolutions
Wolff travelled to Silesia, where he fought for the abolition of feudal
obligations that still prevailed among the peasantry. Marx published
numerous articles by him on the campaign in the _Neue Rheinische
Zeitung_, including a series of eight articles entitled “The Silesian
Billion,” from March 22 to April 25, 1849. In these influential and
inflammatory writings Wolff calculated the amount of money, labor, and
landed property that the Silesian aristocracy had robbed from the
peasants through feudal dues since the beginning of the Middle Ages. The
articles were reproduced as a book after Wolff’s death, to which Engels
wrote the Introduction. _See Die schlesische Milliarde_
(Hottingen-Zürich: Volksbuchhandlung, 1886).

³² _Kurmade_ (also _die kurmede_), _besthaupt_ and _gewandrecht_
(literally, “a right to the robe”) refers to a manorial levy extracted
from peasants upon the death of a lord or a change of ownership in the
manor. Payment could be made in kind (through grain or cattle), money,
or even by granting the lord of the manor allowance to sleep with a
peasant’s wife. It essentially served as an inheritance tax.

³³ General Gottfied Henrich Graf von Pappenheim was a famous military
commander and mercenary during the Thirty Years’ War (1618–48), in which
he was employed by the armies of the Holy Roman Empire. He became
imperial marshal in 1632.

³⁴ Delbrück is a town in northeast Germany, in Rhine-Westphalia. The
town was founded in 1219.

³⁵ Gera is a city in southwest Germany, in the state of Thuringia. It
was founded in the ninth century AD. Schwarzburg-Rudolstadt is a state
in Thuringia. It is named after the Schwarzburg family, which resided in
the town of Rudolstadt.

³⁶ Whitsuntide (also known as Witsunday) is the Christian festival of
Pentecost that falls on the seventh Sunday after Easter. It commemorates
the descent of the Holy Spirit upon Christ’s disciples.

³⁷ A _Malter_ is literally a “corn-measure”—an ancient measurement of
corn that varies in different locations. In some parts of Germany, a
_Malter_ was a basket or container that held about 150 liters.

³⁸ The reference is to Lassalle’s book, _Herr Bastiat-Schulze von
Delitzsch, der Ökonomische Julian, oder, Kapital und Arbeit_, pp.
118–80. Marx was much more critical of this work by Lassalle than
Luxemburg seems to have been aware. See his letter to Engels of June 3,
1864, where he accuses Lassalle of having “cribbed” much of the work
from his _Wage Labor and Capital_. In response, Marx planned at the time
to reprint _Wage Labor and Capital_ “without any mention of Izzy
[Lassalle]. He won’t enjoy it in the least.”

³⁹ The manorial estate was that part of the manor directly controlled by
the lord and used for the benefit of his household and dependents.
Compulsory labor was required of those belonging to it.

⁴⁰ Luxemburg is again referring to Lassalle’s _Herr Bastiat-Schulze von
Delitzsch, der Ökonomische Julian, oder, Kapital und Arbeit_.

⁴¹ Guizot’s book was actually first published in French between 1828 and
1830. See François Guizot, _Histoire de la civilisation en France depuis
la chute de l’empire romain jusqu’en 1789_ (History of Civilization in
France from the Fall of the Roman Empire to 1789) (Paris: Pichon et
Didier, 1828–30).

⁴² See Augustin Thierry, _Erzählungen aus den merovingishcen Zeiten: mit
einleitenden Betrachtungen über die Geschichte Franksreich_ (Stories of
Merovingian Times, Preceded by Reflections about the History of France)
(Elberfeld: Friderichs, 1855). The book originally appeared in French as
_Récits des temps mérovingiens, précédés de considerations sur
l’histoire de France_ (Paris: Furne et Cie, Éditeurs, 1851).

⁴³ See Augustin Thierry, _Recueil des monuments inédits de l’histoire du
Tiers Etate_ (Unpublished Collection of Documents of the History of the
Third Estate) (Paris: Didot, 1850–53).

⁴⁴ See Friedrich Carl von Savigny, _Geschichte des römischen Rechts_
(History of Roman Law), six volumes (Heidelberg: J.C.B. Mohr, 1815–31).

⁴⁵ See Karl Friedrich Eichhorn, _Über den Ursprung der Städteverfassung
in Deutschland_ (On the Origin of the Constitution of the Cities in
Germany) (Berlin: Nicolai, 1815).

⁴⁶ See Ernest Theodor Gaupp, _Über deutsche Städtegründung,
Stadtverfassung und Weichbild im Mittelalter, besonders über die
Verfassung von Freiburg im Breisgau verglichen mit den Vergassung von
Cöln_ (On the Founding of the German Cities, The City Constitution, and
the City Precincts in the Middle Ages, Especially the Constitution of
Frieburg in Breisgau Compared with that of Cologne) (Jena: F. Frommann,
1824).

⁴⁷ See Heinrich Leo, _Entwicklung der Verfassung der lombardischen
Städte bis zu Ankunft Kaiser Friedrich I_ (Development of the
Constitution of the Lombard Cities to the Rise of Emperor Friedrich I)
(Hamburg: Perthes, 1824).

⁴⁸ These question marks are in the original manuscript. It is probable
that the secretary or student recording Luxemburg’s lecture did not
understand what she said at this point.

⁴⁹ _Städtewesen_; a term that might also be translated as “the nature
and condition of the cities.”

⁵⁰ See Wilhelm Eduard Wilda, _Über das Gildenwesen im Mittelalter_ (On
the Guild System in the Middle Ages) (Halle: Rengerschen Buchhandlung,
1831).

⁵¹ See Karl Dietrich Hüllmann, _Städtewesen im Mittelalter_ (City
Structure in the Middle Ages) (Bonn: Adolph Marcus, 1829).

⁵² See Georg Ludwig von Maurer, _Einleitung zur Geschichte der Mark-,
Hof-. Dorf- und Stadtverfassung und der öffentlichen Gewalt_.

⁵³ See Wilhelm Arnold, _Das Aufkommen des Handwerks in den deutschen
Städten_ (The Rise of Craft Production in the German Cities) (Basel: H.
George, 1861).

⁵⁴ Imperial cities were free cities of the Holy Roman Empire.

⁵⁵ The counts that had their palaces on the Rhine were called Counts
Palatinate.

⁵⁶ That is, a judicial authority that he could appeal to.

⁵⁷ The word element _Welsch_ refers to Romance-speaking persons from
southern Europe.

⁵⁸ According to Luxemburg’s interpretation, the _Altfreie_, or old free
ones, were descendants of the former free members of the mark community.

⁵⁹ The term _Geschlechter_ has a number of different meanings, depending
upon the historical context. It originally referred to persons of noble
lineage, or “those of well-born families.” Over time, such persons
tended to engage in trade and commercial activity. In the High Middle
Ages, therefore, _die Geschlechter_ came to denote a merchant or an
elite family of merchants. It often occurred, however, that subsequent
to engaging in trade and commerce these families withdrew from such
activities and invested their capital in farmland, banking, or urban
real estate, using these to claim noble status. Patricians and Junkers
(the so-called “best citizens”) could therefore also be referred to as
_die Geschlechter_.

⁶⁰ An _Innung_ was a professional organization of crafts at the local or
regional levels in which self-employed craftsmen came together to
promote their common interests. In Germany and Austria the _Innungs_ was
succeeded by the guilds, in the twelfth century.

⁶¹ The question marks are in the original typescript.

⁶² Here, and throughout much of the rest of the piece, _die
Geschlechter_ refers to merchants or merchant families that descended
from people of noble lineage.

⁶³ Luxemburg here uses _Hofherr_ as a synonym of _Fronherr_.

⁶⁴ This is a reference to the fact that in response to these struggles,
a number of merchant families (_die Geschlechter_) withdrew from direct
commercial activity and invested their capital in farmland, banking, or
urban real estate, using these to claim noble status.

⁶⁵ At the Diet of Worms in January 1231 the ecclesiastical princes
forced the emperor of the Holy Roman Empire to outlaw town-leagues and
other associations of the burghers.

⁶⁶ The Diet of Ravenna in January 1232 outlawed all statues made by the
town burghers that were opposed by the bishops.

⁶⁷ This is a reference to Bishop Henry II of Saarbrücken, who served as
Bishop of Worms from 1217 to 1234.

⁶⁸ The _Altbürger_, or old burghers, were members of the urban middle
class in the towns of the early Middle Ages that were originally
descended from serfs who had fled the manorial estates.

⁶⁹ Zorne (also spelled Zorn) was a name of a group of families that
played an influential political and economic role in such cites as
Strassburg and Innsbruck in the Middle Ages.

⁷⁰ This is a reference to the feud between the Montagues, who were
aristocrats, and the Capulets, who were merchants, in Shakespeare’s
famous play.

⁷¹ _Grundzins_ is here rendered as land tax, but it can also be
translated as ground rent.

⁷² Luxemburg is referring to Ferdinand Lassalle’s _Die indirekte Steuer
und die Lage der arbeitende Klassen_ (Indirect Taxation and the Position
of the Working Classes) (Zurich: Verlag von Meyer & Zeller, 1863). Marx
had a far less favorable view of this book than Luxemburg. As Marx wrote
to Engels on June 12, 1863, “One or two individual bits are good, but
for one thing it is, on the whole, _written_ in an unbearably officious,
chatty style, with absurd pretensions to scholarship and
consequentialness. In addition, it is _essentiellement_ the confection
of a _‘pupil’_ who cannot wait to make a name for himself as a
‘thoroughly learned’ man and original scholar. Hence the abundance of
historical and theoretical blunders.”

⁷³ Luxemburg is here considerably exaggerating the size of medieval
cities. The largest city in the Holy Roman Empire in the fourteenth
century was Cologne, with about 40,000 inhabitants.

⁷⁴ See Ernst Theodor Gaupp, _Über deutsche Städtegründung_ (On the
Founding of German Cities).

⁷⁵ The _Innung_ was the earlier form of the guilds when they were still
subject to the manorial estate of the feudal lord.

⁷⁶ A _Schreiner_ was a maker of fine woodwork, such as a cabinetmaker. A
_Zimmermann_ (plural, _Zimmerleute_) was a carpenter who constructed
houses and buildings.

⁷⁷ A masterwork was a special work done to qualify as a master
craftsman; it was also called “masterpiece.”

⁷⁸ Karl Bücher, _Die Entstehung der Volkswirtschalt_.

⁷⁹ All of these “inventions” actually arose outside of Europe, in China,
and were adopted by Europeans through the impact of increased contact
with Asia. Paper, for instance, first came to Europe after the eleventh
century through contact with Muslims, who had earlier learned the art of
papermaking from the Chinese.

⁸⁰ The name does not appear in the typescript, a blank space appearing
instead.

⁸¹ _Eidgenossenschaft_ is more literally, a fellowship of the oath.

⁸² The name is not given in the manuscript, the space here being left
blank.

⁸³ While the typescript has _Beute_, Luxemburg probably said _Gebäude_
(which means “buildings”). The two German words are pronounced quite
similarly, and a stenographer listening to Luxemburg speaking this text
could have easily heard _Beute_ when Luxemburg said _Gebäude_ (or even
_Bäude_, which means the same).

⁸⁴ That is, the so-called Holy Roman Empire.

⁸⁵ This town was called Leghorn by the English.

⁸⁶ The Strozzi was the name of a noble family of Florence that played an
important part in the city’s affairs in the thirteenth and fourteenth
centuries. The Strozzis founded the first public library in Florence.

⁸⁷ Luxemburg mistakenly gives the date as 1503.

⁸⁸ The Langobardi is another name for Lombards, a Germanic tribe that
ruled much of Italy from 567 to 774 AD.

⁸⁹ This is a reference to the Pataria (or Patarines), a religious
movement in Milan in the eleventh century, led mainly by traders, that
sought to reform the clergy by ending simony and clerical marriage.
_Patarini_ derives from the word for “ragpickers,” which they were
called by their upper-class adversaries.

⁹⁰ The printing of books as a skilled craft was begun by Gutenberg in
1436.

⁹¹ Ulrich von Hutten’s _Epistolae obscurorum vivorum_ (Letters About
Obscurantist Men), written in 1520, was a famous attack on monkish life.
He was a follower of Martin Luther.

⁹² His original name was Schwarzerd, which in German meant “black
earth.”

⁹³ Zwingli actually died in 1531, not 1533.

⁹⁴ A reference to Conrad Ferdinand Meyer’s poem, _Huttens letzte Tage_
(Hutten’s Last Days) (Leipzig: H. Haeffel, 1891). The poem was one of
Luxemburg’s favorites.

⁹⁵ The duchy of Lorraine was originally called Lotharingia after Lotha
I, one of Charlemagne’s grandsons who obtained control of Alsace,
Lorraine, Burgundy, northern Italy, and parts of modern-day western
Germany after the death of his father, Louis the Pious.

⁹⁶ In Dutch, the name of the town is Leeuwen. The question mark is in
the original typescript.

⁹⁷ Ghent’s origin can be dated earlier, to the seventh century, when two
abbeys were built there, around which the town developed. After the town
was destroyed by a series of raids by Vikings in the ninth century, it
was rebuilt. By 1100 it was already a thriving city. The fortified
castle that Luxemburg mentions was built in 1180, replacing the wooden
fortifications of an earlier castle. The fortified castle was called
Gravensteen Castle (“castle of the count”). From the eleventh to the
thirteenth century Ghent was the largest city in Europe after Paris,
with a population of about 60,000.

⁹⁸ In 1338, Jacob von Artevelde (1290–1345) led a revolt of the weavers
of Ghent against the count of Flanders and France, because of
restrictions placed upon Ghent’s trade with England. The revolt expelled
the count from Ghent and Artevelde took over as head of the city
council. After allying Ghent with England during the Hundred Years’ War,
he was killed as a result of an uprising of the artisans who came to
oppose his policies.

⁹⁹ The reference is to the Dutch East Indies, today’s Indonesia.

¹⁰⁰ A _stadtholder_ was chief magistrate of the Dutch republic in the
sixteenth and seventeenth centuries.

¹⁰¹ Friedrich Schiller’s book was first published in 1800. For an
English translation, see _Revolt of the Netherlands_ (Whitefish, MT:
Kessinger Publishing, 2004). Goethe wrote his drama _Egmont_ in 1788.
For an English translation, see _Egmont_, translated by Anna Stanwick
(New York: Bartleby, 2001). This work is perhaps best known from
Beethoven’s overture of the same name.

¹⁰² These are the islands of present-day Indonesia.

¹⁰³ The Dutch held northeast Brazil from 1630 to 1654.

¹⁰⁴ The verb _hänseln_ appears to have a different etymology from the
one given by Luxemburg.

¹⁰⁵ The Cologne Confederation was a military alliance forged by the
Hanseatic League in 1367 for purposes of waging war against Denmark. It
led to the Second Danish-Hanseatic War of 1367–70, in which the
Hanseatic League was victorious. The Cologne Confederation was disbanded
in 1385.

¹⁰⁶ Wisby is in the Baltic Sea between Sweden and the Danish peninsula.

¹⁰⁷ This was also called Skane, or Scania.

¹⁰⁸ Since the time of John Cabot at end of the fifteenth century,
English explorers were interested in finding a way to Asia by sailing
northeast, through the Arctic. In 1552 English explorer Richard
Chancellor penetrated the White Sea and arrived at the port of Archangel
in Russia, the first Englishmen to do so. As a result of his voyage, a
sea trading route was opened up between England and Russia.

¹⁰⁹ His last name means “wool weaver.”

¹¹⁰ That is, the Diet of the Holy Roman Empire.

¹¹¹ The Peace of Westphalia, in 1648, concluded the Thirty Years’ War
and proved instrumental in the emergence of the modern nation state.

¹¹² See George Friedrich Christoph Sartorius von Waltershausen,
_Urkundliche Geschichte des Ursprung der deutschen Hanse_ (Documentary
History of the Origin of the Hanseatic League) (Hamburg: J. Perthes,
1830).

¹¹³ In this incomplete sentence, Luxemburg may have intended something
like: “Only after exchange has taken place is it possible to attempt
regulating the number of goods to be produced.”

¹¹⁴ Luxemburg’s claim is questionable. As she here emphasizes, in
capitalism labor assumes a social form only _indirectly_, through the
medium of _money_ in exchange relations. However, the ability of labor
to assume such an indirect character is a result of specific relations
of production, in which concrete labor is subsumed by abstract labor.
The exchange process is therefore not the decisive issue; instead, the
peculiar form of capitalist _production_ relations is decisive. See
Marx’s _Capital_ Vol. 2, p. 196: “In the relation between capitalist and
wage laborer, the money relation, the relation of buyer and seller,
becomes a relation inherent in production itself. But this relation
rests fundamentally on the social character of production, not on the
mode of commerce; the latter rather derives from the former.” For more
on this, see Peter Hudis, _Marx’s Concept of the Alternative to
Capitalism_ (Leiden: Brill, 2012), pp. 92–182.

¹¹⁵ _Pecus_ is Latin for cattle.

¹¹⁶ At this point in the typescript, the following typewritten note
appears in the margin: “ ‘from the outset’ obviously means ‘in the
beginning.’ ”

¹¹⁷ Jérome Becker was a Belgian explorer who searched for the origin of
the Nile River, reaching Lake Albert in 1864. Luxemburg may have known
of his book, _La Vie en Afrique ou Trois Ans dans l’Afrique_ (Life in
Africa, or Three Years in Africa) (Paris: J. Lebéque et Cie, 1887).

¹¹⁸ By “the Orient” Luxemburg seems to mean the civilizations of Egypt,
Mesopotamia, Persia, and other regions to the east and south of the
Mediterranean.

¹¹⁹ The _Statistisches Jahrbuch für das Deutsche Reich_ was published
yearly, beginning in 1880, by Puttkammer & Mühlbrecht (Berlin).

¹²⁰ _F. W. Putzgers Historischer Schul-Atlas_.

¹²¹ Justus Perthes, _Taschenatlas der ganzen Welt_ (Pocket Atlas of the
Entire World History) (Hamburg: J. Perthes, 1896). This popular atlas
has appeared in many editions since the nineteenth century.

¹²² See Karl Julius Ploetz, _Auszug aus der alten, mittleren und neuren
Geschichte_.

¹²³ Karl Bücher, _Die Entsehung der Volkswirtschalt, Vorträge und
Aufsätze_.

¹²⁴ Engels’s _Condition of the Working Class in England_ was first
published in Leipzig in 1845. _Socialism, Utopian and Scientific_ was
first published in 1880 in the March, April and May issues of _Revue
Socialiste_.

¹²⁵ Julius Lippert, _Kulturgreschichte der Menschheit in ihrem
organischen Aufbau_ (The Cultural History of Humanity in its Organic
Structure) (Stuttgart: F. Enke, 1886).

¹²⁶ Friedrich Ratzel, _Grundzüge der Völkerkunde_ (Fundamentals of
Ethnology) (Leipzig: Bibliographisches Institut, 1895).

¹²⁷ Engels first wrote this in 1876, as part of a planned work entitled
_Die drei Grundformen der Knechtschaft_ (The Three Basic Forms of
Bondsmanship). It was never completed in this form, however, and Engels
later included it in _Dialectics of Nature_, in 1896. It was originally
published in _Die Neue Zeit_ in 1895.

¹²⁸ Wilhelm Weitling, _Garantien der Harmonie und Freiheit_ (Guarantees
of Harmony and Freedom) (Hamburg: Im Verlag des Verfassers, 1842). The
work was referred to several times by the young Marx, who initially had
a favorable impression of Weitling.

¹²⁹ Lewis Henry Morgan’s book first appeared in English in 1877, under
the title _Ancient Society, or: Researches in the Lines of Human
Progress from Savagery Through Barbarism to Civilization_ (London:
MacMillan & Co., 1877). Luxemburg made use of the German edition, _Die
Urgesellshaft oder Untersuchung über den Fortschritt der Menschheit aus
der Wildheit durch die Babarei zur Zivilisation_ (Berlin: J.H.W. Dietz
Verlag, 1891).

¹³⁰ Luxemburg was using the German edition of Julius Ceaser’s _De bello
Gallico_, his commentaries on the Gallic Wars. For a modern English
translation, see _The Conquest of Gaul_, translated by S.A. Handford
(New York: Penguin, 1983).

¹³¹ Heinrich Cunow, _Die Soziale Verfassung des Inkareiches: Eine
Untersuchung des altperuanischen Agrarkommunismus_ (The Social
Constitution of the Inca Empire: An Examination of Ancient Peruvian
Agrarian Communism) (Stuttgart: J.H.W. Dietz Verlag, 1896).

¹³² Thomas Babington Macaulay’s “Lord Clive” was an essay written in
January 1840. Clive was a British officer who established England’s
control over India following the Battle of Plassey in 1757, which drove
French forces from the country. “Warren Hastings,” first published as an
essay in 1841, discussed British colonial policies in India. Hastings
served as the first Governor-General of India, from 1773–85. A supporter
of British colonialism, Macaulay helped govern India from 1834–38. See
his _Essays on Lord Clive and Warren Hastings_ (Whitefish, MT: Kessinger
Publishing, 2005).

¹³³ See August Freiherr von Haxthausen, _Studien über die Innern
Zustände, des Volksleben und Insbesondere die ländlichen Einrichtungen
Rußlands_ (Studies on the Internal Conditions of Russia, the Life of its
People and Especially its Rural Institutions) (Hannover: Hahn, 1847–52).

¹³⁴ See G.V. Plekhanov, N. _G. Chernyshevsky_ (St. Petersburg: Shipovnik
Publishing House, 1910). This book contains a series of articles on
Chernyshevsky written by Plekhanov in _Sotsial-Democrat_ in 1890 and
1892.

¹³⁵ Engels’s essay on “Russia and the Social Revolution” was first
published in _Volkstaat_ on April 21, 1875. It was reprinted in the
booklet _Internationales aus dem ‘Volksstaat’_ (1871–75) (Berlin: J.H.W.
Dietz Verlag, 1894). An English translation can be found in _Marx-Engels
Collected Works_, Volume 24 (New York: International Publishers, 1989),
pp. 39–50.

¹³⁶ See Aleksandr Alexandrovich Chuprov, _Die Feldemeinscaft, eine
morphologische Untersuchung_ (The Field of Community: A Morphological
Study) (Strassburg: K.J. Trübner, 1902). The Russian last name []poB is
transliterated into English as Chuprov, but into German as Tschuproff.

¹³⁷ See Eduard Meyer’s article on the Russian mir (a peasant community
owning and working land in common), in the _Concise Dictionary of the
Political Sciences_.

¹³⁸ Alexander Parvus (Israel Lazarevich Helphand), _Das hungernde
Russland. Reiseeindrücke, Beobachtungen und Untersuchungen_ (Starving
Russia: Travel Impressions, Observations, and Investigations) (Berlin:
J.W.H. Dietz, 1900).

¹³⁹ Friedrich Engels, _Herrn Eugen Dühring’s Umwalzung der Wissenschaft;
Anti-Dühring: Herr Eugen Dühring’s Revolution in Science, Marx-Engels
Collected Works_, Vol. 25, pp. 146–71.

¹⁴⁰ Frederick Engels, _Origin of the Family, Private Property and the
State_ (New York: International Publishers, 1964

¹⁴¹ Karl Kautsky, _Der Ursprung des Christentrums: Eine historische
Untersuchung_. For an English translation, see _Foundations of
Christianity_, translated by Jacob Hartmann (New York: Monthly Review,
1972). “Slave Economy” appears to be a reference to the fourth section
of Part I of this book, entitled “Die technische Rückständigkeit der
Sklavenwirtschaft” (The Technological Backwardness of the Slave
Economy).

¹⁴² See Eduard Meyer’s _Geschichte des Altertums_ (History of
Antiquity), five volumes (Stuttgart and Berlin, J.G. Cotta, 1884–1902)
and _Sklaverei im Altertrum_ (Slavery in Antiquity) (Dresden: v. Jahn &
Jaensch, 1898). Luxemburg provides a somewhat inaccurate title of the
third work; it is actually _Wirtschaftliche Entwicklung des Altertums_
(Economic Development of the Ancient World) (Jena: G. Fischer, 1895).

¹⁴³ The _Handwörterbuch der Staatswissenschaften_ (Jena: G. Fischer),
edited by Johannes Conrad, Wilhem Lexis, L. Elster, and Edgar Loening,
appeared in four editions between 1890 and 1928. “Population in
Antiquity” was an article by Eduard Meyer. See _Handwörterbuch der
Staatswissenschaften_, second edition, Vol. II (1899), pp. 674 ff.
“Agrarian Relations in Antiquity” was an article by Max Weber. See Max
Weber, “Agrargeschichte. I: Agrarverhältnisse im Altertum,” in
_Handwörterbuch der Staatswissenschaften_, second edition, Vol. 1, Jena
1898, pp. 69 ff.

¹⁴⁴ Karl Julius Beloch, _Griechische Geschichte_ (Greek History), four
volumes (Strassburg: Verlag von Karl J. Trubner, 1893–1904).

¹⁴⁵ This refers to a series of articles by Paul Ernst under the title
“Die sozialen Zustände im römishcen Reiche vor dem Einfall der Barbaren”
(Social Conditions in the Roman Empire Before the Invasion of the
Barbarians), published in Vol. XI of _Die Neue Zeit_, in 1893.

¹⁴⁶ Karl Kautsky, _Vorläufer des neueren Sozialismus. Erster Band:
Plato_ (Forerunners of Modern Socialism: Vol. 1, Plato) (Stuttgart:
J.H.W. Dietz, 1895).

¹⁴⁷ Willibald Alexis was the pseudonym of Georg Wilhelm Heinrich Häring,
who in the mid-nineteenth published a historical novel of the Middle
Ages entitled _Der Roland von Berlin_ (Leipzig: Brockhaus, 1840).

¹⁴⁸ The following note appears right before this subhead; it is not by
Luxemburg, but apparently by a student who had attended her course:
“This lengthy listing of references, before it can be used, must be
checked for accuracy. Some information about the books listed is
deficient and obviously not precise. As I recall, and as can be deduced
from a hint in the ‘stenogram’ [i.e., the typescript], I received it
[this listing] from another student. Both of my own listings on page 28
and page100 are, I believe, more precise, but some of the books
mentioned here are lacking there. And it is possible that in my text,
too, deficient information about the books listed may be scattered about
even more widely, and that needs to be checked.” The page numbers “28”
and “100” do not seem to refer to anything in Luxemburg’s typescript.
This suggests that Luxemburg distributed copies of these typescripts to
the students attending her courses (no more than 30 per year, according
to her own report). That may help explain how this damaged copy of a
typescript survived when so much of Luxemburg’s written material was
destroyed.

¹⁴⁹ Most of the authors and titles in this list repeat what was
contained in the earlier list of literature immediately above, or
elsewhere in the typescript.


PRACTICAL ECONOMICS: VOLUME 2 OF MARX’S _CAPITAL_

¹ It is not entirely clear why the heading “Practical Economics” appears
at the top of this typescript about Volume 2 of _Capital_, since as
Luxemburg noted in the first paragraph, Volume 2 “deals with problems
that do not lend themselves to immediate application in practical life,
for example, in agitation.” However, since most of the manuscript is not
directly on the content of Volume 2 but on the history of actual
capitalist crises, Luxemburg may have intended her discussion here to be
more directed towards the “practical” application of _Capital_ to the
history of political economy.

² The student or secretary who transcribed Luxemburg’s lecture on this
subject, presumably Rosi Wolfstein at the SPD Party School in Berlin,
refers to her here in the third person, as “Comrade Luxemburg.” This
will occur several times in the transcript.

³ This is because in mining the raw materials are right there at the
mining site.

⁴ Volume 2 actually has _three_ parts: (1) “The Metamorphoses of Capital
and their Circuit”; (2) “The Turnover of Capital”; and (3) “The
Reproduction and Circulation of the Total Social Capital.”

⁵ This is a reference to the third part of Volume 2 of _Capital_.

⁶ For Marx’s discussions of crisis, see _Capital_ Vol. 2, translated by
David Fernbach (New York: Vintage, 1981), pp. 153–7, 391–3 and 486–7
especially. Marx’s theory of crisis, however, is delineated not in
Volume 2 but in Volume 3 of _Capital_, in his discussion of the tendency
of the rate of profit to decline. Luxemburg tended to deny the relevance
of Marx’s theory of tendential decline in profit rates, on the grounds
that it contradicted empirical capitalist reality.

⁷ This is a reference to Owen’s works, _Observations on the Effect of
the Manufacturing System_ (London: R. & A. Taylor, 1815); _Two Memorials
on Behalf of the Working Classes_ (London, Longman, Hurst, Orme & Brown,
1818); and _An Explanation of the Cause of Distress which Pervades the
Civilized Parts of the World_ (London: British Philanthropic Society,
1823).

⁸ See Thomas Robert Malthus, _An Essay on the Principle of Population_
(London: Johnson, 1803) and _Definitions in Political Economy; Preceded
by an Inquiry into the Rules which Ought to Guide Political Economists
in the Definition and Use of their Terms; With Remarks on the Deviation
from these Rules in their Writings_ (London: John Murray, 1827).

⁹ Luxemburg is especially referring to Schippel’s articles, “War
Friedrich Engels milizgläubisch?” (Did Friedrich Engels Believe in the
Militia?), in _Sozialistischen Monatsheften_ (November 1898) and
“Friedrich Engels und das Milizsystem” (Friedrich Engels and the Militia
System), in _Die Neue Zeit_, Nos. 19–20 (1898/99). Luxemburg replied to
Schippel in articles in the _Leipziger Volkszeitung_, Nos. 42–44, 47
(February 20–22, 25, 1899), which she incorporated as an appendix to her
_Reform or Revolution_. See Rosa Luxemburg, _Gesammelte Werke_, Band 1/1
(Berlin: Dietz Verlag, 2007), pp. 446–66. For an English translation of
two of these four articles by Luxemburg, see “Militia and Militarism,”
in _Rosa Luxemburg, Selected Political Writings_, edited by Dick Howard
(New York: Monthly Review, 1971), pp. 135–58. See also Schippel’s
_Hochkonjunkture und Wirtschaftskrisis_ (Boom and Economic Crisis)
(Berlin: Vorwärts, 1908). Schippel, a right-wing revisionist who
supported German imperialism, used this argument to defend the necessity
of a standing army and militarism.

¹⁰ See Jean Charles Léonard Simonde de Sismondi, _Nouveaux principes
d’économie politique, ou De la richesse dans ses rapports avec la
population_ (New Principles of Political Economy, or Wealth in its
Relationship with Population) (Paris: Delaunay, 1819).

¹¹ See Jean-Baptiste Say, _Traité d’économie politique, ou simple
exposition de la manière dont se forment, se distribuent ou se
consomment les richesses_ (Treatise on Political Economy, or a Simple
Exposition to Show How Wealth is Created, Distributed, and Consumed)
(Paris: Horace Say, 1803). Say argued that crises of overproduction are
impossible, on the grounds that production creates its own market.

¹² That is, the direct exchange of commodities.

¹³ See Heinrich Herkner, “Krisen,” in _Handwörterbuch der
Staatswissenschaften_, edited by J. Conrad et. al, second edition, Vol.
5 (Jena: G. Fischer, 1900), pp. 413–33. Herkner was initially known as a
“socialist of the chair” and close enough to the Social Democratic
movement to be praised by Karl Kautsky and invited for a discussion with
Friedrich Engels. By 1907, however, he became a political conservative.
Herkner had an eclectic explanation of crises, attributing them not to
any single phenomena but to a diverse array of factors. However, he was
close to Sismondi in emphasizing underconsumption as a prime
determinant. As one recent study notes, “Herkner also points to
increases in the productivity of labor, which are linked to
technological change. As a consequence of the new, more efficient
techniques, the price of commodities declines, which leads to their
greater saleability. However, expansion of the market very often cannot
keep abreast of an increase in production because price decreases come
into force only incompletely and with delay.” See Harald Hagemann,
“Heinrich Herkner: Inequality of Income Distribution, Overcapitalization
and Underconsumption,” in _Crises and Cycles in Economic Dictionaries
and Encyclopedias_, edited by Daniele Besomi (London: Routledge, 2012),
pp. 361–73.

¹⁴ _See Industrial Depressions: The First Annual Report of the
Commission of Labor_ (Washington, DC: Government Printing Office, 1886),
especially Chapter 1, “Modern Industrial Depressions,” pp. 61–3, for its
list of 180 causes of crises, which range from “planless production” and
“speculation” to “lack of interest of the laborer in his work.” We wish
to thank Daniele Besomi for drawing our attention to this document.

¹⁵ Sombart’s lecture was delivered in two parts, on September 14 and 16,
1903. For a fuller discussion of Sombart’s speech on Luxemburg’s part,
see “Im Raten der Gelehrten,” in _Gesammelte Werke_, Band 1, Zweiter
Haldband (Berlin: Dietz Verlag, 2000), pp. 382–90. Her essay first
appeared in _Die Neue Zeit_, Year 22, 1903/04, Band 1 (1), pp. 5–10.

¹⁶ Luxemburg is here operating on the assumption that in primitive
communal society, economic activities are planned.

¹⁷ In 1906 Brazil produced 80 percent of the world’s coffee, a total of
22 million sacks. Output so much exceeded demand that the price of
coffee immediately fell. World War I stimulated an increase in the
demand for coffee; Brazil’s harvest of 1917 was 1.6 billion pounds, the
largest on record up to that point.

¹⁸ See Marx, _Das Kapital_, Band 2 (Hamburg: Otto Meissner, 1885), p.
385. Marx writes in _Capital_ Vol. 2: “Considered from the standpoint of
the whole society, there must be a constant overproduction, i.e.
production on a greater scale than is needed for the simple replacement
and reproduction of the existing wealth” (pp. 256–7). Since “the periods
in which capitalist production exerts all its forces regularly show
themselves to be periods of overproduction” (p. 390), the latter cannot
be construed as the principal cause of crises. At the same time, Volume
Two also argues against the claim that crises are caused by
_underconsumption_. Marx writes, “It is a pure tautology to say that
crises are provoked by a lack of effective demand or effective
consumption. The capitalist system does not recognize any forms of
consumer other than those who can pay … If the attempt is made to give
this tautology the semblance of greater profundity, by the statement
that the working class receives too small a portion of its own product,
and that the evil would be remedied if it received a bigger share, i.e.
if wages rose, we need only note that crises are always prepared by a
period in which wages generally rise, and the working class actually
does receive a greater share in the part of the annual product destined
for consumption” (pp. 486–7).

¹⁹ Luxemburg probably meant to say _imports_ here.

²⁰ The figures in the table are in thousands of pounds sterling.

²¹ In the original typescript the year is given as 1834.

²² The corn laws imposed high tariffs on imported grain.

²³ The county of Lancashire is in the northwest of England, adjacent to
the Irish Sea.

²⁴ This is a reference to a letter published in _The Times_ of March 24,
1863 by Edmund Potter, a President of the Manchester Chamber of
Commerce, that referred to the workers as “the machinery.” Marx
discusses Potter’s letter at length in _Capital_ Vol. 1, pp. 720–3.

²⁵ Overend, Gurney & Co. was a London wholesale bank, founded in 1800,
which collapsed in 1866, after speculating heavily in railroad stocks.
Its losses were the equivalent of about $2 billion in current prices.
More than 200 companies were forced out of business as a direct result
of the failure of the bank.

²⁶ In the typescript the number is given as 14 instead of 5 billion.

²⁷ A reference to the Prussian-Austrian war of 1866, in which Prussia
decisively defeated Austria.

²⁸ Engel published his statistical surveys in a number of journals
edited by him, such as _Preuss Statistik_ and _Zeitschrift des
Statischen Bureaus_.

²⁹ See Richard Vanderborght, _Die wirtschaftliche Bedeutung der
Rhein-Seeschiffahrt_ (The Economic Importance of the Rhine-Maritime
Region) (Köln: Selbstverlag der Handelskammer, 1892).

³⁰ The Kaiserliches Statistisches Amt (Imperial Bureau of Statistics)
published a series of journals and monographs of statistical information
on industry, agriculture, and the overall economy from 1872 to 1918.

³¹ A _baubank_ generally funds construction and housing projects.

³² Prior to about 1900, statistics did not show the proportion of
government securities (as opposed to those of private companies) that
were traded on stock exchanges.

³³ In the typescript this is erroneously given as Berlin instead of
Vienna.

³⁴ The Union Générale was a French Catholic Bank founded by Paul Eugene
Bontoux in 1878.

³⁵ There seems to be an error in the typescript: the phrase 28,240
_million_ appears rather than 28,240 _miles_.

³⁶ This is a further indication that these notes were taken down by one
of Luxemburg’s students, in this case most likely Rosi Wolfstein.

³⁷ The following passage refers to “Comrade Luxemburg” in the third
person, indicating that someone present was transcribing, or taking
notes on her lecture about Volume 2 of _Capital_. The book referred to
by Mikhail Ivanovich Tugan-Baranovsky was _Studien zur Theorie und
Geschichte der Handelskrisen in England_ (Studies in the Theory and
History of Commercial Crises in England) (Jena: Fischer, 1901).

³⁸ Heinrich Dade published a series of four essays on “Agrarzolle”
(Agricultural Tariffs) in _Beiträge zur neuesten Handelspolitik
Deutschlands herausgeben von Verein für Socialpolitik_ (Essays on
Germany’s Most Recent Trade Policies) (Leipzig: Duncker & Humblot,
1900–01).

³⁹ Argentina’s crisis of 1890 was precipitated by a surge of inflation
in its over-heated economy. In response to the crisis, the army
attempted a coup against President Miguel Juárez Celman, who was
replaced by Carlos Pellegrini.

⁴⁰ English capital was heavily invested in Argentina, and the crisis
almost caused the collapse of Baring & Co., which had extensive holdings
in that country. Baring was saved only after obtaining a significant
bailout from the British government, to the tune of about $2 billion in
today’s currency.

⁴¹ That is, they had been importing cotton from England but now imported
less because of the crisis.

⁴² The “Whisky Ring” was a conspiracy of 1875 on the part of government
bureaucrats and distillers to drive up the price of liquor and siphon
off the proceeds of federal taxes on liquor. It was one of the major
scandals of the presidency of Ulysses S. Grant.

⁴³ It is not clear what Luxemburg is referring to here, since the Panic
of 1893 was precipitated by overcapacity in the railroad industry.
“Wheat ring” probably is how the person taking down these notes heard
“whiskey ring,” but the latter took place two decades earlier and had
nothing to do with the economic crisis of 1893.

⁴⁴ The transcript erroneously gives the name as Cozy. Coxey was not a
farmer, but a businessman, politician, and social reformer. Coxey’s Army
was a protest march on Washington by unemployed workers. The movement
was popularly known as Coxey’s Army, but it also called itself by the
name Army of the Commonweal of Christ. A number of different marches by
unemployed “armies” in different parts of the US also set out for
Washington to demand jobs around the same time as the one led by Coxey,
who predicted he would bring 100,000 to the capitol. If all the other
“armies” and marchers of that time are counted, as well as their
numerous supporters, they probably numbered several hundred thousand. L.
Frank Baum, author of _The Wonderful Wizard of Oz_, participated in
Coxey’s march on Washington and later incorporated it in his story, in
which the scarecrow symbolizes the impoverished farmer and the tin
woodman the industrial worker. For more on Coxey’s movement, see D. L.
McMurry, _Coxey’s Army_ (Seattle: University of Washington Press, 1970
[1929]) and Carlos Schwantes, _Coxey’s Army: An American Odyssey_
(Lincoln: University of Nebraska Press, 1985).

⁴⁵ Coxey and other leaders were arrested, and the marchers dispersed
without achieving their goals.

⁴⁶ Luxemburg is here referred to again in the third person by Wolfstein,
the likely transcriber.

⁴⁷ The first Anglo-Boer war in South Africa was fought in 1880–81; the
Second Boer War was fought from 1899 to 1902.

⁴⁸ Luxemburg appears to have in mind Parvus’s pamhlet, _Die
Gewerkschaften und die Sozialdemokratie_. (The Trade Unions and Social
Democracy) (Dresden: Verlag der Sächsischen Arbeiter Zeitung, 1896).

⁴⁹ See Max Schippel, _Hochkonjunktur und Wirtschaftskrise_ (Boom and
Economic Crisis). Luxemburg is probably using a later edition than the
original of 1908 in order for her to cite it as a source for statistics
on bankruptcies in 1909.

⁵⁰ That is, helpful statistical data for use in the practical work of
the SPD.

⁵¹ That Luxemburg cites statistics covering the entire year of 1909
indicates this typescript dates from at least 1910, perhaps even from
the autumn of 1911. The latter supposition is reinforced by Luxemburg’s
letter of November 21, 1911, to Kostya Zetkin, which discusses economic
crises and Tugan-Baranovsky’s (inadequate) analysis of them, as well as
Karl Kautsky’s inadequate treatment of crises. This letter also
indicates that by November 1911 Luxemburg was working on a problem she
had encountered in Volume 2 of Marx’s _Capital_—a problem that prompted
her, beginning in January 1912, to start writing her major work, _The
Accumulation of Capital_. See _The Letters of Rosa Luxemburg_, pp.
315–16.


HISTORY OF CRISES

¹ This typescript consists of notes or rough drafts that were developed
further in the expanded version that appears in the typescript entitled
“Volume 2 of _Capital_.” Most of that latter typescript (all but the
first five pages) discusses precisely the history of crises and follows
this outline version quite closely. Sometimes gaps in the later
typescript can be filled in by looking at this earlier typescript, and
vice versa. The later typescript, in which about 55 double-spaced pages
are devoted to “the history of crises,” was probably transcribed by a
secretary or student from a lecture or lectures Luxemburg gave at the
SPD’s Party School in Berlin (possibly in 1911, since the typescript
includes a reference to statistics from 1911).

² See Thomas Malthus, _Principles of Political Economy_ (London: W.
Pickering, 1820).

³ Therefore, according to Say, the remedy for crises is an increase of
production in those branches of the economy where underproduction
exists. See Jean-Baptiste Say, _Traité d’économie politique, ou simple
exposition de la manière dont se forment, se distribuent ou se
consomment les richesses_.

⁴ Luxemburg’s typescript mistakenly gives “Ursachen” (Causes) as the
title of Herkner’s article, when actually it was “Krisen” (Crises). See
Heinrich Herkner, “Krisen,” in _Handwörterbuch der
Staatswissenschaften_, edited by J. Conrad et. al, second edition, Vol.
5 (Jena: Verlag von Gustav Fischer, 1900), pp. 413–33. For the 1886
study of the causes of economic crises in the U.S. cited by Herkner, see
_Industrial Depresssions: The First Annual Report of the Commission of
Labor_ (Washington, DC: Government Printing Office, 1886), especially
Chapter 1, “Modern Industrial Depressions,” pp. 61–3. This lists 180
causes of crises, which range from “planless production” and
“speculation” to “lack of interest of the laborer in his work.”

⁵ A jenny is a machine for spinning cotton.

⁶ _The Annual Register: A Review of History, Politics, and Literature of
the Year_ is a reference work that has been published in England yearly
since 1758. Its first editor was Edmund Burke.

⁷ Although Luxemburg refers to “now” as 1909, she also gives statistics
for 1911 near the end of this typescript. The notes in those last few
pages are not expanded on in her lengthy discussion of the history of
economic crises in her typescript entitled “Volume 2 of _Capital_.”

⁸ These workhouses were established by the Poor Law Amendment of 1834.

⁹ That is, after the crushing of the Paris Commune of 1871.

¹⁰ In the longer typescript, “Volume 2 of _Capital_,” the figure for
“1882, Machinery” is given as 11.9 instead of 11.6 pounds sterling.

¹¹ In the longer typescript on “Volume Two of _Capital_,” the figures
for “1886, Iron” is given as 21.8 instead of 21.7, and “1890: Machinery”
is given as 16.4, instead of 10.4.

¹² The 1890 revolution in Argentina was named “the Revolution of the
Park,” and took place on July 26 of that year. It was against the
presidency of Miguel Juárez Celman, who was accused of corruption and
abuse of power. The main impetus behind the revolt was the rising cost
of living. Though Celman was forced from power as a result of the
revolution, it failed to achieve its aims of transforming Argentinian
government or society.

¹³ The Whiskey Trust was the nickname of the Distiller’s Security
Corporation. It was founded by Julius Kessler in the 1870s and cornered
the market on distilled liquor.

¹⁴ A reference to Coxey’s Army and its march on Washington in 1894.

¹⁵ Most likely a reference to Parvus’ _Die Gewerkschaften und die
Sozialdemokratie. Kritischer Bericht über die Lager u. die Aufgaben der
deutschen Arbeiterbewegung_ (The Trade Unions and Social-Democracy:
Critical Report on the Position and Tasks of the German Workers’
Movement) (Dresden: Sächsichen Arbeiterzeitung, 1896).

¹⁶ A reference to Eduard Bernstein’s articles that sparked the
revisionist controversy which were published in _Die Neue Zeit_ in
1897–98. Luxemburg responded to them in her _Reform or Revolution_.

¹⁷ That is, they did no business at all.

¹⁸ The question marks within the parentheses are in the original
typescript.

¹⁹ See _Final Report of the Royal Commission Appointed to Inquire into
the Depression of Trade and Industry (With minutes of evidence)_
(London: Eyre and Spottiswoode, 1886), p. lvii. Curiously, Luxemburg
does not mention one factor that the report mentions: “The fall in the
rate of profit which is the natural tendency of the accumulation of
capital” (p. lxii).

²⁰ The table presented at this point by Luxemburg also appears in her
longer typescript “Volume 2 of _Capital_.” We have used the same format
as in the translation of the longer typescript, which appeared with the
following statement by Luxemburg: “The statistics [in the table below]
were assembled by Professor [Heinrich] Dade and published by the
Association for Social Policy.”

²¹ The question marks are in the original typescript.

²² Heinrich Herkner, “Krisen,” in _Handwörterbuch der
Staatswissenschaften_, edited by J. Conrad et. al, second edition, Vol.
5 (Jena: G. Fischer, 1900), pp. 413–33.

²³ The question mark is in the original typescript. This appears to be a
reference to Parvus’ _Die Gewerkschaften und die Sozialdemokratie.
Kritischer Bericht über die Lager u. die Aufgaben der deutschen
Arbeiterbewegung_.

²⁴ Luxemburg does not make clear what the numbers in the following table
refer to. Perhaps she meant the number of persons employed by cartels
and trusts in 1911.

²⁵ There is no number 1 listed in the typescript. It is possible that
the first on the list of 8 points was intended to be the earlier
sentence reading “Do cartels represent progress?”

²⁶ The question marks are in the original typescript.

²⁷ The following seem to be incomplete notes for material already
written about in greater detail earlier in the manuscript.


PRACTICAL ECONOMICS: VOLUME 3 OF MARX’S _CAPITAL_

¹ This is a reference to Eugen von Böhm-Bawerk’s _Zum Abschluß des
Marxschen Systems_ (Karl Marx and the Close of His System) (Berlin: von
Otto von Boenigk, 1896) and Ladislaus von Bortkiewicz’s “Wertrechnung
und Preisrechnung im Marxschen System: ein Übersicht über die
Marx-Kritik” (Value and Price in the Marxian System: An Overview of the
Critique of Marx), _Archiv für Sozialwissenschaft_, 23 (1906) pp. 10–50,
445–488, which argued that Marx’s discussion of the transformation of
values into prices in Chapter 9 of Volume 3 of _Capital_ is internally
inconsistent with his presentation of the theory of value in Volume 1.
For a recent refutation of these criticisms of Marx’s theory, see Andrew
Kliman, _Reclaiming Marx’s Capital: A Refutation of the Myth of
Inconsistency_ (Lanham, MD: Lexington Books, 2006). For an English
translation of Böhm-Bawerk’s work, _Karl Marx and the Close of his
System: A Criticism_ (London: Unwin, 1898); for an English translation
of Bortkiewicz, see “Value and Price in the Marxian System,”
_International Economic Papers_, No. 2, 1952, pp. 5–60.

² A rolling mill is a process for producing certain forms of metal, such
as sheet metal, in which stocks or ingots of molten metal are shaped as
they pass through a series of rollers.

³ Luxemburg largely reproduces these tables from Volume 3 of _Capital_.
See Karl Marx, _Das Kapital_, Band III (Hamburg: Otto Meisner, 1894),
pp. 134–6; _Capital_ Vol. 3, translated by David Fernbach (New York:
Vintage, 1981), p. 256.

⁴ That is, the rate of profit would now be 14 [], instead of 20.

⁵ Marx discusses this in Chapter 11 of Part 2 (not Part 1, as stated in
the typescript) of Volume 3, entitled “The Effects of General
Fluctuations in Wages on the Prices of Production.” Marx writes, “The
conclusion is that a general fall in wages leads to a general rise in
surplus-value, in the rate of surplus-value, and with other things
remaining equal, also in the profit rate, even if in a different
proportion; it leads to a fall in production prices for the commodity
products of capital of lower than average composition and a rise in
production prices for the commodity products of capitals of higher than
average composition.” See _Capital_ Vol. 3, p. 305.

⁶ Luxemburg’s arithmetic here is in error. 6½ percent of 120 (the
original price) is 7.8, not “8 and [].” The new price should therefore
be 127.8. It appears that the 7 and 8 in this number was mistakenly
transposed. Also, it should read [], not [].

⁷ The passage Luxemburg is referring to appears in Chapter 13 of Part 3
of Volume 3 of _Capital_, entitled “The Law Itself.” Marx writes, “The
hypothetical series we constructed at the opening of this chapter
therefore expresses the actual tendency of capitalist production. With
the progressive decline in the variable capital in relation to the
constant capital, this tendency leads to a rising organic composition of
the total capital, and the direct result of this is that the rate of
surplus-value, with the level of exploitation of labor remaining the
same or even rising, is expressed in a steadily falling general rate of
profit.” (pp. 318–19).

⁸ For Luxemburg’s repudiation of Bernstein’s rejection of Marx’s value
theory (which was largely inspired by Bernstein coming under the
influence of bourgeois marginal utility theory), see chapter 9 of her
_Reform or Revolution_.

⁹ See _Capital_ Vol. 3, p. 322: “The law of the falling rate of profit,
as expressing the same or even a rising rate of surplus-value, means in
other words: taking any particular quantity of average social capital,
e.g. a capital of 100, an ever greater portion of this is represented by
means of labor and an even lesser portion by living labor. Since the
mass of living labor added to the means of production falls in relation
to the value of these means of production, so too does the unpaid labor,
and the portion of value in which it is represented in relation to the
value of the total capital advanced.” This is discussed in Part 3 of
Volume 3, not Part 1, as indicated in the typescript.

¹⁰ See _Capital_ Volume 3, Chapter 15, “The Development of the Law’s
Internal Contradictions,” p. 354: “It also leads to the centralization
of this capital, i.e. the swallowing-up of small capitalists by big, and
their decapitalization. This is simply the divorce of the conditions of
labor from the producers raised to a higher power, these smaller
capitalists still counting among the producers, since their own labor
still plays a role.” For Luxemburg’s reference to “the end of the
chapter,” see pp. 359–75.

¹¹ In this part of the course Luxemburg discusses Marx’s theory of
credit and interest-bearing capital.

¹² Ricardo argued that ground rent and the value of land have a tendency
to continuously increase, providing important (albeit unjustified, in
his view) benefits to landowners. The rent obtained from land, for
Ricardo, is therefore always _differential_ instead of _absolute_. As
Marx put it in Chapter 39 of Volume 3 of _Capital_, “[Ricardo] assumes
that no other rent but differential rent exists” (p. 788). In contrast
to Ricardo, Marx held that the value of land and ground rent is impacted
by the productivity of labor as well as the fertility of the soil; on
these grounds, he argued that rents appropriated by the landlords are
often a burden for industrial capitalists. Rodbertus argued that since
the fertility of the soil determines agricultural output, mortgage
indebtedness should be replaced by a permanently fixed (or _absolute_)
rent. Although Marx acknowledged the importance of Rodbertus’ theory of
rent, he argued, in Chapter 46 of Volume 3 of _Capital_ that he erred in
viewing the growth of profit on land as necessarily correlating with a
growth in the value of capital. Marx held that absolute rent cannot
exist where the organic composition of capital in agriculture is at a
higher level than in the economy as a whole.

¹³ Two paragraphs appear at the end of the original typescript that were
not written by Luxemburg. This further confirms that the typescript was
a stenographic record of a lecture by Luxemburg at the SPD’s Berlin
party school, with a listener (or the stenographer) commenting at the
end on some final remarks by her. It is also possible that the
typescript was prepared by Luxemburg _before_ her lecture, for use in it
or as a handout to help students follow it, and that the paragraphs
about Kautsky’s book might have been added or inserted into the
manuscript by a listener. The two paragraphs read:

In conclusion, with regard to ground rent theory, Comrade Luxemburg
recommends that we read [Karl] Kautsky’s book _Die Agrarfrage_ (The
Agrarian Question). It is going to be reprinted.

This book also explains why the general development, which nowadays has
entered the stage of [capital] concentration, becomes blurred and
obscured to some extent in agriculture. This is, so to speak, an optical
illusion, which results from the fact that people apply to agriculture
very mechanically the same methods they have for viewing industry.


HISTORY OF POLITICAL ECONOMY

¹ Luxemburg is referring to John Kells Ingram’s book, _History of
Political Economy_ (Edinburgh: Adam & Charles Black, 1888). Some 55
editions of Ingram’s book, in eight different languages, were published
between 1888 and 2008. Luxemburg was using the German edition of the
work, _Geschichte der Volkswirtschaftslehre_, translated by E. Roschlau
(Tübingen: H. Laupp, 1905). Some of Ingram’s earlier work was known to
Marx, who read and made excerpts of his writings.

² In the manuscript, Luxemburg gives the name as “Scaruff.” The actual
title of Scaruffi’s work is _Discurso sopra le monete e della vera
proporzione tra l’oro e l’argento_ (Discourse on Money and on the True
Proportions between Gold and Silver) (Milan: Destefanis, 1804 [1582]).

³ The actual title of Davanzati’s book is _Lezione delle monnete_
(Lessons About Coins) (Milan: Destefanis, 1804 [1588]).

⁴ The title given for Serra’s work is translated from the German wording
used by Luxemburg. In the original Italian it was _Breve trattato delle
cause che possono far abbondare li regni d’oro e d’argento dove non sono
miniere_ (Brief Treatise on the Causes Which Can Make Gold and Silver
Abound in Kingdoms Where There Are no Mines) (Milan: Destefanis, 1803
[1613]).

⁵ Adam Smith considered Mun to be the most outstanding proponent of the
mercantilist system. See Mun’s _Discourse of Trade from England unto the
East Indies_ (London: Nicholas Okes, 1621).

⁶ The actual title of Child’s book is _Brief Observations concerning
Trade and the Interest of Money_ (London: Elizabeth Calvert, 1668).

⁷ Temple’s book was actually first published in 1673. See William
Temple, _Observations upon the United Provinces of the Netherlands_
(London: J. Maxwell, 1673).

⁸ That is, reached a high point of economic development.

⁹ See “The Physiocrats,” in _Economic Manuscript of 1861–1863,
Marx-Engels Collected Works_, Vol. 30 (New York: International
Publishers, 1988), pp. 352–76. The material contained in what has became
known as _Theories of Surplus Value_ was originally part of the 1861–63
draft of Volume 1 of _Capital_. After 1863 Marx decided not to include
the material (which he called “History of Theory”) in Volume 1,
intending instead to issue it as a separate Volume Four of _Capital_. It
was first published separately by Karl Kautsky under the title _Theories
of Surplus Value_ between 1905 and 1910.

¹⁰ Boisguilbert is widely considered to have been a _precursor_ of the
physiocrats. This was also Marx’s view. He writes in _Theories of
Surplus Value_, “Ideas related to those of the Physiocrats are to be
found in fragmentary form in older writers who preceded them, partly in
France herself, for example Boisguilbert. But it is only with the
Physiocrats that these ideas develop into an epoch-making system.” See
_Economic Manuscript of 1861–1863, Marx-Engels Collected Works_, Vol.
30, p. 359. The actual title of Boisguilbert’s book, first published in
1704, is _Traité de la nature, culture, commerce et intéret des grains_
(Treatise on Nature, Culture and Interest of the Grain Trade). It can be
found in _Pierre de Boisguilbert ou la naissance de l’économie
politique_, 2 volumes (Paris: Institut National d’Etudes Démographiques,
1966). For an English translation, see _A Treatise of the Nature of
Wealth, Money and Taxation_, translated with an introduction by Peter
Groenewegen (Sydney: Centre for the Study of the History of Economic
Thought, 2000).

¹¹ The title of the book in French, first published in 1707, is
_Dissertations sur la nature des richesses, de l’argent et des tributs_.
It can be found in _Pierre de Boisguilbert ou la naissance de l’économie
politique_, 2 volumes (Paris: Institut National d’Etudes Démographiques,
1966).

¹² The _Tableau économique_ (The Economic Picture) was first published
in France in 1759. For an English translation, see _Tableau économique_,
edited by Marguerite Kuczynski and Ronald Meek (London: Macmillan,
1972).

¹³ In the original French, _Réflexions sur la formation et la
distribution des richesses_. It was first published in 1769 in the
journal _Ephémérides du citoyen, ou Bibliotheque Raisonnée des Science
Morales et Politiques_.

¹⁴ Antonio Genovesi was primarily a philosopher who wrote on logic and
metaphysics. His _Lezioni di commercio_ (Lessons on Commerce) (Naples:
Appresso I Fratelli Simone, 1765) is considered the first systematic
work on economics in Italian. Pietro Verri is primarily known for his
_Meditazioni sulla economia politica_ (Mediations on Political Economy)
(Genoa: Livornio, 1771). Giovanni Rinaldo, Count of Carli, is author of
_Della Monete, e della instituzione delle zecche d’Italia dell’antico e
presente sistema di esse_ (Of Coins, and the Establishment of Mints in
Italy and the Ancient and Present System) (Pisa: G.P. Giovennelli,
1751–59) Cesare Becarria first argued against the death penalty in his
treatise, _Dei delitti e delle pene_ (On Crimes and Punishments)
(Harlem: Dal Molini, 1764). Although his economic writings are today not
as well known in the English-speaking world as his contributions to
political thought, Joseph Schumpeter referred to him as “the Italian
Adam Smith.”

¹⁵ Karl Friedrich, Grand Duke of Baden was one of the few European
monarchs to support the physiocrat’s promotion of free trade. Luxemburg
is referring to a précis that he wrote on the phsyiocrats, entitled
_Abrégé des principes de l’économie politique_ (Abstract of the
Principles of Political Economy) (Baden: Grossherzog, 1772).

¹⁶ Luxemburg most likely had in mind Boisguilbert.

¹⁷ Marx tended to use the term “classical political economy” to refer to
the English political economists, from William Petty to David Ricardo,
as well as to the French economists, from Boisguilbert to Sismondi.

¹⁸ The title of the work is not given in the manuscript. Luxemburg is
referring to Ricardo’s _On the Principles of Political Economy and
Taxation_ (London: John Murray, 1817).

¹⁹ The reference is to Smith’s, _An Inquiry into the Nature and Causes
of the Wealth of Nations_, first published in 1776.

²⁰ Storch was economics tutor to Tsar Nicholas I of Russia.

²¹ Kathedersozialismus refers to “academic socialism” or “socialism of
the chair”—a relatively conservative socialist tendency among German
economists and sociologists of the late nineteenth and early twentieth
century that opposed laissez-faire and supported state intervention in
the economy while opposing the revolutionary aims of the workers’
movements. Almost all of its adherents were professors at German
universities. In Luxemburg’s era it was virtually unheard of for a
revolutionary socialist or Marxist to have a position at a German
university.

²² Heinrich Herkner, _Krisen_ (Crises), in _Handwörterbuch für
Staatswissenschaften_ (Dictionary of the Social Sciences), second
edition, Vol. 5 (Jena: G. Fischer, 1900).

²³ Luxemburg appears to have in mind Parvus’ book, _Die Gewerkschaften
und die Sozialdemokratie_ (The Trade Unions and Social Democracy)
(Dresden: Verlag der Sächsischen Arbeiter Zeitung, 1896).

²⁴ See Max Schippel _Hochkonjunktur und Wirtschaftskrise_ (Boom and
Crisis) (Berlin: Vorwärts, 1908).


APPENDIX: THEORY OF THE WAGES FUND

¹ According to the classical theory of the wage fund, the wages of
workers are determined by the proportion between the total amount of
capital and the population of available workers. If the total amount of
capital in a given society remains given but the population increases,
wages will decline; if population decreases, wages will rise. The
implication is that class struggle, trade unions, or social resistance
cannot affect wage rates, since the wage fund is presumably a fixed
amount dependent on the ratio between the volume of capital and the size
of the laboring populace.

² In _A Manual of Political Economy_ (1795), Bentham provided the first
quantitative formulation of the theory of the wage fund. He wrote, “But
the rate of wages depends upon, and is necessarily governed solely and
exclusively by, the degree of opulence in the country at the time: that
is by the proportion of the quantity of wealth in readiness to be
employed in the shape of capital in the purchase of labor to the number
of persons for whose labor there is a demand.” See _Jeremy Bentham’s
Economic Writings_, Vol. 1 (London: Allen and Unwin, 1952–54), pp.
247–8.

³ J.B. Say argued in _Traité de l’Economie politique ou simple
exposition de la manière dont se forment, se distribuent et se
consomment les richesses_ that as workers’ wages increase above
subsistence, family size grows and the supply of labor eventually
outstrips the demand for labor, which in turn compels wages to return
back to their “natural” level.

⁴ Lassalle’s theory of the “iron law of wages” held that in capitalism
wages tend towards the minimum requirements necessary to sustain the
laborer. According to this alleged “iron law,” wages can never drop
below subsistence levels, since that would threaten the physical
existence of the worker, but neither can they rise much above
subsistence, given the competition among workers for employment. The
logical implication of the theory is that the effort of trade unions to
secure higher wages for their members is bound to prove ultimately
fruitless. Although Marx is often associated with the idea, he fervently
opposed Lassalle’s conception of the iron law of wages on both empirical
and theoretical grounds.

⁵ In _Inquiry into the Principles of the Distribution of Wealth_
(London: Hurst, Rees, Orme, Brown & Green, 1824), William Thompson, a
socialist neo-Ricardian, rejected the wages fund theory on the grounds
that workers are entitled to the entire value of their labor.

⁶ Hermann was the first German economist to criticize the wages fund
theory of the British economists in his _Staatswirtschaftliche
Untersuchungen_ (Inquiries into Political Economy) (München: A. Weber,
1832). He argued that the actual consumer of labor power is not the
capitalist (as Smith and Ricardo contended) but the consumers who
purchase the laborer’s products. Since the consumer is the buyer of
labor, the capitalist, in his view, simply pays out in wages the price
of the goods made by labor.

⁷ Rodbertus rejected the idea that wages are paid out of capital on the
grounds that workers are bound to receive a progressively smaller
proportionate amount of wages as production increases. Luxemburg took
issue with him in _The Accumulation of Capital_: “Since the ‘laws of
exchange value’ determine the wage, an advance in labor productivity
must bring about an ever declining share in the product for the workers.
Here we have arrived at the Archimedean fulcrum of Rodbertus’ system.
This ‘declining wage rate’ is his most important ‘original’ discovery on
which he harps from his first writings on social problems (probably in
1839) until his death, and which he ‘claims’ as his very own. This
conception, for all that, was but a simple corollary of Ricardo’s theory
of value and is contained implicitly in the wages fund theory which
dominated bourgeois economics up to the publication of Marx’s _Capital_.
Rodbertus nevertheless believed that this ‘discovery’ made him a kind of
Galileo in economics, and he refers to his declining wage rate as
explaining every evil and contradiction in capitalist economy.” See _The
Accumulation of Capital_ (New York: Modern Reader, 1951), p. 244. See
also Rodbertus’ _Die Forderungen der arbeitenden Klassen_ (The Claims of
the Working Classes) (Frankfurt am Main: V. Klostermann, 1946 [1837]).

⁸ Although not as radical as Thompson in his approach, Thornton’s _On
Labor: Its Wrongful Claims and Rightful Dues, its Actual Present and
Possible Future_ (London: Macmillan and co., 1869), took sharp issue
with the wages fund theory, which led John Stuart Mill to abandon his
earlier defence of it. Mill recanted the theory of the wage fund in a
letter of April 9, 1869 to J.E. Cairnes. See _Later Letters of John
Stuart Mill, 1849–73_, edited by Francis Mineea and Dwight Lindley
(Toronto: University of Toronto Press, 1972), p. 1587.

⁹ Sismondi was one of the first economists who took issue with the claim
of the classical political economists that wages are advanced by the
capitalist in proportion to the amount of the accumulated capital, on
the grounds that the increasing productivity of labor and the divorce of
workers from control over the means of production actually leads to a
decline in their relative wage, and indeed to their ultimate
impoverishment. See his _Nouveaux Principes d’Economie politique ou de
la richesse dans ses rapports avec la population_.

¹⁰ For Luxemburg’s discussion of Julius Wolff’s critique of the theory
of the wage fund, see below.

¹¹ Marx discusses the wages fund theory in _Capital_ Vol. 1, Chapter 24.
He writes: “Classical political economy has always liked to conceive
social capital as a fixed magnitude of a fixed degree of
efficiency … Variable capital in its material existence, i.e. the mass
of the means of subsistence it represents for the worker, or the
so-called labor fund, was turned by this fable into a separate part of
social wealth, confined by natural chains and unable to cross the
boundary to the other parts … The facts on which the dogma is based are
these: on the one hand, the worker has no right to interfere in the
division of social wealth into means of enjoyment for the non-worker and
means of production. On the other hand, it is only in favorable and
exceptional cases that he can enlarge the so-called ‘labor fund’ at the
expense of the ‘revenue’ of the rich.” (pp. 758–60).

¹² In many of his writings Marx took strong exception to the theory of
the “iron law of wages,” which Lassalle had attributed to him. Marx
heaped scorn on the theory as representing little more than an
application of Malthus’ theory of population to the determination of the
value of labor power. See especially Marx’s critique of this Lassallean
notion in his _Critique of the Gotha Program_: “The nonsense is
perpetrated of speaking of the ‘abolition of the wage system’ (it should
read: system of wage labor) _‘together with_ the iron law of wages.’ If
I abolish wage labor, then naturally I abolish its laws too, whether
they are of ‘iron’ or sponge. But Lassalle’s attack on wage labor turns
almost solely on this co-called law … But if this theory is correct,
then again I can _not_ abolish the law even if I abolish wage labor a
hundred times over, because the law then governs not only the system of
wage labor but every social system.” _Marx-Engels Collected Works_, Vol.
24, p. 91.

¹³ In the manuscript the first several lines of this paragraph were
crossed out (through the phrase “industrial reserve army”), but we have
preserved these lines since there is no alternative wording for the
beginning of this long sentence.

¹⁴ This is especially the case with such socialist neo-Ricardians like
Thompson, whose criticism of the wages fund theory pre-dates Marx’s
development of the concept of the industrial reserve army.

¹⁵ See Adolph von Wenckstern, _Marx_ (Leipzig: Duncker & Humblot, 1896).

¹⁶ Luxemburg here gives the English word “precisely,” along with its
German equivalent _genau_. Luxemburg is apparently referring to the
following passage in Chapter 8 of Volume One of Smith’s _The Wealth of
Nations_: “In Great Britain the wages of labor seem, in the present
times, to be evidently more than what is precisely necessary to enable
the laborer to bring up a family. In order to satisfy ourselves upon
this point it will not be necessary to enter into any tedious or
doubtful calculation of what may be the lowest sum upon which it is
possible to do this. There are many plain symptoms that the wages of
labor are nowhere in this country regulated by this lowest rate which is
consistent with common humanity.” See Adam Smith, _An Inquiry into the
Nature and Causes of the Wealth of Nations_ (London: Metheun & Co,
1904), Vol. 3, p. 27.

¹⁷ This is discussed in Chapter 5 of _The Principles of Political
Economy and Taxation_, second edition (London: John Murray, 1819).
Luxemburg most often refers to the second edition of the work, which
originally appeared in 1817.

¹⁸ This paragraph was a marginal notation in the manuscript.

¹⁹ James Mill was one of the most important advocates of the classical
theory of the wage fund. He argued that wages are advanced by the
capitalist out of the funds that would otherwise be constituted as
capital. See James Mill, _In Defence of Commerce_ (London: C. and R.
Baldwin, 1808). Destutt de Tracy’s _Traité de la volonté et de ses
effets_ (Treatise on the Will and its Effects) (Paris: Courcier, 1821),
argued that since wages are a deduction from the value of capital, an
increase in workers’ wages would lead to social impoverishment. On these
grounds he declared that “in poor nations the people are comfortable, in
rich nations they are generally poor.” John Stuart Mill’s _Principles of
Political Economy_ was actually first published in 1848 (London:
Longmans, Green and Co.). It strongly defended the classical theory of
the wage fund, a theory that Mill repudiated two decades later. For
Marx’s critique of Mill, see the “Introduction” to the _Grundrisse_ and
Chapters 15, 16 and 24 of _Capital_ Vol. 1. Henry Fawcett’s _The
Economic Position of the British Laborer_ (London: Macmillan and Co.,
1865) is discussed by Marx in _Capital_ Vol. 1, in the section on “The
So-Called Labor Fund.” See _Capital_ Vol. 1, pp. 758–61.

²⁰ Karl Heinrich Rau’s _Lehrbuch der politischen Ökonomie_ (Textbook of
Political Economy) (Heidelberg: Winter, 1826–37) was the first work in
Germany to articulate and defend the theory of the wages fund. He argued
that wages are but a special form of price—the latter in his view, being
determined by the value of the commodity, the cost of exchanging the
commodity, and competition. John Ramsey MacCulloch argued in his _The
Literature of Political Economy_ (London: Brown, Greens, and Longmans,
1845) that wages are necessarily dependent on the proportion between the
total amount of capital and the size of the laboring population.

²¹ That is, the time necessary for a new generation of workers to be
raised.

²² The economic crises of 1825 resulted from a stock market crash
arising from speculative investments by English investors in Latin
America. It is considered the first modern economic crisis. In referring
to “1836,” Luxemburg is probably thinking of the financial crisis of
1837 in the US, which occurred after President Andrew Jackson refused to
renew the charter of the Second Bank of the US. The crisis of 1847
refers to the collapse of British financial markets after the bursting
of a bubble in the railway industry. The Panic of 1857, which greatly
drew Marx’s attention, is considered to have been the first worldwide
economic crisis in human history. It resulted, in part, from a run on
stocks following the British government’s decision to withhold the
release of hoards of gold and silver to back up its currency. The
reference to 1867 is the crisis in England of 1866–67. In her discussion
of the history of crises in her manuscript “Volume 2 of _Capital_” in
this volume, Luxemburg noted: “By 1866 all this led to a crisis in
England, and the high point of the crisis was 1867. An outbreak of panic
followed, as ever, from some particular event, and indeed in this case
it was a bankruptcy of Overend & Co. The consequence of this bankruptcy
was a frightful panic. In two weeks the reserves of the Bank of England
were almost completely emptied.”

²³ Three question marks in place of a word appear in the manuscript
here. We have provided what we take to be the meaning of the missing
word in brackets.

²⁴ Ricardo discusses this in Chapter 31 of the second edition of his
_Principles of Political Economy and Taxation_. In the Preface (p. 3),
he noted: “To determine the laws which regulate this distribution, is
the principal problem in Political Economy: much as the science has been
improved by the writings of Turgot, Stuart, Smith, Say, Sismondi, and
others, they afford very little satisfactory information respecting the
natural course of rent, profit, and wages.” Shortly thereafter the
critique of the wages fund theory was carried further by such
neo-Ricardian socialists as William Thompson in his _Inquiry into the
Principles of the Distribution of Wealth_.

²⁵ Alfred and Friedrich Krupp were one of Germany’s most important steel
and armaments manufacturers (see the second footnote on page 114 of this
volume). Karl Friedrich Stumm at the time was the most important
employer in mining and iron and steel industries in Saarland, in western
Germany.

²⁶ _Des Weltbaus Löcher verstopfen sie/Mit alten Schlafröcken und
Mützen_. These lines are from Heine’s famous work, _Buch der Leider_
(1827), or _Book of Songs_.

²⁷ That is, greater than the quantity of accumulated capital.

²⁸ See Rodbertus’s _Zur Erkenntnis unserer staatswirtschaftlichen
Zustände_ (Contribution to the Knowledge of Our Economic Conditions)
(Neubrandenburg: Friedland, 1842).

²⁹ Here _Arme_ means the “poor,” but Luxemburg intends it also to mean
_Armée_, that is, the reserve army of the unemployed.

³⁰ That is, for his capital to make a profit.

³¹ The common theory would be one that reflected the views of both Marx
and Julius Wolf.

³² The manuscript breaks off at this point.



A GLOSSARY OF PERSONAL NAMES


ABAMELIK-LAZAREV, SEMYON SEMYONOVICH (1857–1916), Russian industrialist,
wrote a number of works on the mining industry and Russia’s economy. He
was also an archaeologist and scholar of ancient societies.

ACOSTA, JOSÉ DE (1539–1600), Spanish Jesuit and traveler, arrived in
Peru in 1571 founded a number of colleges and universities in South
America. He wrote an important study of the Native Americans of South
America and Mexico, _Historia natural y moral de las Indias_, which is
one of the most accurate depictions of the New World produced at the
time.

ALEXANDER II (1819–81), Tsar of Russia from 1855 to 1881; in response to
Russia’s defeat in the Crimean War, initiated a series of reforms, the
most important being the abolition of serfdom, in 1861; also reorganised
the military, state bureaucracy, and penal code. Brutally suppressed the
Polish uprising of 1863 and banned the use of Polish, Lithuanian and
Ukrainian languages. He was assassinated by a revolutionary in 1881.

ALEXANDER III (1845–1894), Tsar of Russia from 1881 to 1894, extremely
conservative and reactionary ruler who reversed many of the reforms of
his assassinated predecessor, Tsar Alexander II. Insisted on the
suppression of the languages and cultural heritage of non-Russian
peoples of the Empire and severely persecuted the Jews. He severely
weakened the power of the _zemstvo_, the elected local councils, in
favor of the “land captains” appointed by the central government.

ALEXIS, WILLIBALD. See HÄRING, GEORG WILHELM HEINRICH

ALLART ROUSSEAU, LÉON (1837–1906), Belgian entrepreneur and
industrialist; founded a textile factory in Roubaix, France, near the
border with Belgium, in 1849. In the 1870s his company built a large
textile factory in Łódż, Poland, becoming one of the largest textile
producers in the country.

ARKWRIGHT, RICHARD (1732–92), English inventor who is credited with
devising the spinning frame and carding machine (to convert cotton into
yarn), which helped launch the industrial revolution. His mill at
Cromford helped create the modern factory system.

ARNOLD, WILHELM (1826–83), German legal scholar and economic historian;
a follower of Leopold von Ranke, wrote extensively on constitutional
history and the political economy of the Middle Ages.

ARTEVELDE, JACOB VON (1290–1345), Flemish statesmen, became the ruler of
the city of Ghent (one of the largest in Europe in the Middle Ages)
following a revolt in 1338 by merchants and weavers opposed to the
alliance between the Count of Flanders and France, which had
impoverished many of them by denying them access to the English market.
Artevelde ruled all of Flanders for a short time after leading the
revolt but he was killed in an uprising of artisans opposed to his
pro-English policies.

BABEUF, FRANÇOIS-NOEL (GRACCHUS) (1760–97), French revolutionary and
journalist, member of the “Conspiracy of Equals” of 1796 that sought to
replace the Directorate with a radical regime committed to the
eradication of poverty and inequality. Participated in the Revolution of
1789, was initially close to the Jacobins, but went on to advocate a
more radical program of income redistribution and equality of property.

BAKER, SAMUEL WHITE (1821–93), English explorer, explored the Upper Nile
and was the first European to reach Lake Albert, in 1864. He was also an
Abolitionist who strongly opposed slavery.

BECCARIA, CESARE (1738–94), Italian philosopher and politician who is
best known for writing _On Crimes and Punishments_, a passionate attack
on torture and the death penalty that advocated a radical reform of the
penal system; his books were an important influence on such US thinkers
as Thomas Jefferson.

BECKER, JÉROME (1850–1912), Belgian explorer who traversed the course of
the Nile to Lake Albert, in 1884. He wrote about his travels in _La Vie
en Afrique ou Trois Ans dans l’Afrique Central_ in 1887.

BELLERS, JOHN (1654–1725), English educational theorist, argued that it
was the responsibility of the wealthy to provide for the education of
the poorer classes of society. A Quaker and friend of William Penn, he
lived for a time in Pennsylvania. He was a fervent opponent of capital
punishment and advocated a unified European state. Some of his ideas
were influential upon such utopian socialists as Robert Owen.

BELOCH, KARL JULIUS (1854–1929), German economic historian, spent much
of his life at the University of Rome; authored a number of important
studies of Greek and Roman history, foremost of which is the four-volume
_Griechische Geschichte_.

BENNETT, JAMES GORDON JR. (1795–1872), American journalist, publisher of
the _New York Herald_; provided the financial backing for Henry Morton
Stanley’s trip to Central and East Africa in 1869 in pursuit of David
Livingston, which eventually led to the brutal opening up of the Congo
basin to European imperialism.

BENTHAM, JEREMY (1748–1832), English philosopher and economist, one of
the leading figures in the development of modern utilitarianism;
defended free trade, usury, and unrestricted free markets and formulated
the first quantitative formulation of the classical theory of the wage
fund; a liberal social reformer, he founded (along with James Mill) the
_Westminister Review_, a leading journal of the “philosophical
radicals.”

BENZONI, GIROLAMO (1520–1570), Italian adventurer and historian, spent
fifteen years traveling through Spanish America; recorded his
observations in a series of works in which he sharply attacked the
Spanish for their repressive policies against the Native Americans.

BERNIER, FRANÇOIS (1625–88), French traveler and physician, lived in
India for twelve years, during which time he was the personal physician
of the Mughal Emperor Aurangzeb. Author of _Travels in the Moghul
Empire_, one of the earliest accounts of Mogul India by a European. He
helped promote the (erroneous) view that the Moghul Emperors owned all
of the land, which became an important cornerstone of the theory of
“Oriental Despotism.”

BERNSTEIN, EDUARD (1850–1932), German socialist politician and
theoretician, initially a follower of Lassalle, joined the “Marxist”
Eisenachers in the 1870s; 1890–1901 lived in exile in London; appointed
literary heir of Marx’s archives by Engels; regular contributor to _Die
Neue Zeit_; from 1896 on, one of the major theoreticians of
“revisionism,” the view that Marxism should be revised and “modernized”;
subject of Luxemburg’s polemic in her _Reform or Revolution_; member of
the German Reichstag 1902–06 and 1912–18; in 1906, became a teacher at
the SPD’s party school in Berlin; resigned from the SPD on pacifist
grounds in 1914 and became a leading member of the USPD; rejoined the
SPD in 1919.

BISMARCK, OTTO VON (1815–98), Prussian-German statesmen and first
Chancellor of Germany from 1871 to 1890. A member of the Junker
landowning class and extreme nationalist and authoritarian, he was
instrumental in Prussia’s (and later Germany’s) military expansion. He
imposed the anti-Socialist Laws against the workers’ movement while
trying to buy off sections of it by providing some social welfare
protections.

BLANC, LOUIS (1811–82), French journalist, historian, and politician;
reformist socialist who advocated national workshops, under government
control, to ameliorate poverty and unemployment; in 1848, member of the
Provisional Government; 1848–70, lived in England as an émigré; in 1871,
elected to the French National Assembly; supported the reactionary
regime of Thiers and took a position against the Paris Commune of 1871;
in 1876, became a member of the Radical Party.

BLANQUI, AUGUST (1805–81), French revolutionary, joined the
conspiratorial society, the Carbonari in 1824 and later other groups,
including the League of the Just; devoted himself to various schemes for
insurrection with the aim of liberating society from oppression by
bringing to power a cadre of professional revolutionaries who would rule
on behalf of the masses; spent the bulk of his life in prison; he was an
uncompromising revolutionary who spent little time or effort on theory
or in developing a conception of the future social relations that could
replace capitalism.

BLANQUI, JÉROME-ADOPHE (1798–1854), French economist, brother of famous
revolutionary Louis August Blanqui. Made important discoveries in
economic history and labor economics. An advocate of improved conditions
for workers, but a supporter of free market capitalism.

BLOCH, JAN GOTLIB (1836–1901), Polish banker and financier who helped
develop the railway industry in Poland. In 1877 he was appointed a
member of the Russian Foreign Ministry’s Scientific Committee. He also
wrote a number of works on the Polish and Russian economy. Although he
converted to Christianity as a young man he did not deny his Jewish
roots and was an early supporter of Zionism. Near the end of his life he
turned his attention to the need to avoid future European wars, arguing
(in his six-volume study _Is War Now Impossible?_) that technological
developments ensured future wars would lead to entrenchment and
stalemate without clear victors.

BOCCACCIO, GIOVANNI (1313–1375), Italian poet and writer, author of the
_Decameron_, a highly influential work of Renaissance humanism; also
authored _On Famous Women_; emphasized a return to classical Greek and
Latin sources, stimulating the rediscovery of ancient texts and ideas
that proved of critical importance in the Renaissance.

BÖHM-BAWERK, EUGEN VON (1851–1914), Austrian economist and leading
figure in the conservative Austrian school of economics; served as
Minister of Finance of Austria from 1895–1904 and afterwards was
professor of economics in Vienna and Innsbruck; best known for his
criticism of Marx’s economics, arguing that Marx’s discussion of value
in Volume 1 of _Capital_ was internally inconsistent with his theory of
prices in Volume 3 and that the labor of workers is not the sole source
of value. His work proved highly influential on such right-wing thinkers
as Ludwig von Mises.

BOISGUILBERT, PIERRE LE PESANT SIEUR DE (1646–1714), French economist,
one of the earliest theorists of the virtues of a free market; opposed
mercantilism (the notion that the wealth of nations consists in their
possession of precious metals) on the grounds that wealth depends on the
level of production and exchange; considered a major precursor of the
Physiocrats. Marx, who often discussed his work, favorably quoted his
comment that social wealth depends not on the level of coinage but on
the enjoyment of human capacities.

BONTOUX, PAUL EUGENE (1820–1904), industrialist and banker in the
Austro-Hungarian Empire, invested heavily in railroads and mining;
founded the General Union in 1878, an association of conservative
bankers that sought to limit the economic power of Jews; he was arrested
for participating in a banking scandal that helped precipitate the
economic panic of 1882. After being sentenced to prison, he fled to
Spain.

BORGHT, RICHARD VAN DER (1861–1926), German jurist and statistician,
taught economics at the University of Aachen from 1892 to 1900, served
as a member of the Prussian lower house and in the Council of the
Ministry of the Interior after 1898; published a book in 1892 on _The
Economic Importance of the Rhine-Maritime_.

BÖRNE, LUDWIG (real name, Löb Baruch) (1786–1837), German author of
imaginative literature and political journalism; a radical democrat in
the period after the July Revolution in France of 1830; _Briefe aus
Paris_ (Letters from Paris) is his most famous work.

BORTKIEWICZ, LADISLAUS VON (1868–1931), Russian-born economist and
statistician of Polish origin who spent much of his professional life in
Germany; best known for his criticism of Marx’s theory of reproduction,
in which he claimed that Marx failed to adequately transform values into
prices in Volume 3 of _Capital_. Bortkiewicz’s criticism of Marx’s
alleged inconsistency in determining how values become transformed into
prices, which has since been seriously challenged, was largely accepted
by a number of left-wing economists, such as Paul Sweezy and Piero
Sraffa.

BRAY, JOHN FRANCIS (1809–1897), English economist and utopian socialist,
a follower of Robert Owen who developed the theory of “labor money”—the
idea of replacing money with notes or chits denoting hours of labor that
could be exchanged for commodities.

BRENTANO, LUJO (1844–1931), German economist; “socialist of the chair”
associated with the historical school of economics and member of the
Association for Social Policy; studied under Adolph Wagner and later
worked with Ernest Engel in studying the role of British trade unions. A
moderate socialist, he was a strong supporter of German militarism in
World War I and briefly served as Prime Minister in Kurt Eisner’s
Bavarian Socialist Republic of 1918.

BRIGHT, JOHN (1811–89), British politician and social reformer; strongly
opposed protectionism, becoming one of the best-known opponents of the
Corn Laws; a strong advocate of free trade, he opposed capital
punishment, restrictions on religious and political liberty, and British
colonial policy in Ireland, Egypt and India. He became known as one of
Britain’s greatest orators.

BÜCHER, KARL (1847–1930), part of the “Young German” historical school
of economics that emphasized statistical and sociological analysis as
against classical economists’ emphasis on deductive reasoning.
Criticized unregulated free markets and defended Germany’s authoritarian
welfare state.

BUCKLE, HENRY THOMAS (1821–1862), English historian and sociologist,
author of _History of Civilization in England_ (1857–1861).

BÜRGER, GOTTFRIED AUGUST (1747–94), German poet and writer, author of
_Lenore_ (1773); his popular ballads are considered among the
outstanding works of German literature.

CAESAR, JULIUS (100 BC–44 BC), Roman general and statesmen who served as
dictator of Rome from 49 BC to 44 BC. His early military career was
defined by the conquest of Gaul (modern France), which he recorded in an
important historical work. He effectively put an end to the phase of
republican government of ancient Rome.

CAMERON, VERNEY LOVETT (1844–1894), English explorer, traveler and
opponent of slavery who sought to suppress the East African slave trade;
embarked on an expedition to East Africa in 1873 to assist the
explorations of David Livingston; traversed the Congo-Zambezi watershed,
becoming the first European to cross equatorial Africa from coast to
coast; his reports on his travels, first published in 1877, helped open
up the African interior to European colonization.

CARTWRIGHT, EDMUND (1743–1823), English inventor of the power loom,
which played a critical role in the industrial revolution; mechanical
spinners were in use prior to his inventions, but his work improved the
speed and quality of mechanical weaving.

CELMAN, MIGUEL JUÁREZ (1844–1909), President of Argentina from 1886 to
1890. A liberal who favored the separation of church and state, he was
forced to resign in 1890 after the “Revolution of the Park” took issue
with his increasingly autocratic policies.

CERVANTES, JUAN ORTIZ DE (birth date unknown; died 1629), Spanish
lawyer, judge, and Attorney General of Upper Peru, who wrote a book on
the destruction of the South American Indians.

CHANCELLOR, RICHARD (birth date unknown; died 1556), explorer and
navigator. He was the first Englishman to explore the White Sea and
establish direct commercial relations between England and Russia. At the
time, England did not have access to the Baltic Sea, so his journeys
established a new market for English wool for the countries of the East.

CHARLEMAGNE (742–814), King of the Franks from 768–814, greatly expanded
the Frankish Kingdom into an Empire that incorporated much of Western
and Central Europe. His Empire ranged from northern Spain to Croatia.

CHARLES V (1500–1558), ruler of the Spanish Empire (as Charles I) from
1516–56 and of the Holy Roman Empire (as Charles V) from 1519–56;
presided over a massive empire that included Spain, Austria, The
Netherlands, parts of Italy and the Spanish Americas; her was a fierce
opponent of Protestantism and helped foster the Counter-Reformation.

CHARLEVOIX, PIERRE FRANÇOIS-XAVIER (1682–1761), French Jesuit traveler
and historian, considered the first historian of New France; arrived in
Canada in 1705, where he served for four years in Quebec as Professor;
visited North America again in 1720–22 and explored the Great Lakes,
Mississippi River, and the Caribbean; in addition to his history of New
France and Hispaniola, he also wrote a history of Paraguay.

CHÂTEL, MARLY DE see FUMÉE, MARTIN.

CHICHERIN, BORIS NIKOLAIEVITCH (1828–1904), Russian jurist and political
philosopher, strong supporter of the liberal reforms of Tsar Alexander
II; influenced by Hegel’s political philosophy, he supported a
constitutional monarchy.

CHILD, JOSIAH (1630–99), English economist and proponent of
mercantilism; Governor of the East India Company from the 1680s until
his death; author of _Brief Observations Concerning Trade and the
Interest of Money_ (1688) and _A new Discourse on Trade_ (1690).

CHUPROV, ALEKSANDR ALEXANDROVICH (1874–1926), Russian statistician and
demographer; he argued for the use of statistics in analyzing and
resolving social problems. A follower of Ladislaus Bortkiewicz, he
taught at St. Petersburg Polytechnic Institute until 1917, when he went
into exile following the Russian Revolution.

CICCOTTI, ETTORE (1863–1939), Italian teacher, historian and politician,
wrote several influential works on ancient history; an active socialist,
he also sponsored a number of translations of Marx’s and Engels’s works
into Italian; best known for his studies of women and politics in
ancient Rome and on the decline of slavery in ancient society.

CLODION THE HAIRY (392–448), King of the Franks who invaded the Roman
Empire in 428, defeating the Romans at Cambrai; by 431 he extended his
kingdom from northern Gaul south to the Somme River; defeated and killed
in battle in 448 by the Roman general Flavius Aëtius. His name probably
derives from wearing his hair long, a custom among many Frankish rulers
of the time.

COBDEN, RICHARD (1804–65), British liberal politician who worked closely
with John Bright in leading the Anti-Corn Law League. A firm supporter
of free trade, he opposed both the conservative landlords and the
radical Chartist movement. He was a sharp critic of British foreign
policy, arguing against excessive military spending and colonial
domination; he especially opposed Britain’s role in the First Opium War
against China.

COCKERILL, JOHN (1790–1840), British industrialist who was born in
Belgium, built wool processing machinery and founded an ironworks and
mechanical engineering company; after his company went bankrupt in 1839,
he traveled to Congress Poland and Russia, where he established several
business ventures.

CÖLLN, FRIEDRICH VON (1777–1831), German writer and politician; served
as an official of the Prussian government during the Napoleonic Wars
primarily responsible for formulating taxation policy. After the Battle
of Jean he became a strong supporter of the Stein–Hardenberg reforms.

CONRAD, JOHANNES (1839–1915), German political economist, co-founded
Verein für Sozialpolitik with Gustav von Schmoller. Co-edited the
influential _Handwörterbuch der Staatswissenschaften_ (Concise
Dictionary of Political Sciences).

COXEY, JACOB S. SR. (1854–1951), American politician and populist; in
1894 and 1914 led tens of thousands of unemployed on a march on
Washington, DC demanding that the government initiate a job creation
program; it became the inspiration for later marches on Washington. He
began his career as a businessman and in the 1870s and 1880s became a
leading member of the Greenbacks, which demanded that the government
print additional money to stimulate the economy; in the 1890s was a
leader of the People’s Party; in 1932 ran for President of the US on the
Farmer-Labor Party.

CUNOW, HEINRICH (1862–1936), German economist, historian, sociologist,
and ethnographer; one of the leading theoreticians of the Second
International, edited the main theoretical journal of German Social
Democracy, _Die Neue Zeit_, from 1917–23; a teacher at the SPD party
school from 1906, he wrote a number of influential works on the kinship
structure of Australian aborigines, the Inca Empire, ancient technology,
and the origin of marriage and the family; initially an opponent of
Revisionism, in 1914 he supported Germany’s entry in World War I and
moved to the Right; in his last years argued that socialism could be
peacefully introduced through state intervention in the economy.

DADE, HEINRICH (1866–1923), German agricultural economist, served as
General Secretary of the War Committee of German Agriculture during
World War I; wrote a major work on the agricultural policy of the German
Empire. He defended German imperialism and colonial expansion.

DANTE, ALIGHIERI (1265–1321), Italian poet and one of the greatest
figures in world literature; author of the _Divine Comedy_, the first
major literary work to appear in the Italian vernacular. He also wrote
works on political philosophy. He was one of Marx’s favorite writers.

DARESTE, RODOLPHE-MADELINE CLÉOPHAS DE LA CHAVANNE (1824–1911), jurist
and writer on legal history, wrote important study on property relations
in Algeria that was referred to by Kovalevsky and Marx.

DARIUS III (380–330 BC), the last king of the Archaemenid Empire of
Persia. Defeated by Alexander the Great at the Battle of Issus and the
Battle of Guagamela, he died from wounds inflicted by two of his
generals (Bessus and Nabarzanes) as he was fleeing from Alexander’s
forces.

DAVANZATI, BERNARDO (1529–1606), Italian economist and historian who
wrote several books on the history of coinage and the use of money in
commercial transactions; his work helped pave the way for the modern
banking system; he also translated Tacitus’ _Annals_ into Italian.

DEMOSTHENES OF PEAENIA (birth date unknown; died 377 BC), a wealthy
sword maker and owner of many slaves who fought for Athens during the
Peloponnesian War against Sparta; he was the father of the famous orator
of the same name.

DESTUTT DE TRACY, ANTOINE COMTE DE (1754–1836), French philosopher and
economist; an ally of the Marquis de La Fayette during the French
Revolution and imprisoned by the Jacobins; member of the sensualist
school of philosophy of Condillac and Locke, he is credited with first
using the term “ideology.” He was a strong supporter of laissez-faire
economics and defended the interests of property owners against workers.
Thomas Jefferson wrote the Preface to the US edition of his _Principles
of Political Economy_.

DIETZGEN, JOSEPH (1828–88), German socialist writer and philosopher; met
Marx during the 1848 Revolutions and lived for many years in the US; his
_The Nature of Human Brain Work_ argued that mental concepts are mere
reflections of material and social relations.

DRUCKI-LUBECKI, FRANCISZEK KSAWERY (1778–1846), Polish politician,
served as Minister of the Treasury in Congress Poland from 1821 to 1830.
A supporter of Tsar Alexander I of Russia, he was part of the political
faction of “Conciliators,” which argued that Poland’s short-term
economic development could best be assured through union with Russia.

DUBOIS, JEAN-ANTOINE (1765–1848), French Catholic missionary in India,
lived for many years in Mangalore and Mysore; he rejected Western
society and dressed and lived like an Indian, and expressed strong
appreciation for Hindu culture and religion; his major work is _Hindu
Manners, Customs, and Ceremonies_.

DÜHRING, EUGEN KARL (1833–1921), German socialist theorist, proponent of
crude positivistic materialism and a critic of Marx and Marxism. Highly
influential among many leading socialists of the time (included Eduard
Bernstein and August Bebel initially), he was critiqued by Engels in
_Herr Dühring’s Revolution in Science_, a chapter of which was written
by Marx. Argued for a harmony of the interests between capital and
labor; became an advocate of German nationalism and anti-Semitism. He
was also sharply criticised by Friedrich Nietzsche.

EDWARD III (1312–77), King of England from 1327 until his death, he
initiated the Hundred Years’ War with France, initially enjoying
considerable success; many of his conquests in France were lost towards
the end of his life.

EHRENREICH, PAUL M.A. (1855–1914), German ethnologist and anthropologist
who visited and researched the indigenous peoples of central and eastern
Brazil, including the Botocudo (also known as Aimorés, Aimborés or
Krenak people). In 1887–88 he accompanied Karl von den Steinem on the
second Xingu expedition. He later made several ethnographic studies on
Indian and East Asian societies.

EICHHORN, KARL FRIEDRICH (1781–1854), German jurist, politician, and
historian; wrote extensively on German constitutional law. A follower of
Friedrich Carl von Savigny.

ELIZABETH I OF ENGLAND (1533–1603), Queen of England from 1558 to 1603;
under her reign, England emerged as a major commercial and imperial
power.

ENGEL, ERNST (1821–96), German economist and statistician; formulated
Engel’s law, which stipulates that as income rises the proportion of
total income spent on food declines.

ERNST, PAUL (1866–1933), German journalist and playwright; a supporter
of the German Social-Democratic Party in the 1890s and contributed to
_Die Neue Zeit_; corresponded with Engels on issues of women’s
emancipation; became a leader of “The Young,” an anarchist current that
was expelled from the SPD.

ERASMUS OF ROTTERDAM (1466–1536), Dutch Renaissance Humanist, most
famous as author of _The Praise of Folly_, a satirical attack on the
popular customs, morals and traditions of European society. Although
friendly to Marin Luther, he remained within the Catholic Church and
defended (contrary to most of the Protestants) the doctrine of free
will.

FAUCHER, JULIUS (1820–78), German economist and politician, defender of
an unrestricted free market; emigrated to England in 1850, returned to
Germany in 1861, where he became a member of the House of Prussia for
the National Liberal Party.

FAWCETT, HENRY (1833–84), British economist and politician; author of
_Manual of Political Economy_ (1863) and _The Economic Position of the
British Laborer_ (1865). A follower of Jeremy Bentham and John Stuart
Mill, he was associated with the English Radicals; elected to Parliament
as a member of the Liberal Party, he supported workers’ rights and
women’s suffrage.

FERRAND, WILLIAM (1809–1889), English landowner, conservative
politician, and member of the British House of Commons from the 1830s to
the 1860s; a protectionist and opponent of extending assistance to the
poor through social legislation; he defended an idealized feudalism,
defending absolute monarchy and a powerful church.

FOURIER, FRANÇOIS-MARIE-CHARLES (1772–1837), French utopian socialist
and radical defender of democracy, women’s emancipation, and gay rights;
his writings were a major influence on the young Marx, who held his work
in high regard throughout his life. Marx refers to Fourier’s work
numerous times in the _Grundrisse_ and _Capital_.

FRAZER, JAMES GEORGE (1854–1942), British anthropologist, author of the
12-volume _The Golden Bough_, a study of myths and rituals from around
the world. He is considered the founder of religious anthropology.

FREDERICK, CHARLES, GRAND DUKE OF BADEN (1728–1822), ruler of
Baden-Durlach in southwest Germany from 1746 until his death. He was a
relatively enlightened social reformer who outlawed serfdom and torture.

FRIEDRICH I, BARBAROSSA (1122–1190), German Holy Roman Emperor from 1155
until his death. One of the most powerful rulers of the European Middle
Ages, he restored imperial authority, imposed imperial rule over much of
Italy, and helped lead the Third Crusade. He also presided over a
revival of Roman law.

FRIEDRICH II (1194–1250), Holy Roman Emperor from 1220 until his death.
Presided over the Roman Empire at the peak of its power and influence;
an avid patron of the arts and sciences and supporter of rationalism; an
opponent of the Papacy, he encouraged cooperation and dialogue between
Christians and Muslims.

FUMÉE, MARTIN (1540–1601), French writer and aristocrat, Lord of
Marly-la-Ville, translated work of Lopez de Gomara on the Spanish
conquest of the Americas into French; he also wrote under the pen name
of Marly de Châtel.

GAMBETTA, LÉON (1838–82), French bourgeois politician, an
anti-monarchist, he nevertheless supported the suppresion of the Paris
Commune; during the Commune he fled Paris in a hot-air balloon; elected
to the Chamber of Deputies in 1879. He generally supported the interests
of the lower middle class and petty-bourgeoisie.

GAMITO, ANTÓNIO CANDIDO PEDROSO (1806–66), Portuguese explorer, sought
to cross equatorial Africa from coast to coast in 1831, but was stopped
at Lake Mwereu, on the border between present-day Zambia and the
Democratic Republic of the Congo, by resistance from the Kazembe people;
the journal of his expeditions recorded important information about the
ethnography of Central Africa.

GAUP, ERNEST THEODOR (1796–1859), German jurist who specialized in the
history of German law; author of the two-volume _German City Rights in
the Middle Ages_.

GELFAND, ISRAEL LAZAREVICH (1867–1924), pen name Alexander Parvus,
Russian Social Democrat and Marxist theorist; in the 1890s, became
active in the German Social Democratic movement; 1895–96, editor of the
_Leipziger Volkszeitung_; 1898–99, chief editor of the _Sächische
Arbeiter-Zeitung_ in Dresden; worked closely with Leon Trotsky in
1904–05 in developing the theory of “permanent revolution”; during the
Russian Revolution of 1905, member of the St. Petersburg Workers’
Council; supported Germany’s intervention in World War I; after
Bolshevik Revolution of 1917, offered to assist the Bolsheviks, but
Lenin turned him down; became a trader and businessman.

GENOVESI, ANTONIO (1712–69), Italian philosopher and political
economist, strongly influenced by John Locke’s empiricism; wrote one of
the first works in Italian on political economy, _Lezioni di Commercio_;
although he was close to the mercantilists, he argued that labor is an
important source of value.

GILLEN, FRANCIS JAMES (1855–1912), Australian anthropologist and
ethnologist, explored central Australia and lived among the aborigines;
wrote several books on aboriginal society and culture.

GIRARD, PHILIPPE HENRI DE (1775–1845), French engineer and inventor who
helped found the textile industry in Poland, in the 1820s, in the city
of Zyrardow, which is named after him. He also invented the use of tin
cans to store and preserve food.

GLADSTONE, WILLIAM (1809–1898), major British politician; Chancellor of
the Exchequer, 1853, leader of the Liberal Party and Prime Minister of
Great Britain in 1868–74, 1880–85, 1886, and 1892–94.

GNEISENAU, AUGUST NEIDHARDT VON (1760–1831), Prussian general who served
as Field Marshal during the Napoleonic Wars. Along with Gerhard von
Scharnhorst, he argued for major reforms in the Prussian military in the
face of several major defeats; captured Napoleon during the Battle of
Waterloo in 1814.

GOETHE, JOHANN WOLFGANG VON (1749–1832), German poet, prose writer,
dramatist, and naturalist; foremost representative of German classical
literature, and one of Rosa Luxemburg’s favorite writers; author of
_Faust_.

GÓMARA, FRANCISCO LÓPEZ DE (1511–66), Spanish historian who wrote an
account of Cortés conquest of Mexico. Although he knew Cortés personally
and the book has some important anecdotes, modern historians question
many aspects of its claims to accuracy.

GRACCHUS, GAIUS (154 BC–121 BC), younger brother of Tiberius Gracchus,
promoted land reform by restricting the size of landed estates in favor
of poorer peasants; appealed to the support of plebeians against
patrician landed interests; served as Tribune from 121 to 122 BC;
alienated many plebeian supporters when he advocated extending
citizenship to non-Roman Italians.

GRACCHUS, TIBERIUS (163 BC–133 BC), Roman politician, formulated with
his brother Gaius the Gracchi reforms, which sought to ameliorate the
conditions of the peasants by providing them with lands owned by
patricians; elected as Tribune in 133 BC, he promoted a policy of land
reform by limiting the amount of land that could be owned by any
individual; facing intense opposition by the patricians, he was murdered
by them in 133 BC.

GRAY, JOHN (1799–1883), economist and neo-Ricardian socialist; a
supporter of the labor theory of value, he argued that the unequal
distribution between the proceeds of labor and workers’ wages should be
redressed by eliminating the competitive free market and replacing it
with cooperative communities run by the workers.

GREGORY VII (1015–85), served as Pope from 1073 until his death. Greatly
expanded the power of the papacy through a series of reforms, which
included creating a new canon law, imposing his will during the
investiture controversy against Henry IV of the Holy Roman Empire, and
adopting the election of future popes by a College of Cardinals.

GROSSE, ERNST (1862–1927), German sociologist and Sinologist who
proposed studying “primitive” peoples based on their artistic and
cultural formations.

GUIZOT, FRANÇOIS PIERRE GUILLAUME (1787–1874), French historian and
conservative politician, strong supporter of King Louis Philippe from
1830 to 1848 and virulent opponent of social revolution; after being
removed from power by the 1848 Revolution, he devoted himself to writing
a series of historical works that were severely criticized by Marx and
Engels.

HALLER, KARL LUDWIG VON (1768–1854), Swiss jurist and politician,
opposed democracy as well as the model of the centralized state that
came out of the French Revolution; a fierce reactionary, he opposed all
the major revolutionary movements of his time. Hegel strongly criticized
his _Restauration der Staatswissenschaften_ (Restoration of the Science
of the State) in his _Philosophy of Right_.

HANDELMANN, HEINRICH GOTTFRIED (1827–1891), German historian and
philologist, wrote histories of Brazil, Haiti, the United States,
Denmark, and the Hanseatic League.

HARDENBERG, KARL AUGUST VON (1750–1822), Prussian statesmen who promoted
a series of important liberal forms, such as the abolition of serfdom
and guild monopoly, in the aftermath of Prussia’s defeat by Napoleon in
the Battle of Jena; later in life he became a political reactionary.
Served as Prussian Foreign Minister from 1805–06 and chief
representative of Prussia at the Congress of Vienna in 1814–15.

HÄRING, HEINRICH, GEORG WILHELM (1798–1871), German historical novelist
who wrote under the pseudonym of Willibald Alexis; best known for his
novel _Der Roland von Berlin_.

HAXTHAUSEN, AUGUST FRANTZ LUDWIG MARIA VON (1792–1866), German economist
and scientist, defended the interests of large landed-property owners
and worked for the King of Prussia in promoting legislation related to
land tenure; as part of his studies of the peasantry, traveled to Russia
in the 1840s; authored a three-volume study on Russian agrarian
formations, which first brought to Western European attention the
importance of the Russian village commune; his work proved influential
among Russian radicals and conservatives seeking to renovate society on
the basis of its traditional social formations.

HENRY VII (1275–1313), ruler of the Holy Roman Empire from 1312 until
his death. He aimed to restore the power of the Empire by gaining
control of Italy, but failed to achieve his aims; Dante was one of his
most fervent supporters.

HENRY II OF SAABRÜCKEN (died 1234), Bishop of Worms from 1217 to 1234.

HERMANN, FRIEDRICH BENEDICT WILHELM (1795–1868), German economist and
statistician; one of Germany’s earliest political economists, he drew
heavily from the work of Smith and Ricardo while giving greater emphasis
than they did to such factors as the role of the public sphere and the
consumption levels of the laborer.

HEINE, HEINRICH (1797–1856), one of Germany’s greatest poets, essayists
and political journalists; close friend and associate of the young Marx.

HELMHOLTZ, HERMANN VON (1821–94), German physician and scientist who
wrote important studies on optics, visual perception, and the physiology
of the nervous system; he was the first to discover the speed by which a
signal is carried along a nerve fibre.

HERKNER, HEINRICH (1863–1932), German economist who wrote a series of
studies on industrial and financial crises and their impact on economic
development; close to Marxism in his early years, he befriended
Friedrich Engels and served as a mentor to the Russian Marxist Alexandra
Kollontai; became a conservative by 1907, helping to form the German
Society for Sociology, along with Max Weber.

HERSCHEL, WILLIAM (1738–1822), German astronomer, discoverer of the
planet Uranus.

HILDEBRAND, BRUNO (1812–78), German economist, statistician, and
politician; member of the historical school of economics, sought to
analyze economic development on the basis of contingent empirical
circumstances and conditions; he was critical of Ricardo and classical
political economy for its emphasis on universal economic laws. Like many
members of the historical school, he was a conservative socialist of the
“socialism of the chair” variety.

HOWITT, ALFRED WILLIAM (1830–1908), English and Australian explorer,
natural scientist and anthropologist; moved to Australia in 1852 and for
many years served as a magistrate of the Omeo goldfields; in the 1860s
began to study the Australian aborigines and published several studies
about them, especially about the Kurnai peoples; considered a founding
figure of Australian anthropology.

HUGHES, JOHN (1814/15–89), Welsh engineer and businessmen; originally
made his fortune producing iron and armaments, including of the first
ironclad ships for the British navy. In 1868, he moved to Russia to help
build the naval fortress at Kronstadt; in the 1870s founded a series of
metalworks factories and the self-contained city in Ukraine, now known
as Donetsk, that became one of the largest industrial centers in Russia;
the city was originally named Hughesovka or Yuzovka in his honor.

HULLMANN, KARL DIETRICH (1765–1846), German historian. His books include
studies of the Byzantine Empire, ancient constitutional law, and the
commercial history of ancient Greece. His most famous work is a study of
the development of cities in the European Middle Ages.

HUMBOLDT, FRIEDRICH HEINRICH ALEXANDER FREIHERR VON (1769–1859), German
naturalist and explorer; between 1799 and 1804 traveled extensively in
Latin America; the account of his journey and discoveries was a major
impetus to the development of the disciplines of geography and global
studies; his work focused more on natural conditions and formations than
cultural or social issues, but he was a firm opponent of slavery.

HUTTEN, ULRICH VON (1488–1523), German humanist and satirist, colleague
of Martin Luther, Zwingli, and Erasmus; author of _Letters of Obscure
Men_, which attacked scholasticism and monkish life. As a result of his
support for Franz von Sickingen’s war against the German princes he was
forced into exile in Switzerland.

INGRAM, JOHN KELLS (1823–1907), Irish economist and sociologist; an
opponent of classical political economy in favor of a positivist
approach to economics and the social sciences; a follower of August
Comte, he was strongly influenced by the German historical school. Best
known for his widely read _History of Political Economy_ (1888), he may
have been the first to use the term _homo oeconomicus_ (economic man).

IANZHUL, IVAN IVANOVICH (1846–1914), Russian economist and statistician,
taught law at Moscow University from 1876. From 1882 to 1887 he was a
factory inspector for the Moscow area. A follower of the historical
school in political economy, he supported state intervention in the
economy and protectionist trade measures.

IVAN THE TERRIBLE (1530–84), ruled Russia as Ivan IV from 1533 until his
death. Vastly expanded the territory of Russia by conquering the
Khanates of Kazan, Astrakhan and Siberia and became crowned as the first
Tsar of Russia. Under his rule Russia emerged as a powerful and
centralized multiethnic state. His cruel and relentless repression of
the Russian nobility as well as all potential political opponents earned
him his sobriquet.

JARCKE, KARL ERNST (1801–52), German jurist and writer who forcefully
opposed the revolutionary movements of his time in the name of political
conservatism. He was close to the reactionary romanticism of figures
such as Karl Ludwig von Haller and Adam Müller. A supporter of
Metternich’s reactionary policies, he accepted his offer to serve in the
Austrian government during the 1830s. He idealized the medieval period
as being far superior to modern society.

KANKRIN, YEGOR FRANTSEVICH KANKRIN (1774–1845), Russia’s finance
minister from 1823 to 1844. He stood for protectionism in tariff policy,
in part to cover the chronic budget deficit experienced by Russia but
also because he wished to counteract the development of capitalist
industry in the country.

KAUFMAN, KONSTANTIN PETROVICH VON (1818–82), Russian governor-general of
Turkestan from 1867 to 1882, author of _Turkestanskii Albom_, an
ethnographic study of the people’s of Central Asia.

KAUTSKY, KARL (1854–1938), German Marxist theoretician and the leading
figure from the 1890s to World War I of German Social Democracy and the
Second International. In 1882 co-founded the journal _Die Neue Zeit_ and
was its chief editor until 1917. An ally of Rosa Luxemburg in the
revisionist debate of 1898, she broke with him in 1910 as he moved
closer to reformism with his “strategy of attrition”; 1917 co-founded
the USPD; became a fierce critic of the Bolshevik Revolution after 1917;
returned to the SPD in 1920 when much of the USPD’s membership joined
the German Communist Party.

KINDLINGER, NIKOLAUS (1749–1819), German Franciscan who devoted himself
to studies of early German history. A follower of Justus Möser, his main
work is _Geschichte der deutschen Hörigkeit_ (History of German
Bondage).

KNIES, KARL (1821–98), German economist associated with the older
version of the historical school of economics; attacked classical
political economy for its claim that society operates according to
universal, abstract economic laws.

KOVALEVSKY, MAKSIM MAKSIMOVICH (1851–1916), Russian historian,
sociologist and anthropologist, author of _Communal Ownership of
Land—the Causes, Process and Consequences of its Dissolution_, a study
of pre-capitalist communal formations in India, the Middle East, North
Africa, and Latin America. Marx made detailed notes on this work shortly
after its appearance, in 1879. Marx held numerous in-person discussions
with Kovalevsky, beginning in the summer of 1875; subsequently,
Kovalevsky became a regular visitor to Marx’s household. Luxemburg
closely studied and commented on Kovalevsky’s work, especially in her
_Introduction to Political Economy_ and _The Accumulation of Capital_.

LAFITAU, JOSEPH FRANÇOIS (1681–1746), French philosopher and Jesuit
missionary, lived among the Iroquois from 1712–17 and carefully recorded
their customs and traditions in _Mœures des Sauvages américains
comparées aux mœurs des premiers temps_ (Habits of the American Indians
Compared with the Morals of the Earliest Times). He is considered an
important precursor to the field of ethnology.

LANGOVOI, NIKOLAI PETROVICH (1860–1920), Russian scientist who
specialized in the study of textile production. Much of his work focused
on a theory to explain winding on spinning machines and other types of
weaving.

LAS CASAS, BARTOLOMÉ DE (1474–1566), Spanish historian and social
reformer who condemned the genocidal practices of the Spaniards against
the indigenous peoples of the Americas; a Dominican friar, he was among
the first European settlers in the New World; served as first resident
Bishop of Chiapas and “Protector of the Indians”; author of _Short
Account of the Destruction of the Indies_ and _History of the Indies_.
After returning to Spain in the 1540s, argued in a series of debates
that Indians were fully human and worthy of decent treatment; he
suggested Indian slaves should be replaced with slaves from Africa, but
changed his views on this by the end of his life.

LASSALLE, FERDINAND (1825–64), writer and political organiser, major
figure in formation of German socialist movement. Participant in 1848–49
revolution; 1849–62, maintained connections with Marx, who ultimately
broke from him for being “a future workers’ dictator”; in 1863,
co-founded the Allgemeine Deutscher Arbeiterverein (General Union of
German Workers), which for many years was the largest socialist
organization in Germany. Lassalle’s followers merged with the
“Eisenachers,” the purported followers of Marx, in 1875, despite Marx’s
strong objections, voiced in his _Critique of the Gotha Program_.
Lassallean ideas and approaches continued to influence German
Social-Democracy for decades afterwards.

LAVELEYE, ÉMILE LOUIS VICTOR DE (1822–92), Flemish economist and
Christian socialist, took special interest in preserving the culture of
minority groups. Wrote an important work on property forms of
“primitive” societies.

LEHMANN, CARL (1865–1916), German physician and activist in the
socialist movement, involved in publishing and distributing radical
literature; in 1899 traveled to Russia and co-authored (with Alexander
Gelfand, aka Parvus) _Das hungernde Russland: Reiseeindrücke,
Beobachtungen und Untersuchungen_ (Starving Russia: Travel Impressions,
Observations and Analysis), in 1900.

LEO, HEINRICH (1799–1878), German historian and politician; a follower
of Gustav von Hugo, he studied under Hegel at Berlin University, though
he later repudiated his thought. A political reactionary, he was
fiercely anti-Semitic. Author of numerous historical works, including
_The Constitution of the Development of Lombard Cities_.

LETOURNEUX, ARISTIDE (1820–90), French military office who wrote a
three-volume study of the Kabyles of North Africa between 1868 and 1873.

LEXIS, WILHELM HECTOR RICHARD ALBRECHT (1837–1914), German academic
economist, wrote one of the first reviews (in 1885) of Volume 2 of
Marx’s _Capital_. He rejected the labor theory of value and the
distinction between value and price. Engels responded to Lexis’s
critique of Marx in his “Preface” to Volume 3 of _Capital_.

LIEBIG, JUSTUS VON (1803–1873), German chemist, made important
discoveries on the effect of nutrients such as nitrogen and carbon
dioxide on crops; his work proved of critical importance in the later
development of artificial fertilizers; helped elaborate the principles
that led to the modern laboratory; his use of the term “metabolism” to
explain the biochemical processes of natural systems had important
impact on Marx, who discusses his work in _Capital_.

LINNAEUS, CARL (1707–78), Swedish botanist, physician, traveler, and
zoologist, and founder of modern taxonomy, the system of scientific
classification now used in the natural sciences; one of the first
European thinkers to classify human beings as primates and rejected
arguments that humans are fundamentally distinct from animals; he was
the first to describe the human race as _homo sapiens_.

LIPPERT, JULIUS (1839–90), Czech politician and historian, author of
_Die Geschichte der Familie_ (The History of the Family).

LIST, FRIEDRICH (1789–1846), German economist, forerunner of the
historical school of economics that dominated German academic circles
for much of the nineteenth century; moved to the US in the 1820s, where
under the influence of Alexander Hamilton’s writings became a firm
advocate of protectionism; served as US counsel to several European
countries, including France and Germany; author of _The National System
of Political Economy_, which argued for promoting capitalist development
through national protection of domestic industries; an advocate of a
strong, national state, he denied pursuit of private interest
necessarily promotes public good.

LIVINGSTON, DAVID (1813–73), Scottish physician, missionary, and
explorer; moved to South Africa as a missionary in 1840; traveled
extensively in Africa from the 1850s onwards; first European to see
Victoria Falls; navigated the Zambezi River and engaged in an ultimately
unsuccessful search for the origin of the Nile River. His letters and
writings denouncing the slave trade had an important impact on pubic
opinion in Britain and elsewhere, though he often relied on slave
traders for supplies in his travels; his explorations and missionary
work had the result of opening up much of the interior of Africa to the
ravages of European colonization and domination.

LOAYSA, JUAN GARCÍA DE (1478–1546), Spanish Dominican, served as
Confessor for Emperor Charles V of Spain; as President of the American
Council of the Indies, proposed lenient treatment for the indigenous
peoples under Spanish rule; became Archbishop of Seville in 1539 and
Grand Inquisitor (of the Spanish Inquisition) in 1546.

LOSKIEL, GEORG HEIMRICH (1740–1814), missionary and author, published a
report of the work of missionaries in New York, Pennsylvania and Ohio in
the 1740s.

LOTHAIR I (795–855), Emperor of the Romans, the successor state to
Charlemagne’s kingdom, from 817 until his death; his kingdom was divided
into three parts as a result of conflict with his brothers Charles and
Louis; his territory became known as Lothringen, origin of the name of
the French province of Lorraine.

LOUIS XIV (1638–1715), King of France from 1643 until his death. The
longest-reigning king in European history, he centralized the
administration of the French state and eliminated some aspects of
feudalism in the name of consolidating an absolute monarchy. He was a
firm upholder of the notion of the divine right of kings.

LOUIS XV (1710–74), King of France from 1715 until his death. Under his
reign the French lost possession of Canada and other territories to
Britain in the Seven Years’ War; his military exploits greatly weakened
the French economy, although he attempted some reforms, such as altering
the tax code near the end of his reign.

LOUIS XVI (1754–93), King of France from 1774 to 1792, attempted to
impose some reforms in the early part of his reign, such as abolishing
serfdom, but resisted deeper calls for change and was deposed as a
result of the French Revolution of 1789. In 1793 he was tried and
executed by the National Convention for his covert support for the
foreign invasion of France.

LOUIS-PHILIPPE (1773–1850), King of France from 1830 to 1848. Proclaimed
King after the 1830 Revolution, he was forced from power by the
Revolution of 1848 and spent the rest of his life in England. He was the
last king of France.

LUCULLUS, LUCIUS LICINIUS (118– 56 BC), Roman politician and general,
helped conquer much of Asia Minor for Rome in the Third Mithridatic War;
he accumulated a vast amount of private wealth as a result of his
conquests; served as consul of Rome in 74 BC.

LUDEN, HEINRICH (1778–1847), German historian and economist who
commented on the work of Adam Smith.

MACAULAY, THOMAS BABINGTON (1800–59), British poet, politician, and
historian; lived in India from 1834, where he served on a number of
bodies of the British colonial administration. Influenced by utilitarian
philosophers such as Jeremy Bentham and James Mill, he argued that
educated Indians should learn English instead of their native languages.
“Macaulay’s Children” refers to those of Indian ancestry who accept the
cultural “superiority” of Western culture. Marx was highly critical of
him, accusing him of falsifying history.

MACKENZIE, ALEXANDER (1764–1820), Scottish explorer who sought to find
the Northwest Passage to the Pacific, becoming the first to complete a
recorded crossing of North America north of Mexico, in 1793. The
Mackenzie River in northern Canada is named after him.

MAINE, HENRY JAMES SUMNER (1822–88), English historian and jurist,
author of a number of works on ancient society; his work highlighted the
difference between the contractual nature of social relations of
modernity versus status-based social relations of antiquity. An advisor
to the British government in India, he wrote an influential work on
communal village communities in precapitalist societies that was read
and studied by Marx and Luxemburg.

MALTHUS, THOMAS ROBERT (1786–1834), English demographer and economist,
popularized the theory that population growth increases faster than the
rate of economic growth and availability of resources, thereby
precluding the possibility of the progressive improvement of society;
supported legislation that would prevent the poor and indignant from
having children and large families.

MAN, EDWARD HORACE (1846–1929), member of the British colonial
administration of India, studied the language and culture of the peoples
of the Andaman and Nicobar Islands.

MANGOLDT, HANS KARL EMIL VON (1824–1868), German economist who argued
that the profits obtained by capitalist entrepreneurs is a reward for
risk-taking. His _Grundrisse der Volkswirtschaftslehre_ (Outline of
Economics) (1863) proved influential in the later development of
neo-classical economics.

MARCEL, M. G. (1843–1909), French geographer who made a study of the
native inhabitants of Tierra del Fuego in the 1890s. He also authored
the original text of _Mutineers of the Bounty_, a story of the famous
mutiny against Captain Bligh; the story was used by Jules Verne and many
others in retelling the incident.

MARWITZ, ALEXANDER VON DER (1795–1814), Prussian nobleman and soldier,
took part in the wars against Napoleon on behalf of Prussian and Russian
forces; perhaps best known for his brief affair and correspondence with
Rahel Varnhagen, an early proponent of women’s liberation.

MAURER, GEORG LUDWIG VON (1790–1872), German historian, wrote a series
of influential works on the early social and communal institutions among
the Germanic peoples; his work was intensely studied by Marx as well as
by Luxemburg.

MCCULLOCH, JOHN RAMSEY (1789–1864), Scottish economist, leading figure
of the Ricardian school of classical political economy; sought to
“defend” the labor theory of value by arguing that nature and machinery
are also sources of value. His work was strongly criticized by Marx, who
considered his contribution a pale reflection of the accomplishments of
Smith and Ricardo

MCGEE, WILLIAM JOHN (1853–1912), American inventor and ethnologist; from
1893–1903 headed Bureau of American Ethnology; 1895, he explored Isla
del Tiburón in the Gulf of Calfornia, home to the Seri Indians;
published his study _The Seri Indians_ in 1898.

MEDICI, ARDINGO DE (birth and death dates unknown), Italian soldier;
first member of the famous Medici family of Florence to hold public
office. In 1296 he was elected Gonfaloniere, a post designed to protect
citizens from abuses of the wealthier and more powerful classes.

MEDICI, AVERARDO DE (birth date unknown; died 1346), member of the
Cafaggiolo branch of the Medici family and father of Giovanni di Medici,
who became the first truly powerful member of the Medici’s in Florence.

MEDICI, CATHERINE DE (1519–89), daughter of a leading member of the
Medici family; Queen of France from 1547 to 1559, after marrying King
Henry II. After Henry II’s death, she exerted considerable political
influence as the regent for her three sons Francis II, Charles IX, and
Henry III, each of whom served as king of France.

MEDICI, COSIMO (1389–1464), leading figure in the Medici family who
helped consolidate control over Florence in the fifteenth century;
although he never held public office, he controlled the city through a
series of political appointments and his extensive business dealings in
banking and commerce. He was a major patron of artists and the arts,
playing a critical role in making possible the Italian Renaissance.

MEDICI, FRANCESCO DE (1541–87), Grand Duke of Tuscany from 1574 until
his death. He was a patron of the arts as well as of science, taking a
special interest in chemistry and alchemy.

MEDICI, LORENZO DE (1449–92), Italian statesmen of the Medici family and
de facto ruler of Florence at the height of the Italian Renaissance;
also known as Lorenzo the Magnificent. He was a patron of many artists,
poets, and architects; his largess helped make possible the work of
Leonardo da Vinci, Botticelli, and Michelangelo.

MEDICI, SALVESTRO DE (1331–88), member of the Medici family of Florence,
held the position of Gongaloniere in 1370 and 1378, after which he ruled
as effective dictator of the city. He was forced into exile in 1382.

MELANCHTHON, PHILIP (1497–1560), German religious reformer and founding
figure of the Protestant Reformation; worked closely with Martin Luther
and helped formulate many of the leading tenets of the Lutheran Church.

MENDELEYEV, DMITRI IVANOVICH (1834–1907), outstanding Russian scientist
who first devised the periodic table of the elements and made important
discoveries (as well as inventions) associated with modern chemistry. He
helped make St. Petersburg into a major center of scientific research.
He also helped found the first oil refinery in Russia.

METTERNICH, KLEMENS WENZEL VON (1773–1859), Austrian politician,
fiercely opposed the French Revolution and helped fashion the political
restoration of the old regimes that followed the defeat of Napoleon;
formed the “Metternich system” of international alliances whose main
purpose was to prevent further revolutionary upsurges in Europe; forced
from power as a result of the 1848 Revolutions.

MEYER, CONRAD FERDINAND (1825–98), Swiss poet and novelist; author of
the epic novel _Hutten’s Last Days_, which was a favorite of
Luxemburg’s.

MEYER, EDUARD (1855–1930), German historian, wrote extensively on
economic and social relations in the ancient world; best known for his
book _Geschichte des Altertums_ (History of Antiquity).

MILL, JAMES (1773–1836), Scottish historian, economist, and political
theorist; one of the founders of classical political economy. Marx
subjected his economic writings to careful scrutiny in the 1840s. His
historical works include _The History of British India_, which has been
widely criticized for helping to originate the theory of “oriental
despotism.” Mill also wrote extensively on issues of ethics and
psychology from a utilitarian perspective.

MILL, JOHN STUART (1806–73), British philosopher, economist, and
political theorist, best known for formulating the modern theory of
utilitarianism. A social reformer who served as a member of the British
Parliament allied with the British Radicals, he opposed slavery,
restrictions on workers’ rights, and championed women’s emancipation.

MOMMSEN, THEODOR (1871–1903), German historian and politician, author of
influential multi-volume study of ancient Rome; served as professor of
Roman history at the University of Berlin from 1861 to 1887; he won the
Nobel Prize for Literature in 1902 for his _Roman History_; also wrote a
systematic treatment of Roman law. Although he was a Liberal, he opposed
Bismarck in favoring cooperation with the Social Democrats. Despite his
support for German nationalism, he sharply opposed anti-Semitism. MORE,
THOMAS (1478–1535), English philosopher and statesman and important
figure in Renaissance humanism; coined the term “utopia.” A religious
conservative, he defended the traditions of the Catholic Church against
the claims of Luther and other Protestants. Opposed to King Henry VIII’s
break from the Papacy, he was tried and executed on trumped-up charges
of treason.

MORGAN, LEWIS HENRY (1818–81), American anthropologist; author of
_Ancient Society_, consisting largely of a study of the Iroquois Indians
of North America, which argued that the earliest form of human
association was the matrilineal clan. Marx made a critical study of
Morgan’s work in his _Ethnological Notebooks_, accepting some but not
all of his findings. Engels utilized his work less critically in his
better-known _Origin of the Family, Private Property, and the State_.
Morgan also served for several years as a member of the New York State
Assembly as a Republican.

MÖSER, JUSTUS (1720–1794), German jurist, statesman and social theorist,
argued in contradistinction to social contract theories that the state
is a natural and organic part of historical development; he was a
conservative thinker who idealized the pre-capitalist social order.

MUKANDA (birth and death dates unknown), also known as Chief Mkanda of
the Chewa, an indigenous African people living southwest of Lake Nyasa
in modern-day Malawi. Portuguese travelers to this area in the early
1800s referred to him as the most powerful ruler in the area.

MÜLLER, ADAM HEINRICH (1779–1829), German political economist and
writer, a representative of the school of economic romanticism; a
political conservative, he opposed the liberal reform movement in
Prussia that followed its defeat by French forces in the Battle of Jena.
His literary work extolled the virtues of medieval feudalism. A
political ally of Metternich, he worked as a political advisor to the
Austrian monarchy.

MUN, THOMAS (1571–1641), English economist, associated with the
mercantilist school; served as director of the East India Company for
several years and defended its practices in his book _A Discourse of
Trade from England unto the East Indies_.

MWATA KAZEMBE III LUKWESA ILUNGA (1760–1805), ruler of the Luba-Lunda
Kingdom in the southeast of modern-day Congo who fiercely resisted
efforts by the Portuguese in the late-1700s to secure domination of the
area.

NAPOLEON I (1769–1821), Emperor of France from 1804 to 1815; ruled as
Napoleon I. Rising through the ranks of the military during the French
Revolution, he seized control of France and initiated a series of wars
against reactionary European powers known as the Napoleonic Wars.
Initiated a series of legal reforms that laid the foundation of
modern-day France, the Napoleonic Code. Died in exile in St. Helena.

NASSE, ERWIN VON (1829–1890), German economist and politician, wrote on
banking and tax systems as well as agrarian history, especially in
England.

NEBUCHADNEZZAR (634–562 BC), King of Neo-Babylonian Empire from 605–562
BC. According to the Old Testament, he conquered Jerusalem in 586 BC,
destroyed the First Temple and sent the Jews into the “Babylonian
Captivity.”

NETTELBECK, JOACHIM CHRISTIAN (1738–1824), Prussian seaman and slave
trader, best known for his autobiography, _Des Seefahrers und aufrechten
Bürgers Joachim Nettelbeck wundersame Lebensgeschichte von ihm selbst
erzählt_, (The Seafarer and Citizen Joachim Nettlebeck’s Miraculous Life
Story, Told by Himself). The work served as the basis for a propaganda
film used by the Nazis during World War II.

NICHOLAS I (1796–1855), Emperor of Russia from 1825 until his death.
Among Russia’s most reactionary rulers, he ruled through brutal
autocratic power. Fostered Russian nationalism and brutally repressed
the rights of Russia’s many national minorities. His crushing of the
Hungarian Revolution of 1848 earned him the enmity of democrats and
free-thinkers throughout Europe.

NICHOLAS II (1868–1918), Emperor of Russia from 1894 to 1917; forced to
abdicate by the February Revolution. Presided over Russia during its
defeat of Japan in the Russo-Japanese War of 1904–05 and the Russian
Revolution that followed; led Russia into World War II, in which four
million of his countrymen perished. His regime was marked by severe
repression and anti-Semitic pogroms as well as political corruption. He
was executed by the Bolsheviks during the Civil War.

OWEN, ROBERT (1771–1858), Welsh social reformer, leading figure in
utopian socialism; manager of a textile mill, he became a sharp critic
of the inhumanity of capitalist industrialization and a leading figure
in the cooperative movement. Although initially a follower of English
liberals like Jeremy Bentham, he embraced socialism and became a firm
critic of the free market; argued for the creation of freely-associated
townships based on common ownership, which he applied in creating New
Harmony, Indiana; also established an equitable labor exchange, in which
distribution of the products of labor was effected by use of labor notes
instead of money.

PALMERSTON, HENRY JOHN TEMPLE (1784–1865), British politician; served as
Prime Minister from 1855 to 1858 and 1859 to 1865. A conservative Tory
who later switched to the Liberal Party, he presided over the Crimean
War with Russia, the Second Opium War against China, and the Sepoy
Rebellion against British rule in India. He strongly sympathized with
the Confederacy during the US Civil War.

PAPPEMHEIM, GOTTFRIED HEINRICH GRAF ZU (1594–1632), field marshal of the
Holy Roman Empire during the Thirty Years’ War; Friedrich Schiller
extolled his military exploits in his famous trilogy _Wallenstein_.

PASHA, ISMAIL (1830–95), Viceroy of Egypt from 1863, he helped introduce
large-scale cotton cultivation to Egypt in response to the US Civil War;
in 1866 became Khedive, making Egypt largely independent of Ottoman
rule. He initiated a series of social and political reforms aimed at
modernizing Egypt but was widely criticized for granting major economic
concessions to a number of European powers.

PASSARGE, SIEGFRIED (1867–1958), German geographer, Professor at the
University of Berlin, wrote on Africa and South America.

PAUL III (1468–1549), Pope from 1534 until his death. Leading the
Catholic Church during the Protestant Reformation, he was a strong
promoter of the counter-reformation, supporting the formation of the
Society of the Jesuits. He also authored a series of bulls that
officially declared for the first time that Native Americans were human
beings who were not to be dispossessed of their holdings.

PARVUS, ALEXANDER, see GELFAND, ISRAEL LAZAREVICH

PELLEGRINI, CARLOS (1846–1906), President of Argentina from 1890 to
1892. After becoming President following the severe depression of 1890,
he insisted on repaying Argentina’s debts to its foreign creditors in
Europe. He supported a centralized state and opposed the efforts by many
of the _caudillos_ to affirm regional or local autonomy at the expense
of the central government.

PERICLES (495–429 BC), Greek statesman and politician, led Athens during
the height of its fame and fortune, from 461 to 429 BC. Known as one of
the greatest orators of ancient Greece, he is best known for his Funeral
Oration, which extolled the virtues of Greek democracy. He also was
responsible for sponsoring some of Athens’ most important architectural
projects, such as the Parthenon. He died of the plague during the
Peloponnesian War with Sparta.

PERTHES, JOHANN GEORG JUSTUS (1749–1816), German publisher, founded
publishing firm that bears his name; began publishing its widely used
world atlas in 1785, which has since gone through many additions and
change.

PETER THE GREAT (1672–1725), Tsar of Russia from 1682 until his death.
Significantly expanded Russia’s territory, both to the East, South, and
West, and played an instrumental role in the modernization of Russian
society.

PETRARCH (1304–74), Italian poet and writer, widely considered the
father of modern humanism. His sonnets and lyric poetry exerted great
influence on such figures as Dante, Boccaccio, and Chaucer. His effort
to reinvigorate Christian culture and religion through a return to
ancient Greek and Roman sources is widely credited with paving the way
for the European Renaissance.

PHILIP II (1527–98), King of Spain from 1554 until his death, during the
height of its power and influence. His extensive military entanglements
in Europe helped squander much of the enormous wealth that flowed into
Spain through its exploitation of the Americas, leading to a series of
economic crises. Under his reign the Dutch initiated their struggle from
Spanish rule. The Philippines is named after him.

PHILIP IV (1605–1665), King of Spain from 1612 until his death. During
his reign the Spanish Empire reached its greatest territorial extent;
its possessions included Portugal and much of Italy in addition to the
bulk of the Americas. The political rigidity and economic difficulties
that beset his reign helped lead to the decline of Spanish power.

PHILIP II AUGUSTUS (1165–1223), King of France from 1180 until his
death. One of France’s most important monarchs, he checked the power of
the nobles and extended royal power by conquering most of the English
possessions in France. His reign was marked by considerable economic
growth and prosperity. A participant in the Third Crusade, he expelled
the Jews from France and waged war against dissident Catholics such as
the Cathars of southern France.

PIZARRO, FRANCISCO (1475–1541), Spanish conquistador who conquered and
destroyed the Inca Empire. His destruction of the indigenous culture and
population has earned him the enmity of Andean peoples for generations.

PLEKHANOV, GEORGI (1856–1918), Russian revolutionary and Marxist
theoretician; originally a Populist, he became an avowed Marxist in the
early 1880s and established, in 1883, the Emancipation of Labor Group;
author of many books on politics, economics, and philosophy, he coined
the term “dialectical materialism”; leader of the Menshevik faction of
the RSDLP from 1903; one of the only party leaders not to return to
Russia during the 1905 Revolution, he sharply opposed the Bolsheviks on
the basis of an economic determinist and unilinear evolutionist
understanding of historical development; a strong supporter of World War
I, he sharply opposed the Bolshevik seizure of power as well as
left-wing Mensheviks such as Martov; left Russia following the October
Revolution.

PLOETZ, KARL JULIUS (1819–81), German historian, produced a number of
influential handbooks and studies of ancient and modern history; author
of _Auszug aus der alten, mittleren und neueren Geschichte_, published
in English as _A Handbook of Universal History_.

POZDNEYEV, ALEXEI M. (1851–1920), Russian linguist and geographer, wrote
a series of books on the Mongol peoples; helped found the Oriental
Institute of Vladivostok University.

PROUDHON, PIERRE JOSEPH (1809–1865), French political theorist and
economist, the first person to term himself as anarchist. His early
work, such as _What is Property?_, influenced a wide number of radical
nineteenth century thinkers, including Marx; his effort to utilize
neo-Ricardian principles to organize exchange on the basis of commodity
production led Marx to sharply criticize his ideas in the _Poverty of
Philosophy_. Advocated workers’ cooperatives and private property as
well as the formation of a national bank to help redistribute wealth
from capital to labor; his ideas had enormous impact on the workers’
movements in nineteenth century France.

PUTZGER, FRIEDRICH WILHELM (1849–1913), German cartographer, author of a
widely used Historical Atlas that is often used in schools today.

QUESNAY, FRANÇOIS (1694–1774), French economist and leading figure of
the Physiocratic school; best known for his _Tableau économique_, the
first effort to work out a systematic model of social reproduction; he
coined the term _laissez-faire_.

RATZEL, FRIEDRICH (1844–1904), German anthropologist and ethnologist,
argued that the physical environment was the deciding factor in human
culture; most of his work centered on Africa and Asia.

RAU, KARL HEINRICH (1792–1870), German political economist who was
strongly influenced by the thought of Adam Smith, although he gave
prominence to the role of the state in economic development; his work
was highly influential among the German historical school of economics.

REMBRANDT, HARMENSZOON VAN RIJN (1606–69), Dutch painter; composed his
works at the highpoint of Dutch cultural history; renowned as one of the
greatest portrait painters.

REUBENS, PETER PAUL (1577–1640), Flemish painter who worked in the
Baroque style; his works emphasize color and movement, with lavish
detail.

REUCHLIN, JOHANN (1455–1522), German humanist and scholar; pioneered the
recovery and study and Greek and Hebrew texts that were of central
importance in the European Renaissance.

RICARDO, DAVID (1772–1823), English political economist; a central
figure in classical political economy, he extended its discoveries with
his writings on the labor theory of value, the theory of comparative
advantage, and the theory of rent. His ideas proved highly influential
among free market economists as well as radical critics of capitalism
who sought to address the unequal distribution of the proceeds of labor
in capitalism.

RINALDO, GEOVANNI (1720–95), Italian economist and politician; wrote
several influential works on the nature of money and the balance of
trade; served as head of the Council of Political Economy in Tuscany
during the 1760s.

RODBERTUS, KARL JOHANN (1805–75), German economist who advocated a
conservative version of socialism based on state ownership of the
economy; on the basis of the labor theory of value, he argued that
workers’ share in social wealth becomes progressively reduced with the
development of capitalism, leading to the over-production of
commodities; favored state intervention in the economy to impose an
equilibrium of production and consumption.

ROSCHER, WILHELM GEORG FRIEDRICH (1817–94), German economist and main
founder of the historical school of economics in Germany, which
emphasized the rise and fall of economic systems based upon cultural,
political, and racial factors; he opposed both socialism and
laissez-faire capitalism. Marx refers to his work numerous times in
_Capital_, describing it (in Volume 1) as “eclectic professorial
twaddle.” In _Theories of Surplus Value_, Marx referred to Roscher’s
work as “the graveyard of the science of political economy.”

RUDOLPH I (1218–91), also known as RUDOLPH OF HABSBURG. Ruler of the
Holy Roman Empire from 1273 until his death; played a pivotal role in
raising the Habsburg dynasty to one of the most important and powerful
ruling groups in Europe.

RUMFORD, see THOMPSON, BENJAMIN, COUNT OF RUMFORD.

SAINT-SIMON, CLAUDE HENRI DE ROUROY, COMTE DE (1760–1825), French
political theorist and philosopher; advocated a form of statist
socialism based on utilizing the power of modern industry; his advocacy
of science as the key to progress helped pave the way for positivism. He
was not a revolutionary, appealing instead to the agents of existing
society to implement such ideals as full employment, social equality,
and meritocracy.

SAVIGNY, FRIEDRICH CARL VON (1779–1861), German jurist, historian, and
leading figure of the historical school of law; wrote extensively on
Roman law and property relations.

SAVONAROLA, GIROLAMO (1452–1498), Italian friar who opposed the Medici
family and helped impose a puritanical regime upon Florence for several
years that restricted freedom of artistic, cultural, and religious
expression; he especially condemned same-sex relations commonplace in
Florence at the time. After falling out with the Pope, he was condemned
and executed.

SAY, JEAN-BAPTISTE (1767–1832), French political economist, defended
classical liberal views of free competition, free trade, and lifting
governmental restraints on the activities of businesses; formulated
Say’s Law, which claims that aggregate supply creates its own aggregate
demand. His work was highly influential among such figures as James Mill
and John Stuart Mill, as well as later neo-liberal economists.

SCARUFFI, GASPERO (1519–84), Italian economist best known for his
writings on money and gold coinage.

SCHÄFFLE, ALBERT (1831–1903), German sociologist and political
economist, supporter of capitalism but argued (especially in the last
decades of his life) for collective ownership of property and planned
organization of production; also wrote on ways to replace the existing
monetary system through the use of labor-based time chits or vouchers;
Marx read and criticized his work, in 1881.

SCHARNHORST, GERHARD JOHANN DAVID WALTZ VON (1755–1813), Prussian
officer and military strategist; Chief of the Prussian General Staff
during the Napoleonic Wars. In response to Prussian military defeats,
argued that only a modern national army based on merit promotion,
universal service and modern weaponry could improve Prussia’s fortunes.
Died in battle.

SCHEIBLER, KAROL (1820–81) German industrialist; originally from
Belgium, he moved to Russian-occupied Poland in 1848 and helped
establish the textile industry in the city of Łódź, building a series of
factories and businesses. He became very wealth during the 1860s, when
he managed to obtain supplies of cotton for his factories that were
unavailable to other industrialists.

SCHILLER, CHRISTOPH FRIEDRICH VON (1759–1805), German poet, historian,
playwright and philosopher. One of the most outstanding representatives
of the German enlightenment, he made important contributions on
aesthetics, ethics, and the meaning of human emancipation. His
distinction between overcoming the divide between “formal drive” and
“sensuous drive” through the realization of the “play drive” anticipates
later utopian thinkers and had an especially important impact on the
thought of such twentieth century critical theorists as Herbert Marcuse.

SCHIPPEL, MAX (1859–1928), German Social Democrat and journalist;
originally a follower of Rodbertus and Albert Schäffle, he was a
long-time leader of the revisionist wing of the SPD. He supported German
imperialism and militarism and was a strong supporter of World War I.

SCHMOLLER, GUSTAV VON (1838–1917), leading _Kathedersozialist_, or
“Socialist of the Chair.” Leading member of the inductive historical
school of economics that opposed both classical political economy and
marginal utility theory. Advocated social reforms along the lines of a
corporativist union of labor and industry. He was an outspoken supporter
of German militarism and imperialism; strong supporter of Bismarck’s
policies.

SCHÖNBERG, GUTAV VON (1839–1908), German economist; specialized in the
field of agricultural economics. Worked closely with members of the
German historical school.

SCHULZE-DELITZSCH, HERMANN (1808–1883), German left of center economist
who organized some of the world’s first credit unions and worked to
create “people’s banks” to make capital more readily available to small
businessmen and traders. Ferdinand Lassalle sharply critiqued him (in
_Herr Bastiat—Schulze von Delitzsch, der ökonomische Julian, oder
Kapital und Arbeit_) for promoting policies that were not conducive to
the struggles and aims of the working class.

SHULZE-GÄVERNITZ, GERHART VON (1864–1943), German economist whose
studies on the Russian economy were used by Luxemburg in _The Industrial
Development of Poland_. He also authored a book on the work of the
English publicist Thomas Carlyle.

SCHURTZ, HEINRICH (1863–1909), German ethnologist and cultural historian
who studied African initiation rites. He opposed Bachofen’s theory of
“mother right” and matrilineal descent by arguing that early societies
were characterized by male bonding and male domination.

SERRA, ANTONIO (1580–1650), Italian philosopher and economist, supporter
of mercantilism; best known for his work on the nature of coinage and
monetary circulation, he was one of the first economists to emphasize
the importance of the balance of trade.

SHARAPOV, SERGEI FEDOROVICH (1855–1911), conservative Russian writer and
economist; advocated the eventual union of all Slavs in a single
national state under Russian tutelage. He was a political reactionary
who attacked the gold standard on the grounds that it was part of an
international Jewish conspiracy. Argued against those who held that the
infusion of capital from overseas would enable Russia to become
industrialized.

SHCHERBATOV, A.G. (1850–1915), member of the Russian nobility, a
conservative who worked closely with the Slavophiles. Traveled to the
Middle East in the 1880s, where he obtained horses that he bred on a
special farm in the North Caucasus.

SCHÜLLER, RICHARD (1870–1972), Austrian economist associated with the
neo-classical Austrian School of economics; student and follower of Carl
Menger. Worked as an official in the Ministry of Trade and Foreign
Office in the Austro-Hungarian Empire, prior to World War I; his
specialty was foreign trade policy. Emigrated to the US in 1940, where
he remained until his death.

SIEBER, NIKOLAI IVANOVITCH (1844–88), Ukrainian economist and writer,
wrote a thesis in 1871 entitled “The Theory of Value and Capital. D.
Ricardo in Connection with Later Explanations,” one of the first works
in Russian to discuss Marx’s _Capital_. Taught political economy at the
University of Kiev from 1873 to 1875 and later lived in Switzerland and
England, where he met with Marx and Engels. He held that communal forms
of social interaction are universal features of early human societies.
He also argued that capitalism was an inevitable stage of development
Russia was compelled to undergo, interpreting Marxism along strictly
evolutionary deterministic lines.

SISMONDI, CHARLES LÉONARD SIMONDE DE (1773–1842), Swiss economist and
historian; denied capitalism tended toward conditions of equilibrium and
full employment, arguing that a lack of aggregate demand led to
persistent economic crises. Although a critic of classical political
economy’s emphasis on an unrestricted free market, he was not a
socialist but rather called upon the existing state to regulate the
distribution of social wealth. His work represents a forerunner of the
theory of under-consumptionism.

SKODA, EMIL VON (1839–1900), Czech engineer and industrialist; built a
series of armaments plants that was the largest industrial enterprise in
Austro-Hungarian Empire and became known as the Skoda works. It played a
pivotal role in arms manufacturing during both World War I and World War
II.

SMITH, ADAM (1723–90), Scottish philosopher and economist, leading
figure of classical political economy. Formulated the labor theory of
value in his major and pathbreaking work, _The Wealth of Nations_
(1776). Although often considered a leading proponent of laissez-faire
capitalism, he supported government intervention in the economy to
mitigate against monopolies and help ameliorate severe poverty and
inequality.

SODEN, FRIEDRICH JULIUS HEINRICH, GRAF VON (1754–1832), German jurist
and economist who commented critically on the work of Adam Smith.

SOLON (638–558 BC), ancient Greek statesman, lawmaker and poet who is
credited with laying the foundations of later Athenian democracy;
legislated that the poorest class of Athenian citizens, the _Thetes_, be
admitted to the Assembly governing Athens and broadened the financial
and property qualifications needed to hold office. His abolition of debt
obligations for the poorest citizens helped undermine the power of the
Athenian aristocracy.

SOMBART, WERNER (1864–1941), German economist and sociologist, leading
figure in the “Young Historical School” of empirical-based social
theory. Studied under Gustav von Schmoller and later befriended such
figures as Max Weber and Carl Schmidt. An avowed Marxist in his early
years, his major works are _Der modern Kapitalismus_ (Modern Capitalism)
(1902) and _Why there is no Socialism in the United States_ (1906), a
highly influential work that promoted the myth of American
exceptionalism. By the 1930s he moved to the Right and supported a
corporativist fusion of state power and economic development.

SOMLÓ, FELIX (1873–1920), Hungarian sociologist and ethnographer, part
of the school of legal positivism; wrote on totemism and the nature of
folklore in ancient societies.

SPENCER, WALTER BALDWIN (1860–1929), British-Australian biologist and
anthropologist; in 1894 part of the W.S. Horn scientific expedition that
explored central and western Australia; on the basis of his experiences
of living among the Aborigines, he wrote extensively on their culture
and languages.

SPINOZA, BENEDICT DE (1632–77), Jewish-Dutch philosopher and leading
figure of Western rationalism; sought to extend Descartes’s discoveries
by fully integrating geometric methods and veridical knowledge into
philosophy. Hegel held that “all true philosophy begins with Spinoza”;
Marx carefully read both his political and philosophical works.

STARCKE, CARL NICOLAI (1858–1926), Danish politician and sociologist who
opposed Darwin’s theories from an anti-evolutionist perspective.

STEIN, HEINRICH FRIEDRICH KARL REICHSFREIHERR VOM UND ZUM (1757–1831),
Prussian statesman who introduced a series of political, economic, and
military reforms following Napoleon’s victory over Prussian forces in
1806.

STEINEN, KARL VON DEN (1855–1929), German physician, explorer, and
ethnologist; made a journey around the world, 1879–81; best known for
his several expeditions to the Xingú region of Brazil between 1884 and
1888, which he recorded in a book about native peoples of central
Brazil; he also published works on the culture and languages of the
native peoples of the Caribbean.

STORCH, HEINRICH FRIEDRICH VON (1766–1835), German-Russian economist; in
1819 wrote an influential work on political economy that presented a
modified form of Adam Smith’s classical theory of value; developed the
theory of “internal goods”—moral and cultural factors that he considered
crucial for economic development.

SUTHERLAND-LEVERSON-GOWER, ANNE (1829–88), born Anne Hay-Mackenzie, she
married the Marquis of Stafford in 1849 and became the Duchess of
Sutherland in Scotland; her wealth largely derived from clearing the
highlands to make room for sheep farming, causing Marx to write, “The
history of the wealth of the Sutherland family is the history of the
ruin and of the expropriation of the Scotch-Gaelic population from its
native soil.”

STEWART, DUGALD (1753–1828), philosopher and mathematician of the
Scottish Enlightenment; initially studied under Adam Ferguson, who
preceded Adam Smith in proclaiming labor as the source of all value.
Taught moral philosophy and economics at Edinburgh University and upheld
many of the philosophical ideas of Thomas Reid; he was generally
supportive of the democratic and revolutionary movements of his time.
Marx refers to his work several times in _Capital_.

SIGURD, SYR HALFDANSSON (birth date unknown; died 1018), King of
Ringerike, a territory in southern Norway; emphasized the importance of
farming and led a relatively modest life for a nobleman. He became a
Christian in 998.

TACITUS, PUBLIUS CORNELIUS (56–117 AD), Roman historian, author of the
_Annals_ and the _Histories_, which delineate the reigns of the early
Roman emperors. One of the greatest of the ancient historians, he made
careful use of official sources and documents and avoided mythological
presentations of historical events.

TEMPLE, WILLIAM (1628–99), English politician and diplomat; served as
advisor to Charles II of England; Jonathan Swift served as his secretary
for a brief period; wrote a series of essays on the nature of
government.

THOMPSON, BENJAMIN, COUNT OF RUMFORD (1753–1814), British physician and
scientist; born and raised in New England, he opposed the American
Revolution and moved to England; much of his scientific work concerned
the generation of heat and furnaces. On the basis of his knowledge of
caloric theory, he wrote about the minimum amount of food that is
necessary to reproduce the labor power of the industrial worker.

THOMPSON, WILLIAM (1775–1833), Irish economist, social reformer, and
neo-Ricardian socialist; used Smith and Ricardo’s labor theory of value
to critique capitalist exploitation by attacking the discrepancy between
the value of the product and the value of the workers’ wages. He
advocated a cooperative form of communism based on the independent
resources of the working class.

THORNTON, WILLIAM THOMAS (1813–80), English neo-Ricardian economist;
1858–80, secretary for public works in the India office; author of
_Over-Population and its Remedy_ (1846), which advocated a plan for
colonizing Irish wastelands by Irish peasants. Worked with John Stuart
Mill for many years and played an important role in Mill’s recantation
of the theory of the wage fund. He was a major critic of the
unrestrained free market and defender of the rights of workers; author
of _On Labor, its Wrongful Claims and Rightful Dues, its Actual Present
and Possible Future_ (1869).

THEOPOMPUS OF CHIOS (378–320 BC), ancient Greek historian; wrote a
history of Philip II of Macedon and is a source for information about
Alexander the Great.

THIERRY, AUGUSTIN (1795–1856), French historian who was a follower of
the utopian socialist Saint-Simon. Supporter of the 1830 Revolution in
France, he was a moderate liberal in politics. Moved to the Right after
the 1848 Revolutions. Many of his historical works (such as _History of
the Conquest of England by the Normans_) dealt with the Middle Ages. His
most famous book is _History of the Third Estate_.

THIERS, ADOLPHE (1797–1877), French politician and historian; Served as
Prime Minister of France in 1836, 1840, and 1848. An opponent of
Napoleon III, he returned to power in the national elections of February
1871 and sued for peace with the Germans. Forced to flee Paris because
of the Paris Commune of 1871, he directed the government forces that
broke through the city defences, resulting in the slaughter of tens of
thousands of communards. Following his brutal repression of the Commune,
he became President of France, only to be forced from power in 1873 by
opposition from the monarchists.

THÜNEN, JOHANN HEINRICH VON (1783–1850), German economist who developed
a theory of ground rent based on spatial economics by emphasizing such
factors as transport costs and access to ports in determining the cost
of production. In his later work he emphasized the importance of the
class struggle between the industrialist and artisan and expressed
considerable support for the latter’s demands.

TIMIZIRIAVEZ, DMITRI A. (1837–1903), Russian statistician who worked for
the Russian Ministry of Finance. He also served as a trade
representative to Romania, Serbia, and Turkey; in 1894 he served as a
member of the Russian Ministry of Agriculture and State Property.

TIMUR (1336–1405), Mongol-Turkic conqueror and founder of the Timurid
dynasty; also known as Tamerlane; originally from modern Uzbekistan, he
conquered an enormous area, including the Middle East, southern Russia,
Persia, and northern India; died while en route to conquer China. Though
known as one of the most brutal conquerors in history, he was also a
patron of the arts and sciences and helped make his capitol Samarkand
one of the most splendid cities of the medieval world.

TRIROGOV, W. G. (birth and death dates unknown), Russian economist,
studied communal land formations among the Russian peasantry. Author of
_The Village Community and the Poll Tax_ (1882).

THOMPSON, WILLIAM (1775–1833), Irish economist, philosopher, and social
reformer; an early critic of capitalism, he concluded from the labor
theory of value that workers are wrongly dispossessed of the product of
their labor. A leading radical neo-Ricardian, his work had an important
impact on the cooperative movement and was highly praised by Marx. He
was a strong supporter of women’s rights and criticized other utopian
socialists for authoritarian and anti-democratic tendencies.

TOWNSEND, JOSEPH (1739–1816), English physician and geologist; a
political reactionary, he argued in such works as _A Dissertation on the
Poor Laws_ against providing public assistance for the poor on the
grounds that it leads to overpopulation and a redundant labor force.

TROTHA, LOTHAR VON (1848–1920), German militarist and imperialist; in
1900, led a brigade that helped suppress the Boxer Rebellion in China;
in 1904–05, led a genocidal campaign against the Herero and Nama peoples
in Southwest Africa, in which he ordered his troops to slaughter all
men, women and children; an extreme German nationalist and racist, he
formed the Thule Society after World War I, which had an important
impact on forming the ideology of the young Adolph Hitler.

TUGAN-BARANOVSKY, IIKHAIL (1865–1919), Ukrainian economist and
politician, a representative of “legal Marxism”; helped develop the
theory of long waves of capitalist development, later taken up by
thinkers such as N. Kondratiev; critical of both the labor theory of
value and neo-classical marginal utility theory, he moved away from
Marxism after the turn of the century towards neo-Kantianism; criticized
extensively in Luxemburg’s _Accumulation of Capital_. He became a
leading opponent of the Bolsheviks after the Russian Revolution of 1917
and was active in the Ukrainian Party of Socialist-Federalists.

TURGOT, ANNE-ROBERT-JACQUES, BARON DE LAUNE (1717–81), French economist
and politician, a leading figure of the Physiocrats; supported free
trade and economic liberalism. Served in several posts in the French
government in the 1770s, including Controller-General; sought to reduce
France’s budget deficit while resisting efforts to increase taxes on
land. He supported “enlightened” monarchical rule.

VANDERBORGHT, RICHARD (1861–1926), German jurist and statistician; his
published works mainly focused on the economics of transportation; his
major work is _The Economic Importance of the Rhine-Maritime_.

VARNHAGEN, RAHEL (née Levin) (1771–1833), German writer and feminist;
part of the romantic movement; advocated women’s rights and opposed
anti-Semitism. An associate of numerous leading intellectuals of the
time, such as Friedrich Schlegel and Alexander von Humboldt; author of
numerous letters (6,000 in all) on social, political, and literary
issues, most of which were published after her death.

VERRI, PIETRO (1728–97), Italian philosopher and economist, close to the
French Encyclopaedists of the Enlightenment. Promoted anti-feudal
reforms from a mercantilist perspective; a supporter of free trade;
author of _Meditations on Political Economy_ (1771).

VORLÄNDER, KARL (1860–1928), German neo-Kantian philosopher who explored
the ramifications of Kant’s philosophy for socialist thought; wrote a
widely-acclaimed biography of Kant as well as a history of philosophy;
author of _Kant, Hegel, and Socialism_ (1920).

WADE, JOHN (1788–1875), English journalist; contributed to _The
Spectator_ and other periodicals. Wrote numerous articles defending the
rights of workers and attacking the inequality and corruption of British
society. His book _History of the Middle and Working Classes, with a
Popular Exposition of the Economical and Political Principles which have
influenced the Past and Present Condition of the Industrious Orders_
(1833) was cited by Marx in _Capital_.

WAGNER, ADOLPH (1835–1917), German economist and statist socialist. A
political conservative, he opposed the aims of the workers’ movement in
favor of supporting Bismarck and German imperial expansion; in 1878 he
joined the anti-Semitic Christian Social Party. Author one of the first
critical discussions of Marx’s _Capital_ in Germany, which Marx
responded to at length.

WALLER, HORACE (1833–96), editor and missionary; traveled to Central
Africa in 1861 and spoke out against mistreatment of the Africans by the
Europeans. Returning to England in 1864, he became a member of the
committee of the Anti-Slavery Society; edited David Livingstone’s
journals for publication.

WALTERSHAUSEN, SARTORIUS VON (1809–76), German geologist; made numerous
contributions to mineralogy and the study of volcanoes.

WENCKSTERN, ADOLPH WILHELM VON (1862–1914), German academic economist,
author of several works on Marx and socialist theory; sought to
reconcile Marx’s ideas with marginal utility theory. Although
sympathetic to aspects of Marx’s work, he argued that Marx erred in
failing to assign a productive role to the capitalist entrepreneur; also
argued society could never dispense with private property and exchange.

WEITLING, WILHELM (1808–1871), German and American radical political
activist, considered one of the founders of German communism; a
self-educated tailor, became active in socialist and communist circles
in the 1830s; in 1837 joined the League of the Just, one of the earliest
communist organizations in Europe. Marx initially praised his 1842 work
_Guarantees of Harmony and Freedom_. Clashed with Marx during and after
the 1848 Revolutions over his advocacy of various schemes to immediately
seize power through an enlightened minority. After the 1848 Revolutions,
moved to New York, where he became active on behalf of the workers’
movements.

WESTERMARCK, EDWARD (1862–1939), Finnish sociologist who studied
marriage and argued the nuclear family is necessary for the survival of
the species. Engels sharply criticized him in _Origin of the Family,
Private Property, and the State_.

WILDA, WILHELM EDUARD (1800–56), German lawyer and legal historian,
specialized in the study of criminal law.

WIRTH, MAX (1822–1900) (1822–1900), German economist and journalist,
primarily known for his studies of the labor market. Most important work
was _Geschichte der Handelskrisen_, a study of the history of economic
crises.

WITTE, SERGEI (1849–1915), Russian politician, served in numerous
government posts under Tsar Alexander III and Nicholas II; as head of
Finance Ministry from 1892 to 1903 presided over the industrialization
of Russia. He helped negotiate an end to the Russo-Japanese War of 1905
and advocated the introduction of various reforms after the 1905
Revolution, such as the formation of elected parliament and a
constitutional monarchy. A liberal by temperament, he criticized
Russia’s entry into World War I.

WITZLEBEN, JOB VON (1783–1837), Prussian military leader; fought in the
Battle of Jena, after which he argued for major reforms of the Prussian
military.

WOLF, JULIUS (1862–1937), professor of economics at Zurich University,
with whom Rosa Luxemburg studied. He was her faculty adviser in the
writing of her doctoral dissertation, _The Industrial Development of
Poland_. On completion of that work she received her doctoral degree in
1897.

WOLFF, WILHELM (1809–64), German revolutionary and writer. He was
imprisoned in the 1830’s for his work as a radical student activist, and
subsequently became active in the labor and socialist movements. In 1846
he became a close friend of Karl Marx, who dedicated Volume One of
_Capital_ to his memory. Originally from Silesia, he wrote a series of
important articles in the _Neue Rheinische Zeitung_ exposing the
deprivations imposed upon the German peasantry.

ZALESKI, WITOLD (1836–1908), Polish statistician and demographer, taught
political economy in Warsaw (in 1869) and commerce (from 1873–1906) in
Kronenberg. In 1882 he helped direct the census of the Kingdom of Poland
and tsarist Russia.

ZETKIN, CLARA JOSEPHINE (1857–1933), German Social Democrat and
feminist; 1892–1917, chief editor of the Social Democratic women’s
publication, _Gleicheit_; 1895–1917, member of the Control Commission of
the SPD; 1906–17, member of the SPD’s Education Committee; in 1907,
became secretary of the International Women’s Secretariat; in 1910, an
initiator of the practice of holding an annual International Women’s Day
on March 8; leading figure of the anti-war German Left, she contributed
to _Die Internationale_ and served as a member of the Spartacus Group.
She was one of Luxemburg’s closest friends and associates, with whom she
carried on a lively and active correspondence.

ZIBER, NIKOLAI, see SIEBER, NIKOLAI.

ZURITA, ALONZO DE (1512–85), Spanish lawyer and historian, known for his
chronicles of the conquest of Mexico and the Incan Empire by the
Spanish; served as Governor of New Granada (modern-day Colombia and
Venezuela) from 1550–52.
